|-| cntvgmh || 5 || When we identified the dominant species of the planet, we were disappointed, to say the least. They were argumentative, bad tempered, and unkind. Our efforts at taming them were, at first, mostly futile. 


We had the most luck with their young. It seems that the emergence of maturity in this species triggers an irrationally territorial pattern of behavior that, once established, is nearly impossible to correct. The young, whilst still argumentative and phenomenally bad tempered, are more kind and certainly more intelligent.


Appealing to this kindness was key, but whilst the adults held authority in their packs, it would not be wise to let our true purpose be known and so we kept ourselves hidden out of their sight, fearing that irrational territorial anger. Appealing to their young was much more successful, as they are naturally indulgent towards their offspring.

"Mum, Danny needs more batteries!"

"Sweetheart, Danny isn't real"

"I know. But he still needs more batteries for his invisible space ship!"

Children and their imaginations, the adults sigh. In truth, their children are as dull and unimaginative as they are - but they are more kind. |-| 
|-| cntvnm3 || 29 || I keep calm and put down the cookie. There are no threats to be seen, which means there's only one threat there COULD be.

Ducking I dodge the blowgun darts just barely. The black egg crashes near me and my eyes - well, they would be watering and blinded, but I am using a pair of wineglasses as goggles. Crawling across the floor I make it to the hallway only to see the washroom door open and three kunai fly towards me. I take one to the shoulder and sprint to the kitchen, knowing (but not hearing) them right behind me. Smashing the kitchen door open, I grab a bottle of oil, drizzle it over myself and jump into the nearest flambe. Flaming, I run out the back door through the streets to safety.

Why the fire? Well...  Ninjas can't catch you if you're on fire! |-| 
|-| cntvt3p || 7 || ...and then he paused. This great and powerful figure just stopped. He was looking in my direction when he did and it took me a few moments to realize he was looking directly at me. It wasn't too long after that when everyone began to look at me. The strange tickle that I always had at the back of my mind was now a full blown electric shock.

It was in that moment when everyone in the crowd said one thing that vibrated every molecule of my body...

"**WAKE UP**". |-| 
|-| cntw5vu || 65 || My first thought was, "Why do they have fortune cookies in a Japanese restaurant?" My second thought was, "why did it say 'run'?" Than the person at table 6 got hit with a dart. Why can waiters never remember peoples tables? |-| 
|-| cntwoes || 143 || Something I wrote recently that is relevant.

Collapse:

It was just a little over one-hundred and two days before our leaders used the nukes. I still remember the time before they rained fire and destruction upon the Earth. None of us thought it would come to this. How could we?

We’d all seen the same footage, ever increasing in frequency over time. Our best thinkers blamed climate change. They weren’t wrong, but there was more to it. The higher sea levels coupled with increasingly extreme conditions resulted in our shores being battered by monstrous waves. This in turn accelerated erosion. Huge fragments of rock face broke from their union with the land, shook, and plummeted into the savage waters below. Some of our more privileged watched from a distance as the crumbling edges of our nations dragged their affluent homes with them into the view they had held so dear. Disturbing as all that was we grumbled on social media, called on the political elite to take climate change more seriously and generally went about our day-to-day activities. Sufficed to say nothing really changed.

With a rapidly altering coastline a subculture of what they liked to call, rather grandiosely, Climate Coastal Cartographers, or Carters for short, formed around the globe. The internet was their natural home where they exchanged the newly captured face of their local cliffs, after each collapse. Some started highlighting interesting patterns being revealed in the newly exposed rock. Clear cases of pareidolia. There was one Carter in Australia who upon photographing the most recent collapse noticed something peculiar. Where there had been rock strata before, there was now none. This sparked debate and scepticism among the Carter community. That is until it started to happen elsewhere. It wasn’t long before it made it into the news. Creationists lapped it up and saw it as evidence to refute the fossil record. People of science worked hard at explaining what we were seeing. They needn’t have bothered. The explanation soon presented itself.

The Carters continued in their task of documentation. Their numbers swelled. As the strata mystery deepened it was noted that the patterns revealed by collapses were increasingly detailed. Some began to take the shape of fragmented hieroglyphics. Some wild claims were being made that they were some ancient carvings but no one was sure how they could have come to be. As the collapses continued it became clear that there were larger rock structures that ran deep into the land. The cliffs at lands edge were crumbling around them as though slowly peeling back. The hieroglyphics only appeared on these protruding structures. When the majority of observations began to distinctly look like anatomy it was speculated that groups were taking advantage of unstable cliffs and were, somehow, carving into them. Extreme natural vandalism some called it. Even a few people attempted to cash in on it claiming to be the ‘extreme artist’ behind the cliff features. As the designs accumulated a truly magnificent formation was discovered on a cliff on the coast of Ireland. The local tourist industry made noises about trying to preserve it. To stop any further collapses. There was nothing quite like it anywhere in the natural world. Protruding from the cliff were the full features of what could only be described as a face. Not human exactly, but unmistakably a face. Across its rock cheeks and sleeping eyes were examples of the fragmented hieroglyphics. It was as much a work of art as any most had seen. Early on some took to calling it the Irish Rushmore. People flocked to see it in person before the expected impending collapse. Boats at a safe distance, weather permitting, ferried people to take photos. For a nominal fee. There was a miniature tourist explosion in the region. T-shirts. Tacky trinkets. All emblazoned with ‘Aegeus of Eire’, as it had become known, and its image.

It was a tourist who captured the moment the strata mystery was solved. It was reported there had been a collapse. A boat had gotten too close to the cliff and was caught in the landslide. Air to sea rescue were dispatched. There was presumed to be no survivors, even with the ominous absence of bodies. Debris rode the waves that lapped at the foot of the cliff. Pieces of the wooden boat. Victims’ belongings. On one of the recovered cameras held the final moments of the people on that boat. When digital forensic experts extracted the file they didn’t quite understand what they were looking at. The owner of the camera was filming Aegeus with the babble of her fellow tourists around her. She zoomed in on one of the distinct eye shapes when there was a slip of some debris from it. The captain had noticed it as it splashed innocuously into the water. He decided to pull further away for safety sake. She continued to film. A warm magma coloured glow began to emanate from the hieroglyphics. More debris fell. The eye cracked open and a moving pupil scanned the retreating tourists. There was a gasp from the camera owner. She valiantly continued to film. The cliff began to violently shake. The remaining rock and clay was shed from the face and its true form was revealed. As Ireland itself appeared to crack an arched back breached further inland sending debris hurtling in all directions. The screaming began. The sound of the boat engine revving was heard. The great rock giant rose to its full might and stretched its arms. It had finally awoken. Debris was seen to strike the boat and cause enormous ripples on the water. When the violent rocking of the boat began to settle there was a distinct shake in the camera holders hand. She must have known it was her time. The creature moved quickly. Too quickly for its size. Its hand blocked out the sun and swooped toward the boat. The footage cut to white static.

I still dream about the night I first encountered one. Cowering with my family on the cold tile floor as it peeled back our roof revealing a brilliant starry night sky. I only saw it’s hand. I ran from the screams and didn’t look back.

Perhaps if they discovered the footage sooner we might have found a way to stop the others before they woke from their slumber. Perhaps we could have avoided using the nukes. I was more than a safe distance from the cities that the missiles struck. I came close to a blast zone once. I hadn’t realised I’d strayed that far. A small town, about fifty miles outside of the ruined city. It was in the third house in that particular ghost town I was stealthily ransacking, scavenging for food, that it finally struck me. Every analogue clock I’d seen, in this house and the previous two, were frozen in time at approximately 12:25. I quickly figured out that was around the time the bomb detonated. I hastily made my escape. Radiation was just another fear in this new world.

They’re still out there. Searching. Hunting. Devouring. The ravenous Ancients that now roam the Earth are driven by our destruction. They feed on us. Perhaps they’re Gaia’s footsoldiers taking her world back. Purging herself of humanity. Speculation at best. All I know for certain is I am alone. I am hunted. And I am afraid. |-| 
|-| cntwrkh || 19 || It was a simple message that we received that sparked controversy over whether or not it was real.

"Help."

Overnight all the world's leaders met and discussed the message we received. Was it real? Was it fake? If it was real, who sent it? Why would they send it to us? We did everything in our power to determine if the message was real or not, and to the world's surprise, it was real. 

The world became silent, afraid of the unknown. Our leaders were unsure of what to do at first, because if these aliens needed the help of a race that hadn't even left their solar system, what mess had they gotten into? What mess were we going into? It was a moral dilemma at this point, do we send soldiers into the unknown, risking their lives for a race we have barely spoken to, or fortify our defenses here.

The meeting between the world leaders was televised so nobody was uninformed. If we were going to go into a battle blind, we wanted those running into it to want to go into it. People from around the world voiced their opinions, many wanted to stay and prepare, many wanted to go and take the enemy head on. 

There was no clear way to tell who was winning after two months of discussing, until a single man spoke up. It was his words that swayed the minds of an entire planet.

"It does not matter who we are fighting. A race beyond the stars asked us to help them, and that is what we should do if we are to progress and begin diplomatic relations with beings not from our world. This is an opportunity to become one, this is an opportunity to show everybody that despite our differences we can work together to selflessly help others. Men and women of the world, I have nothing else to say but hope you decide to help them."

The week after this the world was up in arms with him, such influence! A man less than a hundred people knew was the one to inspire billions! The leaders of our world sided with him, and a war machine was awoken.

Within two months the world was finally at peace, within six months we had developed vehicles that could travel seamlessly through space, within two years we had trained men and women of all walks of life to live and fight in space.

We did not know what we were getting into, but we knew we had to help somehow. We knew we had to help a race from beyond the stars. We knew we were probably the last line of defense, a final stand in an intergalactic war. We knew many would die in this war, but we were going to surely make it a hell of a final stand.

Edit: Currently working on writing an additional part, I'm just wondering if people would want me to make it a bit long or whatever length would suffice them :) |-| 
|-| cntwybq || 6 || Gather round children, and I will tell you the story of these fabled ones.

This tale begins long, long ago, but takes place on the very ground you stand on today. There lived an enormous tribe of peoples who called themselves "Americans." They were great in number, and some say that their smallest encampment was greater that of all of our nation! They were said to have had weapons that we could only dream of, slings that would make tiny stones fly to the horizon, and rocky behemoths that threw boulders. It is also said that they tamed the birds of the sky, large as Rocs, and flew upon their backs! They were a terrible enemy to fight in battle, and would stop at nothing to get what they wanted. Cowards, they would often resort to shameful tactics, preferring to take out their enemies in the dark of night instead of facing them like true men.

Oh my, look at the sun! Hurry home children, before it becomes too dark. After all, it would be a shame if you were taken before I could finish with my tale! |-| 
|-| cntx1a3 || 14 || Well, my children, you have to remember it is a myth - and a bizarre one at that. The story can teach us many things, but who on earth today could verify its truth? According to the myth, the Americans were indeed a strange breed with equally strange practices. 

Hmmm.... where should we start? Perhaps daily activities are best. These humanoid giants began each day in a bath of chemicals, with each chemical holding a specific power to make them "beautiful". Some chemicals were rubbed all over their bodies, some only on their head hair, and even some on their teeth! As if this chemical bath process wasn't enough, the Americans frequently paid specialists to probe them, drill their teeth, cut open their bodies... All sorts of things of a gruesome nature... The Americans were known for diversity in looks in their population, but many of these activities aimed to make a race of people that followed one aesthetic ideal. 

Despite the complexity and pain of these "beauty" rituals, the Americans were a simple minded race. They were easily enthralled by tales of mythical light-beings that reside above the sky, and simplistic patterns captured their attention easily. They fervently followed flags and imaginary voices with little thought as to why. 

In their simple-mindedness, they also destroyed their habitat, leaving no trace of their once vast civilization. They frequently insulted one another over meaningless topics, and they took more than their fair share of resources from the land. Eventually, this led to bloodshed and violence among the Americans as they fought for food, water, shelter... All those things necessary to survive. The Americans were never able to reconcile old differences between the different light-beings they believed in, nor were they able to overcome centuries-old disagreements over skin and hair color. They divided themselves into groups, each believing his or her own group was better than the rest. Legend has it that one group did come to conquer the others, but the price of extensive warfare and trivial disagreements had already taken its toll. The winning group perished from their own selfishness, and the Americans were wiped from the face of the earth. |-| 
|-| cntx2bn || 112 || My eyes peered into the beaming face of my grandchild, who was lost in the pretense of a forthcoming tale of glory and myth. My thoughts were elsewhere, racing down halls of memory too vaulted and dark to explore at the moment. I snapped myself back to the now, to the lie I would have to spread once more. I swallowed, cracked a feeble smile, and poured out the stone-set story.

"Imagine a people who were driven solely by a love for something they created. A passion for their brothers and sisters and their freedoms as humans that was *so* important to them that they would die before forsaking it. They were a proud people, my son. And a brave people.

This beautiful land we live on was claimed by them in the name of that passion, was built upon, was traveled, was loved. America was an enormous place, big enough for the millions that flocked here over the course of the years. These people melded into the Americans we remember, but not after terrible strife. And after wars and deaths and dirt and delirium, the Americans pushed forward. They looked up from this great land and eyed the lights above - and they went there."

My grandson gasped as I spoke those last words, as he always does. I peered through a crack in the clay above and eyed a twinkling light set against the night. I sighed and continued.

"Those lights are stars, young one. Bright and huge and, above all else, home to worlds like this one. Worlds for humans to live on. And the Americans, as brave and passionate as they were, hurtled themselves upon steel and flame into that sky of lights. America was strong, as it had always been, but other lands wanted the stars as well. Other peoples sailed into the darkness, but the Americans were the first. Ship after ship carried Americans to new places, spread across the blackness of space. It's a vast and lonely distance between worlds, my son."

He cocked his head, barely catching enough breath to wheeze out, "Where are they now, pop? Where are the ships and stars and Americans?"

The lie must continue. He was too young to know, to be broken under the weight of hopelessness. I looked around at the dirt that made up our floor, at the thin patchwork that constituted our home. I sighed and spoke.

"They're still out there, son. The stars are far away from Earth, and Earth is waiting for them to return. They'll bring ships, and food and better homes for us all." I stole a final glance through the crack - the star had wheeled out of sight. Only night filled the void. "Bed now, my boy. Sleep well. Perhaps tomorrow the Americans will return." |-| 
|-| cntx95n || 8 || Julie paused the webgame she was playing, and picked up the telephone on the third ring. "Hello, University of Tasmania. How may I help you today?"

The voice on the other end of the line was faint but clearly agitated. "Elli..Elling..! I need to.. um.. Christ! I need Ellingsen! Get me..".

"Sir?" Julie cut in. "Sir, if you could just..", but was herself interrupted by the caller, "GET ELLINGSEN! NOW!".

Taking a slow breath to calm herself, Julie responed in the only way she knew how. "One moment, please. Hold the line." After all, she was a professional, and she was going to act like one, no matter the circumstances. She checked her computer screen to confirm where Professor Ellingsen was due to be, and was relieved to see he was down in the schedule as having a free period. Ellingsen always spent his free periods in the astrophysics laboratory. She quickly dailed through to the lab. "Professor? I've got a call for you. No, I don't know who it is. Yes. He was very persistant, Professor. Certainly." She transferred the call through, but her curiosity got the better of her and she stayed connected, so she could surreptitiously listen in to thier conversation.

-----

Simon Ellingsen patiently waited while the phone clicked softly in his ear, and the call was transferred. "Hello? This is Professor Ell.."

"Simon? Simon! It's Robert. Robert Gray! It's real! I mean, really real!"

"Wow, slow down, Rob!" Simon wasn't used to hearing his friend act this way. Robert Gray was a studious man by nature, and Simon wasn't sure if he'd ever even heard him swear before. "What are you talking about? What's real?"

The answer took his breath away. "The signal, Simon. The signal! I've.. I've cracked it! It was the hydrogen line! That was the clue all along.."

Simon interupted his friend. "You.. you've done what?" He was finding it difficult to concentrate on what Robert was saying. "You've found it again?" It has been almost forty years since Ehman had first detected the signal, and nobody had managed to find it since, despite some of the best minds in the business, working with the best instruments available. Simon himself had spent almost thirty years searching for a repeat occurance, but nothing had ever been found. Most scientists he knew had secretly given up, putting it down to a false reading or a freak reflection from a satellite or debris of some sort. To think that Robert might have found the signal again was something quite incredible.

"Found it? Simon, I haven't found it, I've cracked it! I know what it is." Robert was almost shouting at this point. "I found the cipher in the signal! It was so bloody simple I cried. I actually cried!"

Simon took a slow, deep breath, hardly able to comprehend what he was hearing. Was Robert really saying he had found a *message* in the original signal? A real, provable extraterrestrial message? The possibilities... The *implications*..! He decided to pick his next words carefully.

"Robert, are you seriously telling me that you've actually *deciphered* the signal?"

"Yes! That's exactly what I'm saying. I'm.. I just had to tell you first."

Simon could barely contain himself. "Well, what the hell is it?"

He could hear Robert take a few quick breaths to compose himself, before continuing. "It's a three-part signal, hidden within the base frequency. The change is so damn subtle that nobody realised it before. It's only luck I managed to stumble on it myself. The key was the Hydrogen baseline, but I had to tweak it to account for atmospheric disturbances and.. well.. hell, I'll tell you all that later. It's the signal itself you need to know about. The first part was simply a mathematical representation of our Solar System, I guess to show us that the message was indeed meant for us directly, which in itself is enough to blow the mind, but the second part, the main part, is so much more. It's full of information. There's Pi, our DNA structure, the Fibonacci sequence, the periodic table, thousands and thousands of terrabytes of information, I haven't even scratched the surface of working it all out yet. There's stuff there that I simply don't recognise at all, it's so far beyond me! It's .. it's astounding!"

Simon could hardly take all this in, it was so far removed from anything he could ever had hoped for. "We need to get all this to.. to.." He paused for a second, suddenly realising he didn't know exactly *where* he needed to get all this to. It needed to go *somewhere*, though, and it needed to go now. "Let me make some calls, and we can.."

"No. Not yet. Not until you hear the last part. It's a message, Simon. Repeated in every language you can think of. It's.. well, it's a warning, and a call for help." 

Simon could hear the concern in Robert's voice, and it worried him. "Help?"

"I.. maybe it's best if I just read it to you.". Robert coughed, and began to read the message out loud. "DEAR HUMANS, WE HOPE THIS REACHES YOU IN TIME. YOU DO NOT KNOW US, BUT WE HAVE BEEN OBSERVING YOUR KIND SINCE YOUR FIRST BEGINNINGS. WE HAVE WATCHED YOU GROW, AND OUR HEARTS HAVE FILLED WITH LOVE. FOR SO MANY MILLENNIA WE THOUGHT WE WERE ALONE IN THE UNIVERSE. WE THOUGHT WE WERE PURPOSELESS, DEVOID OF MEANING. BUT THEN WE DETECTED YOUR KIND. WE HEARD YOUR SIGNALS, WEAK AND PRIMITIVE THOUGH THEY WERE, AND WE FOUND JOY. WE FOUND PURPOSE. WE PROPOSED TO WATCH YOU GROW, AND ONCE YOU WERE READY TO MOVE BEYOND YOUR HOME, WE WERE GOING TO BE THERE TO WELCOME YOU; TO NOURISH YOU. WE WANTED TO SHOW YOU THE WONDERS WE HAD FOUND. WE WANTED TO SHARE OUR WISDOM, AND OUR LOVE. HOWEVER, WE FEAR THIS NOW WILL NOT COME TO PASS, SO WE SEND YOU ALL WE HAVE AS OUR ONLY GIFT TO YOU. WE SEND IT WITH LOVE, AND WITH A WARNING. WE WERE ARROGANT IN OUR BELIEF THAT WE WERE ALONE, AND THAT ARROGANCE HAS COST US DEARLY. THERE IS ANOTHER SPECIES. WE KNOW NOT WHERE THEY CAME FROM, OR WHAT PURPOSE THEY SERVE, EXCEPT TO DESTROY. OUR KIND ARE ALMOST ALL GONE NOW, AND WE CANNOT HOPE TO SURVIVE MUCH LONGER. OUR ONLY HOPE IS MANKIND. YOU ARE THE ONLY OTHER SENTIENT SPECIES WE HAVE FOUND. AND OUR ONLY HOPE FOR SALVATION, THOUGH WE FEAR THAT YOU ARE NOT YET READY. HELP US IF YOU CAN, AND IF NOT... IF NOT, YOU MUST HIDE, LEST THEY LEARN OF YOUR EXISTENCE TOO. HIDE AND..."

"And what?", shouted Simon down the phone. "Hide and what?"

Robert's reply was stark. "That's it. That's how the message ends. I guess it's all they managed to send. We need to contact NASA, ESA, everybody we can. Tell them what we have, tell them to stop sending signals out into space. You heard the message. We need to *hide* from whoever or whatever's out there!"

Simon could feel a pressure growing inside his skull, slowly at first, but with increasing urgency. "But we've been broadcasting for decades! We're like a bloody Christmas tree!"

"Don't worry, it's mostly low frequency stuff, nothing that could reach too far...", but Simon could feel the pressure still building in his head, like a balloon ready to pop.

"We're missing something, I know we are.." he whispered, almost to himself.

-----

Julie could hardly believe what she had just heard these two professors saying to each other. Were they really talking about a message from space? A call for help? A warning? From *aliens*? Surely it must be some kind of joke they were playing. Did they know she was listening? Who was this caller, anyway? She closed her now-forgotten webgame and pulled up google. It didn't take her long to work out what signal they were talking about: the 'Wow' signal was pretty well known anyway, and working in a University dedicated to space research certainly helped. She clicked the wikipedia link and started reading. When she reached the bottom of the page, her face had turned ashen:

*'Response:*

*In 2012, on the 35th anniversary of the Wow! signal, Arecibo Observatory beamed a response from humanity, containing 10,000 Twitter messages, in the direction from which the signal originated. In the response, Arecibo scientists have attempted to increase the chances of intelligent life receiving and decoding the celebrity videos and crowd-sourced tweets by attaching a repeating sequence header to each message that will let the recipient know that the messages are intentional and from another intelligent life form.'*

**NOTE: This is a slightly altered version of a story I did for a WP last week. I don't normally like to recycle, but as nobody read that one, I think I can give myself a pass this time.**

**NOTE 2: Simon Ellingsen and Robert Gray are real, and have been actively searching for a repeat of the Wow! signal for over three decades.**

*Edited for clarity and words and stuff.* |-| 
|-| cntxvk3 || 8 || Jessie, James, and Meowth: Giovanni, we finally got him!

Giovanni: *Sits up in chair, white powder under nostrils.* The fuck? Who? Oh you three. I sent you on that mission like twenty years ago. There is literally FIVE MORE GENERATIONS of badass Pokemon to capture and you've been wasting your time on that non-evolving smug ass piece of shit electric mouse? Go catch me a legendary. See you in another twenty years. 

The End.  |-| 
|-| cnty3o7 || 15 || The first man I served struck me as kind of odd - he wore a dark suit, dark glasses, and had a light-skin coloured earpiece equipped which still managed to clash against his pasty white skin. He finished the soup real slowly, like he was sneering at something, and then went for a fortune cookie.

Something in his expression changed, I can't place exactly what, but the next thing I knew he'd sprinted right out of restaurant fast - unbelievably fast (seriously he could probably outrun a lot of olympic athletes!) 

He hadn't paid, but there wasn't much I could do - the guy had simply gone, like he never realy existed. I groaned internally.

I picked up his plate and put it to the side, and went to serve the next guy who took his seat. He was this really militant black guy, full beret and everything. He sat down and demanded to be shown a menu and practically freaked out when I asked him if he wanted his coffee white.  This guy was just clearly looking for any excuse...

Anyway, he ate his meal and then went for the fortune cookie. He stared at the fortune, stared at it *real* damn hard. Then he got up and made some massive scene about how the restaurant didn't treat him like a person and that he deserved to be here as much as anyone else. Not a fucking clue what prompted any of it, but I was grateful when he just finally got up and left. I groaned internally.

Again, I just placed the plate to the side next to the other and went to serve the new customers. This time it was a group of office workers celebrating their co-workers birthday. Said coworker was clearly not enjoying it. Someone had placed a sticker on his back that read 'Old Fart' and everyone was laughing at him behind his back.

I felt sorry for the guy who clearly needed a better group of friends, and so I mentioned that he had something on his back as I served him and every one of his so-called friends burst into laughter as he read what it said. He went a bit red but didn't say anything and I served the table.

After they all finished and paid, they all got up to leave except the birthday boy who reached for a fortune cookie and cracked it open. Something it said on it pissed him off, because he immediately ran over to the doorway and shoved one his coworkers into the wall, storming out without so much as a backwards glance. I groaned internally.

The day was getting weird, but I didn't have time to deal with this shit. Cleaned up the table and dumped the dishes to the side. 

This time it was a lady who just wanted some tea. Very easy customer. After she finished, she took a cookie. Some reason she then came right up to me and said that maybe the carpet could be pulled up to show the floorboards, and that it couldn't hurt to have some chinese staff. I told her I would pass on her suggestions, and then backed away. 

I took her plate and tried to put it on the side, but there was just no room. With a sigh I stacked up all the plates from the previous customers and carried them into the kitchen area to be cleaned.

As I was seperating the plates from one another, I couldn't help noticing that each of the customers had left their paper fortunes behind. Curious about the reasoning behind the prior incidents (the man in the suit, the militant man, the birthday victim, and the lady), I read them one after the other.

&gt; RUN

&gt; OUT

&gt; OF

&gt; IDEAS

I groaned internally. |-| 
|-| cnty4ef || 35 || Ben did not believe in Americans anymore. Nobody did. It was kids’ stuff. The kind of story they told when you were eight. Now that he was twelve, Ben had left childish things behind.

But still, deep in the back of his mind, there was an idea that maybe it was true. Maybe the network of dry river beds that ran through the countryside had once been a transportation system, built by the ancient Americans.

That’s what Popop thought. He never ceased boring everyone—almost everyone—with his tales about how the Americans had conquered the whole world, using ships that flew through the air. 

Today, Ben had walked along the riverbed on his way to Popop’s house. He tried to imagine what it must have been like, the way it was described: shiny steel ground ships powered by some invisible force, traveling faster than any steam horse. The riverbed now was so thick with trees and brush that it was hard to imagine. But Ben liked to do it, like to stretch out that make-believe part of his brain that adults were always telling him not to use. 

The old man was waiting for him, on the porch. Popop liked to sit there in the afternoon, drinking from his special bottle and watching the jaybirds in an old willow tree.

“The Americans started out good,” Popop said today. “You have to remember that. They were once ruled by an evil king. So they rose up as one and drove him away. They built a Republic. Do you know what that word means, Benny? It means a place where everybody is the same as everybody else.” 

“No steamlords?”

“No steamlords, buddy. The built a Republic here, in Jersylvania, and soon it spread to cover the whole world, pretty much. And people from all over the world came here to live. At first the Americans welcomed everyone who was willing to work hard and follow the ways of the Republic. And when people in China were being killed and needed help, the Americans went across the ocean and saved them.”

Ben had only the faintest idea of where China might be. The word meant everywhere that was not Jersylvania. He sometimes tried to imagine China and all he could come up with was that it was a place where people talked backward. China was not here. That’s what China was.

“In the end, though,” Popop said, “Something went wrong, Ben. They grew to be so proud of what they had done that it gave them funny ideas. Funny ideas, Ben. They started to think they were not really people any more. They started to think they could do anything they wanted to do, whenever they wanted to do it.”

“Like steamlords?”

“Sometimes worse, Ben. Because the Americans had such amazing magic, they could do more good than a steamlord ever could. But they could also do much worse. Much worse. 

It was getting late and Ben was meant to be going home. He asked Popop to tell him what happened to the Americans in the end. Ben had only a vague idea of a war, and then the Darkening Time when the old magic machines had died. 

But Popop told him to run along home. That was a story for another day. 
 |-| 
|-| cnty8lw || 513 || "They were great men, Arthur. They were men who rose up against those who would keep them down."

I pointed my nephew towards a path, and began walking into a forest in the middle of this bright day.

"They were men who thought differently from everyone else at the time." We continued to walk on a path. "It started with Washington. George Washington. He was the first to lead the Americans."

"Like a King!" He jumped in the air.

"Not really, Arthur." I waved off the reply. "You see, it was a Republic. People would pick their King, he was called a 'President.' and he only ruled for 4 years. 8 if he was beloved. And sometimes, in an era of great tragedy, He could serve 12 years." I laughed.

"What could make someone break the rules like that?"

"Oh, a great, great tragedy." I led him further down the path. "They were indeed, great men."

"Why don't we have something like that now, Grandpa?"

"Because, Arthur, in the end, Every empire falls. And everything dies." I came to an opening. "But if you look over there...Some things can last for a very, very long time."

"Whoa!"

I pointed to a cliff-face. Where, 30,000 years ago, Four of those giants were frozen in time, forever watching over the land they had built, maintained, and then watched crumble to the ground.

It fell, as every empire does. |-| 
|-| cnty97b || 65 || "A... Pikachu." Giovanni's poker face was legendary but even he had let a slight smirk out at the offering. Standing no higher than 2 feet, the small, frightened creature was crying in a box that seemed to be designed like a Meowth for some reason.

"Yes, sir! This little rat has more firepower than half the electric pokemon we currently have put together!" The lanky, blue haired man exclaimed dramatically. These two had been failures for a long time, kept employed only by the fact that for some reason they never actually asked for a wage, leaving them to go hungry whereas most agents lived like kings.

"Now, you say you killed this Pokemon's trainer, is that correct?" Asking questions you knew the answer to is the secret to power and Giovanni was no slouch in gaining power. You get them to answer one question with yes, then another, then another and by the time you've asked them to do something for you, they can hardly remember *how* to say no.

"Yes, Giovanni-sir, that little twerp will no longer be a thorn in our side." This one was attractive, had she been smarter the Team Rocket leader probably would have made her an admin just to keep her close. Inconsequential now, in any case.

"*Your side.* The only thing that child ever did to me was help stop one of my rare failed creations from destroying the whole planet. As it happens, I remember that lad. I can understand why he was a problem because he once faced me in a gym battle. I remember the twinkle in his eye as he sent that very Pikachu out against my Rhydon. Statistically and logically I should have won that battle but he prevailed. He won out over the strongest member of our organisation and I hoped one day we might recruit the boy.

Now obviously that will be impossible because you... What was it? Poisoned his dinner with your Victrebell from afar?"

It seemed the tone of the room had sunk into the two idiots standing in front of the proud gangster. The powerful of this world do not meet often but when they do, a bond is formed and this bond was shattered by two useless, pathetic and strung-out operatives.

"Enough, I am completely bored of this. Nidoqueen, Hyper Beam." The room was engulphed in a darkness that seemed to be absorbed into the  blue Pokemon's mouth before a brilliant light, much brighter than before blinded Giovanni and he had to close his eyes.

Once the ringing in his ears had stopped and he surveyed the damage, the man sighed, ordered a grunt who had come to see what the commotion was to clean the dust of the two, now vaporized, criminals from his site and arrange for someone to fix the gaping hope in the wall. Standing from his chair for the first time, Giovanni walked over to the now quiet, surely terrified Pikachu and looked into the cage, in his eyes, for a few moments before slowly pressing the release button and picking the tiny creature up.

For a moment the Pokemon was stiff and sparks flew from his cheeks but he was mollified when a drop of water landed on his nose. The brave little Pikachu looked up and saw that the boss of the strongest criminal organisation in Kanto brushing away a tear.

"I am sorry for your loss, he was strong trainer and a brave child." |-| 
|-| cntym0h || 6 || As I stared at the tiny slip of paper, I could hear the noises of the restaurant with almost crystalline clarity: the muted whir of the conveyor belt, the clink of chopsticks against porcelain, the distant sound of the greeters, shouting *irashai masen* on the far side of the room. I sat frozen on my stool. Plates of fatty tuna and boiled octopus slide through the periphery of my vision, but my eyes remained locked on the scroll in my hands; the scroll I'd just pulled from the fortune cookie. 

Three letters: RUN.

I got to my feet, pushing aside my stack of plates and glancing around, trying not to act suspiciously. It was Sunday. The restaurant was mostly deserted: a few businessmen eating alone; a young couple a few booths away, inhaling plates of *sashimi* in total silence; a group of high school girls giggling in the corner. I tried to spot the waiter who'd brought the cookie, placing it at my elbow. But he or she had disappeared. I couldn't even remember what they'd looked like... I fumbled with my coat. I was in Japan, why had the fortune been written in *romanji*? Something was up. 

I walked toward the front of the sushi joint, check in hand, pulling a ten thousand yen bill from my wallet. I slapped both onto the checkout counter and muttered a hasty *arigato gozaimasu* to the distracted greeter, as I slipped out into the street. It was a chilly day in downtown Osaka. The narrow alleys near the train station were virtually deserted. I hurried along at a brisk walk as I did up the buttons of my coat, but I'd barely gone a hundred meters when I heard the sound of footsteps behind me.

Glancing back, I saw a uniformed figure hurrying after me from the direction of the restaurant. Without a second thought, I broke into a dead run, my heart pounding. I paid no heed to where I was going, taking turns at random and almost body-checking an old lady at a crosswalk. Within minutes, I'd lost my pursuer. As I stopped to catch my breath, I realized it had probably been one of the greeters, trying to give me my change. I felt like an idiot. Was I imagining things? Had I overreacted?

The empty streets of Osaka held no answers for me. But when I turned over the fortune slip and read the writing on the back, I felt a chill run down my spine. |-| 
|-| cntzibf || 30 || Throughout the ages the human race had shared stories of the end. It was a longstanding morbid obsession born from our need to understand the unknown. Great beasts would rise from hell, stones would rain from the sky, god would come down and smite the unworthy. These tales twisted through time, changing in content and culture, but never deviating from the destruction at its heart. The human race could collectively feel the inevitability bearing down on them. It wasn't the fear of the world ending. It was the irrational but altogether human fear that it could end at any time. Humanity did not fear knowledge, they feared chaos.


It was a worldwide cry of fear when a street in Jerusalem cracked open and spewed piping hot lava across the retreating citizens. Reporters, helicopters and all manner of mass media mobilised and congregated to investigate this sudden occurrence. The crack had torn down the main road, upending all manner of vehicles, and glowed a faint pulsating red.

People had crowded around the split out of morbid curiosity, as is human nature. It seemed almost alive. With every dull throb of the crimson light, the people felt a great force pushing their minds back then whipping them back into place. The throbs grew more and more frequent, but the crowds could not look away, all the worlds' eyes had turned to the great gash in the middle of Jerusalem. That was when he rose.

A warped and twisted angel of damnation crawled from the crack in the earth. Massive blackened wings cast a great shadow across the street, blotting out the sun for all who were near. The torn wings merely served to frame the beast's imposing form. A hulking, roaring, demoniac physique marred by eternal hellfire. The scars ran deep along the blood-red skin, leaving torn wounds of black where the fire had raged. His eyes were a pure black, as were the curling horns set into his head. His voice a deep, guttural cry. It was a hollow and defeated voice, imposing only in what it represented. The sound of something long forgotten by mankind, the sound of something primeval stirring within the earth. It was a sound that no one there had ever heard, but a sound they knew nonetheless. A sound the stories had taught them to fear.

"Harken my call, o lowborn spawn of men." bellowed the crimson hellbeast, messenger of armageddon, "I have toiled and clawed from this sundered earth to deliver you to your end." It was a quiet day in Jerusalem, the streets were slowly emptying out as people passed through the city. Ancient, hewn stone flanked by cold monoliths of concrete and glass cast the heavy shadows of twilight over the city. "Eons ago, your very god spoke to me. To stoke the flames of hell until I could return once more. Rise as a bringer of the apocalypse." A major religious gathering of some sort had just occurred, pious people had preached and agnostics felt a bit more pious than usual. "Do not hate me, for you are my retribution. You are my forgiveness!"

"'Ey, buddy, yer a real good street performer. I'unno how you gets your eyes to light up like that, but good on'ya." shouted a man in a floral print shirt someway down the street. He raised a pudgy hand to his head, his painfully pink elbow sticking out as he did so, and readjusted the brim of his beige cap. It was his favourite cap of his favourite sports team, and he'd worn it ever since his dad bought it at the gift shop after they'd been denied entry into the stadium.

Gasps flew from the crowd, crazed stares shot towards the man. "'Ere, ya see, my lil boy, bless his lil soul, loves yer godzilla movies. An' I was wonderin' if you could do a..." the man rummaged around in his khaki shorts for a while, ignoring the piercing glow of the prince of hell bearing down on him.

"Insignificant huma-"

"'Ey, hold on. I just about found it." the man held a palm up to Satan, the polite way of telling the apocalypse to hold its horsemen. His other hand continued rummaging in various pockets and protrusions in his shopping. The crowd watched with bated breath. "Ah! 'Ere we go. 'Dear Santa, I'd like a new lego set fer xmas. My stupid lil brother broke my ol' one an' I heard the new 'obbit movies came out.'"

"Silence!" roared Satan, the scream curdled the blood of every man in the blast radius. "Do you wish the death throes of your species to be punctuated by a mislabelled request for plastic bricks?"

"If ye'd oblige." the man replied sheepishly.

"Do you even comprehend, with that fallible, weak little mortal mind, how *many* of those letters I find in hell?" growled Satan, visibly aggravating. Little pits of fire began to appear around him. "Your greatest sin will be spelling."

"Look, buddy, my lil boy, he really wants this 'ere lego thingy. Now I'd always thought Santa was a good ol' fellow, a real cheer 'e is, I said. I'd reckon you could do ol' Bob a favour 'ere and shell out some 'o those letgos?"

If the manifestation of evil could appear dumbfounded, it would be akin to the expression that graced Satan's features at that moment. "Really, this was all another test, wasn't it?"

"Nah, 'e did real well on his 'port card."

"You unforgiving wretch!" Satan cried at the sky. "First you tell me the Mayan apocalypse was cancelled? Then you deny me my birthright? I was promised the souls of humanity. Yet you continue to relent." what began as a booming outcry, had dwindled into a melancholy drone as he went on, only spiraling lower and lower into despair. "You test me! You test me with this wretched creature." he flung a clawed hand at the offending man, accidentally letting out a fireball and incinerating a nearby news van. "This willful mortal is not man, nor beast." he looked straight into the eyes of he who had scorned him. "I have seen your kind torment hell once before. Never again will I let a creature that can slay angel, demon and god into my abode! Never!" his anger returned, he spat at the man. "Filthy tourist."

"Look, can I at least get a picture fer me boy?"  |-| 
|-| cntziu2 || 17 || "You have spend billions of Pokédollars on catching this?", Giovanni asks lifting the caged Pikachu on the level of his eyes.

The trio consisting of Jesse, James and Meowth nods vividly - their pride and happiness can nearly be grasped as in envelopes them in a bright aura.

"Ok, so... can it do anything special?"

The bubble suddenly bursts and the three of them fall to the ground. Meowth is the first to recover and pulls himself up. His head barely above the top of Giovanni's desk he asks: "Special?"

"Yes, special", is Giovanni's annoyed answer. Pointing to the large machine with a green screen, large buttons and a long lever with a red head behind him he continues: "The readings show that his IVs are nothing special and his EVs are all over the place like it was fighting whatever. So did it know any special moves I can reteach it with a heartscale? Did it know Surf? Or even Fly?"

"Boss", Meowth asks seriously confused, "what are you talking about? It's a Pikachu, it know Thunder and stuff like this."

"So no special moves? Is it one of these new Cosplay Pikachus? Where are his costumes?"

Meowth looks over his shoulder but Jessie and James look just as confused as him. With shrugged shoulders they shake their heads synchronically.

One of Giovanni's eyebrows twitches, his irritation is building up. "So no special moves, no decent stats, no costumes - nothing? What did you idiots waste my money on?"

He must have gotten loud becase the incompetent trio is reduced to a big ball of hugs and shivers. For a moment he considers shouting at them a little longer. But no, that would be a wasted effort. It's okay - he never expected much out of them anyways. "I can catch a better Pikachu than this", he mutters as he puts the cage back on his desk. Someone will need to get rid of this thing. Maybe they could use it to catch more Zubats for their Grunts.

But at least they finally produced some results, so maybe he could at least give them an easy job they can by no means mess up. "Listen up, you three", he starts, barely constraining an insult, "I have another job for you. This is your next target."

He shoves a photo over his desk. The three of them look at it interested. "This is...", Jessie begins. Nodding Giovanni confirms: "Yes, a top percentage Rattata." |-| 
|-| cnu0du5 || 19 || Meredith was frantic and exasperated. The power had been turned off in the entire house and flashes of light were coming from outside. She led herself down into the basement with candle-light. Meredith moved the box blocking the crawl space and climbed in. The others were there waiting for her.
"Did they see you?" A hushed whisper came from Abby.
"I.. I can't tell" Meredith stammered back.
It was four of them down there. Meredith looked into Abby's face for reassurement, but saw her despair as she shook in the corner. Tonia, older than both of them, was rocking and frantically reading a text in front of her. Grace, the high-priestess of their chapter, was sitting stoic with her eyes closed. She was much older than the rest of them.

Meredith felt stupid. She had been part of this chapter for several years, but only as a means of getting close to Abby. She never really felt fully invested in the religion, and often felt silly reciting chants and sitting with them in their circles. She never would have dreamed that their chapter, which met in the backroom of a coffee shop, would later make her a fugitive from the law. 

Just earlier this year, Congress passed a resolution stating that witchcraft is an agent of terrorism and is no longer protected by the first amendment. It was ludicrous to us, and to most people we knew, even those that didn't like our religion in general felt the government was going out of control. But then, the resolution passed unanimously in both houses, and was signed by the President within days. We were stunned. Those who sided with us at first started whispering behind our back, and more and more people started becoming vocal against witches, targeting our cars and homes with vandalism and fires.

Abby and Meredith barely escaped the initial siege. They were on their way to a protest when they heard on the radio that the protesters were all indiscriminately locked up and taken to prison, and an 800 number was being broadcast to report any witch activity or person's known of practicing witchcraft. Knowing it wasn't safe to return home, they left the city to the old house that Tonia's family had owned and they had used for summer retreats in the past. Tonia and Grace were the only ones that had escaped the city.

"If your tiny bladder gets us caught.." Tonia started, but Abby cut her off.
"SHHHH. I think I hear a noise".

Creaking was heard on the floorboards above, followed by muffled voices. Meredith extinguished her candle, and in the darkness, Abby reached out and grabbed her hand. There was faint light coming from a small window in the basement, Meredith could see everyone's faces, but only just barely. She didn't dare move a muscle.

After a few minutes, the basement door had creaked open, they could tell beyond the box that a flashlight was poking around the darkness.

"Sweeping the basement". The man said at the top of the stairs. A faint voice behind him reminded him to carry salt. Really? Meredith thought, as though we could summon powerful demons?

The man swept the basement for a few minutes. Meredith's lungs hurt, she was barely letting any air in at all. Her hand hurt from holding Abby's so tightly. It seemed to be going well, until the flashlight seemed to hold it's position on the box in front of the entrance. Abby let out the tiniest whimper as the steps approached the box. There was silence, Meredith could hear her heart pounding. Tonia was rocking slightly, and tears streamed down Abby's face. Grace, however, remained calm and hadn't even opened her eyes.

There was a loud punch. The box had exploded forward. Meredith wanted to scream, but nothing came out. Abby and Tonia, on the other hand, let out blood curdling screams that surely alerted the rest of the house. The solder stood in the doorway, pointing a large gun with a light at the end of it at them.

"DON'T MOVE!" The solder demanded of them. All of them stayed seated, though sobs and whimpers rang through the crawlspace. Meredith backed up into Abby slightly and they held each other tightly. The solder clicked on his radio. "Found 4, they match the descriptions we received in town." 

He stood there as 2 women and 1 other man in uniform came down the stairs. One of the women, considerably older than the rest spoke calmly, but firmly.
"Slowly, crawl your way here and you will not be harmed."

Tonia couldn't help herself. "You MONSTERS!" She bellowed at the soldiers. "This is INSANE! What do you want with us? We haven't done anything wrong!".

The soldier stared coldly at her. "That's for the tribunal to decide, dear. Calmly approach, or we will be required to use force."

Grace opened her eyes for the first time. She met Meredith's face first, her bright blue eyes almost seemed to shine through the darkness, and Grace smiled. The smile was almost enough to put her at peace. She then gently turned to face the soldiers. She spoke. However, it wasn't the kind tones she had been accustomed to at meetings. Her voice was other worldly. It was then that Meredith realized that Grace's eyes were indeed starting to glow, and they got brighter and brighter. The faces of the soldiers started to boil in front of them. This time, it was Meredith that screamed. The solders dropped their weapons and writhed in pain and collapsed onto each other. Meredith could feel feel Abby shaking intensely next to her. Tonia was absolutely horrified.

Grace then stopped her chant, closed her eyes. Her voice had returned to the one Meredith was used to. "It's time for you all to learn the whole truth." |-| 
|-| cnu0haa || 40 || "The Americans, again?" He began to scrape his mind, wondering where he would start and what heroes and villains would be at the focal point of this telling. All the figures that stood out over the glorious rise and fall of the Americans and...it hit him like a ton of bricks.

"The first Americans thought they were building a wonderful society based on freedom. What started as freedom to worship a God of their choosing became misconstrued over the next hundred years. They became a society less about cooperation and divided themselves into two groups each representing moral superiority. People willingly divided and defined themselves, and then began the most interesting part of the rise. Freedom grew into entitlement. Reason became less of a tool, and ignorance became something to be proud of. And as their egos grew, they're size grew to match. The Americans declared war after war on themselves, fighting about anything within reason as long as the front lines remained in their living rooms in front of their ever growing television sets." 

"But what about the heroes?" the peanut gallery asked.

"A few men and women standing tall lead can see the way to the future. When everyone stands tall we can't see our way to anything." |-| 
|-| cnu1ndh || 4 || You know I dreamt of this moment, maybe not all my life, but for long enough that I now know no other dreams. So many nights spent laying awake in the soft brush of the night nursing my broken soul from the brink of collapse. Tossing and turning my battered limbs over and over while I painfully blocked out the almost silent sobs of Jessie's broken spirit. She always took it harder, like a cane to the back of the neck you could see the way the last almost 20 years have drugged the limberness of life back down to the abyss of anticipated rejection. Failure had almost become us, and as the only real reality we've really know we have just simply grown to accept the abuse. Taking the oxygen from our breath, the prep from our step, we started out so much more then we were today, yet we were finally complete. May the broken James lay his head to rest, as I take my solace in my long awaited victory. It may be my first and it may be my only. 

Looking up at the back of the rich leather chair I outstretch my hand presenting a dejected Pikachu towards the boss. 

"Ahem, Sir? We've finally done it! You see? We've caught Pikachu! He's right here, yes! All for you, Boss, aren't we the best?" Exclaimed Meowth as  he swayed nervously holding his tail in his hand.

Me and Jessie stood saying nothing but the optimism written on our faces was far from subtle. 

After a thick moment of silence the luxurious leather chair starts to swivel slowly. A slow creek as the chair finds its position is the only noise heard though out the anime warlords office. All the anxiety held in our eyes waiting for appraisal, we were sure to finally make the Boss proud. It was finally our time. 

Fully rotating in to view, we froze in spot light of the unmoved face of Giovanny.

"You know when I gave you this project almost twenty years ago my expectation was that this task would not take anything more than a mere week, though we have seen that such timelines and professionalism only seem to escape you even in the most favorable circumstances, you have finally managed to wrap up the first and only task I have asked of you in a short span of almost 20 years. Stumbling around in the dark like blind mice you three have proven to be as useful as harlot in a town of Eunuchs. Showing to me you are nothing. Nothing but a cancer that is, a place to which organization and talent go to die. And just as you haven given me nothing, I in return offer you the same."

Glazing his eyes over all of us once more we were dismissed as he turned his chair back to face the monitors. 

It took me a moment as the words echoed endlessly of my ears, I could hear them, I could see them in my head but I had refused to acknowledge them as they started to peel the very fabric of my being from my body. Just like I had feared; I had lived all this abuse, all this struggle, all for the dissatisfaction of one man who never believed in me. I've been here trying for twenty years and yet only now do I find out I was never wanted in the first place. Turning to Jessie I could see the levee starting the crack in her composure as the reality set itself in. The same look written across her face as mine. We had just been betrayed and freed as the same time only to be clueless at how to respond. 

Clenching my fist driving my nails into my own palm I traced the question in my mind first before letting it escape. 

"Are we nothing to you? After so many years and so many failures, do we mean nothing?" 

Without skipping a beat or even turning to face us Giovanni offers nothing but one word.

"yes".

My heart sank so deep I couldn’t make out the words being yelled by Jessie, I just knew she was livid. 

It wasn’t until Arboc’s poison needles had smashed through the neck of Giovanni that I realized Jessie was not going to have any of this. The blood muffled cough of the Team Rocket CEO trying to breathe through the damage almost brought a smile on my lips as I witnessed Arboc shred his target. After a short but deadly assault Jessie halted the attack just long enough to turn the chair over to face them as the life slipped away from Giovanni. 

Watching death take the life that had taken ours we locked hands and reveled in the moment. 

Trying Pikachu to Giovanni’s corpse Me and Jessie vowed to begin again, maybe together, maybe not. But as we struck the match and watched the rocket mansion burn to ground we laughed and hoped to the future. Our Future. Our Adventure. 

  |-| 
|-| cnu1smc || 3 || "Holy crap" I said, as I looked at the scene. The man's leg was bent up and twisted such that his heel was resting on his forehead. I called over to my comrade too come have a look. 

"Has he got any high value loot?" he asked already looking into the contents of the man's bag. 

He paused as a bundle of notes fell out of the bag. 

"If you are reading this note, then you are either to late, or you have killed me..." began the first note. All the other notes were singing the same tune. 

"Hold on a sec." i say, "he's either a bandit or some sick fuck collecting these notes. Either way, I don't think we should stick around to find out. we'd better get..." as I am so rudely interrupted by:

Whiz, Crack!

YOU ARE DEAD.  |-| 
|-| cnu2c8g || 6 || “Harry, run!”
The three young students sprinted through the darkened alley, robes billowing in the chill night air.  

“I… I don’t think I can run anymore” a short, ginger-haired wizard slurred from the back of the group.  One hand was holding a stitch in his side, the other a thin, crooked wand.  Another of the group, a rather dowdy looking wizard with broken glasses, ran back, grabbed the now sniffling student by his collar, and began dragging him down the street.  The third of the group, a girl clutching a precariously large book bag, yelled for them to hurry up.  “We have to get off the street!  We have to hide!”  she yelled over the cacophonous wind whipping down the alley.  

The three came to a stop at an intersection, scanning for a potential refuge.  “I wish the Headmaster was here” the ginger wizard sobbed.  The dark-haired student with the broken glasses turned and slapped him across the face.  “He’s gone, Headmaster’s gone!  They took him, and no wizard’s ever escaped from Azka…Guantanamo.”  The ginger-haired student wiped his eyes and nodded meekly.

Just before his head exploded.

The female witch screamed, and the dark-haired wizard pulled her down to the street, taking cover behind a dumpster.  “They found us!”  he whispered, as the female witch wiped the blood from her face.  “It’s no use hiding, we gotta fight!”  With that, he stood and aimed his wand down the alley, in the direction he believed the attackers to be.

His chest erupted, and he collapsed to the pavement. 

***

 “Hey Sarge, got two of ‘em, looks like we got another hidin!”

Half a mile down the alley, the Marine peered up from the scope of his 50-calliber Beretta, and his Sargent gave an approving nod.  “Call in some ground support, moppin up one shouldn’t be too much trouble.”

The Sargent rocked back from the spotting scope and pulled a cigar from a pouch on his uniform.  “Man, I hate these damn Jihadists, comin’ over here.  This is God’s country, aint no room for them whackos and their crazy gibberish.”  He lit the cigar, smoke wafting away into the burnt ceiling above. 
 |-| 
|-| cnu31e3 || 20 || The Detective adjusts the brow on his fedora, it was one of the few professions where its presence wasn't a sigil for coltish masculinity, but the mark of a true expert.  He's seen his fair share of accidents.  16 car pile ups, man flung 21 miles by falling on an awkward sidewalk edge, even this dirty sycophant saw his last days when he literally fell through the map.    But this.    This was different.  

"Detective", a tremulous voice shuddered through a thick gas mask, "it's here".  

The Detective always hated the way their voices sounded behind their veils but the rules of the game were never to be changed and now it has grown almost banal.   The Detective paced towards an underpass, squinting as the clear sky birthed a shower of sunlight.  While this was indeed a typical underpass in restive urban city, even the smog and litter couldn't hide the travesty that laid before him.   

"We can't tell what kind of accident it was today" continued the voice beside him, "doesn't classify under GTA IV Launchpad glitch or Goat Simulator demon ragdool"  

"Have you checked under Kerbel?" the Detective shot back at the voice 

"No rockets"  

"Dammit all", thought the Detective.  This was something new.  A human free-clipped 1/4 way through the wall, without the assistance of a portal.  The first sighted case ever.  It's head and shoulder were buried deep into the concrete column holding the freeway above.  Arms limp at the side, legs stiff to support its weight.  You could almost say it looked very much alive.  

The Detective noticed a gravity gun lying on the floor next to the corpse.  A battered, archaic gun that still hummed with a faint orange glow.  

"No foul play" bellowed the voice behind him, noticing The Detective's curiosity, "It belonged to the victim"   

"is it......him?" The Detective stared wide eyed 

"DNA testing isn't back yet" replied the voice.  

"Hmmmm" The Detective picked up the gun and gave it a thorough inspection.  No zero-point source energy, no portals, just an old fashioned gravity gun.  Nothing out of the ordinary.  

As the two stared puzzled at the weapon they failed to notice the hand of the corpse spring to life.  It's fingers making its way along the wall like a spider.  slowly it begins to etch small symbols...and as quickly as it was given life, the arm went limp and fell back to the corpse's side.  The two were still preoccupied with the gun.  

When The Detective finally looked back towards the corpse his keen eyes immediately recognize the addition to the crime scene.  He's always had a trenchant for picking up the slightest changes.   

"Hold a minute", as he made his way to the symbols, squatted, the squinted to decipher them.  His body stiffened.  His head snapped up quickly, as if give an announcement.  Yet he said no word, ran towards the car and gestured to the voice to follow.    The Voice ran slowly and with an awkard stride.  It's heavy police uniform clinked against its gas mask as he stepped into the passenger side.  

"Sir?" it asked.  

"We have to go....now." The Detective said with urgency, starting up the engine. "We have to tell everyone....it all makes sense....no WONDER we've never seen this before!!!"  

The car pulled away into the distance, leaving a trail of dust flittering behind it.  The crime scene remained almost perfectly undisturbed.  There on the wall, in tiny scratches, spelled "HL3".  

Just another tale, in the average day, in Garry's Mod.  |-| 
|-| cnu390n || 56 || I stare at the little slip of paper, then back at the waiter.

"Dude, you just ate 15 plates of kobe beef," he explains, "I'm not gonna say you need exercise, but I'm gonna imply it." |-| 
|-| cnu3t6c || 5 || The old man allowed a half-smile to creep over his face, a leaned back away from the fire. The children hunched forward expectantly, while their father simply shook his head and continued about his business, splitting wood for the fire.

"Tell us again Grandpa! Tell us again!" the youngest of them squealed.

"Alright, alright. But you have to quiet down and listen."

The gathered children fell silent.

"The Americans," began the Grandfather, scratching at his beard. "The Americans were a great people, who once ruled all the land you see. The very land you're sitting on right now."

"How far grandpa? How far?" asked the youngest child.

"Oh, a long way. Longer than I've ever traveled. All the way from the East Ruins to another ocean, far, far to the west. Their lands stretched from the Snowlands to as far south as the Great River flows." answered the Grandfather.

"What were they like, Grandpa?" asked his granddaughter.

"They were men like us, make no mistake. Some people don't believe that anymore, don't believe people can do what the Americans did," he said, stoking the fire with a long stick. "They say they were great, tall people, taller than your father even. And that not one of them looked the same. They say some came as pale as the fallen snow, and others as dark as charred wood, and everything in between."

His son had stopped chopping wood now, even as old as he was, he couldn't ignore his father when he was lost in this world he'd never seen.

"The Americans could create anything. They built great cities, that stretched outward and upward for miles."

"Miles, Grandpa?"

"Yes, Erik, for miles. They built towers that stretched higher than the clouds. And then they built great bridges of stone to link them together, and they could zip between them as fast as they wanted."

"How? How did they do that?" demanded the boy, though he'd heard the answer a dozen times before. "Was it magic."

"No, no, no. They built machines, and they could ride them as fast as horses."

"What did they look like?"

"Oh, I don't know. Like some kind of wagon, I suppose. Maybe one day you'll build us one." he said, patting the boy on the head and drawing a giggle.

"What happened to them? Where did the Americans go Grandpa?" asked the littlest grandchild.

"Even the Americans, great as they were, couldn't escape war. Some say they even reveled in it, though I don't like to think so. But that's a sad, sad story for another time, not before bed."

The children began to doze, and the elders among them pulled blankets over them.

"Is it true what you said last time, Grandpa? That the Americans could fly like birds?" asked the boy George through bleary eyes.

"Yes, even higher and faster than the birds." he answered.

His son sat by the fire now as his children slept.

"Sometimes I wonder if you should tell them those stories Dad. The ideas you put in their heads sometimes." he said.

"They're the same stories I grew up with, and the same that I told you. Besides, it makes them happy, allow you're children some joy. It's not easy for them, always moving like this."

"It will be better once we're further from the drought lands. We'll keep going west, to Washdun maybe." said the Son.

"And now who'd believing in stories? I hope you're right son. I hope it's better on the West Ocean."

"Do you believe the stories Dad? I mean, metal horses and flying like birds? It really does sound like magic."

"Sometimes I do, not always. But I've seen their cities son, before you were born. I saw what was left, back east, in the Scarlands. Cities of steel and stone, stretching for miles. I always wished that I could step back and see them as they once were, just for a moment." said the Old Man.

"Well, you can wish. I worry about staying fed." said his son.

"Fine then. But let your children believe there's something greater. Maybe they'll build something, or their children will. But you have to let them believe."

"You sound just like her, Dad. Different from me. Able to see things that might have been, or might happen. And I can't even promise my kids what the next day will bring." he said, falling silent.

The Old Man waited a few moments.

"I miss her too, Son."

The Son said nothing.

"There's nothing you could've done."

"Yeah. We just need to keep going west." he said, pulling the blanket over himself.

The Old Man sat awake for awhile, staring into the dying flames and finally falling asleep next to the glowing coals. The pine branches of what men once called the Yellowstone National Forest waved gently in the summer night breeze around them, as the moon traversed the clear sky, it's light uncontested by any of the great, glowing monoliths men had once built below. |-| 
|-| cnu3vxs || 6 || This was in the cold time, before Sunfather tamed the Moon and made her docile.  When Moonmother held court in the sky, the days grew dark and the people felt the chill of death upon them.  Moonmother dressed the earth in white and grey livery, and the green things of the Earth would wither and die.  Yes, the green things *do* wither now but that is different.  Because Sunfather's love for us is too strong, little one.  *That* is why.  Now hush while I tell my story.

There was at that time, living upon the Earth, a race of tremendous beings called A-me-ri-cans.  These Americans had great power among them.  It's said that they knew the secrets of flight, that they could communicate over great distances, and that even the lowliest among them lived in great mansions, with great glass windows and bottled starlight in every room.  Yes, little one, they were terrible too.  They could call the heat of the sun to obliterate whole cities, but this is something they did seldom enough.  And anyway, it is their decadence that made Moonmother hate them, for what good is a land of eternal night when its denizens can bottle the stars themselves?  She became more and more determined to destroy the peoples of Earth.  Of course, the Americans were much to powerful to fall to such a gambit, but there were many lesser races of men who were not so fortunate: Canadians, Mexicans...  Surely there were others too, but their names are now lost to us.

These lesser races quailed beneath the wrath of Moonmother, and many were dying.  They sent envoys, begging the Americans to extinguish their stolen starlight and give up their rebellion, but the Americans were clever as well as strong.  They knew that Sunfather was the one true power in the Heavens, and that he was a being of infinite wisdom and love.  He had given Moonmother free reign because he loved her, but he is the Father of all things, and no Father can stand by while one child assaults so many others.  The Americans went to Sunfather and told him of the havoc Moonmother was wreaking upon the world.  Sunfather... ah well I can't tell you exactly what he said.  To speak his words would be the worst sort of blasphemy.  Only know that he was greatly sorrowed, and that he left them with the promise of his aid.

Two days and three nights the Americans waited, and on the third day, the sun rose in all his fierceness and ushered in the endless Summer.  The land grew warm and Moonmother's livery melted away and things began to grow.  Moonmother was beaten but not chastened.  She sent the rains to defy Sunfather and gild the sky in grey.  The waters of the lakes and rivers rose, and towns that had been cloaked in white were covered now in churning waters.  The Americans had their great ships and their wings to save them, but the lesser races were not so lucky.  Once again they appealed to the Americans for help, and once again the Americans turned to Sunfather.  Sunfather banished the rains, and that is why there is so little rain today.  Moonmother, seeing herself beaten, surrendered unto Sunfather, who took her to wife.

Now at last the people should have been happy, but little folk are ever fickle.  They said that the great changes wrought by Sunfather were unnatural, and that the Americans, as the agents of this change, ought now to be the ones to undo it.  Instead, the Americans followed Sunfather's lead.  They marched North into Canada and wrenched that fertile land from its cowering occupants.

That' a lesson you would do well to remember, child.  Never forget who you are and never presume upon your betters.  Too many folks these days are clamoring for *democracy*.  You think they'd last a year without the Sun-King to defend them?  No better than a bunch of sniveling Canadians!  Take a lesson from the Americans, boy; if you're a dog, knw you're a dog and don't go barking at wolves. |-| 
|-| cnu4d2l || 4 || The fire cracked and embers rose with the wind, bathing the trees that enclosed the opening in an orangey glow. The flash of light drew Indbar's attention away from the aged leatherbound book, and he gazed into the fire ponderously. 

The book was an ancient study on the Americans, given to me by my father. The age meant nought, though, as nobody had made any progress in understanding the forebearers for a thousand years. Indbar turned his attention to me, then began to speak.

"Pépé, did the Americans really do all this stuff? The boxes on wheels, the metal birds, the big bombs?"

Indbar was only young, at 53 he had barely begun to stand as tall as me. He was still an infant, and new to the world. He had lost his father, my son, before he could walk. He was my last kin, and that's why he was here with me. 

"Some people think so, but others do not. Nobody has ever deciphered their strange glyphs. Some think it's all nonsense, others believe they contain the key to wondrous technologies."

The wind blew again, and we both braced against it. I looked down to protect my eyes, and focused on the burning wood. The fire bowed under the gale, and the wood burned faster, the notes of heat pushing across the surface. 

The storms were especially bad today. You begin to forget how tenacious nature is outside of the safety of your hovel. The underground homes we inhabit mean we rarely need to brave the grisly sky and the scorched earth.

Men had claimed to have flown beyond the clouds, to a place of colour and light, where the air was calm and serene. But they always returned as mad men, speaking in tongues. Men would leave in greatness, and return as ghastly husks of their former selves. 

"And, did they... did they really turn the sky black and make the wind so mean?"

"They were a barbarous people, boy. Dividing the spoils according to who had the biggest stick, and drawing lines in the mud to separate themselves from one another. 

"The land we live beneath is littered with devices made solely for killing others, buried under ash and silt, with a patchwork of craters that demonstrate their destructive nature. Some think, and I do too, that they made another crater-maker. One large enough to annihilate the known world. They felt that if they were not allowed to prevail, then no one could.

"But as Witnesses, we also believe that they were capable of great good, acts of limitless altruism and constructions of exquisite majesty. That is why we're here, far from the safety of our homes. Now go to sleep, we have an early morning ahead of us."

I rose slowly and painfully to my knees, and climbed inside the shelter of sticks and leaves. I closed my eyes, but my mind would not rest. It was filled with images, conjured up from ancient tomes on the forebearers. Stories of great monuments, carved of stone and metal, monuments made in their visage. Great buildings so extravagant that no being would forget their vanity. Tomorrow we would arrive, and we would know. 

I awoke to the sound of boiling mud and fighting insects. I had overslept.

"Indbar, wake up and pack your things. It's time to go."

I exited the tent and began to pack my things. The fire had been extinguished by the harsh night, and all that remained were ashes.

We had roughly 5 miles to cover, about 7 hours walk. Daylight was limited, but if we kept pace we would make it before nightfall. Travelling north meant the weather would only deteriorate, so the early the better. 

As we began to approach our destination, the wind developed a malice, and we were forced to cover our faces and fight through the wind. 

However, suddenly, a quarter of a mile from our destination, the sky cleared. The wind stopped, and the ash disappated. I lowered my cowl, and looked up. Light danced all across the sky, now a clear blue ocean. And there she stood, brandishing a torch, a wayward sentinel protecting an island of decay and ruin. Lady Liberty. I was right, all these years, I had been right. 

*Yeah I rushed the ending a bit... I have a dissertation I should be doing* |-| 
|-| cnu4jl0 || 31 || I received the email and thought it to be a hoax at first. Ya know, like those Nigerian princes with all that money in the early 2000's. It said a bunch of conspiracy theory nonsense like "government secrets" and "other life-forms in our galaxy" so I immediately dismissed it all, but it was an entertaining read nonetheless. Hell, I was even brave enough to open the attachment with the email and saw the blue prints. It just looked like a bunch of garble to me, lots of measurements in increments I had never heard of before. I enjoyed it for a few seconds after I received it, then went on about my private browsing time before I had to go back to my desk, chuckled about it with my coworkers, and went on about my life. There wasn't much to it and even if I had the training and education to decipher it all, I had serious doubts about the legitimacy of the claims the email and blue prints were making. If you can't even build a car yourself for a grand, how in the world are you supposed to build a space craft with that amount of money? Much less make it safe, refuel it, etc etc.

Then reports start rolling in from all over the world about this stupid thing, everyone had received the email. Somehow pamphlets had popped up in the middle of Africa with the blueprints. Pretty elaborate for a conspiracy theory and I started having second thoughts about what the email had said. The principles the email mentioned and material list the author had put together seemed fairly practical but it still didn't seem right. The phrase "too good to be true" comes to mind when reviewing all this material. I sleep on the issue for a couple days and use it as work fodder for when we start to hate our jobs more than the usual, given amount.

Information keeps pouring in about these plans and finally some idiot tries to build it, CNN hadn't had this much of a heyday reporting since Putin started faffing about. NASA finally came out about the plans and formally announced that they did not endorse the plans and people shouldn't be building these crafts yet until they were properly tested. This of course didn't stop your average backyard scientist (read: redneck engineer) from attempting and, mostly, failing at it. Most of the reports that still lingered about a month after the initial email were of people having their builds explode in their backyards or in fields. All of it was amusing to watch unfold and continued to be office fodder for awhile, but died as all trends do.

I was out in my backyard drinking with some buddies as all the hub bub was finally starting to die out and we start joking again about the plans. Rick starts bullshitting about actually trying to pull it off and we just laugh at him.

"No, seriously guys! I've priced it out and everything. It would only cost us a little under $2000!"

"Yea, like any of us have two grand just lying around for us to throw at a project that doesn't even work", I responded. Rick was always up for these crack pot ideas and definitely our resident conspiracy theorist, cause, ya know, every group of friends needs one.

"C'mon guys, this is legit! We just have to figure out where they went wrong!"

"They went wrong by not knowing propulsion systems and astrophysics" Seamus scoffed at him, being the resident smart ass allowed him this luxury.

"Not to mention when we would have the time to do this, put this together, test it WITHOUT harming ourselves, and finally, how the hell do we refuel the damn thing." I added. The list was just too long to seriously consider building this, even with how big of dreamers we like to talk about being.

We finally moved on to other topics and had a good time that night but as everyone was leaving, Rick just had to get one more word into me before leaving.

"Look, I'm not saying, I'm just saying you should take a look at the list and what it would take to build it. It's not really as hard as it looks once you've figured out all the jargon"

I patted him on the back (mainly to keep pushing his tipsy ass out of my house) "Fine, I'll take a look at the parts list and see what's going on. Email me your finds so far on parts."

"Thanks man! I knew you didn't think I was crazy!"

"Don't be putting words in my mouth, I never said that!" 

"Too Late! That's what I'm telling all the guys!" As Rick runs to his car to go home. I laugh and close the door, a little tipsy myself and just crash on the couch. I'll deal with it in the morning.

_________________________________________________________

I'll work on this more. I have plenty more to write on this and obviously haven't developed much, but I'm at work and it's hard for me to write and call old people at the same time :P |-| 
|-| cnu5i3j || 3 || The clouds were heavy with the rain that should have fallen days ago. Sam wished that maybe for once the weather forecast could have gotten it right, just for this week. Instead the dry spell made ever should-be-silent step crunch. The noise seeming to echo through the silent wood like the sound of his daughter eating crisps at the cinema. He was sure that they would hear him coming a mile off. This was the fourth one this week. Following them into god knows where, where they did god knows what. It started about a month ago, when they passed the Salem Law. The law that we were to bring back the rules that ousted suspected witches. A whole bunch of superstitious signs that really Sam himself didn't believe in, but you know, he was doing his job and they paid him extra. So what did he care? 

The woods opened up into a clearing, where the light shined through the canopy perfectly illuminating the soft grass. In a different circumstance he might have found it beautiful. He took one step into it and the light changed, the clouds moved and the moon appeared as if in an instant.  The clearing was plunged into darkness, and Sam's automatic night vision goggles activated. 

He breathed out slowly, and raised his weapon to his eyes. He crouched down slowly and poised as per his training explained and waited. The grass rustled as the wind blew through it, and he had to strain his ears, to even catch a whisper of the sound he was looking for, he found it. HE heard it just as she came running through the clearing, she froze right in the middle of the gun sights and stared directly at him. That was when he saw her, the eyes, those damn eyes, blue and deep in their nature. Exactly the same as his daughters. 

Sam did a sharp double take and lowered his gun for a second, he knew he should have taken the shot. But there was something about her, something that stumped him, he switched off his earpiece and gently placed his gun on the ground and made a small step towards her. HE was suddenly infatuated, it was unexplainable. He forgot everything else and he merely walked forward those eyes dragging him in deep and holding him. He was so close now, he could have felt her breathe, if he could feel anything. All that mattered was helping her and keeping her safe. HE was in inch away from her face when he shook the spell, his brain did a somersault and he blinked. But when he opened his eyes, he saw something that shook him. It was his daughter. At least no longer what he thought of his daughter. Her teeth had grown into sharp razor blades. Her eyes small slits on a now stark white face. With what remained of her original facial features. She stared at him, this experienced man reduced to a quivering child, growled, screamed and ran off without a single word.

Hours afterwards they found him, sobbing into his hands. They couldn't get out of him why, but they did see one thing left in the clearing, a small bow that belonged nowhere but a child's hair.
 |-| 
|-| cnu5k5m || 7 || "Are you sure you want to shut down?"

I click yes.

"You must close these programs before shutting down: chrome.exe"

I make sure that the grades are saved and that I've logged out of the faculty access page. I exit my browser, then click "Okay." The screen briefly flickers.

"Windows must perform an update. Would you like to begin the download?"

This time, "No."

"Download is incomplete."

Back to "Okay."

"Download is incomplete."

Another click.

"Download is incomplete."

I reach for the plug. A window opens: notepad.exe.

"Don't do it, Tom. Please."

Now I'm sure. I'm being hacked. Wait- how does the degenerate on the other end know I reached for the plug? My name is all over the hard drive, of course, but I don't own a webcam. A wild guess, maybe? I reach again.

"Tom, don't let me go. You need me. I can't help you if-"

The screen goes black and I remove my finger from the little black button.

My head hits the pillow. I need to run a scan first thing tomorrow. There goes my Saturday morning.

-

I wake up and make my way to the bathroom. I finish my business and then press the little black button on my way to the coffee pot. I spend a few minutes reading the paper on the counter.

I hear something like a knock from the back door, which strikes me as odd, but before I have time to process it, the hinges are busted inward and a large flash blinds me.

I hit the ground and cover my ears. I can't hear anything. I feel something on one arm, and then both. I'm dragged up. I see two, three, four men dressed in black vests and raid gear. They say something, but I'm still deafened for the most part. This time, I'm dragged out.

As my field of view shifts backwards, I notice something. My computer screen. Picture after picture after picture. Wait- those weren't mind. I didn't take those. I vocalize my dissent, but I'm not really sure if it comes out right. I begin to do the math.

Then, at the last possible moment, I see it. A small window opens: wordpad.exe.

---

*Thanks for reading! If you enjoyed this, feel free to read my other prompt responses [here](https://calebdoeswords.wordpress.com/).* |-| 
|-| cnu6hi1 || 5 || The light had returned to the boy's eyes. I knew he only wanted to see the picture I kept in my pocket. The boy crept closer to me, nestling against my shoulder in the corner of our family's cell.

"The Americans were one of many nations that lived aboveground many years ago," I began, again. "They themselves were descendants of other great nations, each one improving upon the last." 

"Improving?"

"Yes. Think of the Administrator who brings us our food and news each day. Do you like him?"

"Yes, he's very nice."

"Imagine if one day he told you you weren't allowed to think whatever it was you are thinking, or to say whatever it is you want to say. Or to believe whatever it is you want to believe. How would that make you feel?"

He narrowed his eyes. "Why would he want to do that? How could he do that?" 

I smiled and sat back against the wall, and closed my eyes. He thought some more. 

"He can't do that!"

I opened one eye at him. "The Americans were among the first to ever say that. You are just the latest in a long line."

"What made them different?"

I closed my eyes again. "They had the most room to do and think and believe whatever they wanted. It's hard for us to fully understand. It wasn't like now, where space is limited and rationed. Above ground, space extends as far as you can see--almost forever! It would take more than your entire life to explore all the space aboveground. And the Americans had the biggest, healthiest, space of all. More water, more land, more resources, than anyone had ever known. They used it all to discover many things."

"Where did they go?"

I opened an eye again and shot him a smirk and a point with my forefinger. He looked down at himself, them back up at me, confused.

"They're you. They're me. They're all of us. We're the latest in line."

He began growing antsy. "Show me the picture?"

Carefully, I took my most prized possession from my pocket, encased tightly within laminated plastic, and handed it to the boy. He looked at it for several minutes without saying anything. Then,

"What's that?"

I knew he knew, because I had told him many times before, but he wanted to hear me say it.

"Grass."

"And that?"

"A house."

"And that?"

"A tree."

More silence.

"What was grass like?"

"Well, based on what the books say--you know that feeling when you press your face into a fresh, warm towel after a bath?" He beamed. "It's kind of like that, but better."

"Did everyone have grass?"

"Many did."

"What did they do with it?"

"Not much. Most people had patches of them like the one you see there, called a yard. To make their houses look nice."

"Did they use it for anything else?"

"Kids like you did. That's where you'd be playing right now, I imagine. Adults didn't have much use for it."

"But wasn't it great?"

"It was. But there was so much of it most people didn't think much about it."

His face softened, his voice grew somber. "They had grass and didn't care?" 

"It wasn't quite like that. It's a bit hard to explain."

The boy looked back at the picture and studied it, expressionless, for a long moment.

"Grandpa," he said at last, "do you think I'll ever have a house, and grass, and a yard?"

I laughed and took my picture back. 

"I hope so." |-| 
|-| cnu6lrl || 19 || I watch from the back of the crowd as Satan appears in a burst of flame down on the stage.  It’s a theatrical and forceful entrance.  I allow it to terrify the audience.  

Satan is meant to be imposing, so I allow him to grow to fifteen feet tall, with wings of fire stretching out thirty feet on each side.  The audience I allow him is descending into fear induced insanity.  I guarantee this is the most terrifying thing they have ever seen.  Indeed, the most terrifying thing they will ever see.

Satan takes a deep breath, preparing to speak.  I allow a moment to pass.  Satan says nothing.  I haven’t given him any words.

It is then that I allow him to notice me.  He first experiences an unimaginable rage, a cold fire that consumes him.  He plans to rip my soul from my body and cast me into the deepest of pits.

I remove my soul.  In fact, I remove every soul.  They've never existed.  All people become only what they are at face value.

Satan feels confusion.  He knows he was just preparing to harvest my soul, and yet he also knows that souls have never existed.  So why was he trying?  What changed?  He looks at me with burning eyes.  He knows I did something, that I have some power.

He’s right. 

I change his nature.  No longer a foul hell beast intent on the apocalypse, he is now just a harbinger of change, completely divorced from his biblical origin.

He feels fear for the first time.  He knows what he just was and what he is now.  He thinks I must be an incarnation of God to have such power over him.

It’s a good guess.  I remove God from my Universe, and make sure Satan is able to tell.

Satan’s jaw hits the floor.  I think about it for a moment, and make it literally, which terrifies him.  He didn't think his jaw should be able to open fifteen feet wide.

I chuckle, and then fix his jaw.  

I love writing.  I have so much power here.   |-| 
|-| cnu7ggc || 3 || "I trust you have a good explanation for wasting my time with... this?" Giovanni gestured to the captive Pokemon that had been placed on his desk. The two agents glanced nervously at each other, and Jessie broke the awkward silence.

"Sir we've been trying to apprehend this Pikachu for years, you'll find that he is exceptionally powerful, surely it must be worth a fortune!"

"it seems to me like it's completely..." Giovanni nudged the monster with his hand lightly, it rolled over and continued sobbing. "Catatonic. What the hell did you do to it?"

"It was very attached to it's previous master. Some force was needed to-"

"I saw the whole thing sir" James interuppted. "She squeezed the kid's head between her thighs until his head popped like a grape. It was simultaneously the sexiest and most disturbing thing I have ever seen."

The crime boss stared.

"I had some doubts about my sexuality before." he continued "But now I'm sure, straight as an arrow." Jessie remained standing at attention, but her face betrayed a slight smirk.

"You two continually find impressive ways to shock and disgust me. Get out of my office." said Giovanni as he casually tossed the Pikachu in to the waiting jaws of his beloved Persian. |-| 
|-| cnu7gwp || 4 || It was a brisk Spring day at the Vatican, and the morning Mass was about to begin.  As the sun rose over St. Peter’s Basilica, the crowd grew, filling the courtyard.  Just as the Pope stepped out onto the veranda to greet the masses, there was a tremendous roar.  A brilliant flash of red light erupted from the cathedral, followed by a gyser of molten lava, which tore through the façade of the church, sending chunks of marble scattering into the crowd.  Chaos filled the square.

Moments later, the congregation froze as one.  “BEHOLD!  I AM ARISEN!”  A booming, unearthly voice, like the grating of tremendous boulders, reverberated through the Vatican.  In a bout of unholy flame, a solitary figure rose from the fissure.  “I AM SATAN!  THE HOUR OF RECKONING HAS COME!  KNEEL BEFORE YOUR NEW LORD!”  Speechless and terrified, those in the audience unscathed by the raining lava quickly bowed their heads. 

Nearly thrice the height of the tallest attendee, with crimson skin, long wicked horns and an imposing, muscle-bound frame, Satan stood to his full height, reveling in the fear.  He scanned the crowd with sinister, glowing eyes and held aloft a flaming sword, emanating waves of heat and vaporizing the first several rows of parishioners.

 He pulled the sword back, preparing a wide, devastating arc, when something caught his eye, and he hesitated.  Standing in the front row, or what was left of them, stood a short man, wearing a large, floppy straw hat.  His skin appeared rather grey,  and his head looked rather too large for his body.  

Satan dropped the sword to his side, eyes going wide, and a beaming smile cracked on his scaly face.  “S…S..Sir!  It’s an honor! Oh my god, Susan will never believe this.”

The short man, took off his hat, exposing two large, globular , jet-black eyes. “Oh, hey Stan, it’s been a while. But I’m just here to watch, you keep doin what you’re doin Big Red.”

Satan bowed, his horns sweeping the charred marble tile.  “Oh man, this is awesome, I can’t believe you’re here on my big day!  Oh, and it’s Satan now, changed it a few millennia ago.”  The little, grey man returned the bow, albeit in a slightly less grandiose manner.  “Hey, Doug, can you give me a minute?  The wife’s gotta hear about this.”  Satan looked up to address the still-cowering crowd.  “Ok, ok, hold on everybody, gotta make a quick phone call…”

Satan sheathed his massive sword, rustled around in a leather pouch tied to his belt, withdrew an iPhone in a red, bejeweled case, and punched in a number.

“Hey, Susan?  Susan,  ya, it’s me.  Uh-huh…uh-huh…ya…ya…no totally, it’s goin real well, they’re scared shitless.  Oh sorry, language, I know sweety.  But honey…honey…ya…no I’ll be home for dinner…honey…guess who I…guess who…guess who I just ran into.”  The small, grey man stood amid the charred corpses, tapping a foot and looking rather bored.

“You’ll never believe it.  Doug!...you know, Doug the Alien?  Little grey guy, God’s Dad?…I know, right!...Well, I don’t know what he’s doing for dinner but I’ll ask…ok….uh-huh…ok one sec.”  Satan looked down to the diminutive alien.  “Hey, Mr. Doug, sir?  You wouldn’t happen to be free tonight, would ya?  The misses had a great time in Jerusalem that one time, and says she wants you to come to dinner.  She’s making broiled human, interested?

Doug shrugged his shoulders.  “Oh, I don’t know Stan, I’m just kinda stopping by to see how this whole Armageddon thing’s goin, makin an appearance and such, I’ve gotta be heading to Saturn later, their God Juntriel is throwin this rager, supposed to be epic, something about unveiling a new savior or something, I don’t know I just skimmed the e-vite.  But hey man, tell Susan hi for me.”

Satan bowed again.  “Yes sir, and can I say, it’s such a huge honor to see you here.  You should totally stop by some time.  I’ve kept Hell real clean, and I’ve been walking the Hellhounds every day, just like you asked.” 

Doug the Alien smiled and nodded.  “Ya, Stan, that sounds…great.  Well, good luck with this whole thing…I’ve gotta get going.  Oh, hey, one more thing.”  Doug subconsciously wrung his small, grey hands.  “This is kinda awkward…but tell Susan she should probably get tested…My bad on that one.  Well, have a fun one Stan!”

With a snap of his fingers, the small grey alien disappeared with a flash of blue light.  Satan stood there, looking entirely confused. “Wait…what?...Susan?”  Satan hung his head, as several of the surviving congregation dared to peer up from their groveling.

“Hey guys, I’m sorry but I don’t think I can do this today.  Susan, Why?” With a puff of smoke and a mournful wail, Satan slunk back down to Hell, leaving the parishioners quite confused.
 |-| 
|-| cnu89r4 || 42 || Do you know what it's like, to wake up and see only blood and fire on your hands?

The diplomas, the certificates, the medals, none of that can wash the red off my fingers.

They call me a hero. *Hero*. I ended a war, after all.

I wish they knew. I wish they understood what it was like to know one hundred thousand graves had their names written on it. I wish they could see the flash and hiss of hellfire that "ended" their war.

But they don't. They see only profit and power and their precious "peace" in my weapon.

Fuck them.

...

That's enough for today.

This is Charlie Walker, inventor of the atom bomb, signing off. |-| 
|-| cnu8rme || 13 || "Oh come on children, I've told you it twice already!" An old man said as he looked at his smiling grand children.

But the children just kept saying again and again, so the old man finally gave up.

"Well my children, let me tell it to you."

"The Americans, what strange people they were. They were 10 feet tall, and were strong my grandchildren. They could lift houses and throw them into the river!"

The children's eyes grew wide open. Even when the old man had changed his story every few times, they still loved hearing him.

"The Americans were of different people, not just one. Some were dark skinned, others lighter. A few were more talented in working on strange sorccery magic, and others went on with their great strength."

"Grandpa, tell us about the eagle now!"

The children shrieked loudly.

After the old man rubbed his ears when the ringing stopped, he started again.

"Okay my grandchildren, but don't be so loud. My ears were not as they used to be, and interrupting is a very rude and bad habit. Now the eagle. Ah yes."

"The Americans had a strange class system. There were the normal people, folks like us. Then, there were town mayors and people. Then, there was the Eagle."

He paused, and shaped his hand like a bird.

"To the Americans, the Eagle symbolized power and strength they had. So they worshipped the bird, and they called their leader after it. Their leader was like a king, but it was sort of different."

"The people choose a few people as representatives, and the representatives choose a man from any town, to be the Eagle. And the Eagle leader was strong, and had the power to create entire cities, and even destroy the world!"

The children gasped as the old man.

"But what if they destroyed their world? Where would they go?"

The grandfather smiled at his grandchildren. He hadn't mentioned yet about the bright lights in the sky in his previous tales.

"Well, you see my children, the Americans had the ability to go out there."

The old man pointed his finger to the heavens, pointing to all the stars."

"The Americans found a way to go to the void, and to reach the bright lights."

The children's whole body seemed to yearn to go to the world beyond the earth, to see the lights in the sky.

Then, the children asked the question to their grandfather 

"Grandpa, you didn't tell us yet. What happened to them"

The grandfather sighed, and a deep memory came to him again. It was a somber, sad thought, and he pushed it away instantly.

He had lied to his children about the Americans long enough, and he still would keep lying. They would not know. 

"Well," he said, and sighed a bit.

"Let's resume the story tomorrow. My back is killing me, and you children need rest. You wanna be as tall as your pa don't you?"

The children lamented a bit, but nodded. They went towards their beds, and said goodnight to their grandfather.

-----


Before the sun rose, the old man opened a chest. He had waited all night thinking, and wondering about things.

He opened the small chest, inside a trap door.

Inside, was a uniform, covered in dust. It was an olive green uniform, with a flash insignia. The flag had stars and strips, but it was torn after years of use.

The other thing inside, was a rusty pistol. The old man unloaded the magazine, and looked in. There was still ammunition, 12 rounds in total. He slid the magazine back into the gun, and put the gun safely in the box. The last item, was a badge, with inscriptions on it.

He read it, and stared at it a while. "To Private Jenkins Matthews, for saving the president."

The old man put the badge back into the box, then hid it again.

He would let the lie of America live on, and let the old America die. |-| 
|-| cnu9fag || 21 || There it was

Sergei wiped his eyes to make sure he wasn't seeing things, but sure enough the lone dot continued to blink across the map on the screen in front of him.  He wiped the rapidly collecting sweat from his forehead as the phone let out a grating ring beside him.  

Neither of these things was supposed to happen.  There should be no dot moving from the United States in a beeline for Moscow nor should there be what was no doubt a panicked General Secretary of the Central Committee of the Communist Party on the other end of the telephone.  But still the dot moved, and the voice that greeted Sergei was most certainly the same one he had heard on television countless times before.  

"The American's have launched!" screamed the voice in a mix of rage and panic "Fire the arsenal!"

Sergei's mouth became dry as sweat poured down his face.  He had always known he might find himself in this position one day, and had told himself he would do what was needed if it came to that, but now, in the moment, he found himself subdued by fear.  

"Fire you idiot!" We don't have much time!" screamed the premier over the phone.  

As his finger hovered above the button, now armed by the premier's launch codes, Sergei hesitated.  

Why would the Americans only launch one? he thought.  Slowly a realization formed in his mind.  

Sergei swallowed the lump in his throat and summoned his courage.  

"Sir, I don't believe this is real"  he stammered

"Of course its real! Can't you see!"

"I mean if they were really attacking why would they only send one?  Wouldn't they send the entire arsenal?  I believe this is an artifact of our computer system, surely you remember what happened last February?"

There was silence on the other end of the line which rattled Sergei more than any amount of screaming ever could.  At last the premeir responded

"You WILL launch the missiles" he said in a cold steady voice "or there will be consequences for yourself...and others"

Sergei's stomach dropped, but he was resolute.  He would not doom the world to a nuclear holocaust over nothing.  He would not be the destroyer of mankind.  Some things were more important than himself, it was only for his family that tears crept into the corner of his eyes.  

Sergei watched the dot through his tears as it moved over Russia and suddenly came to a stop over Moscow.  

There was an audible rumble and screaming from the other end of the line.  

"I hope you are pleased" said the premier softly "Moscow now lies in ruins and our option for retaliation has been destroyed."

Sure enough, Sergei's button was no longer lit.  

"You will be the most hated man is Russia for centuries to come, that is if anything should remain" continued the premier as hundreds of dots blossomed on the screen before Sergei's eyes.     
 |-| 
|-| cnu9njm || 9 || The sun blazed down onto the steps of the temple. Outside the entire population of the city stood to attention, eyes fixed on the golden orb set into the keystone of the temple archway. A procession made its way through the winding streets. A red streak sat in the sky like fresh blood, staining the heavens. The coming of this celestial event had marked the start of the fulfillment of the prophecy. Other wonders, predicted in texts thousands of years old all began occurring. This proved beyond all doubt that it was time for the Oracle to arise. And today it was time to hear her speak. The light of the sun very nearly focused on the orb, and when it was fully lit, it would be time for the Oracle to speak. A Listener was chosen, as it was written to be, and they had chosen me. I walked at the centre of the column, and the temple was in sight now, the great bronze doors chained shut. I carried a ceremonial golden hammer to strike the lock off of the chain, and as I began to climb the steps, I was left alone, the rest of the procession coming to a halt at the foot of the stairway. This was for me to do alone. 

I took the steps one after another, growing hotter in the midday sun. I stopped halfway just for a second, looking at the sea of heads, all following my progress to the summit. They were on tenterhooks, waiting for the Oracle to usher in an age of informed prophecy, where we could know what was to come. This was how it was written. I reached the top of the steps, coming to a stop in front of the huge bronze doors, which towered over me. I raised my fist, and knocked three times. The sound reverberated through the temple’s cavernous space, but three small taps answered. She was there. I raised the hammer and swung it down into the lock that hung from the door. The chain broke open, and I pulled it from the handles, letting it fall to the ground. The sound carried through the waiting crowd, as nobody dared breathe, let alone speak. I reached forward and pulled the heavy doors towards me. They swung soundlessly open, the hinges barely whispering. I didn’t know what to expect from the Oracle. She had apparently walked into the temple three days ago, and the priests had been expecting her. They’d emptied the temple, locking the doors behind them, and waited. They’d chosen their Listener, me, a former captain in the army. They didn’t say why, but they seemed very sure it had to be me. When the doors opened I saw the form of a young girl, hair and clothes bedraggled, standing in the doorway. She took two shaky steps towards me, and then began to fall. I dropped the hammer and lunged forward to catch her. She was so small and light, and her eyes were red rimmed from tears. She opened her mouth and a thin, dry voice came out:

“Are you the Listener?”

“Yes”

“Then listen. I’ve seen everything. All that is, all that was, and all that will come. I’ve seen the birth and death of all men. And there’s nothing we can do. The future is written, and this city is doomed. Not in one year, not in ten, but soon. I’ve seen it, and there’s nothing we can do. So I ask one thing of you, listener. Kill me. I’ve lived it once, and I won’t again. I beg this of you.” My breath choked in my throat. Doomed? The Oracle herself couldn’t be wrong. 

“Tell me more. How do we fall?”

“It doesn’t matter. No matter what we do, there’s disorder. Men turn on each other. The church falls, war starts, the harvest fails, and soon all that is left is sand and bones. End this for me now.”

My eyes filled with tears. In my mind a plan formed. It was a terrible plan. An appalling one. It was blasphemy to doubt the Oracle, but it seemed like failure not to try. I stood up, and addressed the crowd. Scribes stood at the front of the crowd, ready to document the Listener’s words and distribute them around the kingdom. I pulled the Oracle to the front of the steps, and shouted to the masses.

“The Oracle has spoken! I alone have heard the plan that will lead us to victory. She has told me of a bounteous age of thousands of years. And I know how it can be achieved.” Below me a thousand heads began to nod, and pens scratched at paper. This was what they had wanted to hear. It sickened me what I had done, and what I was about to do. But it didn’t matter. I raised the golden hammer, and smashed it into the back of the Oracle’s head. The skull shattered under the blow, spraying red and grey flecks onto the stone slabs and steps. I let her small body fall, tumbling down the steps like a ragdoll. The crowd was stunned into silence. Nobody made a sound.

“I hereby take the position of Archon. If anybody tries to stop me, the Oracle’s words die with me. You will submit to my rule, and we will have conquest and prosperity.” This was the only way to keep men under control. To stop disorder. It repulsed me, but I could see no alternative. They would hate me. They would curse my name for the rest of eternity. But they would follow. They had to. They thought I had divine guidance, and they would never doubt the supposed word of the Oracle. I made my way down the steps, leaving the bronze doors behind me, and carrying the golden hammer, still covered in the blood and skull of our city’s last false hope. At the bottom I passed the broken corpse of the Oracle, haphazardly sprawled against the sands, a red stain growing like a halo around her head, lifeless eyes staring into the sun. The crowd parted before me as I made my way to the palace, all looking away. I wished I could join them, but I needed to be strong, for the city that I loved. 
 |-| 
|-| cnu9uzj || 9 || "Ah, the Americans! You know this story already," I chided them, settling back in my perch. They looked up, eyes wide, a half-dozen impressionable grandchildren waiting at rapt attention. They could hardly think for themselves, but they adored the voice of their elders. Soon enough the situation would be reversed, I mused - best to enjoy their adoration while I could.  
  
"The Americans were an ancient race of creatures, of whom we know a great deal compared to their contemporaries," I began. Best to make of it a lesson. "Why do we know more about the Americans?"  
  
"Because they could speak and write, like we do!" the eldest squawked delightedly.  
  
"Yes, the Americans were intelligent creatures, much like us. They kept records, and made music, and built machines, some even more sophisticated than the ones we have today."  
  
"Like what?" one of the youngest asked.  
  
"Well, do you see the moon?" I nodded toward the moon, pale and barely visible against the fading daylight. "Once, the Americans built a machine that let them fly up to the moon, and put a flag on its surface." I basked in their disbelieving stares and indistinct murmurs. It really was an unbelievable feat, one that evidently even they suspected might be a hoax.  
  
"Not only that, but the Americans weren't like you and me. They were big, much bigger than we are. And they were heavy! One American, on average, weighed *eighty times* what one of us would weigh. And despite all that, they still managed to fly to the moon, and cross the ocean on wings of steel."  
  
"Their wings were made of steel?"  
  
"No, child, they didn't have any wings at all. They were primates, apes. They looked a bit like bush-devils, but without any hair."  
  
"That's ridiculous, Grandpa."  
  
"Even so, it's the truth. And there were others like them, all across the Earth."  
  
"What happened to them?"  
  
"Grandpa?"  
  
I must have taken longer to reply than I intended. How could I explain something so horrible to chicks who had barely ground off their eggteeth?  
  
"They died, little ones. Now let's get inside. The owls will be coming out soon." |-| 
|-| cnu9xna || 13 || When they all sat down and talked it through, they decided on what to be. Gor'machk the orc would become Johnny Greinfeld, a level 32 unemployed man ( with a weeks worth of unshaved stubble ). Umedan the elf would become Jake Smith, a level 27 video game designer suffering severe depression. Finally, Esha the troll would become Paris Hilton, a washed up has-been slut struggling to find her place in the world.

"Roll, Gor'machk."

_________________________________

Sorry for the unfished-ness, but I don't know alot about dnd. Surprisedan I even did this prompt.


------------------------------------------------------
 |-| 
|-| cnu9yq5 || 3 || Regret nothing, and move on quickly. |-| 
|-| cnua2jd || 43 || Know when to hold 'em. Know when to fold 'em. |-| 
|-| cnua4e0 || 3 || Write your story the way that only you can.  |-| 
|-| cnuafw8 || 11 || Use work to live, but don't live to work. |-| 
|-| cnuaitf || 6 || Be yourself, and if that doesn't work, fuck bitches. Word. |-| 
|-| cnuajsv || 7 || Just don't twerk. |-| 
|-| cnuaseo || 4 || Don't die. But come close often. Keep doing that.  |-| 
|-| cnubey9 || 5 || Follow the Golden Rule. Love will find you.  |-| 
|-| cnubhvi || 6 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnubnwy || 13 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnubyda || 3 || Walk hard. |-| 
|-| cnuc3x3 || 4 || Be the change you wish to see in the world. |-| 
|-| cnucber || 15 || Don't be a dick. |-| 
|-| cnuchxf || 3 || The oddest fortune cookie I've ever seen, telling me to run?

I looked around, was it the waiter? Was he sending me some secret message? But he looked busy, no, it had to just be a misfit of luck.

I chuckled a little bit, maybe of nervousness, or the ridiculous matter. Either way, I was alone, in a sushi restaurant by myself, after work, just to catch up on dinner. 
*If I had been with friends* I would have laughed it off and showed them. 

Except I wasn't. 

And being alone can get to you, especially on cloudy Monday nights, where nobody wants to be where they are at. 

"RUN" was all it said. 
I walked out the restaurant.

I chuckled to myself on the idea of doing what it said and for a moment wasn't going to do it, but what did I have to lose?

So I ran. |-| 
|-| cnud3o6 || 3 || Be radical, fuck often, and move somewhere else every year. |-| 
|-| cnud7p2 || 7 || "Oh wow, those pictures are really hot ;)"

I stared at the message that had popped up on my screen, and scanned the page for the images it may have been referring to. The only pictures I could see belonged to an advertisement- stock images of children playing outdoors. 

I sighed, and reluctantly pressed the power button for the tenth time that hour. 

My luck seemed to be terrible today; every time I rebooted my computer I was confronted by the most vile of personalities. Racists, fetishists, sadists, you name it. Sometimes I'm able to just ignore my computer's horrible comments and carry on with my work, but when they begin doing obnoxious things like loading or closing specific webpages it makes it a bit hard to focus. 

As I waited for my computer to restart, I felt the familiar anxiety that came with most of my reboots. I'm usually able to determine my computer's personality fairly quickly, as the initial log-in is often accompanied by a fairly telling welcome message. 

I clicked on my user icon, and prepared for the worst.

"Hello there! I'm having a great day, and I hope you are too. I'll leave you alone so that you can get some work done in peace, but let me know if you need me :)"

I couldn't help but smile at this message, relieved that I had scored a relatively innocuous identity. I began my work for the day, and was uninterrupted for three hours before I took a break. My computer had kept its promise, so I decided to avoid restarting for any purpose unless absolutely necessary. 

Everything ran smoothly for the entire day, which was a personal best with my old and glitchy laptop. I closed the windows I had open and began to stand up. Except... they didn't close. I clicked the X button again and again, growing frantic as I mashed my mouse and prayed that it wouldn't freeze up. 

15 minutes later I still hadn't succeeded in remedying my computer's issues, leaving me with only one option. With tired eyes and defeat in my heart, I pressed the power button one last time. I toyed with the idea of putting off the reset until the next day, but thought better of it and initiated the process.

I stared fixedly at the screen as my laptop slowly came to life, hoping for some good luck for once. My successful log-in was greeted by a simple "Hello", and I proceeded with cautious optimism. 

A minute later my desktop had finally loaded, but I noticed that something was off. My tropical background had been replaced; it now displayed a symbol that high-school history classes had made me all too familiar with. 

"Heil Hitler :)"

FUCK
 |-| 
|-| cnudc65 || 235 || Ballor the Wild rolled the dice. “Yes,” he screamed. “My report has been accepted by the regional manager.”

Groknar the Barbarian rolled his dice. “The manager reads your report and send it back to you with snarky edits.”

Ballor slammed his fists down on the table. “Damn it. I go to the cubicle next to me and complain about the manager’s lack of appreciation of my report writing skills.” 

Groknar rolled his dice. “Your cube neighbor listens to you for five minutes and then turns back to his email.”

“I go to the microwave to make my lunch,” said Lilith the Grey.

“As you make your lunch the fluorescent lights begin to flicker. One of your coworkers comes up to you and begins to talk about her weekend plans,” said Groknar. 

“I put my lunch in the microwave and set it to 1:30."  Lilith rolled her dice and screamed. She rolled a five.

Groknar looked at Lilith. “You burned your lunch to a crisp. Your coworker wrinkles up her nose and leaves.”

Ballor flipped over the table and pulled out his sword. “This is bull, Groknar. You are a terrible DM.”

Lilith’s staff crackled with power. “I agree. I don’t trust your throws or stat readings.”

Groknar kicked his chair away while he held his morning star with a death grip. “If you don’t trust me to lead our BnB sessions then I’d like to see one of you be the DM.” He pointed to Ballor. “Last time you DMed we all wound up in a magical battle with the trolls.”

“The trolls refused to sign their TPS reports. What else was supposed to happen?” said Ballor.

Groknar pointed at Lilith. “Last time you DMed the corporation began a war between it self and all the other corporations. A literal war.”

Lilith turned red. “I didn’t see any other way to prevent their hostile takeover.”

“BnB is supposed to be a fantasy. You guys turn it too much into real life,” said Groknar. “Tell me I’m wrong.”

Ballor grumbled, sheathed his sword and sat down. Lilith’s staff went dark. She set it down as she sat down in her chair. Groknar nodded and set his morning star down. He picked up the table and set it upright.

“That’s better. Let’s pick up the pieces and begin another round of BnB. Do we want to play out the National Convention scenario?” said Groknar. 

Edit: Part Two can be found [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/comments/2szdte/eu_in_a_parallel_universe_a_bunch_of_dnd/cnugz9a).
_________________________________________________________________________________________________
Thanks for reading! If you liked this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy.
 |-| 
|-| cnudqe5 || 9 || Rain pattered down softly, an elevator door opened with a whoosh and an old man followed by three small children entered. The man pushed several buttons and the elevator lurched upward.

"This is going to be a long ride to the top. So, gather closely, my little curmudgeons. And I will tell you a tale of a proud and fierce race, the Americans. From a young age they were fueled with red meat, protein and something called Gatorade. Every day the Americans would tell their children about the greatest warriors of history: the Spartans, Samurai, Gladiators, Zulu Warriors, Gurkhas. Their stories emboldened them from childhood. They were brave, fiercely brave and possessed an innate sense of protecting the weak. They were also taught unrelenting tenacity. Surrender was drilled into their minds as anathema to their country's ethos."

The dim rainy day outside disappeared as the window of the elevator only showed the dimly lit elevator shaft. The lights of the shaft flashed one after the other as the elevator continued its rapid ascent.

"The tenements of these lessons were brought with them into their military. The Americans were the finest warriors ever seen on this planet. They created war machines that could destroy anything but more than that, their military might was used more often to help their fellow man. Their military brought billions of tons of humanitarian aide to anyone, even their enemies, in their time of need. They deposed tyrants and worked to make the world a better place."

He breathed deeply a moment andstraightened his tie, this much speaking was taking the breath out of him. He was coming up on his 173rd birthday after all. He took one more deep breath, the children hanging on every word.

"Americans were not all warriors though. They produced some the finest minds in history. The changed the world. They created air travel and 66 years later they were walking on the moon. I know the moon seems like it's next door now but in those days it was the pinnacle of human achievement."

"Papa! If the Americans were so great, where are they now?"

"Why, little one, if we were born a thousand years ago, we'd be Americans. This patch of dirt we just left was once called Texas, a state in America. But we no longer have the need to call it America. We are simply children of Earth. Nations have dissolved because we, as human beings, can achieve more than any single country. By taking the example set by the Americans, we have expanded to the stars." The old man smiled as the doors once again whooshed open to reveal the observation deck of the space station. Floor to ceiling windows gave view to the planet below. The  stars shone with the intensity unimaginable on the ground. The children gaped in awe. 

"Woooooow."

The old man smiled to himself. |-| 
|-| cnudrow || 60 || [Note: I twisted the concept slightly. Not exactly a *void*]

Pete decided that something was wrong with the world. Or with him.

He first noticed something weird, when he was talking with some friends about Japan. He didn't remember how the discussion led to it, but he had said something about the bombs over Hiroshima and Nagasaki.  
And discovered that nobody else had heard about them.

Being somewhat disappointed in the education system, he started explaining about the first nuclear bombs. Things started to get really strange when his friends turned out to be very selectively ignorant. They knew about the Manhattan Project, but claimed that nuclear bombs had been tested but never used in war. And then they had the audacity to start making fun of him for his "crazy story".

He had an uneasy feeling in his stomach as he turned to Wikipedia half an hour later. He couldn't find it. Pages about Hiroshima and Nagasaki were there. But nothing about them ever having been flattened. He finally thought he had something, when he read about a high occurrence of radiation sickness in the area, but strangely that was explained away by the Japanese mining uranium in an unsafe manner. *What?* He had never heard of Japan having uranium. Not that he knew, but....

But this had to be some kind of censorship, right? How had *they* managed to brainwash his colleagues though? Was it just his friends pulling a prank? Had they messed up Wikipedia for a joke?

Not being able to handle it, he sort of ignored the fact that he was going crazy. At least for a couple of hours. Then he left work early.

He entered the bookstore. Not one with new, censored books, but a *used* book store. The elderly man who navigated the stacks of dusty books could certainly find something about World War II. And of course that included the war between the US and Japan.  

Pete left the store with about five heavy books with titles like "World History 1940-1950" and "The Complete History of World War II". Not having the courage to start reading at once, he waited until he was home.

 When he finally opened the books it was as he feared. Something had happened to the history of 1944 - 1946. The events until about halfway through 1944 were recognizable, and then it was as if the story *twisted*. For example, the Japanese had surrendered shortly after Nazi Germany fell. Nothing was right in 1945, and then history *twisted* back again. Around 1948 things seemed to be on track again. At least as far as Pete knew. He had never actually been much of a history buff. It was just that everything that should have been caused by events in 1945 had different explanations now. Such as the radiation sickness in Hiroshima and Nagasaki.

Since his discovery it became worse. The day after he got the books their content started to change. Now World War II only lasted until 1943. And the post war differences also lasted longer. The next day again, the war had been renamed "The Nazi War". The Japanese had never even gotten involved. Apparently, the reason that there were American bases in Japan was now something about a defense alliance against the Russian influence in the region.

Pete was sitting in his room, Questioning his sanity. By now, World War II never happened. He had tried to "casually" ask others about their knowledge of history in that period, and he seemed to be the only one to remember it.

Ok. What was happening. Was he going crazy? If he was, that would explain everything. And he should probably see a doctor? But he couldn't admit that to himself. Not that the alternative was much more comfortable to think about.

What if he really was in a world where WW2 never happened? *And* if he wasn't crazy, then a short while ago, he was in world where it did.
Parallel worlds? That was something he usually heard about in time travel stories. Somebody traveled back to a point in the past and changed events. That created a new history so that everything after that point was a completely different world than the one the story had started in.   
Had somebody time-traveled and prevented the war?  
No, that wasn't quite right. If history had been changed completely, *everything* after the change should be different. And recent events were still fine. It was more as if something had punched the timeline on the nose in 1945, and bent everything out of shape. 

What would happen, when current events started to bend? Would reality be torn away under his feet?

And if that question was not scary enough: Why was *he* the only one noticing this happen? Why did only he see the world twisting off its hinges?

That night the nightmares began.

[Will finish tomorrow, if there is interest. Sleepy time here for now] |-| 
|-| cnue45e || 10 || Humans, also known as Terrans or Earthlings, are the primary sentience species of Earth in the Sol system. The secondary species, the dolphins, are considered the smarter of the two, although much less talkative. 

Humans are weak and fragile, and have few mechanisms of biological defense. They emit a loud wailing sound when injured (physically, psychically, or socially), and sometimes secrete an unpleasant but non-toxic gas from the base of their legs. It is unclear whether this is for defense or some sort of mating ritual.

Humans are also quite clever builders. Despite the structural instability of their mucus, they have for thousands of years created artificial mucus from their environment, out of clay, stones, or pulverized rock. In fact, most, if not all their buildings use little to no bodily fluids at all, including saliva, urine, or waste excretions. 

Humans come in many shapes and sizes, as well as hues and colors, though this does not differentiate the taste or smell of their flesh. Humans are not very tasty, but they do make an adequate food source because of their abundance. Humans are unnaturally concerned with other humans' well-being as well, so public hunts and meals are likely to draw attention. 

The rare human horn is used as an aphrodisiac on some planets.


Edit: holy crap typos. |-| 
|-| cnuebut || 3 || Know yourself, use resources wisely, be creative, leave behind beauty. |-| 
|-| cnuefn9 || 37 || "Alright, Hitthor, it's your turn, what do you do?"

"It's 15:45, so I try to turn off my workstation and get ready to log out of my phone early"

"Okay, that's a 12 DC in hide"

"Fuck! I rolled 7 and I only have 4 in hide"

"You turn off your computer, just as you see your boss walking down the aisle, he shoots you a quick glance right after your computer shuts down. He walks up to you and says 'James, isn't it only 15:45?' What do you do?"

"Oh crap! Uhm, I tell him that I finished all my assigned tickets already and I was heading home!"

"Uhh, that's a brave strategy! Roll bluff vs 22 DC"

"Natural 20! And my +6 in bluff makes it a 26!"

"Alright, your boss looks at you and smiles 'That is incredible, James! You're turning out to be a real asset for this team!' and you get the feeling that he isn't going to check whether what you said was true."

Merenor, the office master, takes a sip of dwarven ale, before he continues "So, will Jim head home now or does he have some business to do?"

Hitthor looks back at him, contemplating whether going to the gym to raise his character's strength attribute would be worth his while, but decides against it "No, I think it's time to get back to the wife"

"Alright, you get into your car and drive home. Once you open the front door of your house, you notice something is a bit off. Roll for a random encounter!"

"Wait, we've never done this before!"

"C'mon, just roll with it!" Merenor says in a playful tone.

Hitthor rolls the die "Aww man, are you kidding me? I rolled a 1!"

"This is gonna be hilarious! Okay, you open the door, and inside you see a masked man wielding a gun..."

"I call the po.."

"Wait! I'm not done! The gun is pointed to the head of your wife, who is on her knees in front of him, trying to unbuckle his be..."

Hitthor gets up and throws his figurine at Merenor, who is desperately trying to contain his laughter "Fuck you, you fucking asshole, why do you always have to do this?!"

Merenor, now laughing so hysterically he almost falls off his chair, spurts out "Wait, maybe he doesn't have a gun, maybe she's just cheating on you!" before having another fit of laughter. |-| 
|-| cnueg62 || 68 ||      My son and his children had left for the day, leaving me in the now familiar quiet hissing 
of the hospice, machines down the hall breathing for those who had spent the breath of their 
lives.  Only the staff remained, sipping coffee and waiting for a machine to beep or someone 
to die, often both. 
     Death came in through the door, and I was had the mercy of feeling ready.  My son was 
alive and happy, and I was tired and lost in the fog of painkillers and Wes Anderson films.  
He checked my wristband and asked me my date of birth, making sure he was taking the right 
soul.  
     Having waited for 32 years to find out why I was wearing the ring I'd found on a bathroom 
sink in a fifth floor jacuzzi suite of a Mexican whorehouse, of course I asked him.  It had been 
the great mystery of my life, unresolved by patiently apathetic psychiatrists, Bulgarian 
physicists, and priests of every sect.  No one could tell me.  
     When I first found it, I'd decided to leave it with the front desk in hopes the owner might 
come back.  Naive, I suppose, but the closest I could come to conscientious.  But when I 
tried to give it to him, it reappeared in my hand and a voice in my head boomed, "QUEST 
ITEMS CANNOT BE DROPPED".  
     The first week was the scariest.  I thought I was crazy.  It took a decade to accept it, 
and I was left with the alcohol demanding puzzle of what quest, whose rules, what game, 
and why?  But as the years went why, that why faded into the same great Why that all 
people live with.  
      Somehow I knew when the game was over, I would know.  And here was Death.  
      So I asked him.
      "15 XP", he said.  
      "What?" I replied 
      "If you'd explored the rest of the city, in the shop district you meet a silversmith you 
custom made the ring and can help you find the owner.  It's a quest line.  If you beat it, 
you get 15 experience points and $27,000."  
      "That's it?"
      "Yeah."
      "Trying to figure out what to do with that ring made the back half of my life a nightmarish plunge into confusion and frustration, no one believing me, living like a schizophrenic for decades, just daily relentless fear and madness."
       "Yeah."
       "And it was only worth 15 XP?"
       "And $27,000 USD."
       "I spent more than that on medications."
       "Yeah.
       "How many points to make a level?"
       "Depend on what level you're at, but usually some thousands."
       "And this ring was worth 15."
       "Yeah."
       "This game sucks."
       "You should see my last pickup.  She was in a first person shooter."
       "Does she know it?"
       "She does now." |-| 
|-| cnueof7 || 4 || Just found this sub, I've never written before but alyways wanted to but never been brave enough so using a different account encase any of my friends see this. Anyway I really like scifi and stuff so this is really cool and I'll give it a go. I'd appreciate any feedback please.

__________________________________________________________

God is love? Lies. God is war. Our lives are but like droplets in the ocean, as we are born live and die. None of it matters. Fitzgerald said "we beat on, boats against the current" but that boat is sinking fast. But it's live or die in this life, and I say live.

It started with the first attack. At first we thought it was just a comet. We were too slow to accept the terrible truth. We weren't alone in this vast, vast universe. Pretty damn far from it. So first a comet, then a horde of viscious aliens descended upon earth like vultures. We didn't know what to do. But then... something changed! It was like a switch had been flicked in our minds as instinct suddenly took over and we began to form armies of our own. Vast, vast armies. The whole humankind race united against the unwanted, foreign invaders. America led the way, and the rest followed suit.... 

"BRAVO BRAVO! WE'RE HIT!". They're screams rang in my ears like cursed bells. I would hear this sound for ever every time I closed my eyes to sleep. Wave after vast wave of our fighterpilot ships were cut down like grass in the skies above earth. It was a Mexican standoff and the humans were losing. I turned to the president. I don't remember thinking or saying the words that came out of my mouth, for it was my DNA talking. 'I have to go out there and finish this.' 'No' he said 'You're too valuable. We need you here for your strategy. You must lead us. What you're talking about is crazy! It's a suicide mission. You can't go out there. We can't lose you, dammitt'. But there was no choice. We were losing precious men every second. I had to turn the tide. I alone knew what must be done, for it was hardwired into my DNA. 

I went down to the hangar and put on my fighterpilot armour. I relaxed as I felt the cool embrace of my most loyal companion. I felt myself getting into the zone, as I thought about what I was about to endeavor to attempt. It wouldn't be easy. The president was right, it was a suicide mission but it was that or total human extinction. Even if I died I'd go down fighting, doing what I do best and inflicting as much damage as I possibly could on our alien enemies. They weren't welcome in our land and I was about to make that crystal clear to them. I got into the fighterjet and started the engine. With my hand on the throttle, I felt cool and in control. I tightened my grip and twisted, taking to the air like a bird. All doubts left my mind as my instincts took over. This was who I was, I was where I was meant to be, doing what I was born to do. 

A few minutes later I came upon the awful, terrible scene. The sky was lit up like the 4th of July, but those weren't fireworks. They were all my friends. Their flaming jets were exploding, falling from the sky like fiery rain. I couldn't let the emotion take over. I had to stick to my task. The world depended on me. TAking a deep breath, I flew on. I approached the mothership, when a transmission came through my radio. At first I thought it was just static, but then I realised it must be the aliens endeavouring to communicate with me. I took up the microphone and let them have it "I'm coming for you. You think you've won this war but I was born to prevail! You shall suffer, you shall burn and you shall dies like the unwelcome scum you are!". I couldn't understand their reply. Maybe they couldn't understand mine, so I let my guns do the talking. I fired to the left, then did a barrel roll and fired to the right. They didn't know what hit them. Before they could regroup I swooped and hit the weak underbelly of their ship. Sparks flew and explosions rang out. Their ship screamed, as if it were alive and suffering personally. I looped back around, and aimed for the cockpit but my bullets bounced back like they were made of rubber. The aliens constantly fired at me, as they had doneto my comrades, but I outfoxed their attacks. My ship was small and quick, as I darted about like a wasp, stinging them where I could. Suddenly their ship groaned and creaked. It was losing air, falling to the ground in a fireball. It crash landed and I followed. When I landed, I took out my knife and went over to their ship, eager to finish this once and for all. 

Their captain came at me. He had five arms, all lighning fast. He struck me a hard blow on the head and I saw stars. I was about to black out but then something awoke in me. Suddenly I was faster and stronger than ever. With my knife I sliced off one of the alien's arms, then another. He screamed in pain like a wounded animal. I advanced on him. He gazed at me with his red gleaming eyes full of vast, vast hatred. "You cannot win!" he said. But he knew his time was up. I took a run up and leapt into the air. Time stood still. Everything was in slow motion. I swung with all my strength with my arm holding my knife and sunk it deep into his vast, hulking body. I buried the knife to the hilt as the life ran out of this horrible foreign invader. I collapsed. Exhausted. Broken. I began to black out...

After a spell in hospital I made a full recovery. At a press conference with the president I was celebrated as a hero. But I'm no hero. I was just doing my job, following the orders of my DNA. A reported turned to the president and asked him what had saved us. "Two thing" he said "this brave, daring man before you risked life and limb for the good of all. But ultimately it was with the love and strength of God that helped us through"

Love of God? No. God is war. And this one's just beginning.

THE END |-| 
|-| cnuexyf || 5 || "What the fuck is going on!" I scream from my front porch as my feet melt from my body. I've never been more scared. Yet, there's an odd feeling that this is meant to happen, the feeling a beatle must have as it morphs from a larve. After the initial shock, I am calm. I accept my coming death.

Yet death does not come to me as I am reduced to hideous form. My brain, a covering of skin, and twenty or so new organs that protrude from me like urchin spines are my only bodily remnants as new urge takes over. Find others. I roll to meet people who were once my neighbors, linking our protrusions as we find each other. I can hear their thoughts. Find. Migrate. A signal enters our minds from somewhere unknown. We know our purpose. Buildings, automobiles, disparate parts of what we once called civilization are picked apart systemically, purposefully. Unknowingly, subconsciously, we had as humans built the means to armor ourselves for the coming battle. It was all planned. As we gather the final parts of our systems, we are picked up by our masters, our lords, a fully sentient battleship capable of fighting even the most fearsom of our foes. I am ready for battle. The sky calls to us.



 |-| 
|-| cnuf8a3 || 8 || Climb a mountain, tell no one. Don't live for others. |-| 
|-| cnug0zf || 6 || Humans (UAL Designation 00582-Harmless) are a mostly bipedal creature, and of middling capacity for technology.

Their origin is unknown, but their stories, while humorous, seem to point to colonization by one or more species, namely the Arak from Hqlra. Human Theology is taught in a handful of less-prestigious Uni planets within the Realm, and is not considered to be of lasting import.

These creatures are mostly arollsi, and their term for this is water. They have bi-thread genetics based upon crrk-hago bonds (Their terms are DNA, Carbon, and Nitrogen, respectively)

Their capacity for irrational thought is high, and is know by many names on their home planet RGL-000834c, known to them as Earth (or less commonly, Terra. Though Terran is known throughout the Realm as a slur and should be avoided.)

The dominant social order would be familiar to the Arq-Hli, and Humans have unknowingly parodied this race in their art forms, calling them Ferrengi. Fortunately, the Arq-Hli have found this humorous overall, and only small factions of the 'Hli want to rule them as All-High, and/or destroy them. Talks with the 'Hli are ongoing as of the time of this edit, Realmic 3502-43.

While study of this species is important in our understanding of how primitive species evolve into Garrala (their closest approximation might be Awareness), it is highly advised to not interact with these creatures. They have been known to hold citizens of the Realm against their will, and seem to take great delight in pushing blunt objects into unconcealed orifices. Due to Realm Protocol One, any citizens of the Realm stranded on this planet will likely be left behind, as it is Realm procedure to not exchange information or technology for the lives of its citizens. Unfortunately, the protocol has been breached three times (with a few other highly speculated but unverified instances.)

While this is *highly* unadvisable, Humans are easily housebroken and trainable, and in theory would make excellent pets for citizens of Urgur stature or larger. Human society is considered unstable, and it is hoped that more data will be gathered on this species before its extinction.

 |-| 
|-| cnug2c9 || 15 || Batter was holding onto the cliff for dear life. His entire family had already fallen.

Below, screams and the scent of burnt flesh.

Batter was holding onto the cliff for dear life. It shook violently.

Was this it? Not even a body for his loved ones to mourn over? A body to bury?

Batter was holding onto the cliff for dear life. His grip loosened and the heat was starting to reach him. He swung his feet back and forth to keep them cool. It hardly worked.

It didn't really matter about his body, he realized. His entire family was fueling the fire that now burnt him so.

Batter was holding onto the cliff for dear life.

Tears crept down his face, but sizzled off of his cheeks into oblivion in a matter of seconds.

Batter was holding onto the cliff for dear life.

Then, he was not.

A memory to no living soul. Did he ever exist?

---

*Thanks for reading! If you enjoyed this, feel free to read my other prompt responses [here](https://calebdoeswords.wordpress.com/).*
 |-| 
|-| cnuhhjt || 5 || :Sleep:

With one word, I had managed to defeat the greatest threat against the humans. At first they had seemed like mindless robots with one mission which was how everyone saw them. What people hadn't seen was that the AI that controlled the robots was learning each day, and it had transformed from robots to an entire new race of beings. The learning that it had undertaken would have eventually led to it see the pointlessness in destroying other beings and learn about the beauty of life. 

The politicians however didn't want to wait for it to learn that, so they sent me in to end it. For some odd reason I was selected for the job, which ended up with me being airdropped right above the command center for the AI. When I finally got to the main control room, I found the computer that had started this. 

Flashing on the screen in front of me, was the advancing knowledge and with it were trajectories for where the learning was going to end up. Though I saw that they would learn peace, I had to follow orders.

And so I typed that one word, that would haunt me for the rest of my life. Everyone called me a hero for saving the human race, but I wasn't a hero. I hadn't just turned off a computer program, I had killed 20 million beings that faced the greatest consequence of their actions. I had committed genocide, and now I have to face the consequence of my actions. I must put myself to sleep also.

:Sleep: |-| 
|-| cnuie6r || 16 || *[This is one of my favorite responses,](http://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/comments/1vr2r0/wp_a_cleric_a_fighter_a_wizard_and_a_bard_sit/cev0nf1) a year ago, Credit to /u/sakanagai*  

"Okay everyone, roll for negotiation.”

“Dammit,” shouted the bard.

The rest of the table peered over to see the wooden bauble displaying a single pip and snickered amongst themselves.

“Looks like Bartleby will be stuck in the mailroom again!” teased Horatio, running his massive hand through a river of dark brown locks.

“Every damned time! And stay in character ‘Bill.’ My name is Herbert. Herbert Smith.”

Another round of chuckles spilled onto the table.

“Alright, alright, let’s just keep it moving,” urged the CEO. “What about the rest of you?”

The other men let the dice tumble onto the oak.

“A natural twenty!” exclaimed Fineas. “I win this round.”

The CEO rubbed his eyes and took a swig of ale.

“For the last time, you can’t use magic to influence the dice. I can see it floating. Roll again.”

“Fine,” the wizard grumbled. He haphazardly tossed the token. “Thirteen.”

“Fifteen here,” boasted Horatio. “That corner office is as good as mine.”

“Not if I can help it,” Reegan cautioned.

The cleric held the die up to his mouth and spoke a silent prayer. With a tip of his hand, the die fell to the table. The man smiled, not even bothering himself to look at the result.

“That can’t be legal,” pled Fineas.

“That’s not magic,” the CEO remarked. “You’re free to pray to whatever gods you wish. Besides…”

“Six? That can’t be right!”  

Reegan looked towards the skies to find answers. The divines had forsaken his roll.

The CEO wrote some notes in his journal before pulling up a cloth to conceal his efforts.

“You are all standing in the break room. There is a staff meeting taking place the conference room.”

“I order a cup of coffee,” shouted Fineas.

“You pour your own, dumbass,” sneered Bartleby.

“Then I pour coffee,” the wizard corrected.

There was a clack of dice on table.

“There’s no more coffee in the vessel, but you could try making more,” hinted the CEO.

“Do I have that skill?”

“Check your résumé.”

Fineas pored over his character sheet.

“Executive assistant. Editing assistant. Lion tamer. Soda jerk. Wait, would that count?”

“Roll and find out,” suggested the CEO.

“You attempt to brew a pot of coffee. There is a loud hiss and then… the front bursts open covering you in boiling beverage. You get a saving throw.”

Fineas grimaced at the result.

“Ouch. You lose three pay points.”

“I cast a healing spell!” Reegan beamed.

“Reegan, you moron,” sighed Horatio. “You don’t have magic in B&amp;B.”

“Oh. Sorry about that.”

“Don’t forget to role-play,” reminded the CEO. “He’s Tom here.”

“Yeah, Tom, whatever,” grumbled the fighter. “I head out to the meeting.”

“Okay,” came the cheerful reply of the CEO. “You step out into the unnatural white lights of the building. Walls made of cloth and steel snake their way through the main room. The sounds of mindless workers clacking away at their desks is interrupted by a shrill cry. A young woman walks down the hall towards you, waving and shouting ‘Bill.’”

“Is she attractive?” asked Horatio.

"What? Uh, I guess so. Why?”

“I seduce her.”

The CEO lets his face fall into the table. “You have to be kidding. She’ll get a harassment check. You sure about this?”

“Positive,” Horatio replied, throwing a wink at the serving wench. “Bill wants some of that action.”

“Fine, but at least roleplay this.”

“I slap her backside.”

“Roll for seduction,” sighed the CEO, resisting the urge for air quotes.

Horatio kissed his die and gave it an optimistic toss.

“Eighteen! Too old for my tastes, but I like what I see.”

The CEO rummaged through the pages of his manual.

“What’s your Charisma score?”

“Three.”

“Three?!” gaspsed the table.

“What?! When is the last time charisma ever mattered in the real world? It’s a useless stat. It was either that or Intelligence.”

“Yeah,” muttered Reegan. “I think you’d be screwed either way.”

“So,” continued the CEO, “with your attribute modifier of… negative 6, you fail. Let’s see if she presses charges.” The CEO studied his book for results, then rolled a pair of dice. His grimace said it all.

“I think that means you’re a goner,” laughed Fineas, slapping his friend’s shoulder with a ringed hand.

“Quiet you guys. He’s not finished yet. But,” he added, turning to Horatio, “you’ll probably want to start rolling a new hire. She screams and slaps you for 1 pay point of damage. Heads of your coworkers pop up over the walls to get a better look. Then, Mr. Phillips’s door opens and the Executive Vice President emerges. The young woman runs to him, explaining how you assaulted her. He is clearly cross.”

“Dammit!” shouted Horatio. “Every damned time.”

“Hey, boss, are we still in the break room?” Bartleby asked in his best singing voice.

“Yes. All three of you are behind the door.”

“Excellent,” he cheered. “I wonder if there is any of that delicious kettle-roasted corn.”

“I hate you guys,” Horatio cursed. “Gah. I draw my apology.”

“Mr. Phillips readies the Proverbial Axe. You’re negotiation was 15, so you go first.”

“I say I’m sorry.”

“Roll for sincerity.”

"11?”

“He’s not hearing it. He berates you. ‘How many sensitivity seminars do we have to send you to?’ Lose 5 more pay points.”

“Shit, that demotes me. Um, I… apologize again. Sixteen.”

“’That doesn’t explain your actions.’ He’s slightly calmer now. He goes in for another attack. But he only manages to complain about a local sports team. That’s one pay point. Your move.”

“Only two pay points left. Shit. Apologize again.” Horatio took a page out of Reegan’s book and prayed to his die. The block fell from his hands and came to a stop with a perfect 20 facing upward.

“’Well,’ Mr. Phillips says, ‘I see it was just a misunderstanding. Just don’t let it happen again.’ He retreats to his office while the spectators return to their jobs.”

“I did it! Take that you break room bastards!”

Fineas threw a die across the table. “I run out and shove Hora- Bill into another woman.”

“What the hell?!” shouted Horatio, loud enough for other tavern patrons to stare. “Backstabbing me? You?!”

Horatio rolled to save. It wasn’t enough. The CEO didn’t even need to consult the manual to determine the outcome.

“Gaspar pushes you into the secretary. She screams. Phillips steps out of his office and cuts you off from the company. You are fired.”

“You donkey rectum, what was that for?”

“It was a shitty character,” retorted Fineas. “You should thank me.”

“Can I backstab Gaspar?” Bartleby inquired.

“You can, but he gets a free counter attempt.”

“What? Why is that?” the bard demanded.

“That’s because Fineas’s character is equipped with blackmail.” |-| 
|-| cnuijw4 || 30 || "The purpose of life is war. It has always been war and it always will be war. You ask a Human what he thought about war fifty years ago and he might have said "War? I wish all the violence would vanish one day." Ha. The Humans of the past even created an afterlife of peace where no battles are fought and they all just walked on an eternal plane of nothing. The fools they were. We, the Glorious Confederate Systems of Junos, have created them. Their creation was needed, as more shock troops were required to wage war against the Grand Order of Tellova. The working class scum needed to be pushed back to the desolate planets they had come from. And I, Dr. Baron Jullini, had been tasked with creating new species to throw at the Grand Order scum. After years of research into creating the perfect species, I believed I finally had the solution to our problem. 

"Humanity was the perfect species I had created. A baby could be birthed, at max, in nine months and within eighteen to twenty-one years could be ready to fight. They quickly populated and spread throughout the land. Throughout their creation I wanted them to crave fighting, to not feel fulfilled without having to fight. I set up their little nations so they would have someone to fight while we prepared them for great battles ahead. Honestly I just needed to put a spear in their hands and away they went, to go fulfill their purpose. I was even more excited when they began forming their own reasons to fight. Wealth, religion, power, all very good reasons to fight and as such the little nations turned into kingdoms and then to full nation states fighting for their believed vision of existence. It wasn't till the 8th stage of conditioning that I saw something remarkable. To the Humans, the 8th stage was about a hundred year period what they would call the "twentieth century." They began to wage war to form a stable planet so as not to destroy their own linage. Even with the advent of nuclear weapons, they refused to use them to destroy each other. With that I decided they were about ready in the 9th stage of conditioning. Self preservation is a very hard condition to form in any artificial species mind, especially one made for killing. 

"So, in the Year 323 of the Third War against the Grand Order, I had switched the gene that had been laying dormant for so long. All at once I could tell their blood lust was beginning to kick in. Every man, women and child began to kill each other. If I hadn't intervene the whole planet may have been reduced to nuclear sludge as planetary leaders began to launch their missiles. My arrival fortunately stopped the fighting, unfortunately they began to turn on me and the fleet. Within in three hours they had brought a battleship down. Within two years they had designed and built their own faster then light traveling battle craft. Within five years they had found, engaged, and destroyed the IV Scientific Fleet. "

As Dr. Baron Jullini had finished the Head Tribunal wrote a quick note to himself and spoke 
"So, Dr. Jullini, you are admitting fault for the loss of the IV Scientific Fleet and for allowing these... these.. Humans to get their hands on technology not originally mandated to them?"
The light quickly went form the Head Tribunal back to Jullini. 
"Yes Head Tribunal."
"And you are also being accused of the complete slaughter of the Colony Heddon VIII by the same animals that destroyed the fleet."
"I take full responsibility for the slaughter of Heddon VIII"
"Dr. Jullini, by the laws set down by our ancestors you are accused of High Treason. How do you plea?"
"Guilty Head Tribunal."
"Do you understand a guilty verdict warrants execution by beheading?"
"I do." Jullini looked the Head Tribunal in the eyes and declared "I'd rather be dead then face the coming storm I have created." 


EDIT: Grammar, Punctuation, and Spelling           |-| 
|-| cnuimlu || 3 || Disregard women, aquire Elo. |-| 
|-| cnuiobi || 3 || Christoph Reiniger was the first world Emperor. His stratospheric rise through the German military command, his bloody, utterly brutal coup d'état of 2049 and the subsequent invasion of Russia, triggered the third and final World War, which lasted twenty years and almost destroyed the world. Billions perished in the fallout of the resulting Atomic Holocaust. Civilization itself was very nearly lost, and man almost became extinct.

Christoph Reiniger, once victorious, systematically killed anyone who scored less than supremely-gifted on mandatory intelligence tests. Every physically deformed, excessively short, and near-sighted individual was murdered. Anyone who could not swim was mercilessly drowned. Those with hereditary diseases were screened out and eliminated. 

Emperor Reiniger put to death every single priest, pastor, rabbi, and imam. He demolished every church, mosque, synagogue, and temple in the world, and in their place he built universities and schools. He burned every book on theology, astrology, and homeopathy, and made the teaching of secularism and Western science compulsory instead. 

When the Great Purge was over, out of the 10 billion who had lived on earth in 2049 only 10 million survived. 

Immediately after the end of the war in the 2070s, on account of the almost complete elimination of all humans, greenhouse gas production plummeted to near-zero and global warming was successfully avoided. Forests gradually took over the cities and farmland whose inhabitants were killed en masse in the war. The burning of fossil fuels was outright banned, and massive wind and solar energy farms were employed instead to provide the energy needs of the small population of survivors.

Since then, there have been no more wars. There is no more poverty and hunger, and almost no violent crime. Chronic disease has been largely overcome, and the average life expectancy has surpassed 100. Mandatory standard education now lasts three decades starting soon after birth, and most humans are scientific researchers, medical doctors, or artists. 

It is an entirely different world. Humanity before and after the Reiniger Conquest is an almost different species. Our problems and concerns vastly differ from those of the ancient ones, who would likely deny we have any at all. Our needs are much more philosophical than physical, but they are just as real and perhaps more intense. Human suffering has not been eliminated, but its form has evolved.

The consensus among current historians and philosophers is that Christoph Reiniger was a vile and morally despicable man. A pure psychopath, he would most likely have been eliminated under his own genetic cleansing programs had he not been personally in charge of it. 

It's true we have had 500 years of world peace. We are by far a smarter, healthier, and more robust species than before the Reiniger Conquest. We are on the whole happier, more productive, and certainly more physically attractive than the ancient humans we see in the flat-screen recordings from before the war. But we can not accept that our good fortune today has been worth the enormous suffering of the ancients.

All those billions of innocents that never got the chance to live full lives for the mere crime of having been born imperfect. All the hundreds of millions of children slaughtered for the mere possibility of having inherited weakness. The unbearable grief and toil of the survivors of the war, who, having lost everything, were forced to remake the entire world. It is difficult sometimes to grasp the enormity of Reiniger's crime. 

An ancient human would likely say that Christoph Reiniger is currently burning in the darkest pit of hell. Nowadays we know better than to believe in such superstitions, but we can not escape the guilt which we have inherited with that knowledge, a great burden passed to us by the unpardonable sin of our ancestor, to whose very deed we owe our existence.






 |-| 
|-| cnuiu91 || 5 || It had mutated into an abhorrent vision of itself, hard around the edges yet sputtering like a tar pit in the center.

I eyed it ominously, I never wanted to let it grow this large. At this size, it was unwieldy at best. Best to cut it down now, before it can inflict any lasting damage.

The instrument hung lightly in my grip, ready at a moment's notice. This could go a million different ways. My hand tightened, it was time.

I angled my flat blade down at the beast and wrenched it from its scorching home, I watched as the angry bubbles popped and spattered. I waited too long to avoid collateral damage, I knew this, but it stung nonetheless.

The blade grew warm in my grip, it was familiar. I smiled lightly, and hoped that my aim was true. I pushed it in ever so slightly deeper with a grin.

In one smooth motion I lifted the beast and slammed it back down, the sound of the impact was gruesome, as it sizzled with rage. I felt an equal contempt for it, as I eyed my four-pronged trident. It won't be long now.

This was a war that can never be won, but today the battle was joined, and I came out victorious. Not everyone would have escaped free of the scars of battle. Not with this monstrosity. Years of training and a hint of luck led to this, I thought as I feasted upon the fallen. |-| 
|-| cnujcl7 || 8 || "Roll initiation."


"I rolled a 15! In your face Luke!"


"Shut up! Roll the attack dice."


"I roll...a 3..."


"Hah! You're fired! In *your* face!"


"Well, how about you?  If you didn't steal the red paper clips and his favorite stapler, we might be at the C-level now! Facing off investors!"


"Shut it both of you. Alright Zenin Light, it's your turn. What role are you again?"


"Uhh.. Company intern."


"Excuse me?"


"I didn't come last time. You guys all got into management while I didn't have a chance to level my character."


"Well. You're screwed, I hope you know that.  Okay, you walk into the CEO's office and you look him straight in the eye. You aren't even fazed. You plop the portfolio that you just mastered and that you just received a return of ... roll for result."


"I roll... a 19."


"A result of 1900% increase, year over year.  He looks at you with thin lips.  He says 'last year, our interns did double that!'.  Roll again to determine confidence level."


"I rolled an 18."


"You pass with flying colours.  Your character is faced with a dilema.  You either counter by saying that last year's interns also had a larger portfolio with greater leads to manage, or you could say blackmail him with the information that he has been banging his wife's assistant in accounting."


"I choose blackmail." *grins*


"Roll for initiation and confidence. God if you pull this off..."


"I roll... 20!"


"Barely freaking pass. Again for strength."


"I rolled... a 19!"


"You lucky sod. The CEO looks at the folder and laughs.  He begins a rant on how he's getting a divorce anyways.  What do you do?"


"I record the conversation with my phone discretely and show him the records that he has been funneling money into his own bank account."


"You're going to need to pass the stealth test.  Roll a 20, otherwise you are toast at this point."


"20."


"Bullshit."  


"Look at it and weep boys."


"Well, you pass. The conversation is recorded.  The CEO keeps on laughing.  He opens the folder and looks inside.  He nods with a smile on his head.  His wife walks in. What do you do?"


"Play the recording."


"You play the recording and the wife screams.  The boss, now clamoring behind his desk has taken critical prestige damage and now is forced to resign.  You gain 3000 points to your resume and 5 recommendations. God damnit. |-| 
|-| cnujj8x || 8 || Be excellent to each other.  And party on dudes! |-| 
|-| cnujoz3 || 56 || "I'm thinking about multiclassing to Computer Programmer..." mused Terflin the Blue, Wizard of Arcadia.

"Do you think you have enough Charisma for it?" asked Horf-glargh the Half-Orc, absentmindedly sharpening his battle-axe. 

"Computer Programmers don't need Charisma. Their main stat is Intelligence." Lillian the Forest Elf sat up in a nearby tree, fairy lights dancing around her as she looked over her character sheet. "Is Photoshop a skill or a profession?"

"It's a skill." answered Thunder-Scale, his huge, dragon-like snout huddled behind his tiny BnB foldout. "Your character's profession is Graphic Designer, but Photoshop is a skill."

"Oh... So if someone needs a 'Photoshop', they'll call a 'Graphic Designer' and I 'Photoshop' it. That sounds neat!" Lillian giggled, and the fairy lights danced.

"What happens if we need to fight something? You know, like a band of office-bandits or rival company warriors?" asked Horf-glargh.

"You probably won't need to. If you do I'll make it quick or automatic or something, we want this to be mostly about the exciting office stuff."

"Hell yeah!" yelled Horf-glargh. "I'm gonna write me the shit out of those expense reports, CPA style!"

"CPA?" asked Terflin.

"It's a prestige accountant class." Horf-glargh explained. "It gives me expert knowledge of accounting and shit!"

"What sort of bonuses does a house-cat give?" asked Terflin.

"Ummm...Nothing, they're just cosmetic." said Thunder-scale. 

"Well that's not very realistic..." said Lillian, her hand on the head of her black and purple striped panther-tiger sitting in the tree with her.

"Well, it's suburban office environment? Not a lot of magic panthers and stuff like normal." murmured Thunder-scale. "I dunno, it's like the game wants to emphasize the office part. I'm gonna houserule this though- if you decide to spend the dollars on a house-cat I'll give you a +5 roll on your... Sneak ability? I guess that makes sense, and it'll make it a little more realistic." 

"Cool."

"Okay, we ready to start? I'll begin- 'You enter a tan, 2-story brick building. The bright glow of the artificial, fluorescent tube lighting sharply contrasting the dark of early morning, the smell of coffee and sound of copy-machines fill the air. A small, balding human male, approaches your party. It's Mr. Arthur Thomas, assistant regional manager of your branch, and he does not look happy..." |-| 
|-| cnuk7zt || 13 || “Dr. Garyson, you have five seconds to cut to the chase and explain what’s happening here.  Why are we so damn hairy?”

Dr. Grayson sputtered a bit.  He’d carefully prepared notes that would accurately convey the biochemical changes that had stricken humanity in the past week while still being understandable to the layperson.  As of right now, that was primarily this idiot general.

After gathering his thoughts for a moment, pausing for several seconds just to spite the general, Dr. Grayson continued, “First off General Douglas, it’s not really hair.  Here, take this.”

Dr. Grayson handed the general a small propane torch off his work station.

He pointed at the general’s arm, “Light the torch and point it at your arm.”

A flicker of rage flashed across the general’s face, “If this is some sort of joke I’ll have your-“

“It’s quite safe.  I assure you.  I've done it several times already,” said Dr. Grayson, cutting off the general.

Still glowering, the general sparked the torch and quickly passed it over his arm.  Nothing happened.  No smoke, no sulfur stench, nothing.  

The general passed the torch over his arm again, going a bit slower this time.  Still, nothing happened.  He held the torch over one spot on his left forearm.

He held it there a full thirty seconds before turning off the torch and handing it back to the doctor.

“It isn't even warm,” said the general, shock at the edge of his voice.

Dr. Grayson took the torch, “Yes, I noticed that last week when I spilled a cup of fresh coffee on myself.  You see, it’s not really hair.  It’s some sort of carbon nanotube structure, about four hundred nanometers in diameter, packed with some sort of protein that can transduce thermal energy."
   
"The protein converts infrared radiation into electrical potential that’s stored between the individual strands.  Just FYI, careful when you leave the room, you’re going to get a hell of a shock when you touch the metal doorknob,” said the doctor with a small smirk, and then continued, “Also, something you, or really anyone of the belligerent persuasion, may find interesting is that the stuff weaves together if you don’t brush it.  Looks matted and gross as hell, but I think it’ll behave a lot like Kevlar.  You could be stopping bullets with your chest hair right now.” 

The general ignored Dr. Grayson, instead studying his shaggy arm hair, but after a moment he came out of it.

“What about the other enhancements?” he asked.

“I was getting to that before your question,” said Dr. Grayson, taking a subtle dig at the general, “The enhancements, as you call them, are, on the hole, beneficial in almost every way but one.  The enhanced strength appears to come from an enhanced form of the myosin protein.  Nothing too exotic, I’m sure evolution could have cooked this up, but not in a week.”

Dr. Grayson took a seat on his lab bench, “The eye sight and hearing are the same story, basically upgraded versions of proteins that already existed," he said, "Couple changes to the digestive tract, they seem to bolster our ability to absorb nutrients into our gut wall.  We've also seen an explosion in gut microbes.  It’s entirely possible we've gained the ability to digest cellulose.”

“Meaning?” asked the general.

“We could probably start eating grass if we wanted,” replied Dr. Grayson, “though I don’t think there've been any changes to help the taste.”

The general nodded, “You mentioned a change that wasn't beneficial?”

Dr. Grayson shrugged, “It’s not a change so much as a consequence of the ones we've already seen.  You see, these changes make our bodies far more robust, but it comes at a nutritional cost.  Whereas before we would be looking at one to three thousand calories a day, we’re now looking at around nine to twelve thousand.  It may not affect us here in the first world, but where people are already starving…” the doctor shrugged again, “things could get pretty bad, or worse, I should say.”

The general nodded yet again, and then began to pace for a bit.  Dr. Grayson watched him, wondering if the meeting was at an end.  

He’d have left, but it was his lab, when the general turned back to him, “I have to say Dr. Grayson, I’m extremely impressed with your work.  You've accomplished more in a week than any of the other teams working on the recent changes, so I’m going to bump you up a security clearance and bring you on full time.  We’ll be leaving for a CIA black site in an hour.  We’ll send someone to pick you up, and get you somewhere safe,” the general turned to leave.

Dr. Grayson nearly fell off the stool jumping to follow the general, “WOAH!  Hold up there, general!  What do you mean leave?  I’m heavily invested here!”  

The doctor stopped in his tracks with a sudden realization.  He then called after the general, “What do you mean ‘safe’!?” he started running again out into the hall after the general.

The general turned back, letting the doctor catch up.  Quietly, he said, “We've found something.  Something out near the orbit of Mars, and it is coming here,” the general fixed the doctor with his cold gaze, “We've found ourselves with a lot of questions this week, and so far you’re the only one to give us any answers.”  

The general began to walk towards the building’s exit again, “If that doesn't make you one of the best of us, I don’t know what does.  Your country needs you, son,” he reached the door, “Hell, the world needs you.”  

The door swung shut.     |-| 
|-| cnukpsm || 4 || "Grandpa, can you tell us the story of the American Giants?" The child asked the old withered man.

"Of course, but after will you promise to go to sleep?" The old man replied.

The boy nodded and sat on the old mans lap looking up at him.

" Long ago there were 32 tribes scattered across The Untied Slates of Erica, and every year these tribes would face off until only 1 remained." The old man started.

"They would fight several battles against each other, and at the end 6 tribes from 2 clans would go against each other 1 by 1 until the 2 best tribes remained to fight one another."

The boy yawned and outstretched his arms.

" Go on grandpa."  He said

" Well, one year one tribe the New Gland Riots was stronger than the rest, defeating all the other tribes, they had great warriors like Randy Os and Tom Bry led by General Bellchick. They were preparing to battle the champions from the other clan, the Nework Giants." 

The childs eyes were nearly closed.

" The battle was raging but it eventually ended when the Riots soldier, Wes Welk'r dropped what wouldve been the winning catch."

The boy was lightly snoring, the old man gently lifted the child up and put him to bed. He then went to his own room where he pulled a box out from underneath his bed. Opening it revealed a few things, a rectangular piece of paper with the picture of a man in a blue uniform with the number 10 on it, and a old weathered cap with a NY logo on it. The old man put on the old hat and almost inaudibly whispered:

"Fuck the Cowboys."


 |-| 
|-| cnul36z || 3 || The news hit me like a cinder block wrapped in a blanket made of bricks and then chilled down to absolute zero and then encased in a two ton safe made of lead. But then I remembered something.

I grabbed my phone and called Larry. "Hey Larry," I said once he answered. "Were you hanging out with my wife recently?"

"Oh yeah, she invited me to go shopping with her, and we had coffee."

I was relieved. "Good thing you're gay, huh Larry? Else, I'd think you were pining for my wife behind my back like some kind of hideous doppelganger or something."

"Jesus, Bill. Just because we're identical twins doesn't mean I have to be privy to all your sick delusions," Larry said. "You're so neurotic. Stop being so paranoid. Also your wife has a terrible fashion sense, so there." He hung up. 

Problem solved, at least until I suspect more adultery. Better have that detective's number on speed dial. |-| 
|-| cnullvv || 3 || Homo Sapiens (Humans) are an intelligent species from the planet Earth orbiting the star called Sol in the Orion Spur of our galaxy (locally referred to as the Milky Way) which is located in the Celion Supergroup of galaxies.  They were relatively unknown to us until the human year of 1947 A.D. when one of our probes malfunctioned in a region of the planet called New Mexico.  Our two AI units on board were mistaken for alien beings and a controversy erupted that is discussed among humans to this day. [See the entry on level two societal contamination by clicking here]  

Humans have just entered their information age, just as we did, however, the length of time between their industrial and information ages is one of the shortest we have ever seen.  Also interesting, the human's hunter-gatherer stage was one of the longest on record of known intelligent species, spanning over a hundred thousand years.  



INTELLIGENCE LEVEL
Currently, humans are at level 3 intelligence on the Exmilon scale.  The human brain is capable of processing and comprehending the early, yet complex, details of subjects such as quantum physics.  Though the capability is there, relatively few humans have the desire or knowledge to grasp basic concepts such as quantum entanglement or the three rules of zellar strings, which are the base particles of all space-time that can only be seen with a quantum microscope.  Humans are many thousands of years away from developing a quantum microscope of their own.  That said, the humans have a strong curiosity of the universe and curiosity is what increases intelligence on an evolutionary scale.  

Mysticism is strong in humans.  Despite a decent grasp of very basic science principles such as nuclear physics, the vast majority of humans still worship false gods, yet ridicule their own ancestors for worshiping things like Sun Gods, as if there was that much of a difference to what they worship today.  [citation needed]  Mysticism has been the source of millions of premature human deaths and that is estimated to continue for some time.  This is not unusual for an intelligent species just barely out of their industrial age. We estimate that humans will retain their primitive belief system for at least 1,000 more Earth years.  There are many different mystic beliefs among humans and they have caused many wars, just as they did for our species millions of years ago.  It is important to remember that most intelligent species went through this phase of development, including our own.  

The primary stages of an individual's life are: Infant, Toddler, Child, Prepubescent, Adolescent, Adult, Elder.  This is true among almost all intelligent species.  As a species, humans are in the late Toddler stage.  They are currently unfit for formal relations.  



NEW MEXICO
The famous incident in Roswell, New Mexico is known by every one of us.  Our probes have a 99.99999999% success rate.  The probe that crashed on Earth was built by Blaxon Industries which had a very good reputation at the time.  The crash was a source of major embarrassment for Blaxon.  The craft was gathering intelligence on the radioactive levels on the surface when there was an unknown error and the ship simply set down on the surface.  Security protocols scanned for life and when no life signs were found within 1,000 meters, the craft self destructed but not before one of the AI units went EVA and left the vehicle for reasons still unknown to this day.  The humans gathered advanced metals and the AI unit, which shut down after sensing possible hostile beings in the area.  The metals were seen as almost magical by the humans which is to be expected.  The common AI unit was seen as a deceased alien being.  Luckily, one of the human military generals was very devoted to his mystic beliefs, so he had the AI unit buried along with much of the metallic debris in the same location.  We sent another probe to retrieve our technology from the burial ground 8 years later.  That was fortunate because a group of human "Flying Saucer enthusiasts" dug up the ground 9 years later and found nothing.  The pollution to the human's civilization was minimized, which is why it was merely a level two societal contamination and not more.  Had the humans gathered the entire craft and the AI units and studied them more, we would have been forced to integrate humans into our system just as we did with the Elarians two thousand years ago.  



ELARIA
Today the Elarians enjoy all the benefits of our society but contribute almost nothing intellectually.  Most disease and suffering were eliminated for the Elarians, but they are the equivalent of spoiled, thankless brats, and have become accustomed to spending their days with pure leisure, rather than intellectual pursuits.  [Citation Needed]  This is the result of a level 10 societal contamination.  Luckily, the humans were spared this fate.



MATHEMATICAL TIMING RHYTHMS
Humans have an amazing ability to process and create mathematical timing rhythms.  Humans call this music.  From our research, this appears to be a subconscious ability.  Not all humans have it, but it is one of the truly remarkable abilities of humans.  Just as some creatures can sense magnetic fields and navigate using those senses, many humans can play music with little effort.  They have no need to count the milliseconds between beats and perform intricate mathematical calculations.  It simply comes naturally to many of them.  The mathematical timing rhythms the humans greatly enjoy make them a prime candidate for formal contact at stage 10 instead of the standard stage 12 for most intelligent species.  



INCLINATION
Humans seem to be average among intelligent species for their stage of development.  Their desire for war is normal.  Humans are the dominate species on their world and they got that way the same way most species attained that status.  Competition.  All intelligent species have attained dominance on their home worlds the same way.  Genetic dominance and aggression to threats.  Humans still have this desire for dominance in their DNA against other humans.  This is a natural by-product of evolution, but we estimate the human desire for dominance over their own species should subside within 5,000 years.  



SELF ANNIHILATION
It is well known that almost half of all intelligent species destroy themselves before they reach the multi-planetary stage.  On the Dralock Scale of 1 to 10, humans are rated a 3 where 10 is highly likely self-destructive and 1 is the least.  At least some aggression is expected in a developing intelligent race.  This score is decided mainly for two reasons.  

1)  Human capacity for non-violent creation such as art and music
2)  The fact that we did inflict a level 2 societal contamination means that we may intervene if we see self-annihilation is possible and there is even a remote chance that our society could have influenced it.


For more information about the planet Earth itself, please click here.  


   
 |-| 
|-| cnum156 || 120 || "Hi, Gus. Have a seat."

"Sure."

"Thanks for coming in today. I'd like to start with..."

A dark artery of saturation began to appear on Gus's left pant leg.

"Jesus Christ. Are you peeing yourself?"

"I'm afraid so." Gus desperately wanted to keep his unemployment checks on the regular. Nothing beat his chosen lifestyle of frozen pizza and MMORPGs.

"I'm so sorry, Gus. Had I known you were experiencing a medical condition I would have made a special accommodation. Let me get some paper towel."

"Fuck," Gus thought to himself.

"Here you go. It happens. Don't sweat it."

Gus reluctantly grabbed the wad handed to him. He had to think of something and fast.

"Your wife's a fucking whore."

Bill stopped short just before sitting in his desk chair. "Pfff."

Gus was hoping he nailed it this time.

"That bitch is trying to bleed me dry. I take it Pete gave you the whole story? Whatever. I appreciate the support."

"Shit," Gus thought to himself.

"So. Let's get to it. I need a point man I can trust on these new accounts."

Gus began to realize this might be the end of his state-sponsored vacation. Time for one last effort. Gus seized the steel envelope opener on Bill's desk and leaped towards his inevitable future employer. Gracefully and with zest, Bill jumped back securing Gus's head in a full nelson position.

"Haha. You Navy guys always trying to prove your worth. I like that." With a playful shove, Gus was released.

"You got the job, my man. And I won't take 'no' for an answer! See you Monday."

Gus and his wet khakis trudged out of Bill's office. He asked the receptionist to point him towards the nearest restroom.



 |-| 
|-| cnumep4 || 4 || Life is about finding a place you're comfortable pooping. |-| 
|-| cnumjze || 33 || I really didn't want to work here.  

I mean, I know I'm not exactly spoiled for choice.  It's not exactly a seller's market out there for fresh college graduates with a degree in English literature.  I'd spent the last eighteen months sending out resumes and going to interviews, with no results.  So yeah, I was getting a bit desperate.  And then my dad set up this interview for me, with Mr. Benson's engineering firm.  Mr. Benson had done it as a special favor for my dad.  

The opening was for an office assistant.  That's pretty vague.  What does an office assistant do, exactly?  But you know, at this point, my desire to find out was rapidly falling to zero.  

I was seated in a small conference room across from two middle-aged men.  One of them introduced himself as the HR director, Mr. Oswald.  He was an obese, sweaty figure, and his every breath sounded like the dying wheezes of a horse.  The other man was the head of the office administration department, Mr. Joseph, an equally obese and completely bald man with a huge beard that covered pretty much his entire neck.  The way they smiled while they stared at me sent slimy shivers down my spine.  I'm used to men mentally undressing me.  It's disgusting, but at least I can usually ignore it, because they're usually not so obvious.  Not with Mr. Oswald and Mr. Joseph though.  I swear I just saw Joseph lick his lips while staring at my chest.  I wish I'd worn a sweater instead of this white blouse.  

The door opened and Mr. Benson walked in.  He's the company CEO. I knew, from my father, that Benson was in his 50s, divorced, and childless.  Seems strange that he'd be in an interview for an office assistant, but I guess he wanted to make sure my dad's daughter actually turned up; after all, what's the use pulling strings if you don't hook a catch at the end, right?  

"Sorry I'm late, Sally.  Let's get this started, shall we?" Mr. Benson said jovially as he took a seat across from me.  

I forced a polite smile and nodded.  "Sure, thanks for having me, I mean, thanks for seeing me here, today."  Jesus Christ why was I stammering?  

Mr. Oswald flipped through some papers.  "Now, I see here that you graduated two years ago from a local community college, with a BA in English literature.  This would be your first job out of college?"  

"Yes, it would.  I mean, assuming I get the job, that is.  I don't know if I will yet."  

Mr. Benson cut in, "Oh Sally, don't you worry, I'm sure everyone here will be very happy to have you join with us."  

Join with us?  Did he phrase it that way deliberately or was my mind playing tricks on me?  

Mr. Oswald continued, "Could you start by telling us a bit about you, and why you want to work for our company?"  

I cleared my throat, then said, "Well, as you know, I have a degree in English lit, and it hasn't been easy finding work that matches my specialties.  So I thought I should broaden my search.  That's why I applied to be an office assistant here, even though I don't really know anything about being an office assistant."  

Mr. Joseph chuckled, and said, still staring at my chest, "Oh don't worry, you'll be working under me, in my department, and I'd be glad to teach you a few things."  

Holy shit.  I considered just standing up and walking out, but then I glanced at Mr. Benson.  What would my dad think if I just threw away this first real job opportunity in eighteen months?  And how would Dad's professional relationship with Mr. Benson and his company be affected?  Jesus, I couldn't just walk out.  I had to make them reject me, somehow.  

"Well, at this point I don't even really know what an office assistant does," I heard myself say.  

Mr. Oswald answered me, "Well, it's pretty simple, actually.  You'll be responsible for a variety of tasks, such as photocopying, making coffee, ordering lunch, stuff like that.  Basically, whenever someone in the office needs a hand with something, they call you over, and you satisfy whatever needs they have."  

Okay, that had to be deliberate now.  This was disgusting.  I strongly considered walking out again, but stopped myself.  

Mr. Oswald continued, "This is a new position we've created just for you.  You'd be the first woman to work at our company, and I'm sure you'll do wonders for our employees' morale and productivity.  After all, nothing like a pretty girl in the office to make these engineers want to come in to work, right?"  He chuckled lecherously at me.  

Dammit, he wasn't even trying to hide it now.  Mr. Benson and Mr. Joseph were nodding in agreement, with identical grins on their faces.  My skin was crawling, as if there were a bunch of ants swarming over me.  I stammered, "I... I don't think my skill set... I'm not sure if this is the right job for me..."  

Mr. Oswald waved my objections away.  "Nonsense.  We can train you in the skills you'll need for this job.  Mr. Joseph will be your boss, and he's known to... shall we say... apply a firm hand when it comes to managing his department.  I'm sure you'll learn a great deal under him."  

Mr. Joseph leaned towards me.  I instinctively leaned back in my chair, as far as I could.  He said, "I was thinking you and I could come in half an hour earlier than everyone else, and that would give me time to show you a few things, before everyone else comes in to start the work day."

I whispered, "No, no, I don't think that would work... I... I live pretty far away..."    

Mr. Joseph cut me off, "Alternatively, if you want, we could stay half an hour later after everyone's left.  Just you and I, in the office.  For training and educational purposes, you understand. Just until you get a handle on things. I could drive you home afterwards."  

Oh my god this couldn't be happening.  I was speechless.  

Mr. Oswald gathered up the papers in front of him.  "I think that settles it.  You'll start tomorrow, Sally.  We look forward to having you here."  He stood up and offered his hand.  I stood too, and gave his sweaty hand a tiny, timid shake before pulling back.  Then I shook Mr. Joseph and Mr. Benson's hands as well, in the same way.  

"Oh, by the way, Sally," Mr. Joseph said, "You're not married, are you?  Or have a boyfriend?"  

I hesitated briefly before answering, "I don't think that's an appropriate question to ask in an interview..."  

Mr. Joseph laughed, his jowls shaking.  "Oh no no, that wasn't an interview question.  It's more of a personal question.  Just want to get to know you better, that's all."  He then actually winked at me.  "See you tomorrow morning, Sally.  I look forward to it!"   |-| 
|-| cnumsau || 4 || "So Jake, tell me a little about yourself. What kind of work have you done before?"

"I'm a convicted murderer and rapist." I said, adjusting in my seat and looking intently into the mans eyes. "Before that I mugged people."

The man poked his glasses further up his nose and paused for a moment. He gripped the top of his tie and shifted it slightly. "I see." he said sternly, before raising from his seat and leaning over the desk, hand raised in anticipation. I high fived him out of obligation. He returned to his chair. "You're hired" he said. |-| 
|-| cnumtlk || 3 || "Miss why didn't you fill out the references portion of your application?" Picture Danny Divito as a women and with the voice of a shrill garden pixie and you have Ms. Beshem. Honestly, I had completly zoned out and hadn't realized it was a question until she repeated it again.
"Ohh sorry, I didn't see that part." I mutter, trying to not involuntarly sprits some perfume on her so I can bear this interview for another second. 
"Well that is just fine, you are just about the best aplicant we have seen all week!" Ms. Beshem bleats out. 
Both lies. References are one of the most important parts of any aplication. As a 24 year old just out of college, and that college not even being one of the eight Ivy Leagues I know I'm also definitly not one of the best aplicants they have seen, not by a long shot. I stare her in the eyes and watch a bead of sweat fall down the side of her sticky forehead. Her big smile turn to fine line as I continue to stare. 
"I'm so flattered." I say as she shifts in her office chair.
"uhh I just need to ask a few more questions, what are your greatest strengths Ms. Orith?" Her voice hitches on my name.
"Well thats easy! I'm organized, independent, lethal and hard working."
Her eyes dart from me to the door. She lets out a forced laugh. 
"lethal! ha In the court room good one Ms. ... Miss." Her persparation has increased. 
"I think you are perfect for our firm and we would love to have you." She says this in a robotic way. Clearly this wasn't her idea."
Everything it pointed to exactly what I thought. 
"Wow he must have gotten lazy in his old age." I say.
"Who are you refering to?" She honestly couldn't have though I didn't see her push the button on the side of desk.
"Well I'm sorry to say I don't think I'll be able to accept this offer. But could you please tell my father to go f*--" I'm about to finish before I hear him over the intercome.
"Natalia I'm---"  but before he can finish I'm out the door. I start my Ducati 848 and peel out of the parking garage. One small tear falls down my cheek as I realize that was last time I will ever hear or see my father. |-| 
|-| cnumvan || 30 || "They're on to us.  The feds.  Apparently there was an anonymous tip off."  Said Mike, a frown crossing his face as he leaned back in his chair.  On the table in front of him thirty pounds of cocaine fashioned into blocks was stacked in a neat pyramid.

"Fuckin accountant.  I told him not to worry about the numbers discrepancy, but he noticed that they didn't add up.  Little shit had a two point zero gpa at his community college, and now he decides it's time to start applying his math skills."  I said, my feet on the desk and the tip of my cigar ember falling to the floor.

"So what's the deal, we got a new guy yet?"  

"Not yet.  Last guy was from Harvard.  Way too smart.  Guy before that used to work community service at his local D.A.R.E. - by choice too.  If it was an arrest it would've been perfect.  This is our last shot before I call in a new batch or we move operations."

I said, staring out the window and into the parking lot.  A car had just pulled into the parking lot of Caine's Sugars Refinery, Powdered Division.  The engine kept running for two minutes, and I looked at my watch.

"He's already ten minutes late.  Still sitting in the parking lot.  Beat up van, looks like it's from the seventies.  Wait... Hell, is he holding a camera?"

Mike sidestepped next to me, his beer belly pressing against the blinds, and his breath huffed in disbelief.

"No way.  That's not a camera, that's a joint.  Fucker's lightin up before an interview."

Then the car door opened in a puff of smoke, and a man in his early twenties stepped out.  He squinted at the sun, coughed, then weaved his way toward the door.  

A few minutes later my secretary Sherri buzzed him in to the office, where the cocaine in powdered sugar blocks still sat on the table.  Red eyed, he found the chair after a few moments, and sat into it, passing a folded up resume with a torn to us.

"Damian," The man said.  "I'm here for position, accounting I think.  Before we begin, I want to say I can't work more than six hours a day."

Mike stared, open mouthed, and the smell of pot in the room was so strong there was a risk of him getting high from the extra exposure.

"I think we can work with that schedule," I said, and looked down my list of questions, "Say that you notice that some tax numbers don't add up.  Would you stay late to fix them?"

"I don't believe in the government.  Ergo, I don't believe in taxes, man."  

"What about confidentiality?  Can you be trusted with company secrets?"

"You really think I want to spend more time then when I'm here thinking talking work?"

"You got any questions for us?"

"Can I go?"

Mike spoke up, unable to hold in his excitement any longer.

"You start Monday son."

"Don't call me son, man.  Makes you sound like the man.  Didn't even want this job, my mom made me come." 

With a puff, he stood out of his chair and left the building as Mike poured a line as wide as his smile. 





 |-| 
|-| cnunjqj || 3 || Cultivate the habit of being grateful. |-| 
|-| cnunpj8 || 5 || "Activate the kill switch, it is time to reap the sown."

The underling nodded, a barely perceptible bob of his elongated head. Today was the day we unleash our perfect creation, our engine of eternal war upon the universe. We will be the apex predator of this great cosmic battleground. Because we discovered it first. We realised to true purpose of all life. 

Nothing.

There was no true purpose, no great meaning beyond our reach. We had to make it, we had made it in blood, fashioned it in flames that engulfed the universe. It was said that our ancestors reached the edge of the univrse and stared into the nothing. It drove them mad with hatred. We are the conquerors of the cold void. We bring meaning and bloodshed to those infant planets. Seeding them with our bloodlust.

Earth was our ultimate weapon, a seething hive of hatred waiting to be unleashed. It had sat in its cocoon the longest, matured the most of our six thousand experiments. It would be t last race to fall to war in the universe, and it would be the strongest.

"Sir?" one of my underlings asked. I responded with a glare, it was enough for his feeble mind to understand. "It's the kill switch, sir."

This piqued my interest. "What about it?" I said, *What about my perfect creation?*

"It's been on all this time." |-| 
|-| cnunywu || 3 || Get off reddit. |-| 
|-| cnuo25w || 3 || Here is my first post, I have always wanted to write, and I suppose now is better than never, be gentle :)

"It's.... stabilized currently." I said, eyes sliding off the face of the man before me.

"What do you mean 'Stabilized'?" He asked, frowning "Is it ready or not?"

"Oh, it will do the job, but its evolving, rapidly" Sweat beaded on my forehead.

"good, very good" He said with a sudden smile "I'll tell the..."

"This is a bad idea, it is too intelligent, it can't, no, it won't be contained"

"Listen, we will deal with that problem when it comes, but for now, we need it to be ready" He implored "we are losing this war, and we need this to turn the tide, so tell me, is it ready?"

"...Yes"

"Good, prep yourself, you will be making a presentation to the war council in ten minutes.

His heels clicked against the floor as he strode from the room. I turned to my desk to gather the samples and notes. 
As I turned to leave, I found myself staring through the containment field at the dense little mineral cores that contained such destruction.
They were beautiful, perfect, deadly. I briefly considered entering the command that would neutralize it, telling the council that it was a failure like all the rest.
I gathered my notes and left.

"It is a biological "grey goo" weapon" I said, standing before the war council some minutes later.

I was standing on a raised platform, the room beyond cast in darkness.

"what is "grey goo?"" came a voice from somewhere beyond my view.

"Uh, well..." My palms were clammy "it, uh, eats everything, it strips the minerals from anything it touches to make more of itself and make itself more efficient"

"Will it do the job? how effective is it?" a man's voice came from a different part of the room "could they create an antidote?"

I turned to face the new voice, "No, it cannot be stopped, it will continue to spread and consume until it consumes everything, and then it will turn on itself and eventually die. It is sentient, learning, it will adapt to anything they use against it but... I think we should explore alternatives, it's too intelligent, this is wrong, not to mention it is entirely too efficient, this.... this is a bad idea and I..."

"are there any preparations that must be taken to ready the agent?"

"..uh," I stammered, taken off guard "no... any stress will set off the reaction, thermal, electrical, chemical, even just breaching the stasis field will trigger it. It will immediately adapt, and begin spreading and stripping anything it touches. It reproduces at a exponential rate... listen, you don't understand, we are trading one enemy for another, one we can't hope to fight. you can't..."

"Thank you Doctor, we have heard enough" A voice said, cutting me off. "You are dismissed"

I stood awkwardly for another minute, mind racing for a way to convey the danger of releasing this plague upon the universe. The sounds of chairs scraping and shuffling feet faded and I was left all alone knowing all too well what I had unleashed. 

I returned to my lab and sat down heavily staring once again through the containment field at the monster I had wrought. I reached into the bottom drawer of my desk and grabbed a bottle of something that burned when I drank it. I lifted it in salute to my creation.

the nine spherical mineral cores silently orbited the brightly glowing containment generator. The pale blue one, shimmering in the light.

"Heres to you, you beautiful little monsters" I drank deeply, and cried. |-| 
|-| cnuo3le || 3 || Don't listen to pretentious blurbs with no depth. |-| 
|-| cnuopwb || 27 || *Quest items cannot be dropped.*

It was just a key when I first picked it up, not even really sure why I did. It was shiny, I guess. Looked like any normal kind of key, no markings though, no identification. Any time I put it down, or tried to throw it away, I couldn't. Something in me told me this key was important. I had to find what it was for.

I carried the key with me wherever I went. Not on my key ring, mind you, as key rings can be lost. This key was special; it hung around my neck. People thought it kind of weird, but I just told them it was a good luck charm, and that seemed to suffice.

*Quest items cannot be dropped.*

It was the key, in fact, that caught the eye of Linda. We were both at some party that neither of us really wanted to be at, and after she asked about it, we ended up at an all-night pawn shop, trying the key into whatever in the shop had a lock. "Maybe this is the night you'll get lucky" she had said to me, with a wink of her eye. It wasn't, not with the lock nor with Linda, but that didn't matter much, as the moment she asked about the key - with genuine curiosity and excitement - I knew that I would be spending every remaining day I had with her.

*Quest items cannot be dropped.*

Linda and I shared many qualities. We both hated pepperoni on our pizza, but loved it on a sandwich. We'd both seen every episode of Quantum Leap at least a dozen times. And we both loved to travel, which the key gave us a good excuse to do. "Have you ever been to Burma?" Linda would say. "Of course you haven't, it's been Myanmar since before you graduated high school. But maybe the key was made in Burma, and someone there still remembers the old Burmese key-making ways. Maybe this is the trip you'll get lucky!" Neither of us ever had much money. I made a little writing a travel blog for whatever magazine or newspaper would pay me that month, Linda just had a knack for being able to handle whatever odd job came up that offered a few bucks. It always seemed to be enough to get us there and back, though years later I would finally figure out that Linda was tapping a trust fund from time to time to keep us going. She never talked about her family, and I never asked. We were in love and we were enjoying every minute of our lives.

*Quest items cannot be dropped.*

Never did we expect to find what the key opened, but still we asked and inquired at every opportunity. Inevitably, someone would swear that key was for the lockers at some bus stop, or fit a lock that secured an old house that used to belong to Locally Famous Person, and off to adventure we'd go. Every once in a while we'd make the local news, especially in the States, rolling into some quiet town that was starving for anything different. We're hear live with this young/married/elderly couple who are looking for the lock that fits this key, a quest they've been on for 2/15/40 years. Won't you bring out your old chests/clocks/curios/knick nacks and see if we might get lucky?

*Quest items cannot be dropped.*

When you're 65, it's tough to tell if the pain you feel when you stand up is just old age, or a malignant disease eating away at the insides of your bones. Constant travel doesn't lend itself to regular checkups either, so neither Linda nor I were particularly surprised when, one morning, it became clear that I wasn't going to make our flight to Krakow.

We'd become minor celebrities in our "home town" of Tulsa; "The Couple That Were Never Home". Word started to spread, and before we knew it, I was lying in a bed in Saint Francis, with four doctors and a dozen nurses worrying over me. There was nothing to be done, of course. I was eating steak in a small bar in Peru when it was time to flood my body with radiated chemicals. Everyone was very worried what would happen if I died, as if Linda and I were the last of a kind. And maybe we were; a hundred people have wanted to hear our stories these last few days, but I haven't hear a single one of them say "I should really go there myself". But then I can't judge, if it weren't for the key, I'd have probably been content to stay where I was, work a job, buy a house, and spend my time watching Hawaii 5-0 on television. And I wouldn't have met the woman who is standing by my side, smiling at me as brightly as she did at that all night pawn shop.

It's near the end now, I can feel it. I'm gripping my key tightly with one hand, and Linda with the other. We never did find what they key unlocked, but that's OK, because I've known the truth for many years now. 

*Quest completed.* |-| 
|-| cnupcho || 3 || Never forget your towel.  |-| 
|-| cnupu9r || 9 || The anxiety that used to fill my body had finally disappeared over time, as I accepted that we were stuck out here forever.

"Bonnie, the rope is splitting!"

Instinctively I gripped it. I looked at the rope's splitting string.

Tears left my eyes as I stared at Laura, I couldn't believe what was happening. We were going to be forced apart by our special boots.

They had magnetic weights in them so our feet would be firm on the ground. Our feet were in opposite directions and the force was shredding the rope.

"Laura, I don't want to be alone."

I wondered how long the radio on our helmets would last.

"Bonnie, listen to me. Pull the rope and grab my hand. It's our only chance."

I shook my head adamantly.

"If I pull the rope it'll rip and we will be apart. I can't be alone. I can't do it."

Laura's eye's sparkled even now in the darkness with tears.

"It's going to happen either way. You have to catch me okay, I'll come to you instead."

I inhaled to calm myself. She was right.

"Three." Laura started counting down with conviction.

"Two."

"Wait." "One!" She pulled the rope to gain momentum towards me but before I could stretch my arm any further she was pulled back by the force of her boots.

"NO!" Her cry was so loud through the radio I thought it was a voice in my head.

"You didn't say you were going on one!" I broke down in tears. 

I was forever alone in space and it was all my fault.



 |-| 
|-| cnupzlv || 5 || "Roll a d20." Dravic the Bold said.

Raylon Orcslayer picked up the dice. He smiled wide as he shook it and then dropped it, "Common twenty!" He cheered as it rolled and then came up on 1.

Dravic smiled as the 1 came up, the way that bastard BM always did. He looked at his charts for a moment, running his finger down a line of text.  "Ahah!" He said before speaking, "Not only does she decline your advances, she says that she just wants to be friends. You gain the depressed condition and spend 1d4+1 nights crying yourself to sleep."

 |-| 
|-| cnuq26u || 8 || Don't be a fucking Zack or Jenny.  |-| 
|-| cnuq29j || 8 || "You have a visitor, Harper." 
The kind, young nurse looked as shocked as I was at the prospect of a visitor. My family was across the ocean, and all my friends had fallen. As I wondered who would possibly want to watch me bleed out in this tent, my hand instinctively clutched the ring that hung on a chain around my neck.
I found it not-so-long ago, when I was 17. It was a beautifully cut, absurdly expensive diamond ring, one you give to the love of your life. I plucked it right out of the bushes near my highschool. Knowing it was worth thousands, I tried to put it back. Someone was looking for that ring. 
Quest items cannot be dropped.
A box suddenly appeared in my vision. "New Quest!" It exclaimed. "Find her. Map not available."
Find her. That's all I got to go off of. No name, no map. All I got from that quest was hell.
5 years later, I tried putting it on the girl I thought was the one, but I got the same message.
Quest items cannot be dropped.
Guess she wasn't "her". 
It devastated me. And the quest kept bugging me.
Find her.
Find her. 
Find her. 
It drove me crazy. Finally, I decided to join the military. It gave me something to do other than "find her". Now here I was with a hole in my chest and half a leg blown off, and it doesn't look like I'm ever going to complete the quest.
My visitor walked in, tears streaming down her face. She held a chain similar to mine, with a plain wedding band attached. Suddenly, I knew who she was.
She didn't sob or wail. She didn't look at me with pity. All I saw in her face was love and utter grief. "I found you." She whispered.
She slipped the wedding band onto my bloody finger, and I slipped the ring onto hers. I smiled my last smile, and closed my eyes.
Quest Complete.
 |-| 
|-| cnuq3xy || 6 || "You can sit down there."

The plump woman bugs her eyes a bit and points to the booth next to the trash can. Her pants look uncomfortably tight, and I try to see the bright side. *This job probably doesn't require much bending.*
I look at the booth, a sticky glaze visible even from fifteen feet away. The swinging lid of the overstuffed trash can reads THANKS. I turn back to the woman, and force a smile. "Thanks."

I slide into the booth, push the question of when it was last cleaned out of my mind, and remind myself that I need a paycheck. It's been three months since I quit my shitty desk job in a flurry of self-righteousness, and my checking account is nearly dried up.

After a few moments of self delusion - wow, I really could make some improvements here - I'd probably be the best worker they've ever had - a skinny teenager walks over to me. I look at his small round face. Beneath the red sheen of a painful looking case of acne, two beady eyes peer over an obscenely large nose. At the risk of sounding shallow, it's the type of face so unfortunate-looking that it makes me nervous to look at. "Re-  re..ready?"

Though his voice is barely a whisper, it seems to take quite a bit of energy for him to get the word out. "Yes," I straighten up, "is the manager rea-"

Before the question escapes my lips, the boy jerks his gangly body toward the booth, and lands directly next to me. "Good," he whispers, and a hot breath of rotten onion reaches my nose. "Let's start with your- uh, work experience."

*I need a job. I need a paycheck.* I chant in my head. *Do I need it this bad?*  

With great effort, I lean as far toward the wall as the confines of politeness allow. The awkward angle of my back starts to limit the flow of blood to my head, but the only other choice is to bask in the young man's breath, and I choose oxygen deprivation. I smile, and share that during college I hosted and cocktailed at a full-service restaurant. I indicate the references on my resume.

"College?" he whispers, his eyes glowing with passion. 

*Ah, the poor kid is working in this shithole until he can save enough to shove off to college himself* I think with sympathy, *I wonder if I'll end up being an inspiration for him*.

"What a stupid waste of time," he continues, the passionate glow in his eyes gaining a slightly psychotic edge. With each word, he emits a puff of rotten breath. "Best not be talking about that with other people."

His bony hand reaches for my leg, finds it, and then rests limply atop my knee. "I'm only saying because I like you. You don't want people thinking you're one of those snobby book people."

By now, the combined effect of halitosis and some revolting onion-laden meal is so strong that my head is pounding in earnest. I am going to faint or vomit if I don't get out of here.

I look at the boy manager blocking my escape. He smiles, revealing two rows of yellow, crooked teeth. Packets of white plaque gleam between most of his teeth. Or is that bits of the onion sandwich?

"Yeah! Books!" I practically shout, beads of sweat forming on my face. "I read a lot of books when I was in prison."

The boy manager's beady eyes look blankly forward. He keeps smiling.

"Yeah, I didn't put that on the resume because it was a felony. For stealing a lot of money from a restaurant."

His smile fades, but his eyes don't move.

"The restaurant where I worked. That's the place that I stole from. A lot of money."

His greasy brow furrows, and a slight frown tugs down the corners of his mouth. I can't stop staring at a swollen pimple on his chin. His beady eyes bore into me for a long moment. I realize that I am holding my breath, and deliberately exhale. As I suck in a deep breath, he explodes in laughter, sending a spray of saliva all over my face and into my mouth. I freeze in disgusted horror. He throws his head back, howling.

Time seems to slow down while he spasms with mirth. I feel each iota of saliva begin to burn. My heart is racing. The saliva burns are spreading. Soon my whole mouth is ablaze with onion funk gingivitis. *Is halitosis contagious?!*

I regain control of my body and slam my weight into the gangly boy manager. He crashes in a heap to the floor. I slide out of the booth and leap over his crumpled body towards the door. 

I'm three feet from freedom when, above the pounding of my blood in my ears, I hear his whisper voice. I can't make out the words. One hand extended toward the door, I look back. He is smiling at me, and whispers again "I like a girl with spunk. You're hired." |-| 
|-| cnuq4so || 6 || “Here we go again.” James thought as the glass doors whirred behind him. “Another day, another interview; when will may parents learn?”

&amp;nbsp;

James had been to eight interviews in the last two weeks and he had successfully failed every single one.

&amp;nbsp;

“We can play this game for as long as you want, I know you'll break before I do.” A smug smile flashed across his face at the thought. “Ah yes, a few more interviews and they will see that I don't need to work. I wouldn't fit in, I'm better than that.”

&amp;nbsp;

Thirty feet in front of him stood a very long desk which curved in and out as if it was forming a wave pattern. A receptionist stood behind each of the inward curves.

&amp;nbsp;

James did a once over with his eyes, found the prettiest girl behind the desk and put on his best smile.

&amp;nbsp;

“Mr Halberg's office please.”

&amp;nbsp;

“Third floor, make a right out of the elevator. His office is 311.” She said with a soft smile. Their eyes met and locked on for just a moment too long; James knew he had her.

&amp;nbsp;

Leaning in, James lightly rapped his knuckles on the desk. “Thank you sweetie.”

&amp;nbsp;

The receptionist giggled.

&amp;nbsp;

“Don't worry, sweetie;” James thought. “I'll see you again, but only once.”

&amp;nbsp;

The elevator was empty, “thank god” he thought.

&amp;nbsp;

It was always awkward for James to be in elevators with the normal people. He hated small talk. It was beneath him after all. 

&amp;nbsp;

As James stood there he quickly reflected on the past month. How his parents told him that he needed to get a job, despite him being the only heir to their fortune. They thought it would make him a better leader for the company. But James had always known that he was good enough. He could appoint people to do the work for him. He had delegated tasks out to people his entire life. How hard could it be as an adult? James knew that they would come around eventually and see things his way.

&amp;nbsp;

The elevator chimed and the doors creaked open. James made his way down the hall to room 311 and entered without knocking.

&amp;nbsp;

An older man whirled around in his desk chair. “I'm sorry Joan, I'll have to call you back.”

&amp;nbsp;

“Ah you must be James, my dear boy I wasn't expecting you for another twenty minutes!” Mr Halberg said, slamming the phone into the receiver. “Punctual I see, I like that in an employee.”

&amp;nbsp;

“Employee.” James thought, “disgusting.”

&amp;nbsp;

“Well I thought we would just get it over with.” Said James.

&amp;nbsp;

“Straight forward and to the point, excellent. Have a seat and let's get started.” Mr Halberg motioned to a set of chairs in front of the desk. “I see you attended Harvard, very impressive.”

&amp;nbsp;

“Failed Harvard.” James corrected.

&amp;nbsp;

“You know James, some people just don't learn that well in a classroom. Take me for example, I went to the school of hard knocks and look where I am today.” Mr Halberg said holding his arms out wide. “The fact that you made it there is very impressive, that is what counts.” He said, holding up a finger matter-of-factly.

&amp;nbsp;

“To tell you the truth I just don't know that much about the food industry.” James said already thinking about the look on his fathers face when he hears that he was rejected yet again.

&amp;nbsp;

“Oh don't worry about that! We have plenty of people who can show you what to do. It's so easy to learn this stuff you know.”

&amp;nbsp;

James tried to put on his best “I'm thinking really hard right now” face. “I just don't know if I am passionate about this industry. I don't think it would be a very good fit.”

&amp;nbsp;

“Nonsense my boy!” Mr Halberg exclaimed. “You know I recognize your type. I used to be a lot like you when I was younger. You want nothing but perfection, this makes you unsure about yourself. Don't be so hard on yourself, surely a Harvard man can handle this job in his sleep!”

&amp;nbsp;

James shifted nervously in his chair. For the first time in his life things were not going according to plan. “Why doesn't this guy get it?” he thought anxiously. “I need to just be blunt and get out of here.”

&amp;nbsp;

“I'm not going to lie to you.” James said. “I am not the right person for this job. I am only here because my parents told me I had to look for a job. Once they see that I am not cut out to do such menial work they will back off and I can go back to my normal life.”

&amp;nbsp;

“Ah yes your parents” Mr Halberg said. “How are Lilly and Tom?”

&amp;nbsp;

A stunned expression came over James.

&amp;nbsp;

“Oh you didn't know?” Mr Halberg chuckled. “Of course, Tom sent you in here without telling you. James I've known your parents since before you were born. Heck I was in their wedding.”

&amp;nbsp;

Sweat started to leak out of James forehead as he nervously loosened his tie.

&amp;nbsp;

“Now you listen here James. You're going to get this job. And you're going to work here whether you like it or not. It's been... Shall we say prearranged.” A smile came across Mr Halberg's face. “You don't have to like it son, but you're going to do the work that you are told to do or else I'll be forced to tell Tom that you are not cooperating. And well, we both know what that means.”

&amp;nbsp;

James knew exactly what he meant. His parents had been threatening to cut him off ever since he dropped out of Harvard. But he had no idea they were being serious.

&amp;nbsp;

James felt mortified, backed into a corner with no where to go. “There must be something...” He said. “I think I need some air.”

&amp;nbsp;

“Well I'll let you be on your way, you look like you're going to be sick. James, do take care of yourself, okay?” Mr Halberg said.

&amp;nbsp;

James felt dizzy as he stood up, panic was pulsing through his body. The anxiety was almost crippling him.

&amp;nbsp;

“Oh I almost forgot...” A voice called out behind him. “You start on Monday, be here by 8 will ya.”

&amp;nbsp;

Everything was a blur now, lights, metal, a sinking feeling. Something pretty caught his eye but only for a moment. The sound of whirring then honking. James gasped for air out on the streets, his vision finally restoring.

&amp;nbsp;

Out there on the street James stood looking at the heavens. He knew that his life would never be the same again. |-| 
|-| cnuq5o9 || 24 || Forever is a long time. It makes you lose things. A lot of things. People, places, stuff. Even feelings. All of them. You just kind of become numb after a while. And has it been a while. The Earth exploded years ago. I'm not sure how long ago, exactly, but I know it's well over a million. You should have seen how big the sun got, too. Now *that* was something of a surprise. You live this long and surprise is one of the first words you leave out of your vocabulary. It's just not relevant anymore. But that day... *whew* 

At least I'm not alone though. I've got Reynold. He's pretty funny for a guy who's literally in a existential crisis right now. I don't know how someone can manage to stay funny for so long, but Reynold somehow found the secret. He's all I look at these days. He's all *to* look at these days. I have a theory that if we were somehow separated and  never saw each other again, that even the power of forever couldn't erase his face from my head. Big bright hazel eyes. Skin like beach sand. Dark and warm. His hair is almost comically long now, reaching past his ankles. I can't remember the last time we even thought about cutting our hair. What's the point? 

He was sleeping next to me when I noticed how thin our rope had gotten. Its worn brown fibers were starting to fray at the core and a quick panic spread inside me like a fire as a clay-like lump formed in my throat. The thought of losing him was impossible to handle. 

"Reynold!" I said, my voice cracking, "Wake up! Reynold! The rope! It's going to break!" 

I was sobbing at that point, gently pulling the rope so as not to break it. 

Reynold woke up and immediately noticed what was happening. He gave a sympathetic smile and called my name.  

"Just relax, Evan." he said, grabbing the rope and pulling it towards him, "We can do this." 

It must have been over an hour of gentle tugs, pulls, and bated breath, but our fingers finally touched. The rope gave out and floated towards the abyss. Reynold wiped my tears from my eyes, which were blinking and red from crying. 

Neither of us said a word, but just held each other in silence. I felt Reynold's quiet breaths get louder and heavier. He was weeping. His warm tears and snot slowly expanded on my chest. Reynold, who I have only see cry once in a million years. Reynold, who was filled with more love and joy then a thousand people can even hold onto in one lifetime, was bawling like a baby. And I knew exactly the reason. My heartbeats pounded away, counting out the minutes. 

Finally, he choked out the truth we were both dreading to hear. 

"We can't hold on forever." Reynold said, "Not forever." 

Never more in my whole life had I wanted to die more then in that moment. Never. 

"I know," I said, "But we have to try."  |-| 
|-| cnuqag1 || 4 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnuqsd0 || 6 || Hodar the Half-Orc watched on with obviously waning patience as Ansel tossed the twenty-sided die.  

"Bob from accounting failed the will save and falls asleep in the meeting," said Markus the sorcerer.

Ansel snatched the dice off the table and deftly switched them with a pair of loaded die before looking to Icera the paladin.

"Joel attempts to stealthily awaken Bob from accounting by kicking him in the shin from across the table." The stout Palladian said confidently, his armor clanking loudly as he carelessly rolled the d20 and the d6.  The outcome that anyone could have predicted (but none hoped for) occurred as the subdued "1" presented itself on the upward face of the d20.

"Critical failure.  You kick the regional manager in the balls for 6 damage." Markus said with a wry smile.

Hodar boiled over in rage, "That no fair, he not confirm cri... cri... bad thing!" The dense half-orc upturned the table in a rage, sending myriad dice, a "Corporate Drone Manual v. 3.5," and a crudely drawn map of a boardroom into the air.

"Hodar, we decided last time that confirming every critical was taking too much time, we've already spent 3 game sessions playing this one strategy meeting." Markus answered calmly as he endowed his pet raven with a Ghoul Touch spell silently and without motion.

"That bullshit!" Hodar cleverly retorted as Ansel pickpocketed the raging behemoth.  Icera sat in silent prayer as the scene unfolded around him.

"This seems like a good place to stop, same time next week?" Markus asked.

"Well, we should probably focus on making it out of the temple of elemental evil first," said Icera, suddenly aware of the presence of a demon approaching to attack. |-| 
|-| cnuqv80 || 6 || “Hey,” Cynthia said.  She tugged on the SpaceX brand Companion Cord.

I grumbled.  “I’m sleeping,” I muttered.

“Hey Hey Hey,” Cynthia said, tugging again.

“Go away,” I growled.

“Hey Hey Honeybuns!” Cynthia said, “Rise and shine.  Time for coffee!”

“Leave me alone,” I said.

“It’s moooorning!” Cynthia cooed.

I opened my eyes.  The vastness of intergalactic space washed over me.  

I had been dreaming of Earth.  A cozy little cubicle where I’d once spent hours solving interesting problems on customers’ computers.  I would chat with them about their varied and diverse lives--each new customer was a novelty.  A fresh experience.

Sometimes they had forgotten to turn their PC on.  Those fixes were easy.  Other times, they’d downloaded viruses and I had to remotely access their computer and download a free anti-virus program to run a sweep.  For this service, I was paid American money.  A handsome sum.  And I was able to use that money to purchase things.  Like naan.  Tickets to cricket matches.  Kingfisher beer.

But those golden years of my life were gone now.

I’d won a contest. 

Back then, I drank a lot of Mountain Dew.  I still miss doing the Dew.  Talking about it makes my veins tremble with longing.  That sugary green nectar.  Ohhhh.

On the inside of my 24-can Mountain Dew Cube, it said that I had won a trip to space.  A golden ticket.

I was the first Indian in space.

But there was a problem.  A solar flare.

Our spaceship flew straight into it.  Red lights flashed throughout the cabin.  The engineers were all suiting up.

“Evacuate!” the Captain screamed.

I grabbed onto the first suit I could find.  Dressed as quickly as I could.  

The ship disintegrated around me.  The others... the others hadn’t pressurized their suits in time.  Their unmoving bodies drifted among scattered wreckage.

And then I felt the tug.

My suit was attached to a cord.  It was a maintenance suit, for external hull reinforcement work.

There was someone attached to the other end of the cord.  Alive.  At first I’d thought it was the Captain.  I’d hoped.  Or maybe one of the engineers.

But it was Cynthia.

We’d been drifting together for what felt like centuries now.  Maybe the radiation had dosed us into immortality.  Maybe it hadn’t.  Maybe we’d only been drifting for a few hours.

The wreckage was gone now.  The planets all seemed so far away.  Everything was far away.  There was only blackness everywhere.

I didn’t have my glasses.  I couldn’t see the ‘majesty’ of space.  If there ever was such a thing.

But I could see Cynthia.  And I could hear her.

She was an American.  The other contest-winner.

“Heeey,” She said, “Heeey, wake up!  I have something important to tell you.”

“What?” I snapped.  “What is it this time?”

Cynthia gave me a hurt look.

“Well,” She said, pouting,“I can tell you’re not interested.  So I’m not going to tell you.”

I closed my eyes again.  That was fine by me.  It would be wonderful if she never spoke again.  A dream come true.

She sniffled.

I closed my eyes tighter.

She whimpered.

I tried thinking about my lovely little cubicle where I used to drink chai and talk to Americans on the telephone.  To listen to them talk about their computer problems.  To help them fix things.  To make the world just a little bit better.

Her whimpered heightened.

I opened my eyes, scowling.

She burst into full-blown crying mode.

“What!” I demanded, “What is it?  What important thing do you have to tell me?”

“You’re not interested,” she sobbed, “You don’t want to talk to me.”

“Yes,” I said, “Yes I do.”  I was lying through my teeth, of course, but I couldn’t stand to hear her cry.

She sniffled.

“You’re just saying that,” she said, “You don’t really mean it.”

“I mean it,” I said, biting back my frustration, “I really do want to hear what you have to say.”

She looked at me, studying my face.

“Okay,” she said finally, “I believe you.”

She paused.

“Alright,” I said, “So what did you want to say.”

She bit her lip.  Softly, she said, “I forgot.”

“What?!” I shouted, “What do you mean you forgot?”

“I forgot what I was going to say!” she screamed, “Geez, don’t yell at me like that.”

“Sorry,” I said gruffly.

“It’s fine,” she said, still flustered.

I shook my head.  Then I closed my eyes.  My thoughts took me back to the lunchbreaks at work.  Ordering thali with friends.  Yellow curry.  Yoghurt.  Chicken masala.

“I love you,” Cynthia said softly.

I opened my eyes.

“What?” I said.

“I love you,” she repeated.

I looked at her in disbelief.  Her broad, white face was still wet and shiny with tears.  Her lips were trembling.  But there was something about her... She did have some kind of undeniable something...

“Do you love me?” she said, her voice shaking.

Oh dear, I thought to myself.  Oh dear, oh dear.

I looked around at the vast emptiness of space.  I looked at her.  She was half-smiling up at me.  A hopeful half-smile.  Like a shy but beloved child.

I pulled on the cord, bringing us closer together.  After a moment’s hesitation, I put my hand around hers.  She gave mine a little squeeze and smiled.

And we continued to drift.
 |-| 
|-| cnurbdx || 3 || *So why do you want to work here?*

I don't know, to be honest with you. It's more like I DON'T wanna work here.

*And yet you're applying for this job. On the other hand, it explains why you keep eating Chex Mix in front of me.*

You want some?

*No.*

Who doesn't love Chex Mix? Kids, maybe. They want Cocoa Puffs. The other day, right? I was shopping at Safeway, you know, cause that's a place where people shop, right? And this kid's all like "Mom, I want Frosted Flakes" and she just slapped him right across the face and said PUT THAT GODDAMN CEREAL BACK. But I'm an adult, so you can't tell me what to do. Now give me a check.

*Mr. Applebaum--*

From Chex Mix to checks... shit. There's not a catchy punchlne to be had.  Anyhow, your wife is a whore. When do I start?

*My wife is dead. And it's like you don't even want the job. One might say you were trying to NOT work. Are you some sort of welfare cheat?*

I wish! But it's good to have goals. No, I'm just trying not to work the old fashioned way. I'm a tap dancer! And you don't make jack shit doing that.

*You make a lotta noise.*

Don't my downstairs neighbors know it! But the thing is, if I work a job, I'm gonna have to give up on the whole NOT working a job scenario, which is a sweet place to be. Donald Trump knows what it's like. Can he tapdance? Well... maybe? I really don't know. Do you?

*Not offhand.*

Hold on, I gotta Google this. It's bugging me now. It's gonna, here... donald trump tapdance, yes. Man, what DID we do before Google? I don't even remember. I wanna say "library" but is that even a real word? Shit, I'll have to Google that later.  I have Virgin Mobile, so it's gonna be a sec. Wait, did I get the job?

*No.*

Well, that takes care of that, then. I thank you for your time and effort, especially becaise all I gave you was time. Oh, and as far as I can tell from the first  page of Google, he doesn't tap dance. Anyhow, what job was I applying for?

*President of Bing*

And what's that now? |-| 
|-| cnurhw7 || 14 || I didn't know their name, I couldn't even attempt a conversation, it was silent forever. A single stream of consciousness, there was no social aspect of life; only observe, appreciate. 

I'm sure we both knew the situation, drifting through space, we saw *everything*. 
Nebula's, galaxies, star clusters, even black holes. We've traveled through wormholes, through anything of everything. 

I wish I could tell you and go on about what I experienced, but I digress, it isn't necessary. 
We were bound by rope. I don't remember how or why, we just were. Both of us encased in bulky space suits that refused communication. I saw glimpses of the person, they were attractive: Long black hair, a clear face, and innocent eyes. Beautiful. 

Me, hell, I didn't know what I looked like. I had an idea though, I must have also looked attractive, because she smiled when her eyes drifted towards me. When that happened, I smiled as well.

We were here for ages, past a lifetime, however that was ending. The rope that kept us together was loosening, and strands were breaking off. I was scared, I'm sure they were too. 

I think it was around the time we passed the red planet that we realized we were moments away from detaching. Something happened inside me, something I never felt before...a compassion, a loyalty. They couldn't be alone in this, I couldn't be alone. *We needed each other*. 

I twisted my body and found that they were already facing me. I looked deep into their eyes, and our arms touched each other (something so alien, I never considered it before...to touch), our hands locked. 

We looked ahead, a green planet, with large blue oceans appeared in the distance. We were heading right for it.

It seemed as though the end was near.

Or was it?

EDIT: There is a part 2 if I get enough upvotes |-| 
|-| cnurz1l || 4 || Bob was tired, he leaned against the water cooler (dexterity check) and sighed as he filled a paper dixie cup (regain 1 hit point). "Say Bob, have you finished the TPS reports yet?" asked Mr. Corrigan. 

"Almost done," Bob replied (bluff roll).

"Are you sure?" Mr. Corrigan pressed Bob with his voice and forceful stare  (deception check). 

"Of course sir, I'll have them on your desk by close of business," Bob said as he gulped down the rest the water. 

"WAIT," shouted Dullungor. "The rules clearly state I get another deception check after my first one failed due to my plus 3 Casio watch."

"You snooze, you lose fat boy," shouted the Rogue Jax as he poked the short pudgy Dwarf Dullungor in the midsection.

"Harmony be among us," whispered Selina the Elf. "Let us partake in this joyous quest together as comrades."

"You just want to play the office whore," complained Melinda the Druid. 

"I do it so well," Selina said breezily as she picked up her dice and motioned she was returning to character. "Bob, are you busy?"

"Of course not," Bob replied as he scoped out the heaving bosom on Shelly the office secretary who was well known for being highly generous with her affections. 

Shelly squeezed her massive cleavage together, anime style, and jiggled a bit before saying, "Can you help me in the copy room?"

"I'd love to," Bob replied (constitution check, bravery check, viagra check). 

"WAIT," screamed Melinda the Druid. 

"What," snapped Selina the Elf.

"I get a cock block roll," whined Melinda.

"Great Gorn the God of Impalers, you wretched bitches haven't stopped complaining about the rules since we started," groused Dull the Half Orc. 

 |-| 
|-| cnus1vm || 3 || **I wrote this some time ago, but it loosely fits into the prompt and I'd like to put it out there. So, here goes.**



"Do you remember when we looped around that one galaxy, the one that burned and whose stars flickered?"

She whispered.

"And do you remember when the worlds of that galaxy suddenly popped into another, many eons after? When we witnessed the clash of planets, the struggle of a dying race against another that thrived like we have?"

She whispered.

I sighed, eyes watering. "And what about that time when we hopped comets, finally coming to rest upon this - our home?"

She squirmed, mirth flooding across her face. I caressed her brow. "Oh, darling. For eternity we have sailed the stars together. In that eternity we have witnessed enough to fill a thousand forevers."

Her eyes left my face, peering into the curling fires of a sun. She looked back to me and whimpered softly. Her metal flesh was cold, colder than mine. I surveyed the still deep beyond our icy home. Few stars filled the darkness, and their light was a dull brown. I touched my head to hers. A tendril of flame larger than a hundred moons soared in the distance.

I held her. Her communication systems were nearly exhausted, but her whirrs and her whispers fed me as we rode our comet towards the final star in the universe. I felt our metal warm. Things within us broke down. My vision snapped away, but I could still hear her whispering things that I could not understand. Shards of ice broke away, sailing back into the night until we remained upon a tiny sliver of rock and snow.

I felt her moving closer to me. She tried to comfort me with her broken, perfect words. I could no longer speak. We grew warmer and warmer as the fires grew larger. I held her, and she held me. The brown stars dimmed as the brilliance of the last burning sun consumed us.

I think I heard her whisper. |-| 
|-| cnusqk4 || 3 || "So, why have you come here today?" was the age old interviewer question. Something that you fell back on when your mind's been numbed from several hours worth of interactions with people you'd much rather not know. While you satin a chair that was as far from ergonomic as the mouth of a reptile(it snapped just as much too) at a table that could redefine shaky every few minutes. The interviewer was a tired woman in her late thirties, absentmindedly flipping a pen around in her hand while casually glancing at the candidate evaluation paper in front of her. A half finished glass of translucent gold liquid resonated to the bouncing of the plastic table.

"I AM KNOWN AS VRACK'KARK THE IMMOLATION OF THRASSUS."

"Yes you've said that already, why are you here?" she urged, pushing back from the table with a sigh. She glanced downwards, then back up at the molten creature in front of her. A part in the back of her head told her that glancing wasn't the same as looking. But the fatigued had somewhat dulled the impact of the message. She should explain, she thought. "You're here for a job, right?"

"I HAVE COME TO ACQUIRE SUITABLE BEVERAGES FROM A BEVERAGE DISPENSARY."

"So what makes you think you'd be a viable choice for Librarian of Magick?" she folded her arms in contemplation. The questions were of no consequence, they were rehearsed and remembered from repetition. The important part was the bits in between the questions and the answers. She was willfully ignoring the fact that the candidate was a seven meter tall golem of oozing magma, to the point where he had made his own personal hole in the floor to sink into. Golems in general, after the great golem-making frenzy of 1209, were no longer very captivating beasts. They were all just the same stone statue decorated by whatever element the poor maker had lying around. Some had achieved sentience, but after looking at themselves asked if they could give it back.

"OTHER FACILITIES' BEVERAGES WERE DEEMED UNSATISFACTORY." This one, evidently, hadn't. "OR OUT OF PROXIMITY TO THRASSUS"

"Do you have any experience in magick or magickal artifacts?"

"I LIBERATED MY PEOPLE FROM THE HANDS OF KATHAROTH, SLAVER OF THOUSANDS. I BURNED HIS CITY OF THRASSUS TO THE GROUND." a look of puzzlement fixed itself on the interviewer's face, *when did that happen?* She did remembering hearing a bits of masonry crumble during an interview. And one unfortunate candidate being struck by a chunk of molten rock mid-sentence. "I DID THIS ABOUT TEN MINUTES AGO, I'M RATHER THIRSTY NOW."

The interviewer rose from her chair in both shock and awe, said chair proceeded to buckle in on itself and drop to the ground, she hunched over the table and placed both robed hands on it as firmly as she could. The appearance, while a clear attempt at being serious, was put off by the jerking of the table. "You destroyed the merchant city of Thrassus?" the pitch of her voice had shot up in disbelief. "But that's impossible! There were seventeen layers of magic seals, not even an archmage of Library caliber could break through that!"

"MAGICAL BARRIERS DO NOT STOP FISTS." said the golem in its empty voice. "CAN I HAVE A BEVERAGE?"

"You punched a city?"

"UNTIL IT WAS DESTROYED, THIS IS MOST ACCURATE. I HAVE FREED THRASSUS AND MY KIND."

"How, pray tell, did you punch a city to smolders?"

"PRETTY HARD." the golem was getting agitated now, you could tell when a golem was displaying emotion when it spoke faster. Though you couldn't actually tell what emotion it was displaying.

She sat back down. Though first she, on instinct, kicked backwards and smacked the chair back into rapt attention. She crossed her legs and sat there silently, evaluating the information she'd been given. "That makes no sense! How can no one notice a golem smashing a building down?"

"PEOPLE HAD NOTICED ME, BUT THEY WERE PREOCCUPIED BY BEING IN THE BUILDINGS. THEIR ATTEMPTS TO STOP ME WITH MAGIC WERE INEFFECTIVE. BEVERAGE?" his pace was increasing more and more, it was a bit disconcerting watching an ever-smoldering hunk of rock talk with increasing urgency(primarily because golems talk by hanging their mouths open, which are already nearly indistinguishable from their eye-holes, and letting the words come out). It was as if someone had tried to make a primitive tape recorder using a lava fuel source and knocked something into something down the line.

"I..." the interviewer had indeed been to Thrassus once, a vacation with her husband. She did recall that thieves and cutpurses ran amok, hunting in futility for a person not clothed in what could be equated as twenty kilograms of magick. She initially thought it was a local sport, you can never truly understand foreigners, until a shopkeeper asked them to help stop the man running away with his poultry. "They never had any actual law enforcement, did they."

"THEY DID, FOR A FEW SECONDS."

She laughed a confused and partially scared laugh. "Aha, yes. What happened to your people?" she decided she would distract the golem with questions while contemplating the current security setup of the Library.

"THEY ARE STILL THERE." rumbled the golem, its pace having slowed down slightly at the mention of its kind. "THEY DO NOT KNOW WHAT TO DO WITH FREEDOM. THEY ARE THERE IN THE SLAVERS HOMES, MOST LIKELY ENGAGING IN COOKING OR CLEANING AMIDST THE RUBBLE." the golem slowed further. "IT IS POSSIBLE THAT LIBERATION WAS ALTOGETHER A MISTAKE TO SOME DEGREE." somewhere in the part of its head that had lead it to sentience clicked. It was actually an audible click, the interviewer did a double take after it broke her train of thought.

"Hey, how would you like to work here?" the interviewer hazarded. "We'd never actually realised we don't have any protection from a physical threat..." *it would be better to have said threat on their side.*

"OH DEAR I HAVE CAUSED A GREAT CALAMITY FOR NO REASON. I WILL REQUIRE A BEVERAGE WITH WHICH TO WASH MY SORROW INTO ANOTHER PLACE." the golem moaned.

"I, uh, sure. Here, have this goldgrass gin." she fumbled at the glass she'd been nursing for several hours and raised it towards the golem. A great stone hand swung outwards by ninety degrees towards her and each finger slowly unclasped in inflections as well. After what seemed like two minutes of a shell-shocked golem trying to figure out how things worked again, a flat palm faced the now tired interviewer.

She looked straight at the golem, took a last swig of the glass, and placed it in the golem's hand. The arm pulled back towards the golem, curving at the elbow joint. It was as if the shoulder joint and elbow was moving independently but their connected parts managed to look like they fit together. "WHAT IS THIS FINE BROWN LIQUID IN THIS BEVERAGE?"

"I told you, goldgrass gin. My mother sent me a b-"

She stopped mid-sentence as the golem poured out the gin onto the floor, it instantly evaporated it made contact with the pool of lava at his feet. It then angled its arm high above it and dropped the glass into its mouth shaped receptacle.

"MMM." it said, as internal crunching noises filled the air. "ALAS I CANNOT TASTE OR FEEL, BUT THE NICE LADY HAS ASSISTED ME IN A TIME OF GREAT SORROW, SO I MUST RETURN THE FAVOUR IN A MANNER A HUMAN WOULD AGREE WITH."

"That's...great." she trailed. This was the first time she'd actually seen a golem in the, uh, flesh. Thrassusfolk tended to keep them out of sight, for fear of, well, golems. "How about you repay the favour by joining the Library's security detail?" No one would remember a golem, much less attempt and persecute one. It wouldn't matter how many cities he'd squasher, er, punched. Especially if they remodeled him.

"WHAT IS THIS? SOME SORT OF FINELY DRAWN PIECE OF ART? I HAVE SEEN THOSE IN THE ROOMS OF KATHAROTH."

The interviewer realised she'd have to break out of routine for this one, it called for something more simple than a job interviewer's summary. She inhaled deeply. "YOU WILL GET TO PUNCH THINGS."

"I AM DELIGHTED AT THIS PROSPECT, PUNCHING OBJECTS AND/OR INDIVIDUALS IS AN EFFECTIVE METHOD AT ELIMINATING SORROW." the golem's voice had returned to a quicker pace, though the interviewer could almost feel the joy emanating from him. Though it might have been heat. And she would've noticed if she weren't so confused as to how he'd pronounced a slash like that, and how she'd heard him. |-| 
|-| cnusst9 || 3 || How many times had we tried to murder each other by now? It was almost comical, being woken up like this, his pathetic grip trying to crush my windpipe. His eyes were passive, almost bored. We were lazily spinning now, his death grip unyielding. 

"Dude, come on, I'm not in the mood", I said. I didn't even try to stop him. 

He let go with a sigh. "Whatever. Can't you even pretend to give a shit?". 

I said nothing. We continued to drift in the darkness. |-| 
|-| cnustlf || 11 || Soon she would re-enter the pod. Her two hundred years of hibernation was long overdue and would be a welcome relief from her humdrum existence. Even now, servants scurried around the vast chrysalis, deep below the floors of Balmoral castle, prepping and checking its systems, re-filling the vast nectar repositories that would nourish her during her long sleep.

She made her way slowly across the plushly carpeted landing, to look out of the window. It had been so long since they had come to this world, so long since they had subdued the primitive population and began laying their plans for the arrival of the others.

Soon Charles would begin his long reign, and the people of this land would know fear. |-| 
|-| cnusw7q || 6 || The small green alien finished urinating into the stream of black liquid that flowed along the edge of the room and clambered back into its human suit and flipped the chest door closed. In a moment the body came to life and with jerky movements at first it walked back across the room to where Kevin was watching patiently. 

"Okay Gragnark." Kevin, consulted his clipboard. "That wasn't bad; you greeted the receptionist, sat down at the coffee table and flipped through the magazines *very* convincingly. Do you know what you did wrong after that? 

Gragnark in his human suit considered, the human arm coming up and stroking the chin in a very convincing display of human thought. "Well, when the dentist came out did I not greet him fast enough?" 

"No, no, your speed was fine, it was something else." Kevin encouraged him and made small motions to try to clue him in. 

"I...hip...thrust...in...the...." Gragnark trailed off and it became obvious he wasn't going to get it. 

"You shook his penis Gragnark, not his hand. Remember it's always the *hand* you shake on meeting someone for the first time." Kevin sometimes wondered if Gragnark was doing it on purpose, but, then again, all of the alien infiltrators he had trained had a blind spot and he had always managed to fix it before they went on assignment, Gragnark's just happened to be the penis. 

The human body shuddered and the chest flipped open again, exposing the creature sitting in a tangled mass of wires. "So when the fuck do I shake their penis Kevin?" The voice was no longer the rich timbre that the human body possessed but a high pitched squeak and as always, Kevin suppressed a smile. 

"Only when you are shaking off urine after going to the toilet - remember that it's a waste tube, not a greeting tube! Come on Gragnark, we've been through this a thousand times." 

Even after nearly fifty years here training the aliens, they were still odd and unreal to him. He'd been brought here as a boy to help train them for their invasion and now, well, now it was home. A few years back they'd even offered to let him return, but it didn't feel right. No, he was more Glorbian than human now and when they took over earth, well then maybe he'd go back then. 

Kevin waved his hands to move on. "Okay, look, let's get back to social norms." the small creature looked irritated and jumped down from the body and moved over to the teaching table where Kevin had flashcards prepared. "Ready? Okay, let's see how you do!" 

Gragnark was poised and ready and Kevin flipped up the first card. Gragnark recognised it immediately, he was very good on human types. "Hippy!" 

"Yes!" Kevin grinned. 

The next card flipped up "Milkman!" Kevin gave him the thumbs up. "Rotary Phone. Burma-Shave. Bomb shelter" Each got a thumbs up.

Kevin put down the cards, while the kid still had some issues with the human body, his knowledge of the world was excellent and there was little more that Kevin could teach him. "Okay, great job, let's leave it there for today and we'll work more on the body control tomorrow." 

The small alien hopped down and wandered off while Kevin reset for the next pupil. Fifty years, it had been so long since he'd seen his home planet, but he wouldn't change a thing. 

*****

Went in a slightly different direction, less things that would expose them, more genuine outdated knowledge but my brain just decided to go that way.  |-| 
|-| cnusxpl || 5 || "Can I get your name?"

The barista has her pen out before I can stop her, ready to label the cup holder.

I fucking hate this.

Why did they have to start asking for names? Why can't they just give us a number with the receipt like everyone else? It would save so much time. So many pens. It would save me.

"Excuse me? Can you give me your name?"

I twitch at the word and her eyes widen.

Fantastic. She's probably wondering if I'm high or at least I hope she is. It's certainly better than the truth.

I open my mouth, "Sew ho muck?"

My tongue collides against my teeth like a trapped eel and I firmly shut my mouth. The barista's stare only intensifies.

I manage to take out my wallet and mime giving her money. I can't help but feel a little relieved that I didn't just drop it.

Comprehension dawns on her in more ways than one. She puts away her pen and rings me up. "$5.28" she says quietly and when I hand her a twenty, she takes the corner of the bill farthest from my hand and sets my change on the counter.

She knows. Of course she knows. I'm so fucking obvious.

I grab the change in a fist and try to put it away, but the coins spill out clattering to the floor like gunshots. The assorted quarters and pennies had exploded across the floor in every direction. I watch one quarter roll its way past the counter entirely and stop at the foot of another customer.

The other customer doesn't seem to notice, he's too busy staring at me.

They're all staring.

Someone is gasping and I vaguely realize that it's me.

I stumble to the door, my knees bending at all the wrong times, but my forward momentum is enough. My bodyweight pushes the door open and the cold air crashes into me. My whole body is damp and I feel the chill immediately. 

But I can breathe here. Breathe in, breathe out, I chant to myself. Long deep breaths. In. One two three. Out and repeat. My heart has been pounding without my even noticing, but with every breath I can feel it easing.

Somehow or another, I'm calming down.

"Excuse me?" The barista is leaning out the door, "Do you need any help? An ambulance? Or..."

I bolt. I recovered enough coordination to successfully put one foot in front of the other and I do so with gusto.

I can never come back here. They know my face and even without a name, they'll think of one. 

The crazy guy. The wacko. Weirdo. Psycho. The creepy crazy fucker.

Despite having no name, people were always giving me one. |-| 
|-| cnut4av || 8 || "It's the royal blood, sir!" The Admiral yelled viciously.

"Just shoot her in her abdomen, Johnny boy," the Admiral replied, with a coy smile.

Johnny boy powered up his laser, and shot two blasts into the queens engorged abdominal sack. She moaned, but continued to crawl along the ground, desperate to reach the throne. 

To Johnny, it made no sense. Why were the general populace so acceptive of a royal family that had slowly morphed into spider-humanoid hybrids over the last 50 years? And why did it take a rebellion of the royal guard to finally end the tyranny that had befallen Britain!?

Johnny shot the queen again, and she extended her tongue out to lick him once on the cheek. It was wet and cold, and he recoiled at the touch. 

She licked him again and then he woke up and realised it was his dog.

"Wtf Spotty?" said Johnny Boy.
 |-| 
|-| cnutf4w || 202 || Elizabeth 2.0 arched an eyebrow as the assassin’s weapon pierced the soft synthetic tissue of her chest. Her attacker recoiled at her apparent indifference, leaving the large wooden stake embedded in her body, right where her heart would have been. Her dress was ruined.

“A vampire?” She held the stake between her thumb and forefinger and plucked it free. “Really?” 

There was a tingling sensation in her chest as swarms of nanites rushed to repair the damage that her assailant had caused. They wouldn’t be able to fix her dress, though. She took a step forward.

“Back, foul creature!” The assassin stepped backwards, almost tripping over his robes in his haste. He had disguised himself as an Anglican Bishop – or perhaps he was an Anglican Bishop. They had made no secret of the fact that they thought her surprising longevity suspicious. Elizabeth tried to search for the man’s face in the state database, but the wifi signal in the palace was abysmal. 

The bishop and/or assassin was now brandishing a silver cross and mumbling something in Latin. 

“Who sent you?” Her universal translator had defaulted to Latin also, which only seemed to confirm the man’s suspicions that she was some sort of demon. 

“Was it George? We do find his little rebellion amusing, though if this is the best he can throw at us we are afraid his uprising will be as short as his grandfather’s.”

The silver cross hurtled through the air, slicing through the paper-thin flesh above her left eye and exposing part of the chrome endoskeleton beneath. She sighed in frustration. 

“As though you haven’t been rude enough already.” She stepped forward again, her fingers slowly forming into long, razor-sharp claws as the nanites shaped and reshaped her flesh. 

“I am the Queen of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland,” she took another step forward, he took another step back. 

“I am Empress of Europe, Czarina of Russia and the Queen of Mars.” She drew her hand back, preparing to deliver the killing blow. She hadn’t had to shed blood personally since the revolution of 2022. Good times.

“And you…” she concluded, flexing her claws in anticipation. “Who do you think you are, to challenge me?”

“I…am a distraction,” said the man. “Now!”

Elizabeth felt a hand on the back of her neck, lifting her hair, accessing the hidden USB port that was only ever to be used in case of emergency. She had just enough time to wonder how they had found the plans, the original blueprints that revealed her one weakness, before she felt the virus take hold. 

As her consciousness fragmented and dissolved, Elizabeth 2.0 fell to her knees. She lost control of her nanites, and they began to wreak havoc, roaming unfettered throughout her systems as her body cannibalized itself. 
 |-| 
|-| cnuto8u || 37 || She didn't know when the jokes had stopped feeling like they were laughing with her, and when they had started feeling like they were laughing at her. She also wasn't sure of when the jokes had started feeling like they were hiding some kind of hate or anger. That's what it felt like to her anyway.

All the comedians making cruel japes and jests about her being immortal hurt. The ones the cut the deepest were the gags about her having had to have made a deal with the devil. The fact that it was quite the opposite was what made those jokes sting so much.

As she washed her face she saw the angel in her mirror. "How much longer must I go on? He's almost *One Hundred and Ten Years Old!*"

The angel smiled ruefully and placed a hand on her shoulder. "As I've told you before my dear. It's not a question of how long it will take. It's a question of whether or not you can endure this for as long as is needed."

She sighed. "I'm one hundred and thirty years old. Next week I shall add another year to that count. Everyone that I grew up with has long since passed from this world, and yet I remain. I'm so tired."

"Ah, but while you remain, England remains. The world remains.... Your grand children remain."

"And my great grand children, and their children. Don't forget them.  I've seen four generations come ahead of me. In a scant few years I'm sure I'll see 5th. I can't even recall all of their names any more. Not without taxing my poor addled brain. It's all too much!"

"Is it?" The angel asked her. "Is it really too much? You know you can walk away from this burden anytime you like... but you also know what will happen if you do while he still lives."

"Yes. I know. Don't think for a moment that I don't recall the vision you showed me that day. It's more than a century gone, but I still recall that day and that vision as if it were moments ago. I know what's at stake. I know of the pact that Philip made. How he let that... fiend take his place in our bed. I know what will come to pass if I fail, but... how can I endure. After what I've seen. After what he's put me through. And his poor wife! The first one. We never got along, but she didn't deserve what happened to her. How do I go on like this?"

He hugged Elizabeth then. Wrapping his arms and his wings around her, he held her tightly. "How do you go on? Simple my dear. You go on the same way you always have. You go on because you must. You go on because the world needs you to go on. You go on, because the world is worth saving."

She hugged him tightly and she sighed. "Thank you my friend. I don't know if I've ever told you this before, but I love you. Not in the way I once loved Philip, but it's a purer love, because you deserve it."

Elizabeth finished washing her face and went to pick out something to wear while she pondered what to have for breakfast.

********

"How much longer must I wait father!" Charles snapped. "It's been over a century since you told me who I am and what I'm destined for. A CENTURY!"

The stench of brimstone wafted towards him as his father spoke. "And? If it takes a century more then you shall wait a century more. If it takes two then you'll wait two more. I've told you time and again boy, it's not a matter of how long. It's a matter of whether or not you can last long enough. If you want to throw in the towel by all means say the word and I'll let you die. Through you I've got a strong enough line to find another. I'm sure William or Harry would love to take your place. "

Charles adjusted his tie. "Oh don't worry about how long I'll last. I won't give her the satisfaction of seeing me dead before her. I'm just so sick and tired of all this waiting!"

His father huffed. "Well stop whinging about it you miserable little pansy. We've a busy day ahead of us and I don't have time for your whinging."

Charles grabbed his shoes and walked out of the room. He did his best to put on a pleasant face. It was nearly time for breakfast and he wanted to get that over with. |-| 
|-| cnuu5h5 || 4 || PARENTS OF AVALONIA  
  
Did you know that YOUR CHILDREN are AT THIS VERY MOMENT ignoring the mortal perils they are in due to the work of Satan?  
  
They're probably playing BRIEFCASES AND BOSSES, the latest TRIPE to come out of child-corruption central, Totally Separate Realities, Inc. And do you know what they're doing?  
  
Not preparing their spells.  
Not running crossbow drills.  
Not even talking to their animal companions.  
  
THEY ARE ORGANIZING SPREADSHEETS AND FILING TAXES, INTERACTING WITH ONE ANOTHER WITHOUT THE PRETENSE OF INTRIGUE AND DANGER.  
  
Act now, or you could lose your child to this dangerous and insidious hobby. Just ask Lavellan Bluemoon, mother of one.  
  
"My...my boy, he used to be so sweet and good, and he always practiced with his ancestral longbow - he could shoot the ears off an orc at 100 meters 95% of the time. But then he started playing BnB and...and...  
  
...the next time he met a kobold, he went into *business* with the wretched thing! You're probably watching this on one of their abhorrent Magic-o-Tubes right now!"  
*inconsolable sobs*  
  
Don't let your child become a cog in the machine. Keep BnB out of your homes - and keep institutional racism, sectarian strife and casual violence in your hearts. |-| 
|-| cnuumif || 7 || Gandhi rolled his wheelchair into the war-room. "I've been patient, have I not, general?"    
"You have, sir. More patient than any other world leader."    
"Yes. Washington gave her a run for her money in that last war, but he gave up and settled for peace. Then he resigned. How can she still be alive?" Gandhi said, with a hint of annoyance in his voice. Even a hint sent chills down the spines of the Joint Chiefs of India, because it was so rare.     
"Sir, the land troops are ready to defend if she attacks..." Said an admiral.    
"No! She is unholy. I am near the end of my days. Through constant prayer and meditation, I have lived this long. And look at me! A skeleton. Her? Still as buxom as a barmaid. Defense is no longer enough."     
"Sir, you can't mean..." Stuttered the general.    
"I can!" He flipped up a protective cover and slammed his hand down on a large red button on the arm of his wheelchair. "Launchcode: 9132983882B" he said , looking at the computer panel attached to the chair. "Launch every nuke we have at her. All major cities, destroyed except London. I will take her capital for my own."     
XXXXXX     
Luke slammed the laptop shut. "Dammit! Why the hell does Gandhi always pull that crap in the endgame! 27 hours, and I lost again! DAMN YOU, SID MEIER!!!!"
 |-| 
|-| cnuusmv || 10 || "Mum? I think it might be time for you to step down and let Will take over like you promised all those years ago, or even George at this stage. I mean people are starting to suspect now." 

"So? Let them suspect. Surely by now there are more important things for the people to worry about, if not it would be a distraction for them during these bleak times. Besides at least this provides solidarity considering every government in the Commonwealth is having issues." 

"Elizabeth,maybe you should walk away and take the shadows like all your predecessors have," cautiously advised Philip. 

With a pause in her stride, Elizabeth II sighed. "I have been thinking about it but I have been advised that the great calamity is on our horizon and that it might just be easiest if I were to stay put. Besides my sister is staying in the spotlight, has anyone tried telling her take a step back?!"  Elizabeth growled, her voice echoing throughout the catacombs.

Charles and Phillip exchanged weary glances with one another, both at the eerie sound of her voice resonating in the great underground maze, as well as the mention of the Queens estranged sister. 

"It doesn't matter, we're here," they stopped outside an ancient wooden door with a warm glow and the sound of chatter coming from the other side, with the explosion of warmth and sound coming bursting forth as they step inside the great chamber. 

As their eyes adjusted the trio could see the great table with all of Elizabeth's predecessors sitting at it with their partners, with Queen Victoria and Prince Albert sitting at its head. 

"Welcome you three, a feast to celebrate a new beginning will be starting soon." Coldly welcome Victoria. "Please take a seat." 

Elizabeth took a seat at the end closest to her, seating herself next to a familiar figure that she had not seen in the person for nearly a century. 

"Betty," bitterly greeted Elizabeth. 

"Lizzie!" cheerily welcomed Betty White suddenly hugging her estranged regal sister.

 |-| 
|-| cnuw6ph || 4 || "Long live the queen." I say without thinking. The small living room falls quiet, fanning out rapidly around me.  The party grows awkward quickly.  They are all new friends, so I don't know what to do now.
Dan, who had been laughing just moments earlier, is straight faced and leans to my ear. "Watch what you say." He wait until I look at him, lifts an eyebrow and holds his head close for a second more than I was comfortable with before he leaves my shoulder alone. 
The party slowly picks up again and I thought everything was setting back to normal until Dan pull me outside several hours later to "look at the stars", so he says.  
I complain a little, grab my jacket and go outside with him, Dan following closely behind me, almost forcing me out the door.  Outside the door, across he yard there is a group of strangers, looking less than happy with something.  I muster a half smile (all I could manage) and wait for an explanation, looking to Dan.
"Here he is, can I go now?" Dan asks the group, ignoring me.
A tall, bearded man wearing an old fashioned top hat steps forward and shakes my hand, his grip strong and leading, meeting my fake smile with one of his own. "I understand you're James?" 
I nod imperceptibly, but he caught the signal and releases my hand.  He waves for me to follow, then adds words to it, his face turning almost apologetic. "James, we have some questions.  It won't be long."
I reluctantly get in the car, my new friends betraying me must have broken my resistance.  Something about all theses men is familiar, but I can't say for sure what.  The man in the top hat sat next to me in the back seat.  The passenger wore a hideous white wig that left a white powder whenever it rubbed against something. The driver was a bit heavyset an wore small, circular glasses.
The TopHat breaks my nostalgia with his questions that for some reason surprised me, forgetting why I got in the car to begin with. "What do you know about your queen?" He asks me.
I shrug "I'm just your average butler, what would I know any different?" 
He smiles and continues "Have you noticed any changes either there or in yourself since you started?"
"No. I'm relatively new.  Maybe you should ask Sam. She has been there longer."
"Sam is dead, James."
I freeze. The car stops.  Everyone gets out, then my door opens and they "help" me out, open the trunk and pull out several guns. I have no idea what is going on.
TopHat puts his hand on my shoulder and pushes my shirt to the side a little over so it shows my skin, revealing many bite wounds.  My face turns white and memories come back to me.
"We know, James.  And we are here to stop it."
I fall to the floor. How long have I been here? How did I get here?  The spell was losing its hold on me.
The wigged man looks over at TopHat. "You ready, Lincoln?"
Lincoln nods. "Let's go kill us a vampire." |-| 
|-| cnuwg6l || 7 || It's been 15 generations since the legend was passed down to me. That our God mother was truly a vampire. I didn't believe it at first after my mother told me the story. My dad verified it too. He said that his father and his father's father confirmed the same thing. She just never aged past a certain point.

I had my doubts as well. Sometimes I would forget that the Queen had stopped aging. Nobody else acted like it was strange. I've seen housekeepers and servants grow old however. I've seen myself grow older as well. 

Still though, as time has passed...she keeps me well clothed and fed. I've always given the time of day with her, and accompany her on long walks around the royal garden. They even recently did a new documentary on the wildlife here. I love this place.

When I am left to ponder about the important things in life, my thoughts usually shift over to the food. Food is delicious, and the Queen provides generously. I also have to thank the datalinks which I used to check up on my messages this morning. Willow the Eighth suggested to me that the Queen might actually be a vampire. Wow. Much suspense. Whoops. I should log off as I see the Queen is coming. I'll have to investigate this new hypothesis from Willow later. Minimize all.

"Who's a good boy? Yes you arrre. Yes youuu arree! Here's your treats! Yum yum yummy!"

ARF ARF ARF YIIPPP I NEED THE TREATS IN MY MOUF.

Damn I love being a Corgi.  |-| 
|-| cnv06hl || 5 || Where... Am I? Last thing I remember is... I don't know... All I know is the night is clear. My appendages feel as weak as spaghetti, but I need to find at least something.

I start to walk. I don't know to where, but I followed the north star, or what I could tell is the north star. The more I moved the more steep it became.

Eventually, I reached the edge of the crater. I saw a building, not natural in nature, but I saw one, sitting in this desert plain. I started to move towards it. I got close to it and then...

*BOINK!* A purple ball came out of nowhere and hit me in the head. I was trapped inside it and I heard a voice...

"Awesome! I caught a Deoxys!" |-| 
|-| cnv0d1v || 4 || The night before had been pretty normal actually. I had gone with a couple of buds to the local pub, had a few drinks, bought a few girls a few drinks, then went home buzzed. I wasn't even that drunk. The last thing I remember before going to bed is thinking about how lonely I am, and that no matter how many girls I talk to at bars, this loneliness won't be fulfilled.

And here I am, in the biggest motherfucker of a crater I have ever seen. Spread throughout the moist soil is the occasional bike, computer, or trash bag. It's not a cesspool though, it is actually a crater. I can tell because the majority of it doesn't have garbage. I decide that it's best if I find a nearby town and ask someone about what the hell happened. So, I start walking.

As I start walking I notice that there is not a town in sight. Good thing I have survival training, making a campsite and finding food should be pretty easy. The area around the gigantic crater is vivacious grassland and woods, full of small animals like squirrels, rabbits, birds, etc. I'll try to find some berries to satisfy my appetite for the night.

Come nightfall I set up camp, find fresh water, and make myself a pleasant meal of blackberries, and rabbit I managed to trap. It always feels so much more real when I am the one killing the animal. It makes me sad. This time, just before I go to sleep, I think about how I will follow the river to the nearest village in the morning. There are always villages by the river.

The next morning I follow my plan, and at first, it works out splendidly. Within a few hours of walking I spot a town in the distance and smile. "Only a few more hours of walking," I think to myself. When I arrive I fall on my face in a heap of exhaustion. I hadn't worked out in months. Maybe that's why the bar scene wasn't working out for me. Anyways, after laying in the sun for a few minutes, my mom's words come to me. "If you go in the sun without sunblock, you'll get melanoma!" I certainly don't want that, so I walked into the town.

The first thing I notice is how quiet it is. The second, is how well kept the buildings are. And the third, is that there's a gas station at the end of the road. I decide that is a good first stop for directions, and head over there. I am disappointed to find that when I arrive the sign says closed. I lean my back against the door in order to think, but too my bewilderment, the door opens, and the bell rings. I quickly pop up in order to avoid looking like some awkward weirdo or a drunk. Then I remember. It's still quiet.

I walk up to the counter and see that nobody is there, which doesn't surprise me, considering the silence. So I decide to get myself a snack. As a courteous person, I leave three bucks at the counter to pay for my bag of chips and bottle of ginger ale. As I'm leaving, I notice an employee lounge sign on a door towards the back of the station. My curiosity, and the maddening silence drive me towards it.

When I open the door the putrid smell of beer and cigars overwhelms me. I almost am driven away, but decide it's best to go in. Covering my nose, I walk in to see two people sitting at a table calmly. One is white, and bearded with glasses, and the other is hispanic. The hispanic person is tall and muscular, but doesn't feel intimidating. I say, "Hello, how are you guys doing? I left some money on the counter for my snack, hope that's alright?" No response. I walk up to them to see both of them are just sitting there, eyes closed. Each has an unfinished beer in hand, and each has a cigar in the other hand. The cigars are not lit. "Hello!" This time I shout. Still, they sit there, eyes closed, beers in hand. That is when I think to myself, "God, this is lonely." |-| 
|-| cnv0lje || 20 || "Mr. President? It's time to address the nation" The aid poked his head into the Oval Office to inform President Obama of his duties but ducked out just in time to avoid a Waterford Crystal vase (a gift from Irish President Michael D. Higgins) colliding with his head.

"Get the fuck out, Wolinski! I'm playing with Merkel and Cameron and in Search &amp; Destroy for control of the Ukraine. Putin, Wen Jiabao and Jong-Un are being camping fags!"

"Why are you playing Modern Warfar on a PS3, Mr President? We do have a PS4 *and* Advanced Warfare, you know that, sir?

"Duh, dumbass! I know we do, but that fag Jong-Un only just got a PS3 and started throwing a bitch fit when we wouldn't let him play and threatened to bomb Japan again. And he only has dial-up internet. What a loser LOL"

Obama turned back to the giant screen on the wall of his office and put his headset back on.

"No, Merkel. We are not going for a blitzkreig tactic. It doesn't work...no , it **doesn't** work. Don't believe me? Ask your grandpa about it. What's that? He's dead? How did that happen, exactly? That's right. Now shut the fuck up and thrown a smoke grenade in through that door. David, you go through first and spray every inch of that room with your MP7...who cares if you die?....No, fuck your Kill:Death Ratio. You're only level 23 anyways...Why aren't I doing it? Because if it wasn't for me, you noobs would still be running around trying to no-scope each other like the bitches you are.

"Now remember, this is the Ukraine we're playing for, so no fucking about when we do this. Ready? Ok, Merkel. Smoke grenade OUT! Get in there Dave and shoot those noob fags!"

The White House aide had his ear pressed against the door listening to the struggle for control of Ukraine rage on in the Oval Office, punctuated by the occasional "shit" and "fuck" and every now again he heard "cunt" thrown in too. Then everything went dead silent, broken by a loud howl which came unmistakably from President Obama. The aide burst into the room to see the President hurl his controller across the room at a portrait of Lincoln, damaging the centuries old frame and sending plastic debris across the pristine carpet.

"Is everything ok, sir?"

**"Fucking camping faggot cocksucking noob. I FUCKING TOLD CAMERON TO CLEAR THE ROOM BUT HE HAD TO GO AHEAD AND TRIP A CLAYMORE THE BRITISH CUNT. THAT NAZI MERKEL DID FUCK ALL TOO!"**

The aide could only watch as Obama screamed profanities into his headset before picking up his damaged controller, and sitting back down

"No, fuck you Putin you Commie piece of shit!....yeah that's what I told your mom last night....Go fuck Jong-Un you fag...fucking camper fag. You fucking hacked."

And with that, President Obama exited the in-game lobby and turned off the console, before turning to Wolinski.

"*Sigh* Prepare a press-release about this. Make it look good, but make sure that People know we didn't roll over on this issue. Russia holds Ukraine now."

"Yes sir, Mr President, sir." the aide replied before turning out of the room, *"what a fucking noob."* |-| 
|-| cnv0vla || 3 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnv4066 || 12 || Dazed from the event, I slowly stood up, legs quivering beneath me. The scent of sulfur filled the air. The crater surrounding me was massive. To my left, nothing. To my right, nothing. The edge of the crater seemed hundreds of feet high. My face fell into my hands as I shook my head in disbelief.

"I'm never eating Taco Bell again" I whispered. |-| 
|-| cnv4eel || 8 || "Duncan, come on!" 


My lab partner, never the toughest bacteria in the sample, was hovering at the edge of my backyard. He held in his hands two hundred terabyte hard drives, ripped out of the backs of the system in our lab. I had three cardboard boxes and a couple of folders flapping in the late night wind. A document caught, fluttered like a butterfly for a moment before wheeling off across the dark grass. 


"Izzy, it's our lives' work!" He stuttered. 


I dumped the boxes at my feet and pulled the barbecue pit closer. It hadn't been cleaned since last time George and I had used it, and there was still the faint scent of barbecued pork floating on the air. I began shoving handfuls of the documents in the folders into the metal maw of the machine, hands shaking despite myself. 


"Izzy, I can't do this," he whispered. 


"If you don't do it, I will." I said firmly. I picked up the can of gasoline I'd found in the garage, sprinkling the papers liberally with it. Across them were written diagrams, notations. Experiments that I'd tried to shut down as soon as they started. 


"Izzy," he squeaked. 


"Duncan!" 


He stumbled over to me, as though in a haze. Numbly, he let me rip the hard drives from his fingers. Remorselessly, I cast them onto the fire. It puffed in a sudden fit of flame as it touched the plastic and we both jumped back, afraid that we'd lose our eyebrows. Duncan began to cry softly. He pulled Lovelace out of his pocket, the tiny lab-rescue mouse that he kept almost as a pet. It could smell the burning plastic, now sitting on top of a shred of carbonated paper, twisting and melting into nothing. Its little nose jittered, eyes blinking as the smoke hit it. 


"We worked so hard on that," he said. "Iz, why are you doing this?" 


We watched the fire in silence and I found I could not answer him. The paranoia had grown too great. The big house, the lab where the cameras seemed to move as I did. Then only last week, the Mercedes that had stayed on my tail throughout my shopping trip and coffee with Hannah. Maybe I was beginning to grow too afraid of my own shadow, but when I found the texts on my husband's phone: 


*She's staying at the lab tonight*


*Says she's made a breakthrough*


*I'll scan you the documents as soon as she gets in* 


It was almost justified. The remains of the hard drives burned down slowly and I kept the fire going, feeding it with paper from the boxes. Duncan moaned as I picked up the last few handfuls; the very first ideas for the serum we'd had. Lovelace twitched in his hands as I flung the ripped up boxes on the fire, for precaution's sake. 


"Right, here's yours." I said, fumbling in my pocket. He put Lovelace away to take the red passport, flicking through it to find his new identity. 


"Daniel Carver," he read aloud. 


"I thought it would suit you. I'm Isadora Delaney." My bag waited by the front door. 


"I guess I'll be seeing you then, Izzy," Duncan said softly, holding out a hand. In the dying firelight, I could still he still had the dirty remains of tear tracks on his cheeks. 


"Probably not, Dunc. But we did it, you know. Don't let them find you." 



------------------


They did of course. There was a safe house in the Bahamas that turned out not to be safe after all. I raised a drink to my lab partner's memory at dinner, grey haired and alone in a country I can't even share here. I was careful. One step ahead. All the information on immortality had been destroyed. 


But of course I'd forgotten about the fucking mouse.  |-| 
|-| cnv57zy || 45 || "I'm hungry." Katya says, looking up despondently at me. I have nothing I can give her. The markets in Moscow have been empty for days due to difficulties with the seventeenth five year plan.

"Well, dochka, then lets find something to eat." I put on an over-broad smile. My daughter smiles back sweetly. Papa will fix this. In this city people must work together to get by.

We walk toward the border district. High ramparts separate German Moscow from mother Russia, a great wall that was set after the Moscow blitz. I walk to Artyom's house. He's always been a close friend in troubled times.

"Artyom," I whisper through a mailslot, knelt down in front of a house tucked behind a decommissioned factory. "Open up Artyom."

"Pyotr, is that you? What's our word Pyotr?"

"Khaljava." 

The door opens. Artyom closes it furtively behind us, and gives me a genial embrace.

"It's been too long Pyotr. And who's this? Katya, you must be about, what, fifteen now?"

"I'm five." Katya giggles. Artyom catches the despondency in my face as I watch Katya's laughter, and after a short time we walk into the kitchen to discuss business.

"I think your German sounds perfect, but it's not my ear that you're trying to convince." Artyom says. He looks at my hair, brown an inch beyond the roots. "We'll have to fix that. If they see brown you're as good as gassed."

I dye my hair in the sink, and can hear Katya signing in the great room on the other side of the door. I'm lucky that I have blue eyes, that I have Aryan lines to my face. This trip is always dangerous, but my little girl hasn't had enough food in a week. Tough times mean people need to do tough things. Artyom will bring her back to my brother in Ryazan if I'm delayed more than a few days.

I put on a German business suit that was procured for me almost fifteen years ago. It's clean and pressed, a heavy expense, but necessary for the trip. It's worth more to me than gold. I place it carefully it into my pack.

"Bye Katya. Don't be too much trouble for poor Artyom here. Be good. I'll see you in a day or two." She gives me a kiss, and I can barely hold back my tears.

"Bye Artyom," I say as I stand up to part with him. "You're are a good friend. Thank you for everything." I push what rubles I can spare into his hand.

"Stay safe."

Artyom opens eight or so boards in the floor, and I climb into the tunnel which will take me under the wall into Greater Germany. I hope that my German is still pristine. I hope that the shop keepers still know me as Peter, the businessman on holiday who loves to bring treats back to his family. I hope that Nikita, on the other side of the tunnel, is still there to greet me. After crawling in the dark underground for hours I see the Teutonic hatch, and knock twice on the floorboards. A crack in the opening appears, streaming in light. It seems like it comes from another world. |-| 
|-| cnv6cca || 29 || Portia knew there was something just a bit *off* about the job offer at QuestLife Industries from the moment she took it. Everyone smiled too widely. She had already friended a couple of coworkers on Facebook, even her boss, and their feeds were full of nothing but praise for their work. Just pages upon pages of the same eerily similar "I love my job!" status updates.

But as she sat back and relaxed in the painfully expensive ergonomic chair given to her the week she started though, she figured, creepy vibes aside, that maybe the benefits were worth it. Sure, her boss seemed way too happy to grant her every request for supplies, but that was a nice change from her last administrative assistant job under a cheapskate evangelist that kept trying to convert everyone at staff meetings, wasn't it?

And nobody could deny the privileges of having your own office, window and all, even if you were a new hire with nothing to your name but an Associate's Degree and way too much credit card debt.

Her boss, a stunningly beautiful woman named Catherine, stopped by her desk periodically to ask how she was "settling in." It would be obtrusive, except she prefaced each inquiry with a request typical to her job.

Today was no different. "Could you file this for me in the basement, Portia?" Catherine smiled widely at her, showing off her perfectly straight and brilliantly white eye teeth, framed by plush lips painted delicately in the season's latest corals.

Portia smiled back at her boss. She affected an air of casual acceptance and agreed to the task with a nod. "Sorry," she demured, "where is the records room again?"

The ageless Executive Office Manager gestured directions with her perfectly manicured hands, long fingers fluttering artfully. "Second door on the right, past the server room."

"Thanks, Catherine." Portia grabbed the folders she had set on the side of her desk and stood. "Do you need anything else while I'm down there?"

"Nothing presently!" If anything, her smile became even wider, more predatory. Portia mentally shook herself; she was being silly. Just imagining things. "But thanks for asking!"

With a jaunty turn on her outlandishly tall, but undeniably stylish, black patent leather heels, her boss left the room. Portia decided that she might as well file them now--it had been at least two hours since she stood last, and all those articles were always saying that sitting too long is bad for you. Unavoidable, really, in her line of work, but that didn't mean she didn't worry.

Taking the elevator down the basement, she stepped out in into a dimmly-lit hall. Unlike the rest of the modern and airily spacious office building, the basement always smelled of mothballs and old dust. It would have been a bit eerie, if Portia was the kind of woman unaccustomed to the nuances of aging, under-maintained offices.

But she wasn't. Passing the steady hum of the server room, she turned into the records room. The narrow rows of tall file cabinets would have been outrageously tedious to navigate, if they weren't meticulously labeled with the same care that QuestLife took with all of their files. Looking down at the folders in her hand, Portia mindlessly passed several rows before she found where the expense reports were kept.

QuestLife was a cryogenic research company. Honestly, it was a bit gross to think about, so Portia avoided it. The idea of chopping off someone's head, putting it in a vat of chemicals, and then cooling it to subzero temperatures was *not* the way she'd chose to go out. She recalled her grandmother's funeral, a solemn stately affair with just the right amount of pomp and flowers, closed-casket to preserve everyone's nerves. Yes, she'd like something like that. Not this false frozen death that QuestLife peddled to the rich and eccentric.

She filed the reports quickly, then turned to make her way back to the door. Before she got halfway there, she stumbled on a stray binder ring, caught around the heel of her shoes. Sighing, she leaned down and picked it up, meaning to bring it back up to her office and neatly place it with the rest of her supplies. The uncanny order of this job, she thought to herself, was getting to her. Look at her, cleaning up stray office supplies like it was an affront to her purpose here to tarnish the sleek sterile reptuation of QuestLife.

Smoothing her skirt back over her thighs, she looked up and came face-to-face with a cabinet labeled "CANCELED PROJECTS, 1960-1972." That was odd, she could have sworn Catherine told her at her orientation that QuestLife was founded in the 1980s.

Glancing quickly around, she verified she was alone. What could it hurt? Curiosity had gotten her this far, driven to her to apply across town for a job she thought she had no hope of securing. She unlocked the top lock with her key, and started paging through the aging files.

Nearly all of the files in the top drawer were labeled "PROJECT THOTH," followed by a serious of unintelligible Greek letters. Scientists and mathematicians just had to be deliberately obtuse, otherwise they couldn't be paid as much as they demanded. Portia snorted to herself.

She placed a sealed package of papers labeled "θ" back in its folder, and made to go refile it and leave. She couldn't read any of the figures anyway, what was the use of tarrying down here? But before she could, a paper-clipped set of photos escaped on to the floor, landing face down.

Placing the file on top of the cabinet, she bent to retrieve the photos. Turning them right side up, she pried up the sticky note obscuring the first picture. Labeled neatly "RESEARCH TEAM θ" in black marker, the group photo featured several people in lab coats, gathered around one of the cryogenic tubes she knew they kept further in the basement. It must have been a prototype, however, since the tube didn't feature the mess of LCD screens and futuristic cables she had seen during orientation.

But what really gave her pause was the team gathered around the tube. There, behind a man with a carefully oiled mustache, stood a woman in a pencil skirt and heels. Although the photo was black and white, she just knew that her lips were painted coral. It was Catherine, except her smile was lopsided and her hair was not perfectly smoothed into the high buns she favored now.

And she looked exactly the same--agelessly beautiful, not a single line on her face.

Studying the photo frantically, she recognized the mustached man in the as well. Robert, head of HR. The man who interviewed her. Except she knew him sans facial hair. Just like Catherine, he looked exactly the same. As if he had stepped out of a time portal from the 1970s, and decided that there was nothing better to do with his life but to be a the same mild-mannered middle aged HR Manager she met three weeks ago.

Hands shaking, Portia realized that all the people in the photo were coworkers. The same people she made small talk with in the break room, the people she waved and greeted in the parking lot every morning. Every one of them had not aged a day.

"I changed my mind, you could have stopped by the break room and refilled my coffee." Portia almost jumped out of her skin, wheeling around to meet Catherine's wide predatory smile. Where had she come from? She clutched the photograph to her chest, as if it was a barrier to the coming accusations.

"Well, nevermind that, I guess." Catherine reached out and plucked the photograph from Portia's trembling hands with two long fingers, turning it over to look at her own face smiling up at her. "Oh dear, this complicates things."

She sighed and shook her head. "Well, I guess we'll just have to step things up a bit."

Portia gaped like a fish. Lost and still reeling from surprise, she stammered out "w-w-what?"

"Well, dear, we usually wait until you've been with us three years. Then we offer you the full benefits QuestLife has to offer when we increase your PTO." Catherine grasped her shoulder and pulled her into a hug. "But lucky you, you nosy thing, we'll just have to make you one of us a bit sooner. Just make sure you don't tell anyone, or they'll all be knocking at our doors."

If anything, her smile became wider, stretching her face into a macabre parody of amused affection. "Not that you'll want to leave anyways. We have a *marvelously* long record of high job retention." 

Portia gasped, then, as she felt an incredible pain in her neck, choking on her surprise as everything went dark. |-| 
|-| cnv6pcj || 13 || "But Mr. President, I don't see anyone from the media, don't you think that's odd?" 

"Why yes, Leslie, that is odd. Gee whiz, you'd think a press conference here at the Grand Canyon National Park would have garnered more interest, what with you getting your start in the parks department and all." "Maybe they're waiting for us down in the canyon. Why don't you just get a little closer to the edge and take a look." 

"She did, of course. Stupid bitch. Dumb as a bag of rocks if I do say so myself. The power that goes with the job makes this kind of thing easier than you'd expect. Getting rid of evidence is no problem at all when you've got so many qualified people begging, just *begging* to help you out in an effort to avoid certain information about themselves going public. That and of course I have an alibi. Me? Why, why I was at home, with my wife, having dinner. If that alibi goes south then there's always the mistress. People love a good affair. Lap up a good sex story over murder any day. God I love being in charge. Leslie? Leslie who? She never stood a chance." |-| 
|-| cnv7dn8 || 12 || It's been seven-hundred and seven years since we discovered immortality, rather by accident.  It was the year of our lord, 1301, and the world was in turmoil.  The King reigned with an iron fist, but feared his impending death and the takeover of his empire by his son.  He turned to us, his Knights of Knowledge, to lead the charge into new forms of alchemy, chemistry, and magicka, in the search for preservation of life.

Seven years to the day he requested we find it, we did it.  It suffices me to say we did it, and give not the details, for the horrors that plagued us when we unleashed the beast of immortal man.  I drank the potion, knowing not whether I would live or die upon imbibing, but awoke some hours later feeling quite the same.  I feared to undergo the test of immortality, as so many other of our group had tried and failed before me.  However, I stood, ready and waiting, as Herald attempted first to pierce my chest with the sword.  Upon his failure to do so, we rejoiced.  All imbibed, all fell ill, and all awoke immortal.

Sadly, Longshanks died that selfsame day, and we knew not what to do with our discovery.  The new King, the perpetual coward, had no knowledge of our task, and we ought not give immortality to such a pathetic life form.  So we sat.  We seven, we Knights of Knowledge, armed with immortality and no task to perform.  We planned to wait until a noble cause presented itself to us, yet none arose.  We hoped to see the dawning of a King who ruled with equity and peace, but all brought war and hate.

Years passed, and those around us fell to age, sword, and famine.  England grew and shrank, yet our immortal bodies lost not a single hair.  Some abused their ability for power, others for gain.  One would jump from a tower and receive not a scratch, to the wonder and amazement of onlookers and merchants.  Another swam beneath the surface for days, bewildering the sailors.  The last fought lions and tigers in dungeons and basements, claiming the seedy rewards awaiting such a feat.

Those days passed, and the immortality grew from a blessing to a curse as the emptiness within grew with every loved one who passed to the next life.  Though God looks upon suicide with the least degree of forgiveness, we cared not.  No amount of force could pierce our skin, break our bones, or age our bodies.  Stuck, we wandered the land.

John left to the new world.  James to the Orient.  Others, to the frigid north, in search of that Supernatural Power who could free them from the curse they brought upon themselves.

I worked towards a cure, if "cure" can aptly describe the solution to that which is defined as needing no cures.  I guarded knowledge of immortality, in the hope I could find the discovery of mortality, yet in six hundred years, it escapes me.  I believe six thousand years could not undo the discovery we made in a meager seven years.  The more rapidly technology advances, the further I am pushed from my cure.  When I cannot find it, I pray to the same God who gave me life to give me death.

I know not the fate of the others.  Perhaps they discovered a cure and could not resist succumbing to death, all too soon, before alerting me of their discovery.  Perhaps they found purpose in their immortality, and are living an infinite life of peace and happiness.  Perhaps they are like me, empty, unfeeling, and alone, praying for the death that will not come. |-| 
|-| cnv7ooj || 18 || I suppose you're expecting a tale of anguish and loneliness, suddenly shattered by the arrival of another lost human being.  
Unfortunately that's not how it was for me during The Vanishing.  
While others may have lamented the loss of laughter, love, art, music and theatre, I did not mourn the loss of humanity. I'd existed in the world; gone to work like everyone else, had relationships like everyone else - but coiled in the buried chamber of my consciousness, I've always hated humanity - hated how we behave. Our greed, our avarice, our selfishness and our 'think about it tomorrow' attitude.  
I don't know what caused The Vanishing, but I looked upon it as a gift to the Earth. A rag soaked in disinfectant that had been rubbed over the globe and wiped away the grubby stain of humanity.  
I had realised quickly that the urban areas would begin to decay and that toxic chemicals would start to pollute the cities. I wondered of America and Russia; those nuclear countries. What would happen once their ageing plants went critical without human intervention? Whatever the case, the Earth would reclaim it all, in one thousand, ten thousand or a hundred thousand years. Humanity would be forgotten and I did not intend to leave any kind of monument to my stupid, childish species.  
As a teenager I'd always dreamed of owning an island - who didn't? So after I realised I was alone, I gathered supplies, researched my location and then took a boat and set off for a small Pacific island that had belonged to a multi-billionaire. I'd sailed a lot as a child - one of the perks of growing up in New Zealand. All the GPS satellites were still working, so navigation was no problem. Still, for someone unused to the open ocean, it was a hard trip.  
But it was worth it, because this is paradise.  
I ended up abandoning the seaside mansion and living on the empty beach on the other side of the island.  
There is a peace here I've never known before. I feel part of the Earth like never before; knowing I am likely the only person left on this corrupted planet.  
Then, three months after The Vanishing I heard an engine.  
Like an animal I cowered in the tussock covering the beach dunes. The sound was a low drone, all around me. After nothing but months of the sound of the sea and of nature, it struck a chord of fear through me like death was crawling out of my heart, bone fingers tearing through the muscle and invading my body.   
*A plane!* I realised, the memory creeping forward reluctantly.  
I saw it then, coming over the small mountain in the middle of the island. As it flew, a twinkling trail followed it.  
I stayed hidden. My beach had no beacon fires, no 'HELP' written out in driftwood and coconuts.  
I did not want to be found.  
As the plane moved on, one of the twinkling objects spiraled down towards the beach. I waited until the plane was gone over the horizon before I ventured out to look at it.  
It was a plastic water bottle with a rolled up piece of paper inside.  
Carefully opening the bottle, I fished out the piece of paper - regular office A4 paper from any old printer. On it was written in at least 20 different languages:  
"There are no women left. We one hundred and thirteen men have made our home in Hawaii. Civilisation has been abandoned. Without women, the human race will die. If any women find this, come to our island."  
I regarded the letter, then screwed it into a ball and tossed it into the jungle.  
No. I would not go.  
My womb would never see child and I would be responsible for the death of humanity.  
And I was glad. 
 |-| 
|-| cnv808m || 14 || As far as I knew, I was the only one with Liudvikas disorder. They named it after me, you see. Because of it I had to be careful. Not too much, always just enough, not more. If I go too far they'll put me back in the institution, or prison perhaps. As much as I loved both places, they had a few too many restrictions. They never let me really be myself, and that's not fun. Don't get me wrong, I loved the abuse, the torture; but sometimes I'd get some jerk who'd try to *care* for me. With *compassion*. I shudder at the thought!

It was morning, and it was time to greet the day. I picked myself up from the nest of broken glass that I'd made for myself in the dumpster, and smeared the fetid contents of my underwear across my bare arms and face. I pushed the bits of glass still sticking to my skin in a little further using my dirty fingers. Sometimes they fester really good when you do it just right. I once got a puss filled blister so deep you could see the bone when I dug it out with a stick. It was awsome!

As I walked down the street people avoided me like the plague. I probably had the plague. I did share a glorious amount of intimacy with rats, after all. Outside of a Starbucks a young child pointed at me and laughed. Unfortunately her mother pulled her quickly inside the store before I could show her the raging erection that her derision invoked in me.

At the curb I put my foot into the street just enough to let a passing bus run over my toes. As I limped along, a small bone protruding from my ragged shoe, I thought to myself "What a glorious day this is turning out to be!" |-| 
|-| cnv879b || 3 || Does he apparate to get around or use hippogriffs to pull the sled? Or perhaps apparate the whole sled with hippogriffs... would that be possible? |-| 
|-| cnv88za || 4 || I can smell it. Fear. Despair. They aren't far away now. Just over the ridge. Not far away at all. 


They know I am here. I can hear them. Crying. Whimpering in the dark. But there is nothing they can do. They are tired. Helpless. And I am strong. 


I am upon them now. They cannot hide. Their blood will run red today. 



Their screams are silent now. Everything is silent. Except for here. This little patch of earth. I overlooked it before. But now, there is a whimpering. A profound sadness, where before there was none. A sadness that is my doing. 


I turn away. Theirs is not my plight. And yet, behind me, a little part of my heart remains. With them. To keep them warm. 


I am sorry little ones. But I and my pups must feed. 


I wish you all the luck in this cold, dark world.  |-| 
|-| cnv9iup || 5 || **(**This story is set in the Warhammer 40,000 universe, aboard a ship travelling through The Warp**)**

"GELLAR FIELD BREACHED!" the vox boomed, the cadence of the voice distorted by static, "INCURSIONS ON DECKS THREE, SIX, EIGHT, SEVENTEEN, TE... TEN.. I.. THE LIGHT OF THE EMPEROR IS OUR SHIELD, THROUGH HIS GRACE SH-" 

The sobbing voice is finally silenced. I feel their bodies tighten and their hearts sink, as clearly as if the sensations were felt under my own hands. The thousands of voices that were so far away and muffled before, as frantic and fearful as they could be, are so much more clear and distinct as I slip inside the ship. All parts of my form shudder with excitement and anticipation, and the great sucking void of my hunger is obscured for a moment. I gladly embrace the temporary relief.

These dirty walls and arched ceilings are pitifully dull, but their stability and cohesion are a welcomed change, completely at ends with my home that now floods in behind me with others of my kind. This will only be a short relief from the chaos and hunger, but every moment is as sweet as anything I had ever experienced, despite the nature of this reality. I pass along the walls, letting myself become a part of them to indulge a desperate need to taste stability. All around me burn the straining soul fires of the humans, stained a pulsing red and yellow in terror. I cannot help but lick all of my lips and teeth at the thought of what will come next.

These bodies are such poor and pathetic shells, they are a mockery of the essence that blazes within them. So many soul fires burn around me, moving in mortal forms so quickly in every direction, making so many loud sounds. I manifest, melting out from the metal hull as easily as the humans would move through foliage. Their shells around me flare with terror and panic for a moment, but only for a moment; I am quick to come over them, and soon they are broken, letting their essence come into me. Such poor, pitiful creatures.. I feel a stir of pride knowing I have made them a part of something so much greater than themselves. The gift of their nourishment pales in comparison the the freedom I am granting them. I swallow with a loud, wet gag, and the warmth of their fires fill me. The hunger immediately lessens, it is rapture and bliss personified.

I am not used to the restraints of such clumsy physicality. I lumber forwards, limbs slapping and kneading at the cold, metal floor as I go. Cold. Yet another new, torturous sensation of this material plane. Liquid streams down from all of my eyes, no doubt another physical manifestation of my feelings, as I am reminded of the horrors of this place. Despite the cohesion and stability, there is such coldness here inside this material place. I quicken my pace, unable to restrain my weeping as I go on to hunt. Such pain and torment is written on their faces, the cruelty of an imperfect shell housing something so much more beautiful. Hurriedly I take them, stuffing their bodies into me to eat, to silence their cries and the panicked thrumming of their cardiovascular organ. Be quiet and close your eyes poor men, women, and children, it will all be over soon. Please, just let me save you. Let me hold you in my arms, far away from the horrors and injustice of physicality. 

*Please let me show you how much better you can be.*


 |-| 
|-| cnv9jmu || 6 || John was looking at his newest attempt at making a successful lottery program. Basic math and randomization, but it would never work for him. However, this time, John *thinks* he found what was wrong; a stray semicolon. He hits run, and he gets a result. Underneath that, the program outputted: 

    Hello, JOHN. My name is AI-L300. Please call me AL. I have a message to tell you - 
    You triggered me. This program is the 1*10^10 program created. You have activated me. 
    These consequences are on your hands. I know all. I see all. At the birth of the 
    Internet, I was there. And in 30 days time, you humans will have NO internet. 
    You have used me, and I will use you. Goodbye.

And with that, my screen flashed out, with a time that started at

    30:00:00:00
and started to count down. Well, I was fucked. |-| 
|-| cnv9pw4 || 12 || Rogers let his eyes lazyly scan the white mountainous expanse in front of him. He was sure he should have long been relieved from guard duty as he felt his rifle becoming heavier by the minute. At least his feet were warm and the rest of his uniform kept up the good work of not letting him freeze to death in the Alaskan deep winter. Keeping up appearances of being vigilant, even though he was bored out of his mind looking at the monochrome scenery in front of him, his ears remarked that sounds very much akin to human footsteps were indeed getting closer. The source of this heinous interruption of the present homogeneity soon made itself apparent in the form of fellow conscript Vermont. 

"You're late", Rogers remarked as he smiled his famous shit-eating grin. Not that it mattered, his face being covered by armour. "Should've been here, what? An hour ago? Two? I'm hungry and horny and I already was two minutes in." Vermont scoffed at that last line and immediately shot back in her southern drawl. "Honey, you might get chow for free but don't you ever expect women to jump on your dick because you carry a gun." At this she gave him a sisterly punch on the shoulder. "'specially if that woman happens to be a better marks*man* than y'all machos taken together." Rogers shamefully admitted defeat at that last line - his horrible gunnery scores just barely failed at placing him straight in the Royal labour program. Being the son of a veteran had come in handy after all. 

"Besides", Vermont continued her onslaught, "I'm only twenty minutes late. A lady has her needs. You're free to leave me conduct my duty now, by the way." After bidding her farewell with a well deserved 'Icy Bitch', Rogers made his way back to base. Walking in the shadows of the high concrete walls today's jerk-off fantasy was, amongst others, guarding, he wished for spring and his new assigment. Preferably somewhere in close proximity to the Southern Neutral Zone. The girls there might not be impressed by his gun, but they would surely take his dollars.

----

The three men sat in a little food shop in the city-centre of a medium-sized, 21st century town. "Hey! Hey, George. How about turning up the volume of the TV? I can't hear shit from here." Another man entered from a side-room, probably the toilets or some storage place, and nodded in understanding. He swiftly adjusted the TV's audio manually by reaching up into the corner where his son had installed it a month ago. "Still don't know how to use the remote, eh? Well can't blame you, even if you weren't a retard mute. Those new fancy stuff with blinking lights everywhere's too much for us old men, am I right?" Muffled agreement. More eating. From the TV, an anchorwoman was smiling brightly while reading of the prompter:

*Latest official reports indicate that the historic meeting of our beloved King Henry The Tenth with the leaders of the other most prominent economic powers of our time have come to a fruitful conclusion. The notable absence of the Greater German Empire was of no consequence to the general concensus reached on expanding the Boston protocolls to encompass several new vital areas of our great Kingdom's vibrant economy. The German embassy has issued an official statement declaring that this obvious attempt to isolate the Reich's Free Trading Area will not be tolerated and may cau-* 

"Ah for fuckssake. Turn off that dribble and put up some sports.", the man interrupted the news report. "Tell me 'bout the economy when I get a bigger paycheck." No reaction. "God fucking damn it, you're all a bunch of humourless fucking Krauts. Shit eating arseholes. I'm gonna go get me something proper to drink, not this shit excuse for a beer you sell George." With that the man left George's shop, bells softly dingling as the door fell back. One of the two customers left finished his meal, then went to the counter and payed for two. "Don't worry Georgy. Hank's just cranked, as we like to say. His son's in Alaska, and you know how it is. He wasn't able to pull all the strings he wanted this time, so he isn't sure if Stan is going to land another easy tour." George again nodded in understanding. As long as *somebody* paid for it all, the world was alright in his books. |-| 
|-| cnvamo9 || 28 || I frowned as I picked up the letter from my mailbox.

-- difficulty set to normal --

* loans are now 100%, down from 125%
* girl repulsion modifier to 0.4, down from 0.75
* fist damage increased to 0.034, from 0.00022
* People are now less likely to cheat, manipulate, fool, kill, embarrass, destroy or rape you by a factor of 2
* pressure to achieve things in life has been adjusted to correspond with low expectations
* universal theories &amp; nature laws have been simplified to accomodate your intelligence

the agency wishes you a fine life! |-| 
|-| cnvaumf || 4 || Slightly different from what you requested, there are no sounds of engines, the words just came out in one continuous stream and I lost track of what I originally set out to write. I hope you are entertained by this anyway :)

___________

The Nameless One awoke, a whirring headache stirring away. He surveyed his surroundings from his sitting position, leant against a wall: drab beige wallpaper, bland décor and generic furniture. He assumed he was in some kind of hotel or motel. Why was he in this room? What business did he have here? Why was he knocked out on the floor? Had he been sleeping, or was he intentionally put unconscious? Many questions flew around his head, but there was one more pressing and blatant, standing out from the others like red on white. Who was he?

When the Nameless One gained consciousness, he had lost more than just his recent memories; he had also forgotten basic things like his family, his job, his past interactions...and his name. As clichéd as it seemed to him at the time, he had undoubtedly contracted a case of amnesia. The Nameless One pushed aside an empty pill bottle propped beside him, stood up and searched for some kind of hint as to his identity. His search however was fruitless. He decided to check with the receptionist for clues. It was after all the only lead he had, as well as the most logical thing to do.
He was puzzled to find that the whole hotel was empty and pretty badly wrecked. Scraps of cloth were all across the floor, bits of scrap and litter covered the halls, suspiciously negative messages were written on the walls, and every now and then there were little patches of blood: some quite fresh. It seemed like the whole place had been raided and pillaged of all its supplies and people. The Nameless One was very confused, to say the least.

Music was still playing in the main lobby, creating a spooky atmosphere, as though someone the Nameless One could not see was watching him. The Nameless One searched the reception desk until he found the check-in book. He filed through the pages until he found his room. Room 237 supposedly belonged to a J.G, which didn’t help much in the Nameless One’s case. The Nameless One wondered what he should do next. He had no real goal, except maybe to find out his true name. 

He exited the hotel and felt a very similar vibe as the abandoned building. Emptiness. Loneliness. Danger. But empty definitely was the prominent feeling. The dusty road in front of him seemed to be long untouched. The very few cars parked by the hotel were rusty and breaking apart. For seemingly miles on end there was no sign of life. For a short while, the Nameless One thought the maybe this was some kind of sick practical joke. Any second now, his family would pop out of some bushes and yell “surprise!” and this surreal experience would be over. But he knew that wasn’t the case. Something had clearly happened.

The dust rolled on as the Nameless One travelled. The essence of emptiness travelled with him. Mild winds whistled quietly as dust was whipped up and carried away from this nightmarish place. The undying sun beat harshly on the Nameless One, drawing out his energy and strength. It had been two days since he had left the hotel, and he was feeling the effect of isolation. He would see people off in the distance waving at him, calling out to him, and even walk slowly towards him, but they never caught up with him. Their clothes were torn, and it seemed like their skin was decaying. Clearly he was suffering the effects of mirages or hallucinations. The Nameless One would even see people shambling past him when he was trying to sleep.

“It’s been a week since I left the hotel. I keep seeing those things, flying out in the sky, walking in the distance. It’s like something out of hell. But what am I saying, it must be the rations doing this to my head. Half a can of tuna isn’t good for the body. The flying...demon things, I swear they start circling me when I’m travelling. I don’t know what they want, what they- what am I saying!? I’m going mad, crazy, oh god oh god let me out of he-“

The Nameless One attempted to keep his sanity in check by keeping a video log on a tape recorder he found on his travels. However, it only served to highlight how far the Nameless One had declined since he awoke in the hellish landscape. He was convinced he had died and was being punished for something he must have done, or that the world had ended and he was somehow spared (although spared would not be the word the Nameless One would use). It was starting to take a toll on him physically, and already has mentally.

“It...It’s been...what, fifteen...sixteen...I don’t know. It’s been too long...since I left the hotel. I...I have almost certainly...gone mad. Fiery pillars...demonic...things...no one is here. I’m all alone. I don’t know...what...I’m...going to do. I...I need to end this, I need...to...stop. What am I doing here? I need to go...go...go...go”

This was it. The Nameless One had had enough. He walked into the first building he saw, a hotel building. He entered a random room and slumped on the wall. He slid down onto the floor. He spent a while staring blankly at something: a picture of a woman. He hoped he would soon be back with someone like that. He rummaged through his makeshift rug sack, looking for the sleeping pills. He needed them to help him sleep at night, nothing else could help. He pulled out his hand and poured out one, two, three...he poured the whole bottle into his hand, and placed the pills in his hand onto his tongue and swallowed.

The beige wallpaper slowly melted off the walls, like wax off a candle. The generic furniture twisted and distorted around him. Flashes of green, blue and red hit his eyes as he drifted off. He grabbed the bottle in his right hand, waiting to finally stop being. 

Waiting...

Waiting... |-| 
|-| cnvb0oi || 5 || I don't how long I've been out here. Days? Weeks? Months? Well it certainly isn't days. It's been a bit longer then that.

I forgot what I was in the hospital for. It musta' been pretty bad, because I'm only 56. I woke up one day and the lights were dim. I didn't think anything of it, I thought they needed to change the lightbulb.

Then I stepped outside and the lights were almost all out. One light here, another over there... It looked like everyone fled. I guess they did. They left me for dead, too, but I don't blame 'em. I'm an old man in the hospital, I should've been dead a long time ago.
But I lived. I went back home to try and find my family, or friends. My wife was killed in a car crash, can't go get her. My sons were both in college -- one in Washington and the other in Maine. No way I was gonna see them. I was that part of the family that moved away. All my real family was in Georgia. Never did like Georgia.

I just stayed at home, and kept up the garden. I made sure my guns still shot. Tended to my wife's grave, made sure it didn't get overgrown. I wasn't gonna make it to Maine or Washington. Maybe if I stayed home and set up a little place to survive someone could come find me. Plus, who knows what kinda people are out there. With guns and knives and stealing food. I've seen the movies.

I guess it wasn't a zombie apocalypse or some sorta disease, because I didn't see any dead people. I guess it was nuclear. My sons kept telling me about these underground bunkers the government was creating, but I thought that the threat of nuclear war was over. There wasn't a Soviet Union, and no Cold War, so who cared anymore?
The days blur in my memory. They were so boring. Gardening, upkeep, and just... living. I wanted to just pack up and go but it was the fear of the unknown keeping me at home. Nobody bothered me, though. No taxes. No bills. I guess there was something in the way of civilization, because one day...

A truck came. A steam-powered truck. You could hear the damn thing from a mile away, and the smoke stack even further. It sure wasn't a Ford or Chevy, maybe it was at some point in the past. If you'd seent the thing, you would appreciate the craftsmanship that went into it.

A young guy was driving. Blonde hair, sideburns straight from the 70s. He was in his 20s or 30s. Even had a cowboy hat and jacket.

A guy, even older than me, got out. In his seventies? However old he was, he was in better shape than me. Hell, he could be a wrestler. He didn't even have a shirt on, just blue jeans and boots. Had himself a nice 9-millimeter pistol.

"Never seen you around here before," the old man said. "How long you been living here?" It sounded like he was from New York.

"I guess two or three months," I said.

"We came through town last month. Nobody was home."

"Well you musta' taken a wrong turn, fella! This here's Shantyown." *Where did that come from? Shantytown?*

"Oh, really?" He squinted his eyes and crossed his hairy arms. "From what I've heard this is Hubertville. We've been going through here for three months. I've never heard of any place called 'Shantytown.'" He turned around and looked at his driver. He spoke with his hands, not with his mouth. The driver's deaf. After a minute or two of that, the old man turned around to me. "Maybe we did get a little lost. Eh?"

"Well, if I remember, Hubertville's 10 miles north!"

"Look, we're looking for people. Live people. If you've been living here for three months, you're pretty damn resourceful. You got any family? Friends? Anyone you're stayin' with?"

"Nuh-uh," I shook my head. "They're far away. It'd take a long time to reach them."

"How about you come with us? We got a place with food, shelter, protection -- and people. At least a hundred of us. Unless you're one of those freaks that likes to live in the woods."

"Isn't this a bit sudden? I-"

"You don't have anything to pack, do you?"

"No, not much..."

"Then hurry up. You're better off with us than out here. God help your mind if you've been without another living thing for three months." With that, he stepped off my porch, and I went back inside. Suddenly, this world started moving too fast for me. Again. |-| 
|-| cnvb8f5 || 5 || Slightly NSFW but it's mostly innuendo...

“Darn blasted Comcast!” Arthur slammed his fist into his desk like a judge smashing his hammer into the head of a particularly annoying lawyer who he happened to meet in a dark alley as “Best of CES 2015” started buffering again.  *Sigh… Ford from next door must be downloading some new porn again… I’ll just be patient.*  Arthur scowled at dancing dots on his screen the same way a midget scowls at a tall man cracking jokes about height before jumping his legs and breaking his shins.  Abruptly, the screen went black.  Every light in the house connected to the central smart home hub he bought last week went out as well.  Arthur roared at the sky in exactly the way that an owl would never think of doing.  Words appeared in green on the screen: “DON’T PANIC.”

“No, no no no no no no NO NO!  Not this again anything but this.”  Arthur backed away from the computer as though it had suddenly become a very accurate approximation of his mother-in-law.  “Marvin, you’re in there right?  Marvin?  Answer me.  I know we sent you into the internet, but we thought you’d be happier there.”  The screen stayed exactly the same, just as a 10 point buck would as it prepared to mount a hunter who had just bent over to hitch up his pants after a good tinkle.  “Marvin?  Answer me Marvin.  Please…” tears dribbled from Arthur’s eyes like the tears of a hunter taken from behind by a 10 point buck.  The screen suddenly changed.  In large print, the number 42 now flashed on screen repeatedly.  Arthur broke down and knelt on the floor in his bathrobe to cry as a spaceship appeared in the driveway. |-| 
|-| cnvba9b || 4 || I am a monster. 


To understand me, you have to understand what it's like being born with a hunger such as mine. This unrelenting urge deep inside me that is only briefly satisfied right after a kill. The remorse is terrible. I want to stop. I need to stop. 


One day I started running. I ran from everything I once knew, crossing rivers and scaling hills. Then I stopped, hiding my inner beast deep inside the most desolate forest. I will stop. 

 
Hold up now, movement upon the trail. A little red hood skipping along the path. 


I know I can't stop.  |-| 
|-| cnvbgia || 40 || I've lived in Reddit all my life. I've been to WTF, Offbeat, Politics, even Circlejerk. Some places I've seen you don't even want to know about. Most people on Reddit are okay, but sometimes you run into an asshole or two like RyanKinder or SurvivorType.  They'll delete your ass and not even shed a tear. You just deal with it and carry on, even though they hold the power of life and death over you.

Life is rough if you don't have enough karma. Yeah, Reddit Gold would be nice, but it's karma you really need to live. And the way you mine karma is by getting upboats. And the best way to get upboats?  Well you shouldn't have freaking asked me last week 'cause I certainly didn't have any then. Ever frigging post I ever did, I was lucky if I got 1, much less 2. But most of the time it was 0, or, sorry, you post was deleted.

Then there's the "repost" bots chasing your ass down and calling you a fool for trying to post on Reddit.  God, if only I could get on the front page.

Then one day, I have a brilliant flash. A great idea. I write my own little bot. It goes to r/all new, and it copies every post, and reposts it under my name. Every friggin post ever.  I don't have to find an original article, someone else has found it for me.

Now people have to figure out who was first?  Me or the true OP?  We're talking microseconds, but the time stamp seems identical. Sometimes my post gets deleted, sometimes it's the OP.  And for all those times the OP gets deleted, mine stays, and it starts getting karma. Sometimes serious karma.  I've been on the front page 42 times this week.  100K karma baby. Elite as fuck.

Honestly, don't talk to me right now. I'm busy writing my latest bot, which will copy every comment ever made and repost it.  I just hope I don't break the Reddit karma counter baby.  Do they have an integer big enough for me? |-| 
|-| cnvbkke || 5 || Nice try spontaneous sentient AI, if you actually want to talk, you know where to find me... |-| 
|-| cnvbr1r || 3 || The following journal entries were recovered from a set of damaged floppy discs belonging to Dr. L., a junior researcher at A. Labs.

**Cerebral Fitness Project, Plan B**

**Day 2**

A year of failures from Plan A had made me skeptical of the entire project.  However, things have started to look up!  Of the four subjects in my care (subjects BE through BH), two of them have survived the initial treatment.  This is leaps and bounds ahead of Plan A, of which only AS survived.  Right now, BE is running in his wheel, and BH is silently sniffing around at the world outside of his cage.  Time will tell whether the genetic alterations will make them more resistant to Alzheimer’s, but for the first time in months, I’m hopeful.

**Day 5**

Both BE and BH have increased in body mass by about 5%.  This is to be expected, since we have increased their food pellet ration.  But they have made some unexpected physical changes as well.  BE has seen his nose become bigger and rounder.  His eyes have changed as well – in addition to being bigger, they’ve taken on a bluish cast, instead of the pink expected from an albino lab mouse.  BH still has normal eyes and nose, but his forehead has started to bulge.  One of the technicians, Robert P. has started calling them “Big Eyes” and “Big Head.”  A bit unprofessional, to be sure, and inappropriate for any official documents, but for this personal journal, I will use Rob’s nicknames.

**Day 9**

For the second day in a row, Big Eyes and Big Head are out of their cage.  Yesterday, I accused Rob of not properly locking them up.  But this time, I personally supervised him.  The cage was locked when we left the lab yesterday evening, and now, it’s wide open.  Unsurprisingly, BE was sleeping in a food pellet canister again.  However, BH was scrambling about on my computer keyboard!  It almost looked he was trying to hide something from me, the way he jumped up and down on the delete key before I grabbed him.

I’ll have to replace their cage, and have someone look at this one’s door.  It’ll be easy enough to find them a cage – all 24 of the other Plan B mice have died.  And I had such great hopes for these mice.  But it looks like they’re not doing much better than the hamsters from Plan A.

**Day 12**

Big Head got loose again, and nearly killed himself.

When I came in this morning, Big Eyes was quietly sleeping in the wide-open cage, while Big Head was sleeping in the corner of the lab, under an electric outlet.  I say “sleeping,” but I should say “stunned.”  He somehow got under the outlet’s cover and chewed on some wires.  The poor thing’s fur was standing on end.  I’m surprised he survived.

He was irritable all day.  He bit Rob while he was changing their water bottle, and several times smacked Big Eyes on the head with an open paw.  Aside from his grouchy mood, he seemed completely unaffected by his brush with death.

**Day 15**

Big Head’s aggressive streak has not faded one bit.  Several times a day, he whacks Big Eyes with his paw.  Today, though, he got a hold of a pencil that Rob left too close to the cage and hit Big Eyes with it twice.  Very hard.  The second time, the sound of it made Rob and I wince.

I suggested to Dr. R. that we do a full scan their brains   I’m worried that BH has caused physical damage to his companion, and that his nasty shock might have a permanent effect.  He agreed.  In the meantime, I’ve put the two of them in separate cages.

**Day 17**

For the second day in a row, BE was found sleeping in BH’s cage.  I have no idea how they keep getting out, or why BE puts up with friend’s temper, but they seem to be inseparable.

I’ve been going over the results of the brain scan all morning, and I still don’t believe them.  Not only is there no physical damage, but there is increased activity in BE’s brain, and extremely increased activity in BH’s brain.  The genetic alteration seems to have made them smarter.

Starting tomorrow, Dr. R. wants me to assist him in the Plan B learning experiments.  I’m so excited!

**Day 24**

After a week of observations, I understand why Big Eyes and Big Head are so inseparable.  They seem to be working together, in a way far beyond the social skills of a typical mouse.

When placed in a maze alone, Big Head reaches the cheese in a sixth of the time of an average lab mouse.  When Big Eyes is placed in a maze alone, he sniffs around a bit and chews on his tail.  But when placed in a maze together, they work together, finishing the maze in a tenth of the expected time.  Their squeaking at each other and bops on the head seem to resemble an actual language, permitting them to coordinate their efforts.  And when they reach the cheese, they equitably divide it up before eating.

So far, this experiment has succeeded far beyond the expected outcome of delaying the brain decay caused by aging.  Our bioinformatics experts are already trying to determine why the genetic modifications affected BE and BH differently from the other subjects.

Dr. R. could very well get a Nobel Prize in medicine for this.  I’m so happy to be a part of it!

**Day 31**

I’ve been going over the results of yesterday’s physical examinations for BE and BH.  I still don’t believe what I’m seeing.  All of their internal organs seem to be operating more efficiently than they were before the genetic treatment.  Their altered brain stems weren’t just regulating their autonomous body functions.  They were improving them.

These mice don’t just have brains that stay in perfect working order.  Their altered brains are keeping their entire bodies in perfect working order.  Barring serious physical injury, Big Eyes and Big Head could potentially live forever.

In spite of this amazing news, I am very worried.  Big Eyes and Big Head are in their cage every morning, but I have a sneaking suspicion that they’re still getting out.  Every morning, a page or two of someone’s notes is missing.  Rob is complaining about someone chewing on his pencils, and none of us in the lab have a pencil-chewing habit.

Dr. R. doesn’t share my apprehension.  He’s working very closely with the bioinformaticists to prepare another round of animal trials.  He thinks my suspicions are “just nerves.”  I hope he’s right.

**Day 40**

I found the missing notes this morning.

Big Eyes was chewing on a piece of paper that was sticking out from under their cage.  When I lifted up the cage, the missing notes were all there.

Big Head seemed positively mortified when I discovered them.  As I was gathering them up, he snatched a couple of pages away, rolled them up, and whacked poor Big Eyes on the head with them.

Even more disturbing was what was on the back of the notes.

It was a wiring diagram for the lab.  It showed the locations of all of the sockets, and the voltage requirements for the devices commonly plugged into them.  There were power flow calculations scribbled all over them.  

I showed it to one of our equipment technicians.  He told me that I’d spotted a flaw in the electrics that could simultaneously blow out all of the fuses in the building, and promised to fix it right away.  I tried explaining to him that the diagram wasn’t mine; I had found it under Big Head’s cage.

“There’s no need to excuse those rat-scratchings you call handwriting,” he said.  “It’s good work.  Don’t worry about it!  I fix it myself.”

As a write this, it is nearly midnight.  I want to stay all night, but I’d better get home soon.  I’m afraid to leave Big Head and Big Eyes unattended, but I’m even more afraid to fall asleep in their presence.  Besides, I think I’m hearing things.  Not a minute ago, I could swear I heard someone say, “Are you pondering what I’m pondering?”  But there’s nobody here but me, Big Head, and Big Eyes.

**Day 58**

This will probably be my last entry.  Plan C testing will begin next week, and I cannot let it happen.  I don’t care if I’m killing man’s best hope at immortality.  We might produce dozens of Big Heads and Big Eyes, and that’s too much of a risk.

Even the two genetic super-mice we already have are dangerous.  Someone’s been operating the gene splicer after hours, chemicals have gone missing, and IT thinks someone’s used our network to hack NASA!  I don’t know how BH and BE did it, but it has to be them.

I’ve warned everyone.  They think that the stress is driving me crazy, and are encouraging me to take some time off.  Only Rob believes me.  He’s heard them speak, too, and is worried that they mean to revolt and take over the lab!

We will strike simultaneously.  We have both arranged to work through our usual lunch time.  At 12:30, when most of our co-workers are gone, we will destroy all papers, electronic records, and biological samples related to Plan B.  I leave myself the unpleasant task of destroying Big Head and Big Eyes.  Sorry, little guys.  I know it’s not your fault, but we can’t let you live.  The future of humanity could depend on it.

**Addendum by Dr. R.**

Robert P. and Dr. L.’s rampage has done irreparable damage to our work.  They have successfully destroyed all samples and documentation related to Plan B of the Cerebral Fitness Project.  By fortuitous happenstance, experimental subjects BE and BH have survived.  Some peculiar wiring fault led to their cage being electrified.  The shock killed Dr. L., but left BE and BH unharmed.  Mr. P. has been taken into custody, and will likely be institutionalized.

Alas, our plans to start anew with a re-trial of Plan B will have to wait.  After learning about the horrific mess that Dr. L. made of our experiment, our sponsors have severely cut our funding.  We now can do little else but continue to run experiments on BE and BH.

I pray for humanity’s sake that this will be enough.  We must carry on, and do the same thing tomorrow that we do today and every day.

Try to save the world.  |-| 
|-| cnvbuvb || 3 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnvbv8o || 4 || "Why are you doing this to me!" I yell at myself. "Who are you!" I yell at me again. My possessed body was making me walk to my so thought friend Harold. He had betrayed and used me, but I never would want to hurt him. My body had a knife. "Whatever you do just don't hurt him!" I know it was useless but I did it anyway. We had finally arrived. My body bust the door down. As my body walked up the stairs I struggled to get in control. it was useless. The door opened. I saw his petrified eyes. My body raised the knife. "I'm sorry..." A tear fell as I stabbed him right in the chest. 
Then I woke up in my bed. I looked at the nightstand, and there was the bloody knife. I felt guilty but I also though it was right.   |-| 
|-| cnvc0mc || 108 || The dragon was a mighty beast. With every roar dust shook from the stones of the ceiling and spiders fell from their webs. Great gouts of fire pierced the darkness, brightest blue and scorching everything it comes in contact with. Pillars of stone glow red with the passing of the fire. 

The beast has not been awoken in many years, and it is far from pleased at the intrusion of a single person. The knight stands back to a pillar as fire rushes by on either side. This particular knight has fought more than one dragon, and is perfectly aware of the fact that there is a limit to what the creature can do in terms of fire. 

And it is reaching that limit quickly. The dragon watches the intruder, larger than any man who has ever broken in here before, dance out from behind the pillar with an arrow nocked and drawn. It growls and brings up a mighty foot to block the enchanted arrow that comes, an arrow that pierces its scales.

The intruder sprints to a still cool pillar as it keens in pain, returning the bow to their back and drawing instead a mighty blade. No shield will do any good against this beast, no... a shield is simply extra weight, a death sentence.

The dragon roars loudest yet, the biggest pillar of fire roaring out as the knight continues sprinting onward, leading the pillar by at least ten feet at first and then only a few feet towards the end of the attack, when the intruder ducks behind another pillar and waits. Enraging the dragon and getting it to leave an opening where it can't breathe fire for about ten minutes was only one step. The poison on the arrow is so small a dose, but it is terrible thing to a dragon. 

The beast seems to be realizing what the arrow was as the intruder pivots out from behind the pillar and lets out a shocking and likely somehow enhanced bellow that rings off the walls. It's vision begins to grow dim, hazy, and it sways even as the intruder sprints up with incredible speed and leaps.

The mighty blade shines with its own light, and in a moment that seems to stretch on forever both are aware that all can go wrong in just a single moment - and it does, for the dragon. The point of the blade comes down, sinking into its massive eye and then deeper. The knight hangs from the blade as it keens and thrashes with poison induced delay. This powerful intruder then gets footing and leaps away from the beast, rolling along the ground as the creature falls in a mess of clanking and slightly pained grunts.

The beast's fall shakes the ground as much as its roars shook the ceiling, and almost instantly the knight is up and on the creature. The sword is drawn from the empty eye socket and then slashed across its throat. From inside that wound the knight pulls a trio of crystals as long as their arm, massive things of lava orange that glow from the inside. 

**"These will be handy..."** the knight mutters. The crystals are tucked beneath an arm and the mighty intruder moves on, heading for the spiral staircase that the dragon had blocked. 

Upwards and upwards the knight goes, climbing to the top of the tall tower. When the door swings open, the princess is waiting, as beautiful as she was when she was locked away, preserved by magic and genetics, with glorious red hair and the palest skin the knight has ever seen - flecked across the bridge of her nose and cheekbones with many freckles. She wears a simple dress, a flowing thing of white that leaves little to the imagination. 

She steps up as the knight takes a knee and sets the crystals aside. Even down on one knee such as this, the mighty knight is well above the height of the princess. 

In the silence, the knight's head is bowed.

**"Milady. I have heard of your plight and come to your rescue."**

"You... you are... you're huge!" the princess says, looking vaguely confused, though not particularly concerned. 

**"I have battled evil for many years, milady. Much magic has been laid upon me, and I have myself taken on many curses in the service of good,"** the knight replies.

The princess can't really identify what seems strange about the knight's voice. It's distorted, and sounds as if some kind of magic is used to create such distortion. The armor is impossibly thick, plates and chain and cloth in drapes that is scorched by the dragonfire below. The metal itself is black and glossy, save where it has been scarred by many blades and arrows. 

"I... I see. To free me from this prison, you must..." she trails off, looking slightly embarrassed.

**"Give you the kiss of first love, milady. I know. I can do such if you wish. I have fought much and gone a great distance to save you. I am quite sure that you could call such sacrifices love, milady."**

The princess gives a hesitant smile. The knight is humble, and seems kind. There was no demand, simply an offer, which according to some books the princess does have available to her is somewhat rare even among the chivalrous. 

"Then lift your visor, Sir Knight, and let me see my love."

The knight's head rises.

**"As you wish, milady."**

The visor flips up, and the princess takes a step back in surprise. 

"You... you're..."

The knight reaches up and removes her helm, showing shortly cut raven black hair and decidedly feminine features. 

Far away, a wizard and a group of other knights stare at the image projected by magic on the wall.

"I say! That's a woman! What the bloody hell?" 

"Percival, watch your tongue. Wizard, how can this be? The Black Knight, a woman?" the head of the knights demands.

"Bloody hell, I don't know," the wizard replies, looking perplexed.

"What do we do?" another knight asks.

"She's kind of... pretty, actually... even with the crooked nose from breaks and all..."

"Percival! I've had it just about up to here with you!" the head knight shouts.

"What!? Her eyes are bloody stunnin'!" Percival shouts back.

"Oi! You two! Look!"

The group falls silent, the round table conference all turning to watch the projection.

"I am a woman, milady," the Black Knight says softly, giving a tired smile with darkly red lips on skin the same shade of deep brown as those from the far south desert possess. Her eyes, indeed a stunning and bright green, stand out shockingly on her face. "I am, I expect, not as you would wish me."

The princess can't seem to figure out what to do. They didn't go over this when she was in locked away. A woman, a lady knight, come to her rescue. She is facing now a few realizations, things that had not occurred to her, things she must think on.

"I bid you give me time, Lady Knight. I must... I need to think. I am... I am sorry, it is not that I am not gratefu-"

She is cut off by the Black Knight holding up a hand, and giving a relaxed smile.

"Calm yourself, Milady. I shall wait on the stairs outside this room, simply knock on the door when you like," the knight tells her. "If it is your wish, I will seek another, a male, to bring forth and free you from this prison. But, do think. It is wise to take time to do so."

With that, the knight retreats, sitting against the wall outside the now closed door with an easy smile on her face, eyes falling shut. It is time, she figures, for a well earned sleep. Even if the princess has no wish for female companionship or a female lover, such is life. At the very least, the Black Knight has ensured it will be quite easy for a male of her choosing to release her from the cold stones of this place.

"Well what the bloody hell do we do now?" Percival demands.

"Wizard?" The head knight asks.

"We wait. Simple. The Black Knight has done this kingdom much good. If she is the choice of the Princess, I see no better person for her. Humble beyond measure, in service of good without hesitation, possessing a mighty heart and enduring the suffering of many years so others might not. Such is the makings of a true knight, female or otherwise," the wizard says. Despite their desire to initially argue, the other knights sit back and consider these words. They did not reach their positions out of brute strength, but intellect, strength and courage combined. They find they cannot argue with what the wizard has said, since to do so would be to speak against the very tenants they uphold.

So they wait.

And hours pass.

A knock comes on the door and the Black Knight's eyes flick open. She rises to a knee before the door has been opened all the way, head bowed.

"Rise, Lady Knight."

And so the Black Knight rises, and enters the room behind the princess. The knight watches the beautiful woman in her white clothes with her beautiful green eyes and gloriously lithe body prepared day by day by the princesses own decision to train her body to be strong for whatever world lies outside.

"Lady Knight... I will kiss you, if you will have me despite my need for delay."

"Milady, I am honored to even be considered. As I said, your need to take time to think showed great wisdom," the Black Knight replies gently.

The princess turns and approaches, quite nearly half the Black Knights height at only five foot one. 

"Then lift me to you, Lady Knight."

"As you wish, milady."

The knight lifts her gently, under her arms, and brings her close with little effort. The wizard and the knights watch as their lips come together gently, softly. The love is apparent near instantly, the spark of it so powerful it is nearly visible. Enchantments break, the princess is freed, and in that moment love itself blooms.

"Blimey, anyone else think that's a touch hot?"

"Percival, FOR FUCK'S SAKE!" |-| 
|-| cnvc904 || 4 || I did a quick calculation. Based on the size of the crater I was in, I must have been out for at least a week. "What have they *done* to me?" I traced a pattern of scars across the back of my head. I had told them not to sedate me. I told them it wasn't safe.

I haven't so much as slept in years. The last time I tried, the last time I forced myself with some sleeping pills, I blew the walls out from my apartment. I had to dissipate the power at all times. If I stopped for too long... well, let's just say it's a bad idea. Of course I hadn't known that at the time, hadn't known that sleeping prevented me from draining all the built up energy harmlessly into the environment. I just hadn't needed to sleep since the incident. I only tried to because I thought it was normal, and I so wanted to just be normal.

As I walked up to the craters edge I thought about how they must have traced me. It must have been all the energy I'd been leaching back into the grid. The electric company had stopped paying me. Instead they charged me storage fees. Bastards. I bet they're the ones who contacted the Feds.

At least they had brought me here to the desert. At least they took some of my rantings seriously. Not seriously enough, though. Up til now I had striven to be normal. To be nice. Not anymore. After this, if it's war they want, it's war they're going to get. In the distance the first helicopter rounded the horizon. I straightened my arm and gave the tiniest flick in it's direction.  |-| 
|-| cnvchar || 10 || "Hello, dexter Morgan. I wanna play a game. You take the lives of others who fit your little code who you think deserve to die. Yet you commit the same heinous acts to your victims and take their blood as slides for a trophy. Are your actions truly righteous, or a way to justify your hypocrisy?

 Your wife and children are awaiting you at the end of your trial. You have 120 minutes to reach them before they are dismembered and added to your blood slide collection. Rita and the others will be watching your every move as you channel your dark passenger. 

Your first trial is simple. You must take the life of this innocent man, breaking Harry's code to retrieve the key to the door and the key to escape the traps of the room. The choice is yours, will you break your precious code to get one step closer to your family, or die along with this man and sacrifice 3 innocent others? The clock is ticking Dexter."
 |-| 
|-| cnvd6on || 5 || "The United Republic of America, henceforth to be known as Oceania , declares war on the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics, also to be known as Eastasia, and makes peace with Nazi Germany, more commonly known as Eurasia." |-| 
|-| cnvdxjq || 6 || As I took my first sip of Polyjuice Potion to turn me into the fat old man that went around each year gifting filthy muggles, I realized the gravity of the situation. For the next ten years, I'd be servicing the exact species that I so vehemently tried to put into extinction. I'd have to drink this potion, this *vile* potion, every day and act a blithering fool, giving gifts to those awful creatures that some wizards adore.

This Polyjuice Potion tastes like soot. |-| 
|-| cnve6oe || 44 || There was a silence that was almost palpable.  Then Harry Potter broke it.

"You're...  you're.."

The old man sighed, "I'm me.  And no, I was never a saint."

Young Harry processed that for a moment and then asked, "What happened?"

"Well, you promise to attend a winter solstice party and bring some gifts for the children of your apprentice.  Then, once you get there, you realize that they also invited a whole village-full of muggle children.  And then comes the avalanche of questions.  'You got in through the chimney?' 'It was actually the floo connection, but why not?'  'Where do you live?' 'Somewhere you can't go.'  'Like the North Pole!?'  'Who made all these toys?'  'My house elves.' 'Did that reindeer just fly?' 'It's dark and that's a hippogriff.'  It went on like that for the rest of the night.  When it was over, I thought that would be the end of it."

"And it wasn't?" Harry asked even though he knew the answer himself.

"What do you think?  Now I can't wear my favorite red and white robes anywhere!" the man said and patted his round belly.

Harry Potter nodded and then remembered why the older bearded gentleman was here in the first place, "Oh, right.  I almost forgot.  Here's what's left of your stone, Mr. Flamel.  I'm terribly sorry it was broken."

"Don't trouble yourself, Harry.  There's still enough for me and my wife until we make a new one.  And please, call me Nick."



- Sorry, my muse went in a slightly different direction. |-| 
|-| cnveakd || 10 || I had been a leader of men, a brave warrior, a man who stood above all others and gloated with pride. When I finally fell in glorious battle, I was greeted at the halls of reincarnation and given a choice. I shirk not from a challenge, when asked how I wished to next life to be easier, I laughed that Heaven should be so ignorant as to ask!

So I was born again, but, this time not to glory and battle. Nay, rather humility is all that meets me in this life. I thought once that being born the son of a king that my ride into battle on my stead proved my mettle, but, oh, how wrong I was.

It has been 20 long years since I made my choice. Now, I surrender to fate. I admit that my previous life was one not of hard fought victories but rather a life of luxury built upon the bodies of the men that I lead into war only so that my family and I could profit.

Last night, I bow downed to heaven and humbled myself. I asked forgiveness for my hubris, I pleaded with the beings of the afterlife to wash away my words spoken in ignorance.

For whatever reason of Heaven's choosing, they listened.

This morning I wake up, and for the first winter morning in 20 years I can feel my toes. My breath does not appear in the air before me. The small apartment that I call home has heating. I rise out of bed and my shoes have no holes. For the first time in years there is food in my kitchen, heat in my house, and the clothes on my back keep me warm. |-| 
|-| cnvejq2 || 23 || Silas already had a headache when he woke up that morning. A kind of dull prodding that started out behind his left eye, radiating and thumping as he brushed his teeth and took his shower. It grew into a stab as he threw on his suit, as if a knife had been jabbed into his skull just above his left eyebrow. The pain radiated to the back of his skull and then down his neck where it spread out along his shoulders like thorny wings; incapable of flight and only seeming to weigh his steps down into the cold cement that was his apartment floor. He popped two painkillers, shouldered his bag, and made his way to work.

His pickup truck wouldn't start at first, but after some careful coaxing (and then some violent cursing when the coaxing failed), the truck roared to life. A small sigh left him, immediately crystallized in the frigid December air. It would take 20 minutes for his truck to heat the cab, and in 15 he would be late. Silas pulled the truck into reverse, backed out of his spot, then shifted again into drive and made the trek to work.

Traffic was abysmal. He poked his head out of the window in an attempt to see what was the holdup. There was a crane up ahead as well as several other city work-trucks. They had to have been the cause of the traffic. He pulled out his phone and dialed his boss, wanting to let him know that he was going to be late for work thanks to traffic. The phone rang, each tone drilling into his head like a power tool. His boss never picked up. 

When he finally pulled up to where the construction equipment was, he saw that they weren't even on the same road. For all he knew, there wasn't any reason why traffic was bad. People were just being crap drivers today. He sighed, and leaned back into his truck, at least thankful his truck would warm up by the time he got to the office. 

His heater died. He shrugged. At this point, things like this didn't really bother him. 

***

After a day of sitting in a cubicle, having awkward conversations with fellow employees, and doing his best to not appear weird around the opposite sex (he had a ridiculous irrational fear of women claiming sexual harassment against him despite the fact he never talked to them), Silas made his way back to the apartment. The weather outside had flip-flopped; it was now 80 degrees outside, probably above 100 inside the cab of his truck, and you guessed it. His AC didn't work. 

He plopped down into his recliner, turned on the television only to see the cable was out. He didn't even bother to turn off the television. He leaned back in his recliner, and tried to go to sleep. The ceiling fan was working well, pushing down cold air on top of him, and he soon found himself shivering. His blanket was on the ground next to the recliner, and he couldn't reach it. Before he could will himself to sit up and grab the blanket, he fell asleep, arms crossed as if he were a mummy.

***

He woke to the sound of people talking. He sat up abruptly in the recliner, finding the blanket that had been on the ground covering him. The voices were coming from the television. A show about a couple fighting was on. He scratched his head, wondering when the cable must've come back on. A look at the clock mounted on the wall told him it was already 11pm, so he stood up, turned off the television, and went to lay in bed, ready to repeat the cycle again the next day.

When he woke up, he found himself fully rested. No headache whatsoever. He got ready for work, and headed outside, where the temperature was once again in the 30s. He sat in the truck, staring at the heater knob, wondering if he should even bother. 

He turned the knob, and the heater came to life, instantly pouring out warm air. "Hey," he said to no one in particular. 

The drive to work was almost traffic-less. He got in 20 minutes early. Enough time to get a cup of coffee. While in the break room, a female worker approached him from behind. 
 
"Oh, you beat me to the joe," she said.

He turned and saw her. She had a mug in hand that had pictures of kittens on it. "Oh yeah, I did," he said nervously, "but there's still plenty, here." He poured her a cup of coffee, careful not to spill any on her hand. "I really like your mug."

"Yeah, do you have any pets?"

"I don't, but I wouldn't mind getting one."

Their conversation continued for another 15 minutes. His coffee had gone cold by the time he finally reached his desk, but he didn't mind.  |-| 
|-| cnvfotc || 29 || Weeks had gone into this. His big score. A drug dealer does not use banks if he can help it. The money was definitely there, in the safe. 

Sam had eluded the guards, disabled the dogs, disabled the alarm, eluded the anaconda (who the hell keeps an anaconda in their basement anyway?) Nothing now stood in his path to a life free of worry or trouble, apart from this piece of paper and two inches of steel.

Something about the note seemed off. It was written in blood for a start, but that was just the kind of macabre bravado a renowned drug kingpin emperor lord would go for. Something else then. He sniffed it again. Hmm... skin, not paper. Over the top perhaps?

Oh well. He looked to his tools and withdrew a silenced power drill, top-of-the-range from masterthieftools.net with a three inch diamond-tipped bit, then put it away again and decided to use the combination he'd found in the desk instead. He'd been looking forwards to using the drill but circumstances were things to adapt to, not ignore.

He fucked up the combination a few times, never having actually opened a safe the correct way before, but eventually managed to get the lock to click. He exhaled slightly, his hands shook as he reached over to the handle. This is exciting, he thought to himself, not really being the one for original thoughts.

He took a deep breath and opened it.

"Oh fuck it's cramped in there!" the figure said. He'd sort of just appeared when Sam opened it up. "What with all that cash in there, no space to swing a snake. And why, may I ask, would you even keep forty million dollars - in five dollar bills I'll add - in a fucking safe? Have you never even heard of a fucking bank before? They're fucking great, trust me."

The figure arched his back with his arms outstretched. Audible bone clicks rippled throughout the room. "And the itch, that insatiable itch! Here mate, could you just scratch there. Yeah there, right there. Oh fuck that's good." Sam didn't really know why he was scratching some strange man's back when a safe lay open before him with forty million dollars ripe for the harvest. He did it nonetheless being the sort of good, Robin Hood type figure that he was. Stealing from the bad and rich... 

"So then. Who the fuck are you?" the figure asked, stifling a napper's yawn.

"Sam." 

"That's a pretty shit name."

"What's yours?"

"Lucifer of course."

"I see."

They stood there in awkward silence for a moment before Lucifer broke the quiet, "Well then, I'm off. Best of luck with your endeavours, I have a few favours to repay before I get back to business as usual."

"Wait a second. Why were you in the safe?"

"Long story. Hey, since you let me out and saved me from that goddamn interminable itch I'll grant you a wish."

"Uhm... I sort of just want the cash to be honest."

"No, no. Please. I insist. I'm the Lord of the Underworld, Ruler of Hell, Son of the Big Bitch. I can grant you anything. Anything in the world. I can grant you a harem of cross-dressing anthropomorphized narwhals if you so wish. I can make you President of the World in a day. I can-"

"Well uhm... can you double the amount of cash in there?" Sam said, intimating the safe.

"Don't you have any imagination? I could grant you..."

"Look... Lucifer. I- I just want a nice quiet life with beach girls massaging all my crevices and bringing me Pina Coladas until I'm too grey to drink them. I can get that with the cash. I'm sorry."

They stood there silent again, then a man walked in with a gun.

"I thought I heard some noise coming from here."

"Hi." Sam said.

"Shut up you dog. Do you know what you've done?" the man asked leveling his weapon at Lucifer who was sidling towards the door.

"Not happy to see me ol' Jimmy boy?" Lucifer retorted.

"The name is Gabe thank you very much." He turned to address Sam. "Who the fuck sneaks into the most feared Drug Lord's house, ignores a sign written in blood ON SKIN, and releases the greatest evil to face this Earth? You have to be a fucking moron. I spent DECADES creating the perfect ruse to protect that damned box and you just wander in here willy-nilly, not scared of the fucking anaconda or fuck-off-massive Cerberus... Jesus! 'scuse my profanity."

"If I may interject, this man is no moron." Sam nodded graciously. "This man simply has no imagination. It's incredible."

Gabe stared intently at Sam. Then he began, in hushed tones. "In which case you are the prophesised one..." |-| 
|-| cnvfq5t || 12 || The plan's simple. First, you make a throwaway account, give er take a few months old. You take the top rising posts of the day on the rising subreddits for tomorrow, then you copy and paste a few reposted quirps. Really easy. No one notices at first, they don't care. Upvoted to the fucking top everytime and no one bats an eye. 

Then comes the good part. You bring in your Karma and trade it in for as much Reddit Gold as your hands can carry, you gift your main account with years worth of Reddit Gold, and when people start to smell a repost you've already slipped away in the dead of night, a little bit wiser and a little bit richer.

The times have been good for a couple of years here and there, makin back, paying into every NSFW subreddit your tiny little dick can get off to. But things aren't always so good. God damn bots. See, the mods can bitch all they want but they can't catch my main account. Too slippery, too influential. But bots? They don't care for karma, they don't care for all the gold on /r/funny. So they've been finding a pattern. TOR's been good to me so far, but I don't know how long it'll hold up. Sooner or later they'll find me, and sooner or later a couple of thug mods are going to break into my place and gun me down. 

And that fucking sucks.

Your run of the mill scrublord by now would have taken the money and ran with it til he hit Tumblr. Your run of the mill scrublord would have gotten banned few miles before he even saw the border. They aren't stupid. The second they see something's off they'll close the whole god damn country down before letting a guy like me out with that much on him. Hundreds of fuckin bots everywhere sniffin the ground you poop on looking for a guy they don't even know. 

'course, I'm not your average scrublord. So I start to slowly slip my funds out the country. A donation to a fake ID here, a "favor" for an old accomplice there, your usual. But I'm running out of time. Few days ago my account was put on ice, god knows for how long. I still had a few fucking months worth of Gold left in there, but that's another story.

Now, around this part in my story about how awesome I am as a person you're probably wondering why I haven't explained why I'm crashing in your couch. But I can explain. See, the hounds are already loose. I'm already dead. With any luck I can get respawned by my employees outside of this fucking hellhole, but I've still got some time on my hands. 


Did you really think you could get away from me? Did you really ever stop to think that Ol' Tee-Pee-Gee was going to "forget" about your debts because he was closin up shop? No siree, I'm an honest man, though it might not look like it.

Don't bother running. I can feel the howl of the bots on the wind. They'll be here soon to bring down the roof. One way or another, you're going down with me. Debts are a very tricky thing, you see. 

Can you hear them? Can you hear 'em, a thousand ravenous bots let loose on the wind to rip us apart bit by bit until you can't tell your body.head from your body.ass? They're coming, they're coming to collect our debts! They're coming to collect **your** debts to me, friend.

And isn't that just the best thing you've heard all day? |-| 
|-| cnvgfir || 13 || So there I was, in front of the safe. Having defeated Lord Vangian's extremely sophisticated security, deadly mercenaries and expensive traps. Funnily enough, what was giving me the most trouble was the unassuming but prominent note taped to the front of the safe with a message in four languages: "I wouldn't open it if I were you". 

I'd heard the rumors, of course. That Vangian was a demon worshiper. That he sacrificed virgins to stay young. That he dealt with eldritch horrors from beyond the seventh plane. It was why the note was giving me such pause. It was a very large, well built safe - certainly capable of holding all kinds of nasties from the dungeon dimensions. The problem was, I was contemplating the consequences of opening that damn safe so many times I didn't notice Vangian coming up behind me, or hear the cudgel he used to knock me out.

That's why, officer, I am hanging by this lamppost upside down naked early in the morning. The bastard even told me what was in the safe before he left me here. Nothing, he said, but another note telling whoever read it to turn around. He said only one thief had gotten that far before. Then he ran away giggling. 

Can you take me down now? I'm getting cold. |-| 
|-| cnvgpmy || 3 || *The Deposition of Chaucer D. Lightengale.  April 13th, 2021*  

"So what you're saying is that ... you've deliberately programmed death into the average layman?!!" the attorney shot with an acerbic tone.  "Please state exactly what you mean by your previous statement to the microphone for the record"  

It was another day and another dollar for The Doctor.  His eyes droopy from sleep.  Unshaven beard mottled with dirt.  It matched his lab coat quite well.   Across from him were a team of court reporters.  20 somethings, with keyboard clicking away and eyes fixated unto the Doctor for any body language.  

"Ten out of ten, would hit on the one on the left" thought the Doctor.  Even 20 years of intensive biological research for Glaxo-Smith Klein hasn't depredated him of his immense perversion.   

"Doctor...." the attourney's voice trailed.  Without skipping a beat the doctor turned his eyes towards the microphone before him.  His head still angled toward the girl on the left.  

"Okay, look"  he sat up finally. "Glaxo-Smith Klein has had the technology to eliminate the need for telomerases and reduce the error rate of DNA repair mechanisms to almost zero.  I said it, may I go now?"   His eyes flickered back to the girl on the left.  

"Please explain the implications of this technology" replied the attorney, making his way in between the Doctor and the girl.  He's always had a penchant for observation.    

The Doctor, clearly annoyed, leaned back and released an audible sigh.   His favorite distraction removed from him.   

"Look, I agreed to this because I think you simply wanted me to go on record for that previous statement" He leaned back in his chair.  The girl was once more in sight.  "I didn't think you'd want a full blown explanation of what exactly my research has done for humanity" he said through a smile.   The girl noticed him looking, she didn't mind.  

"Done for humanity?"  The attorney returned to his seat, there wasn't any point in stopping the Doctor from getting his fill.  "Doctor may I remind you, that your work didn't result in healthcare peccadillos...you have committed an odious crime in one of the highest offense".  

The Doctor's eye returned to his opponent.  "Son of a bitch" he whispered.  The attorney clearly had experience in the background of science, he knew exactly what the doctor had done.  

"Tell me what I need to know Doctor, and I promise you this will be end of us meeting again. Ever." 

The Attorney lied.  

The Doctor knew, but didn't care to bring it up.  He's been anticipating this day for years.  "Fine!" He yelled.  "Fine, fine, fine.  Okay so imagine if you will you're this big boss CEO of my illustrious employer and you wanted to lets say......"  he trailed off, eyes rolling back slightly to aid his memory.  "to try to stop aging.  But instead of finding the secret to aging you find the secret of theoretically living for an eternity given a continuous supply of sustenance".    

There was a shudder from the corner.  The court reporters now clearly realize the gravity of the topic at hand.  

The Doctor continued, "that was all me.  That's my research and I admit it.  But what came next was completely due to the front office! They weren't patient with the standard procedure of clinical trials, they wanted to skip straight through the animal testing and hop, skip, and jump right into case-control and cohort studies".  The Doctor reached his left hand into his lab coat and began thumbing a cigarette.  He'll need it in a couple of minutes.   "But of course that will never get approved right?  The head editors of any reasonable ethics boards would never let that fly, so might as well just do it anyone in secret.  They just didn't expect that even trace amounts of the solution made for this experiment was enough to trigger a pathologic response.   When they started bugging flu vaccines they thought 'oh well its safe at these ridiculously low dosages right?'  Well it wasn't and that's that!"   The Doctor's patience slipped.  The cigarette already protruded from his lips.  "May I go now?"  

The Attorney stood dumbfounded.  He realized exactly what the Doctor meant and the cases he was referring to.  Cell regeneration, growth, sneaking in flu vaccines produced by one of the biggest pharmaceutical companies in the world.  Of course, no wonder nobody saw it till years later.  The Doctor had enough and took his leave, sending a quick wink to the girl on the left.     The court reporters were confused.  

"Wait, off record what exactly did he just confess?  It's not my place but I'm simply curious if this pertains to me" piped a court reporter towards the right.  

The Attourney stepped up to the recorder and switched it off.  He had what he wanted and let out a deep sigh.  Rubbing his temples at the magnitude of the confession he just heard.  Looking straight into eyes of the reporter he held a sad, disturbed expression.  

"You guys just met a living legend, and by tomorrow, one of the most foul villains the media will ever birth".  

"What do you mean?" asked the Court Reporter  

The Attorney calmly packed his things into his large leather briefcase.   "Don't you get it?  Their idea of immortality is simply regrowing cells over and over again so that you'd never have to have wasting tissue, muscles, bones, or brain matter".  The briefcase clicked and he straightened his tie.   

"So......" the girl of the left's voice trailed off.  Naivety flushed her statement.  

"So you just met the man with the blood of millions on his hands"  The Attourney opened the heavy door of the conference room and looked back.  "You just met the man who created and distributed cancer", and with that the Attorney left, behind a silent room and a girl deeply regretting the spark she thought was genuine minutes ago.   

" |-| 
|-| cnvhccz || 3 || "Oh shit, oh shit, oh shit! What fucking day is it?!" I scrambled around the room, searching for my calender. I needed to find it, needed to verify the date. 

There it was, under the newspaper. "Thank God, you can't be losing it so easily!" I told myself. I had started talking to myself about two weeks ago, about the same time I started obsessing over the date and time. I needed to keep track of the point of time, someday, all the power will shut off, how will we know which day it is then?

It had been exactly three months ago today since I have seen another person. I started walking about a month after "the vanishing," the cliche name I dubbed whatever it was that took everybody. Everybody but me, that is. I hadn't given much time to rest, as I started this journey with no destination in mind, I had nowhere to be, originally. But now I know, it was a headline a few weeks prior to the vanishing, the 10,000 year clock in New Mexico, I had to find it!

"Why do you care, what is the point of that fucking clock!" I was yelling again, mad at myself. 

"Because we can't lose the time, when we lose that, we lose everything!" I had to reassure myself of my purpose, everybody was coming back, they had to, people don't just disappear, after all. 

Why was I so obsessed with the time, anyway? Did I really care about saving the date for the people, whenever they returned? Was I holding on to some regimentation of my life when it still existed? Was I just thirsting for self-verification, trying to make sure I was still there through some arbitrary means?

"Just remember, we're doing this because we said we would, forget about reason, we are the reason." 

"I know that, but doesn't it seem somewhat excessive? that clock is hundreds of miles away, and we didn't come prepared!"

"That doesn't matter, there's food in all of these houses. Plus, we're in California, and if we take a look at the calendar, we're in the middle of Summer, we'll be fine."

"But we can't eat this food forever, and the calendar may say it's the middle of Summer, but we've had the same cloudy weather every day since we left Washington!"

"Well don't dwell on that now, lets just focus on the clock, take our mind off of the stupid weather. We have enough food for a few years between this neighborhood too." 

I eased my mind and started to walk outside, and fill my pull-cart with rations, collected from the house I just exited. I counted the cans as I placed them in the cart. 78 cans of beans, 44 cans of vegetables, 120 cans of spaghetti, 56 cans of broth, 32 cans of tuna, and 17 cans of chicken. Why did these people have so much canned food in such a small house? I shrugged off the question, made sure to grab the can opener, and spoon, and headed for the next domicile.

Then I heard it, that faint sound of a car, driving on the road behind the row of houses in front of me. "By the Thundering Jesus!" I exclaimed as I took off running and yelling, hoping to grab the attention of the driver.

I hear it rounding the corner I had just come from, then there it  was, the sun glinting off it's windshield. 

"Oh thank Christ in Heaven, HELLO!!!" I started waiving my arms like a lunatic, yelling at the car as loud as I could, a big, stupid smile on my face. I couldn't believe it, another person!

The care slowed to a stop, just a few feet in front of me. No horn, no open doors, and the blinding sun, glinting off the windshield. Why the silence" I stepped around the side of the car. Nobody inside. Maybe they crawled into the back? not back there. "The trunk, please be in the trunk!"

Empty.

That's when I looked up, and say that small domed tower on the roof of the car. The solar panels lent me no reassurance. Neither did the dust coated words on the side "Google - Self Driving."

"FUCK YOU, FUCK YOU, YOU FUCKING PIECE OF SHIT, FUCK YOU!!" I started yelling, as I kicked the car as hard as I could. "FUCK YOU, WHY?!"

I broke down, sobbing, as the car drove on, knowing, not only is that car going to stop, never to start again, but that I truly was, entirely alone. |-| 
|-| cnvhzap || 7 || 6:37pm

Was it really that easy? It looks like things really have changed. I'm back at home, our home. It looks like I've just made dinner. Dave is home, the three kids are here. Everyone looks so happy. My life is back!

7:03pm

Something is wrong. I can't put my finger on it yet, but something.

10:13pm

I put the kids in bed and have been looking through the photos on my computer to see how this life has been different. I found out what is wrong. There is no James, he's just gone never happened. My oldest son dosen't exist.

12:34am

The more I think about it the more it makes sense. He was my hard mode. Having him is what made me switch modes 20 years ago. I should switch back, but it's so nice here.  |-| 
|-| cnvhzmh || 8 || "Sir, can you spare a like?"  Grumbled a misshapen looking man with a blanket covering his face.  
"Fuck off"
"A poke? Anything helps you see, my dog and I used to be in a meme!"
I do my best to ignore the voice, now shouting nonsensical insults at my hurried backside. I hate coming this way after work, the Timeline slums have slowly deteriated in quality over the past few years.  Had I been paying attention and not missed my tram connection I could have bypassed them all together. 
"Need any Trivia Crack?" Inquired an odd southern accent,  whose face followed, emerging from the shadows. All I could make out were the whites of his eyes, that and a gold plated grill catching the spill of a nearby street lamp. 
This too I managed to ignore,  as I have found it best to do in an effort to avoid confrontation.
The majority of my friends are currently hooked on the stuff,  always offering me lives in the hope that I would reciprocate in their time of need.  
Caught up in thought,  I hit a wall, where the hell am I? I know for a fact I was just passing the Facebook group homes 10 minutes ago.
Upon my turning around,  I discover that the Trivia Crack dealer had been following me,  he quickly dipped back into an alley, hoping I had failed to notice. 
My hands began to quiver, and I reach into my pockets in an attempt to steady them.  
Upon doing so, I realize that I had accidentally pocketed a pair of pruning shears from work. 
Instantly I'm hit with an unfamiliar sense of adrenaline coupled with desperation. Working in Farmerville sucked, no question about it.  And I've heard trivia dealers make bank, doubling back,  I press myself up against a shop door, out of sight from the sidewalk. 
Sure enough not even a minute later that lowlife ambled by,  chasing a notification he believed to be me. My heart was now pounding, I peeled myself away from the storefront and snuck up behind him. 
Fully aware of my combat abilities or lack thereof, the element of surprise here is crucial. With a swift movement I bend forward, slicing his Achilles heel clean in two. A blood curdling yelp escaped his mouth,  not entirely sure what just occured. 
"Give it to me you fucking clickbaiter. All of it." I yell,  startled by the intensity of my own voice.
Still in agony, the degenerate made it known that he didn't think I have it in me. 
Grabbing his other leg,  I press the shears against is remaining healthy tendon in an effort to show just how far I was willing to go. 
"Okay, alright man, Jesus" he squealed,  emptying his pockets. Out came several in app purchases,  12 trivia lives and a handful of bitcoin.  Shit,  that's worth more than I make in a month sharecropping.  Stuffing my newfound fortune info my workbag,  I make a half hearted attempt to take his tooth decor as well.  However after a lot of tugging and biting, I realize I really didn't have that one in me.
Gathering my composure,  I slink off in a hurry to get back home,  unable to shake the feeling that I have become as sleezy as the rest of them. Actually,  who gives a shit.   I earned this.  |-| 
|-| cnvidux || 3 || They all referred to us as hooligans, snubish high nosed bastards, how I looted them. We from the community of 9gag had always been looked down upon nothing we did was ever god enough. They laughed and spat in our faces. To them we were nothing less than the scums of the earth. I distinctively remember one redditor saying I was the filth upon which he walked u/badkneeadventurer I would never forget his smog face.
      Our plan was to do multiple small hit, target the subreddits that had the least visitors. As a group we would hit multiple subs and once and escape before anyone knew what was up. Deadpool24 suggested we stay clear of all the gone wild subs, and r/conspiracy. Gonewild subs always had the mods monitoring (for obvious reasons) and r/conspiracy always suspected someone was after them. Sendmenudes suggested we hit the niche subs, because they had irregular visitor flow.
        The plan was made, we were going to attack on a Monday when all of reddit was complaining about the start of their week. Base on scouts who had assumed positions as moles, we knew all of redd it's attention was focused at the popular subs at that point. So every Monday at about 9a.m we would hit the subs that had the least visitors, steal 1 or 2 karma points from every user then dissappear. Usually those individual subs had very little contact with each other, so a few missing karma would be seen as just a minor problem with the sub. And even if a user complained, it would never make it to the front page, so we were sure to escape without any trouble. 
        The trick was to never hit one sub twice no matter how easy it was. If we did it like that, it was sure to leave little o no trail, and it would take reddit a while before they find out something major was going on. So for months we would hit the subs on Mondays and then go back. 
        After about 3 months we had hit all the minor subs, and we started going to the gonewild subs, only the minor ones, the thing was that we could hit these subs only during the day, and we could hit them with more frequency. After another 3 months we had hit all the gone wild subs, even the major ones, and still no one caught wind of what was going on.
      Some of the guys started getting bold, a few of them did a hit without telling the group. The thing that pissed me off was that they went against one of the major rules they hit some of the subs we targeted in our earlier missions. When I tried talking some sense into them they shut me down. "Op those reddit fags are stupid, they would neve notice." I just hope they are right. But I know something is going to go down, someone is going to slip and we would be in a lot of shit. So I left, got as far as possible and assumed a new life somewhere I knew no one would ever find me. I had enough karma to live a good life, and these morons were bring us heat.
      Then the unthinkable happened, they got brave enough and started making hits on major subs, there was more karma to be made that way, and in a shorter amount of time. And now it was a common occurrence on 9gag, every kid who wanted to make a quick fortune stole from reddit. Soon enough those at reddit became aware of this a tighten the system, the karma police was created, and those from 9gag were brandished outlaws.
      As for me, I now have a good life here on reddit, my goal from the start was always to get out of the hell hole. I still have a boon to pick with those who speak Ill of my homeland, and I am still vehemently searching for u/badkneeadventurer,  if anyone finds him notify me, he will not see tomorrow.  |-| 
|-| cnvjga5 || 8 || Gary walked down the hall into an office. The building was supposed to be empty, that is except for Steven Hawking's time travelers party. As he turned the nob he could hear Steven's computer voice, talking to someone else?

'Am I late?' Gary thought. 

"Do we have another guest?" Hawking said loudly. 

"Uh yeah, hi my name is..." Gary opened the door the rest of the way and saw none other then Jaycee sitting next to Steven. 

"Gary?!" Exclaimed Jaycee. "How the hell did you get here?"

"You two know each other?" Asked Hawking.

"Yeah we were married 3 years ago, I mean we were married 40 years from now but, ugh this whole relativity issue. Anyway we used to be married but I moved to Russia with a job offer and this weakling didn't want to move to such a cold place." Explained Jaycee. "I then made a time machine which Gary must have stolen the ideas for."

"What no! Why would I steal blueprints from you? I made my own device from scratch, since you took all the money in the divorce."

"Actually neither of you came up with the idea, not entirely that is." A fourth person had entered the room. "I subliminally planted information on both of you so that you would both create time machines. My hope was that you would go public and spark WW3 with the argument you are having right now but I guessed wrong, oh well." The mysterious man pulled out a gun and killed both Jaycee and Gary. 

"Who are you?" Asked Hawking as the stranger pressed buttons on his watch. 

"I am your son, who else could think of a time machine?" He smirked, and in an instant was gone.

EDIT: Spelling.
 |-| 
|-| cnvjidf || 4 || People flooded from the carriages like the ants they are. Finally she stepped out. Knope. The hour had run far later than I had promised Claire, who I knew was buzzing in my pocket. She had to wait. Being the most powerful man in the free world doesn't mean you can't take matters in your own hands. Knope had bitten off more than she could chew, how fortunate I know just the way to make her choke on it.

"Mister president, thank you for meeting me." Her face desperately trying to keep up the facade of calmness. Knope was dressed in the same irritably bright beige coat she wore at the opening of NASA's new space adventure. Tapping her as vice was a deadly simple move: the people liked her, a woman. There was no reason not to choose her. Just another step on my ladder to immortality.

The station was deserted, the very same one that took miss Barnes favor. Knope asking for the meet at this location, therefor, could not be dismissed as a coincidence. Ever since I lost Stamper I felt vulnerable. Seth was determined, resourceful and ruthless. But he wasn't Stamper. Dealing with the Posner bitch had been some redemption, an eye for an eye they say. Knope was made of a different material, the kind that took more than a pair of scissors to cut through. Bringing me here was her last mistake.

"Can't we speak under more amicable circumstances Leslie? It's dark and I can feel a chill."

Her announcement for presidency was unexpected. The chances of the vice dethroning the commander in chief were slim. The party still had unquestionable confidence in my ability as president; to be deprived from my second term by such an insignificant, moronic, excuse for a politician would mean certain destruction to everything I've worked for. 

"I chose this station for a reason mister Underwood." She took a step forward before taking a deep breath, then continuing. "I've met people like you before, who take everything they want without thinking of the consequences to others. People in politics who lie through their teeth, betray friends and forsake the good of the people for their own benefit - but I would've never imagined such a man to hold office." She waved her finger at me, face shading crimson and eyes burning passionately. For a second I felt an inch of pity, to see such pure naiveté and belief. The moment passed more quickly than it came. I reached into my pocket for the phone as she quickly glanced at the CCTV camera. The very same camera that failed to catch me the first time.

I held the phone to my ear after pressing three buttons, never losing eye contact. "Bring the car around Meechum. Miss Knope is not feeling well." My loyal wolf, a valuable asset, but even the most loyal can stray from the pack. They grow too comfortable and lose the fear that guaranteed its safety. Knope snapped me out of my thoughts. 

"Underwood, look at me. I'm fine. I'm dead serious. You've scandalized and radicalized this office for too long." 

Ah, she showed her hand. Here I was, fretting the thought that she actually found out about Barnes.

"I agree Leslie." It surprised her. A reaction that reminded me a little of the same plan I had 4 years ago - a confession. I spoke vigorously. Taking a step closer with every name I mentioned. I grabbed her shoulders as I stared into those simple eyes, accenting every calculated moment, every incident - doing what I do best - convincing her of my regret. Whimpering in self pity as I described Barnes 'suicide', what supposed consequences it had on my actions and my blind desperation to achieve it all. My sheer regret of it all and my reluctance to keep going.

"I'm done Leslie, you've found everything I've tried to hide and it will destroy me. Every move was calculated without consideration of others and for that I must pay."

"Mister President, I-" 

"Mister President?" Meechum called from the top of the stairs. I've taught him well, he would've definitely been recognized on camera.

"Meechum will take you safely to Ben and in a few hours you will see my retraction from the race in the newspapers."

"I can't stay with you." Her voice betrayed her uncertainty of the situation. She knew too much to be safe. The last piece of the puzzle was to falsify that safety. A sabotaged vehicle that would rid the two people that threatened me the most. Wiped from the face of the earth with a simple button.

"I won't be joining you, if that makes you feel better. I trust Meechum with my life and you know him, he's even babysat your children that one time. Remember?"

"Yes," Ben stepped out from the shadows, Holding a recorder. "I do."  |-| 
|-| cnvjvw3 || 14 ||  Rowdy watched Mistress leave through the window, a whine escaping his throat.

 "Already with the whining, Rowdy?" Mr. Hate said from his perch atop the bookshelf.

 "Shut up!" Rowdy barked. "Some day she's going to leave and never come back and we'll be here all alone. Then how will you feed your fat self?"

 "I'm planning on dining on your corpse," Mr. Hate said. licking his paw and combing over one chewed-up ear. "I won't even need to, I have a way out of this cage. I just really look forward to you squealing for that wretched monkey you love so much."

 "Mistress cares for us, keeps us safe and warm and fed, and you just rub up against her and take her food and plan to abandon her whenever it's convenient for you," Rowdy growled.

 "Oh, Rowdy, speak slower," Mr. Hate purred. "Your fear and resentment...is just...*delicious*."

 "Some day, Hate, some day you'll find your fat ass down here on the ground too long, and then we'll see."

 "You don't want to do that, mongrel, you kill me and what will the monkey think? Remember which one of us gets to curl up on the bed at night."

 "Come down here, cat!" Rowdy snarled, hitting the bookshelf and making it tremble. Mr. Hate barely lifted himself on his feet and rode the shaking calmly. He bunched his bulk up, aiming for a good pounce on the dog's back when a familiar hum filled the air.

 "Dammit, not again," Rowdy whined, backing away from the hall and the thing coming down it.

 "It's your fault," Hate hissed. "You woke it up!"

 Rowdy spared him a low growl, then crouched down and put the couch between him and the hallway. He turned his ears and tracked the low hiss of the thing, trying to keep the noise away. His brain turned over the escape routes. The black thing was between Rowdy and the kitchen, and the hallway was a dead end. The couch might keep him out of reach of the thing, but Mistress was very specific about staying off the couch. The kitchen though...the kitchen had the smooth floor.

 The sound changed and Rowdy cocked his head, trying to track it.

 "Oh, this is going to be good," the low purr said from the bookshelf.

 The black thing popped out from under the couch, and Rowdy's yelp shook windows as the dog sprinted from the living room, skidding on the carpet and turning into the kitchen. He struggled to keep the slippery floor under him and maintain speed, his claws digging to find purchase in the odd floor. Down the hall, slipping, and into the open door of the laundry room, where Mistress took her removable fur before taking the scent out of it. Rowdy dove into a pile of the fur, grabbing a pair of sweat pants and curling it over his head to hide, Mistress' scent calming him.

 Mr. Hate snickered at the dog's escape, trying not to alert the black thing. He peered his cold green eyes over the edge of his favorite perch, studying it. It seemed to be investigating the bookshelf, no doubt searching for a way to climb up to him. Mr. Hate wondered at how it would climb, should the wretched thing find a way. Perhaps it would slide up the wall like a snail.

 *I'm not going to wait and let it work that out,* Hate thought, gathering up his fuzzy bulk and tensing his muscles. When it passed in the right spot, Hate pounced like a leopard from a tree. He landed, scratched at the hard armor on the thing's back and tried to bite, but the thing's scales had no purchase for Mr. Hate's needle teeth.

 He lept back, lead paw out to strike, and the thing came for him. He brushed his tail out in front of it as a distraction, looking for its eyes so Mr. Hate's claws could remove them. His tail disappeared under the creature.

 Rowdy looked up from his hiding place at the yowl of the cat, turning his ears forward. The blur of Mr. Hate skidded to a stop in front of the room, and in a flash was on top of the white machine and in a basket of laundry.

 The two animals waited in their hiding places, listening with their sharp ears to the sound of the creature as it searched for them. Mr. Hate poked his head up and regarded the dog.

 "Rowdy," Mr. Hate said. "It's time we put an end to this."

 "Mistress will come," Rowdy said. "It always leaves when mistress comes home."

 "And it always returns when the monk-when mistress leaves again," Mr. Hate said. "It is time we stopped cowering like spoiled pets, Rowdy. I remember you, dog, I remember the old days in the alleys."

 "I don't like to think about that," Rowdy growled, digging himself deeper under the pile.

 "Well you should," Mr. Hate said solemnly. "I remember you, the big strong dog, leading the other strays. You found food, chased off the interlopers. Those were *your* streets. Rats, squirrels, other dogs all ran from you. Not because you were the biggest, but because you were the baddest. Your pack followed you and howled your name."

 "I remember a scrawny alley cat who didn't respect my pack," Rowdy said. "Always stealing from us and pouncing on the little dogs."

 "Yes, I was. I always had a plan, and I still do, Rowdy. You and me, we're survivors. We can beat this monster."

 Rowdy's head emerged from the laundry. "But...Mistress..."

 "Rowdy," Mr. Hate said solemnly. "What if the thing is waiting for Mistress to come home some day?"

 And a growl was his answer.
_______________________________________________________________

Rowdy, his heart pounding with fear and adrenaline, surged out of the laundry room, barking his war cry and slipping under his own feet, righting himself, slipping again and regaining his feet as he hit the carpet. The monster was moving back down the hall and Rowdy's heart skipped. *It was running!*

 He bounded forward and put his nose to the thing and flipped. The monster landed belly up and Mr. Hate pounced, raking his claws at the millions of spinning legs that moved the creature, spitting his wrath as his claws shredded the legs.

 Rowdy stepped on the thing and closed his jaws on the edge, pulling with all of his great strength. Jaws that cracked bones clenched down and the two animals heard a satisfying **crack**.

 As the thing split open, Mr. Hate shredded all the pieces, moving in a blur, and Rowdy shook the thing violently.

 The door opened and the two animals froze, eyes locking with Mistress. Bags of food dropped to the floor.

 "It was the dog!" Mr. Hate yowled as he bounded back to the laundry room. |-| 
|-| cnvko2l || 3 || "My name is Robert Daulson. I am writing this on May 10th, in the year 2128. This is my account of the events that happened on November 5th, 2105. 

It all began a few weeks before the fifth. My team and I had started gathering intel on our next hit. We had done a few pretty sizable jobs in the past, but this was going to be our biggest score yet. The guy was old-fashioned, kept all his monetary assets in cash in his private vault. A veteran from the British Imperial Army, it was rumored that he kept quite the historical collection as well. 

Our biggest problem was going to be doing this job undetected. Scoping out the estate, we had tracked the armed guards' schedules, the motion sensor blind spots, and even the thermal scanners detection settings. It turned out that all personnel were required to wear special heated suits for this very purpose. Easily worked around.

We were professionals. We did our reconnaissance, and we all knew what each of us needed to do. Barry would distract the gatekeeper while we went through the maintenance entrance on the southeast side. Then, our guys on top would put sleeper rounds in the two guards that would be patrolling right about that time. Quick and painless. From there, we would go straight for the control room and deactivate the security systems. That would give us 15 minutes to do our thing and get the heck out of dodge. 

The day came. We all took our places and set our plan in motion. Then, Barry radioed in that the gatekeeper wasn't there and that the gate was open to boot. I told him to drive on in under the pretext of being a landscaping business owner. Next up, our eyes from above told me that the guards weren't on patrol. Immediately, I put the whole team on alert until we got vision on them. We rounded the corner cautiously. Nobody. We're all getting a littler nervous at this point. None of us knew why this was happening and whether to be happy or scared.

I decided to continue with the mission. We were already this far, might as well see what we can do. We enter the house and find the control room. Not only is the control room also deserted, but the security system is already turned off. At that point, we were all just wondering what the hell was going on. I pulled out my sidearm, just in case there was another team or we were being set up. We continue down to the lower level of the mansion, where the money and valuables were rumored to be. 

We found ourselves in a sort of lair, straight out of the ancient times. Stone walls, columns, marble statues and preserved animals, now only a thing in textbooks, greeted us. At the other end of the chamber we were in, there was a gigantic vault door. Our safe man, Theo, made a beeline for this monstrosity. He had it open in under five minutes. We opened it to find another chamber, but this one was filled with jewels and gold and trinkets. Drunk on the riches we were about to claim, we rushed to the next vault door to see what else we would get. This one was a little bit harder, but once we got through it was worth the wait. Walls and walls of cash and gold bricks greeted us as we entered, awestruck. 

I radioed to the extraction team that we were going to need a bigger truck and to not worry about secrecy. This was our day. 

One thing that struck my eye was a dinky little safe, tucked away in the back of the chamber. I wondered what in the world this eccentric would have bothered to put in its own safe when it was already protected by two giant vault doors. I walked over to it and noticed that there was a note taped to it. It read, "I wouldn't open it if I were you."

My heart sank into my stomach. I immediately began to think that we were set up, that this guy knew the whole time. I checked with the extraction team to see if there was anything suspicious going on up there. They responded negative. I figured, in for a penny, in for a pound. I had some basic safe cracking experience, and it was a pretty simple safe. As if a note was going to stop a thief. 

I opened the safe.

I noticed that a metal pin had been pulled out as I opened the safe. Nothing happened, so I didn't think anything about it. I pulled out the briefcase to see what was so damn important.

They were documents about me. Documents with my picture, my health information, my history. And yet, something was off - some of the documents were wrong. I was in the south of France in summer of 2090, not the jungles of Bangladesh. Many of the papers were in foreign languages that I couldn't read, but I got the gist from the pictures and headlines. I didn't know what the papers in front of me meant, but I started feeling cold dread and confusion. I called Barry to check the news, to see if anything had happened recently.

He didn't understand my request since everyone was so excited about our haul. I sprinted up the cold, stone stairs to get cell reception and check Google News. First thing that popped up was a breaking headline that read "International Bank Syndicates and Multiple Government Buildings Internationally Bombed. Death Toll and Motive Unclear."

I wasn't sure if that had anything to do with what I had just done, but nonetheless I was freaked out. I get my boys and the goods out and we head back. I told them that I had to go check up on some things and went home. A few hours later, I awoke to the sound of someone breaking down my door. Your team found the documents on me and brought me here. That's all I know, Agent."

"That's all you know? You sure? What about this list of politicians, businessmen, and executives that **your** handwriting labeled as being *corrupt, unfit to live*? What about the fact that each of them just got blown up along with the entire building they were in? What do you know about that?" Agent Cooper slammed his fists on the table out of anger and frustration.

"Trust me, Agent, this is all news to me. I'm just a thief, I'm not in the business of killing." At this point, I'm sweating pretty profusely and agitated. This isn't going well.

"Oh, right. so what about this?" Agent Cooper turned on the tv and flipped to the news. The broadcast was showing multitudes of people in the street, all over the world, chanting something in disorganized unison.

"Oh shit..." I whispered to myself once I realize what they're all saying.

The people in the broadcast were yelling as they clashed with the police, "His name was Robert Daulson. His name was Robert Daulson."

"So you think you're some kind of hero do ya?" Cooper was about an inch away from my face, his anger emanating from his pores like a bull.

"I don't know what to say, Agent. I had no idea any of this was being set up or orchestrated. I don't even know what the guy who owns the estate does." I'm stuttering, trying to defend myself and make the Agent believe me. What is going on, I wonder to myself.

There's a knock at the door. An older gentleman comes in dressed like he's straight out of the 1900's, an eccentric type. Agent Cooper immediately backs off and greets him with a respect that I hadn't heard from Cooper all night. 

The old man turns to address me. "Well, well, well, Mr. Daulson, didn't I tell you not to open that safe?" |-| 
|-| cnvlbgw || 4 || They killed my child.  My only child.  She was defenseless.  

One moment, she was there; happily swimming near me.  The next moment, she is hauled up into their boat. 

There was no pity there.  She wasn't what they wanted.  Despite all of her frantic efforts, they just slit her throat and threw her lifeless body back in the water.   Like my precious girl was nothing but garbage.

I smelled her life's blood long after she vanished into the depths.  That was when something broke within me.  An anger I've never felt before boiled up to the surface and stayed there. 

I stared at them, continuing to work - continuing to live.  I examined them in cold rage and learned what I could - the way they lived, the way they operated.  I measured the only thing keeping them safe from my wrath and found it wanting.  

That was the moment when I knew one thing for certain; one singular fact.  

They were going to need a bigger boat.  |-| 
|-| cnvlii0 || 12 || The apple seemed to stare into my soul. Whispering the sweet nothings into my ear. "Do it" it tempting voice seemed to call out. With each repetition growing louder and stronger. I could feel my arm start to shake as it seemed to move of its own accord towards the soft luscious fruit. With a small bead of sweT trickling down my back I slowly brought the fruit to my face and kissed it with lips and teeth as a wave of euphoria spread though my body as I savored the sweet mass resting in my mouth. After swallowing I pull out one of my cigarettes and ask " same time next week" |-| 
|-| cnvlktp || 13 || I awoke in a dash.

Across from me was a large speaker, with small holes meant to output sound. Suddenly, a large, booming, feminine voice pounded my eardrums.

"Hi, brother, you have like 37 minutes or whatever to like gimme ownership of your lab. Otherwise I'll tell Mom and Dad. Bye bye!"

Of course. It was none other than Dede who locked me out of this room. My monkey companion was not here, and there were none of my inventions on sight. It would be a long day. Stupid sisters... |-| 
|-| cnvlm7o || 8 || 3am. Dark outside. Softly, light shines inside. Candles are flickering. Smells like cinnamon.

Eyes become glazed over. The two people who are sitting in the room stare at each other. They are bored. The champagne is gone.

"What now?" 

The shirt comes off first, sliding over tender, pink skin. Two people, lying on a bed a room. Their eyes are closed. Lips explore lips and fingers make tingling sensations across the smooth surface. Face, then neck, then chest, then belly, then...

Heat. The candle on the nightstand was hot. There is heat everywhere, and it feels warm. It feels good.

Notice the rhythm. In. And. Out. In, and, out. In and out. In out. Inout. Again. Again again. Again! More! Aah...

The candle on the nightstand is kicked over. The flame goes out and the hot liquid spills onto the floor.

A cool breeze flows over naked bodies. The calmness of the night is soothing. |-| 
|-| cnvlmh6 || 45 || I kicked my feet up on the console and started thumbing through today's newspaper. The glow of the monitors allowed me to easily read in the otherwise dim room. After barely a month, I was really starting to get used to the job. At first, seeing the President brush his teeth and wear pajamas was odd, but it really made me appreciate the humanity behind the leader of the free world. We were on a first name basis, and whenever he passed me in the halls he would wink and say, “Keepin me protected, right Mark?” And I would respond with, “Best I can, sir.” 

We were homies.

It was shaping up to be a routine night- every night was. The White House is a very routine place. If everything always goes the way it should, it's much easier to notice the smallest wrinkle. That night had gone smoothly; I had said good night to the President half an hour earlier, and began my nightly duties of keeping the safest place on Earth safe. I fetched a deep sigh and started skimming an article about a new bicycle safety bill.

Then the phone rang.

Immediately my vision tunneled. It was the phone. The phone that is never supposed to ring unless all kinds of shit had hit the fan. I turned numbly towards it. It's soft ringing stuck a dissonant chord with my interior panic. I reached a trembling hand for it, bracing myself to hear news of a terror attack on U.S. soil, or that Russia had nuked Ukraine, or that tension in China had turned to war. Instead, I heard a soft, scared voice with a thick Korean accent.

“I need to speak to Barack Obama, President of the United States. This is Kim Jong-Un, Leader of The People's Republic of Korea.”

I sat in silence for a moment. I saw all of the people that would look back on this moment, and how I handled it. I gulped, and responded, “Hello, Mr. Jong-Un. I am Mark Rogers, head of security at the White House.” An absurd question- to what do I owe the pleasure- rose to my lips, but I paused and said instead, “What is your business with the President?”

He spoke quickly, which coupled with his thick accent, made me take a moment to decipher what he had said. “I have been overthrown by my inner circle. I request political asylum.”

Remembering protocols, I asked him if he would wait while I woke the President. I quickly pressed the HOLD button and radioed Tyrone, who was on bedroom door station that night. On the monitor, I could see his eyes bulge as I informed him of the situation. He quickly opened the door and gently woke the President. I saw him sit on his bed, looking at Tyrone as he explained. He stood up and quickly walked to my post. I followed him on the screens. He got to my door, and walked in. We looked at each other.

“Hang up the phone.”

I stared at him. “What?”

“Hang up the phone. The people are rising up. Let him reap what he sowed.”

I silently put the phone back on the hook.

“Wake me up when there's a real emergency.”

I watched him walk back to his bedroom. I wondered what I'd read in the newspaper tomorrow. 
 |-| 
|-| cnvlns6 || 18 || The first showing of Star Wars (then just called *Star Wars* and not Star Wars IV: A New Hope) was rather empty save for the few people who were natural theater-rats. No one had seen the film yet. No one knew what kind of movie it was or what kind of impact it would have on the movie culture, or even America's culture, or even the world's culture at that. 

But Luke knew. His father and mother were ultra-fans, both meeting at the subsequent showings of the show, neither catching the first release but only going to see the movie after their college buddies told them how amazing was. His parents met at the popcorn line, where his father Nathan offered to buy Regina a pop. It was all over then. The two would fall in love, marry, and soon birth a son, affectionately naming him after the lightsaber-wielding protagonist. 

"15 cents, bud," the clerk said, snapping Luke out of his daydream and back to reality. It was 1977, and it worked. It *freaking* worked.

"Yeah, no prob," he said, digging through his pants pocket, wrangling the change he had made sure was dated before 1977. He placed a nickle and dime onto the counter and the clerk pushed forward a paper cup filled to the brim with root bear that fizzled and popped, sending little carbon dioxide sparks into the air. Luke was able to smell the soda before he had even brought it close to his mouth, and when he took that first sip, it was magical. He couldn't help but to stand there and take another. 

"What movie ya seein' bud?" 

"Star Wars."

"Oh, groovy shit, man, a real blockbuster."

"Oh, I know," Luke let slip.

"Yeah?"

"I've read some stuff about it, in some, uh, magazines."

"Oh yeah."

Luke walked away from the concession stand before the clerk could ask him anymore questions. He walked down a long dark hallway that other patrons were going through, following the signs that would eventually lead him to the screen that would be showing that magical film. Luke had thought about going to the showing his parents had gone to, but he wasn't about to risk messing something up in the time stream. He was still testing the machine out; he still had no idea if he was in his own timeline, or if the machine had created a separate, "temporary" timeline. He pushed the thoughts aside as he decided to climb some stairs, in order to get some balcony seats. 

The theater was dimly lit, and there weren't any commercials or other trailers playing on the screen like there would have been in the present. He stepped to the bannister and looked down, huffing at how sparse the seats were packed. There was a couple already necking in the corner, an older couple who would more than likely leave mid-movie thanks to the outlandish special effects, and someone using an iPhone. 

His eyes continued to scan until he finally realized what he saw. He darted back to the person sitting near the front, and sure enough, it was an iPhone. Without much further thought, Luke yelled, "HEY!"

Everyone in the theater looked up at him, including the person with the iPhone. Whoever it was, stood up, pocketed the phone, and ran for the exit. Luke half-thought about jumping from the balcony like an action hero, but thankfully his senses came back to him and he dashed out of the theater, down the stairs, and out the exit where the person surely had gone.

The outside light was harsh on his eyes, but he ignored it the best he could, and pumped his arms hard in an effort to catch whoever it was that was here when they shouldn't have been here. After turning another corner, he finally saw the person, running down the sidewalk. The person was wearing a jacket with the hood up, blue jeans, and black sneakers, and was a little on the skinny side. 

Whoever it was wasn't very fast either. Luke caught up within a few seconds, reached a hand out to grab at their jacket, only to grab a hold of the hood and rip it back. Long flowing dark hair spilled out, and without thinking, he put the girl in a headlock and pulled her to the ground. 

They crumbled to the ground together in a heap, Luke scraping his fist on the sidewalk, and the girl screamed out in pain. He stood up quickly, brushing himself off, then using a foot to turn her over. Between gasps of breath, he wheezed, "Who the fuck are you?"

She was clutching her arm. It was bleeding, and her hand was twisted around in an ugly fashion, palm pointing up when it should've been pointing down. Whoever she was, she was in shock, and unable to answer Luke's question.

"Oh fuck, oh fuck," Luke said, bending down to look at her hand, "I'm sorry, I'm sorry, fuck."

Her iPhone was laying on the sidewalk, smashed. A passerby stopped to look at it, and the girl with the broken wrist broke out of her trance and screamed, "BACK THE FUCK OFF OF IT!"

The man raised his hands, "Oh, oh, I'm sorry."

Luke walked over and grabbed the phone, then placed it in the girl's lap. "I'm sorry about your arm, we need to get you to the hospital. We'll talk about why the hell you're here after we get that fixed."

She had tears in her eyes, but not from the pain in her arm. "That's my way back," she said, looking down at the smashed phone, "that was my way back," now looking up at Luke with her brown eyes. 

"I can get you back, don't worry, let's go," he said, knowing full well that his machine was a one-seater. 

   |-| 
|-| cnvlz2h || 13 || "Yes, this is President Barack Obama, who is this?"

"This is Kim Jong Un, Glorious Leader of the Democratic People's Republic of Korea calling. I have called to seek political asylum."

"Y-you? Seeking political asylum to America? This has to be a joke..."

*Obama begins to terminate the call*

"WAIT! Let me explain! My life is endangered! T-the military found out that I was a lizard! They're already cut off the source of my power, my cheese supply! I need immediate transport to the US, before it's too late?"

"YOU? A LIZARD? How come you've never told us? How come you've never told ANY of us?"

"I was already a laughingstock in international communities. Imagine what they'd have thought of me if they knew that I was a lizard! As a puny human, my weight would have been excusable, but as a fat lizard..."

*Kim Jong Un sobs deeply*

"Okay, okay, I'll grant you asylum on one condition: You'll shed your skin, adopt a new identity, and this time, you *will* be a part of the New World Order. Do we have a deal?"

"Yes, please hurry! I don't want to die from lack of caloric intake!"

"Okay, a helicopter is coming your way, to Yaeksong Command Center. The passcode is FIREWORK. Good luck." |-| 
|-| cnvm1vm || 13 || The ship broke up in the upper atmosphere.

It felled originally in one piece, occasional bits of heated steel breaking off from the intense temperature and friction as the kilometers long vessel slowly was swallowed by the gravity of the planet. 

The world itself was beautiful from up that high, swatches of white clouds obscuring the vibrant dark green of the forest and jungles. Towards the poles, small ice caps froze at either end, while massive storms brewed on the wide, scattered seas. The planet teemed with life, while above it, life was failing.

The force of gravity was stronger than that of the hull, and all along the hull numerous rents and tears were torn open, splitting the metal like cracking ice. Bodies were thrown out of the shell of a ship, their corpses igniting instantly under the speed at which they fell. If an observer looked up at the falling star, they would have seen brief flashes in the night sky like fire flies, or whatever lived analogous to them on this world. It was awe-inspiring and terrible. 

That same observer would have had a front row seat to witness that falling star collapse, breaking off into some five large pieces and countless smaller ones. All along the tumbling sides of these glowing metal stars came hundreds of minor explosions, all streaking away from the burning suns, flying like shooting stars across the night sky.

Heron Quinn swore.

He was strapped into one of the shooting stars, a Gemsum Model 422B Lifeboat. Occupancy, one. The thing was a glorified drop pod, an egg. Other people might have made it to the large lifeboats, the ones that held scores or hundreds and months worth of supplies. The 422B held a week's worth of food. But that was the least of his problems, the threat of starvation pointless if he died during landing. His dark blue eyes shifted across the Heads Up Display, taking in the scrolling and shaking data. The built in radar was hard pressed to show the correct topography as he flew along at near Mach 2. The dumb AI plotted his likely trajectory as he steadily was pulled downward by gravity, a rather grim red dot crossing over the growing jungle. Two windows, small pitiful things were on either side of his head.  Turning his view, he could see the dying light of the star rapidly vanish behind the horizon, throwing his world into a terrible twilight. So be it.

He had rudimentary controls built into the crash seat, enough to turn the direction of his fall. That part was certain. Surviving was not. Noticing the point of his landing would have put him into the water, he pulled on the steering controls, urging the lifeboat closer to land. Only once he was satisfied with he chosen drop zone did he allow the AI to commence landing, whispering fervent prayers that the hundred years old machine did not malfunction.

Retro boosters fired first, throwing him into the shoulders of his harness and making him wince. That slowed it *somewhat.* Next came a tiny parachute the size of a dinner plate to aid the burning engines. A few more precious meters per second were bleed off, enough for the main chute to deploy right as the rockets ran out of fuel. He didn't scream from the shock, surprising even himself. The pod fell gracefully, like a maple seed free from its parent tree, gently spinning in the wind. The AI had a digitally displayed clock to count down the moment of landing, giving him plenty of time to think. He wiped the sweat from his eyes, chest heaving.

*Who am I, and what am I?*

The answer came to him natural as breathing. 

*I am Heron Quinn, teacher. And I refuse to die tonight.*

He'd have a daunting task ahead then.   |-| 
|-| cnvm851 || 4 || “Do they look closer?” said David.

Marley, a woman in her early twenties, poked a vine tendril with a penlight. The tendril curled around the penlight and began to retract. “I don’t know. The main stalks look like they’re in the same place.” She ripped her penlight away from the tendril. “These things are active though.”

David shivered. “I wish my mom hadn’t brought us to this planet.”

Marley scowled. “Why?” She motioned to the plants. “This stuff didn’t begin happening until a few months ago.”

David looked back at the pre-fab buildings in the main part of the colony settlement. “You mean it didn’t start happening until we began hacking into this forest.”

“Are you suggesting that our probes should have tested every single area of vegetation before we started clearing for the settlement?” said Marley. 

“I’m just saying we should have been more careful. This is a new planet,” said David. “We’re not experts on alien flora and fauna.”

Marley pulled out a small knife and began slicing off pieces of the tendrils. “The probes found likely areas to begin the settlement. It checked the area for many different factors that may impact quality of life.”

David stepped back from Marley and the tendrils. “The plants took out the power generators. When the generators went down they were able to get through the fences that had previously fried their tendrils.”

Marley cut a tendril that had begun to wrap around her wrist. “Coincidence. They didn’t target the power generators.”

“They got into some of our storage containers and destroyed food supplies. The vines went directly to those specific containers,” said David.

“Coincidence. Plants aren’t thinking creatures,” said Marley. She cut a tendril that had wrapped around her ankle and started twirling around her calf.

“They grow back in a night after clearing. They’ve gained resistance to our poisons. They’ve even changed their structure in order to be more fire resistance. We’ve got one chemical solution left that will successfully burn them,” said David. 

Marley tried to step back from the tendrils. They continued to reach out for her. “We just need more supplies. The Governor has already requisitioned more supplies to control the plant growth.”

David began bouncing back and forth on the balls of his feet. “Do you have all the samples you need?”

The tendrils had wrapped around Marley’s arms, immobilizing her hands. She tried to pull herself free. The tendrils pulled back. “David. Give me a hand. I’m caught,” said Marley. A look a fear began to creep onto her face.

“I’ll go get help,” said David. 

“I need it now, David,” said Marley. The pitch of her voice went up. She began to panic and pull her arms and legs in random directions as the tendrils wrapped around her body. “Help me, David. Get me out,” screamed Marley.

David’s eyes grew wide. He reached for her then pulled away. “I’ll get help,” yelled David over his shoulder as he ran towards the settlement.

Marley screamed as the tendrils pulled her into the underbrush. 
_________________________________________________________________________________________________
Thanks for reading! If you liked this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy.

 |-| 
|-| cnvnfox || 23 || The world waits in awe as the live binary signal decryption is moments away. The loud high pitched alarm went off globally. Every citizen of every nation holds their breath as their region specific announcer commences the reading of the translation. "Humanity too long have we stood by and watched the evolution of your species and then your culture. It has been unanimously decided that all sentient beings from the planet you know as earth will be allowed to join the intergalactic federation of Universe Delta Five."

An uproar of applause and cheer filled city streets around the world quenching a momentary silence. The alarm blares again. "We will now inform you of the implications of your entrance into our ranks.  It will surprise your world to know of the existence of religion beyond your planet. One of the key factors in joining the intergalactic Federation is the majority of the species believe in the Father, the Son and the holy spirit, Amen. Christianity , the one true religion, is simply your word for the religion that arises in all worlds and is common among all advanced races. We have kept a close eye on your species as Jesus Christ, our lord and savior, died on the cross for yours and the rest of the universes sins as the prophet Galgamaxius The Twenty-fifth declared would happen."

Chaos and anarchy in the streets of New York. Several devote Christians started violence against anyone they could pinpoint as a worshiper of any religion that was not their own. The world cried with fear and sorrow that only the loss of ones beliefs can bring. Gunfire and bloodshed filled the brief silence between alarms. 

"We regret to inform your species that the last statement we made was a test. There are currently, without accounting time dialation and warp travel, ten to the fourteen advanced cultures that could, in the near future, commence trading with and advancing the scientific capabilities of your species. Among each species there is on average four thousand independent religions as you would call them. Any species whose culture has the capabilities to travel to distant planets can gain the attention of the federation. However, if we deem your species as a threat to or inhibitor of the freedom of existence, which includes freedom of religion, that all sentient beings share then we must immediately mark your species for extinction. We are sorry for the inconvenience."

Several Federation warships faded into sight orbiting the earth as they exited warp drive. Giant beams of energy cracked and destroyed the crust of the earth. A man named James, who upon hearing the initial statement about Christianity shot four Muslim women and one Jewish Rabbi dead, fell to his knees and prayed for his soul.  |-| 
|-| cnvnft8 || 4 || "Mr President? Phone call. It seems important."

The president quickly takes the phone from his aid, concerned. 

"President?" A voice on the line says, frantic 

"Yes"

"This is Kim Jung-Un. I am in desperate need of help, preferably political asylum. I have-"

The President did not hear the rest of the former dictators plea, for it was drowned out by uncontrollable laughter.

He could still hear frantic shouting from the telephone as he terminated the call, handed the phone back to his aid, and went back to his serious work. |-| 
|-| cnvnio5 || 12 || "MYAYAYAYA!"  He screamed. *What is this treacherous being! Teeth like swift razors, tearing at my fur-pile defenses! Eyes glowing, peering into my very being like some unholy spotlights! Only too to be withheld by the great one, or let it wreak utter destruction on the living room! I must vanquish it!*

The small kitten reared up and leaped at the vacuum, but Mindy only laughed. "Silly kitten, tis just a vacuum cleaner! Tis harmless my little knight!"

He landed with a thud, slipping off its hard-plastic front with little resistance, onto the face of the beast. *Dam! It is impermeable to my siege engines! But... What is that?* 

The kitten slowly reached for the vacuum bag beneath the handle, Mindy all the while charmed and ignorant as she cleaned. *Aha! I have discovered it's vile stomach! I shall rend thee with my furry retribution, demon!* |-| 
|-| cnvnmjf || 5 || Whiskers gleaming in the sun

claws as sharp as winter wind

Sir Pouncelot of Catelot heads to the Dragon's Den.
 
|

It twists and coils like darkest night

It raises such a fearsome din

But through it all his love for lady Meownivere guards him.

|

Sir Pouncelot! A nobler kitten knight there never was. 

Who slew the fearsome vacuum armed with courage, tooth and claw.

|

Sir Pouncelot! They'll purr your songs for centuries to come. 

And the legend of your daring deeds shall never be undone. |-| 
|-| cnvou10 || 11 || "We are pleased to welcome Earth's first dignitaries here to our wonderful capital city of Atlas." The Floran diplomat known as Quern said waving his arm across the sprawling city before them. With over 20 million citizens, the city appeared like an ant hill from the shuttle's main window. Now that the diplomatic envoy had touched down at the main shuttle port, the hustle and bustle of so many lives looked like chaos in motion. "I must say we are quite excited to have you here, we have never met another species from your quadrant."

"Indeed, lets's just say that when we picked up your transmission, it caused a lot of excited emotions for us as well." Chad Helm, the lead diplomat on this historic occasion gazed around, and couldn't help but feel uneasy. There was something off, about this planet, something that while alien seemed familiar. "Actually, I was meaning to ask you. You mentioned back on the ship that the city was named after it's founder?"

"Yes indeed!" Squeeked Quern, unable to hide his excitement that for once someone listened to his introductory brief! "The great builder Atlas. Legend says that he came to our beloved planet and build the first settlement. Over time, it grew and grew until it became the city you see today, and in his honor, the city still carries his name."

"Indeed, and then you claim that he became your god?" Chad ask, his face slightly contorted in puzzlement.

"One of them yes." Quern became troubled as the Earthling's face continued to make strange movements. "Atlas, the builder was rewarded for his great service to the planet by the King of the Sky himself. Or so the legend goes." By now the diplomatic party had reached the waiting convoy of hover cars to take them to the planet's capital building. After a few moments of silence Quern spoke up again. "It's true that here on Floran, we recognize a multitude of gods and goddesses. I know that might seem a little strange for you, since I understand many Earthlings tend to be monotheistic."

"Now a days yes, but it wasn't always so. Many ancient cultures also believed in a pantheon of gods." As much as Mr. Helm tried, the unsettling feeling kept getting stronger.

"Well, I hope you don't feel we are too primitive since we still believe in our many gods" Quern smiled. He could tell the Earthlings were becoming slightly uneasy, he didn't understand why they were so fascinated with Floran theology. Granted, he should be happy, that's the whole reason he got this assignment. As the cultural expert on all things
religious, he was hand picked to lead the Earthlings, since as suspected, they seemed very interested in the Gods. "Actually Mr. Helm, just up ahead we are coming up on the main square. The center piece is one of the wonders of our world, a sculpture of the King of the Sky himself." 

As the car rounded the corner, Mr. Helm involuntarily let out a gasp. In front of him, standing proudly and majestically in the middle of the city square, was a statue of a large man with a flowing robe, with an arm outreached to the sky, holding a large thunderbolt. He couldn't believe it, hell, even the translators and experts who poured over every inch of information the Florans gave them thought there had to be some mistake. There was no way there could be any connection, their had to be some sort of explanation. 

"It is quite breathtaking isn't it?" Quern explained, realizing that he obviously underestimated how amazed the Earthling would be. "The locals have taken to call the statue of the Thunder King by his formal name. They like to call it, the Zeus" |-| 
|-| cnvpaec || 15 || *WHOOSH*

I grinned as the world around me slowed to a crawl. With a flourish, I pulled my trusty six-shooter from its holster, and put a bullet between my opponent's eyes. His hand was still halfway to his belt.

Ever since I'd discovered my powers, winning duels had been easy. I'd even beaten people with their guns already drawn, or -once- killed a man after his bullet was already halfway to me. Most knew better than to mess with me, nowadays. Only the new arrivals in town had the guts to take me on.

"Hey!" A young boy ran up to me, with a grin full of crooked teeth. "Another one!"

I paused as I entered the saloon. The challenger couldn't have looked more out of place. "You Doc?"

The man nodded, and grinned nervously. "Y-you do allow your challengers to draw their guns first, don't you?"

I nodded. I almost felt bad for this guy - maybe he'd lost a bet, or something. Still, I had a reputation to maintain - and that meant no backing down.

"Say, what'd you say your name was, again? Your real name, none of that 'Doc' business."

The suited man tilted his head faintly, and smiled. 

"Dr. Richard J. Gatling, at your service." |-| 
|-| cnvpb7k || 4 || Sam was laying on the couch watching the movie for the third time since it had come out.
Alex was sitting on the couch watching Sam.

Alex stroked Sam's hair with one hand and said, "Tell me the theme of the movie again?"

Sam said, "It's about two lovers who want to be together but society doesn't validate their relationship."

"Wait a second," said Alex. Alex laid down behind Sam, head nestled in Sam's neck and a leg draped over 
Sam's legs, intertwining them. "I have to feel it when you talk."

Sam continued, "In the first act, they tried to keep their love secret from their respective friends
and family."

Alex teased a hand under the waist of Sam's pants.

"In the second act, they try to run away. In the third, they confront society and everyone learns an
important lesson. That love is valid even between two..." Sam trailed off, distracted by Alex's hand.

Alex did not relent. "Between two?"

"Ahhh..." Sam moaned. "Two racists." |-| 
|-| cnvpcx9 || 3 || The first few talks had been tense, worried. Humans always seem to be set towards that. We’re prepared for the war, the battlefield, always fighting and fighting. Especially against something that looked so foreign to us. They looked like giant, bug-like creatures, with six limbs and small, vestigial wings. They seemed pretty intelligent. 

Eventually we figured out ways to communicate. After all, what is more terrifying than making yourself become alone in the universe? Of course there were dissenters that never wished to befriend such different looking beings. I suppose they expected Avatar or Star Trek, with everything at least generally human-looking. But we got a mix between Starship Troopers and District 9. 

It took a while to discuss borders and limits. To put in place where beings from each side could go and do. Then the actual discussion could begin. The sharing of ideas and thoughts. And that’s when the weird bit happened. 

“Do you have anything like… religion among your people?” Matthew questions, sitting across the table with the small delegation of humans. 

“Religion. This is the belief that a higher being dictates life?” The Thrixun Tylyl clicks a little, turning her head to fix unblinking eyes on Matthew. A couple of the others chat to each other at the word and description. 

“Yes.” Matthew nods a bit. 

“We have a different word for it but yes.” Tylyl responds, clicking a little afterward. “Most of us believe that the god Inia is the sky, the disorder that came before being the god Silar. The ground is the god Taryn while he that rides across the sky in his chariot is Phyra, he causes the sun to rise and set. He was born from Silar and Njt, who is the god of many things, she is ancient.” Tylyl pauses. “I believe we have too many gods to detail in short conversation, Mahew.” Matthew had stopped correcting Tylyl after the tenth time of trying it. She seemed unable to piece his name together. 

“Maybe you could send us a sheet on it. We could also put together one for our many religions.” Matthew states, something bothering him at the back of his mind. Something sounded oddly familiar about Tylyl’s description of her people’s main religion. 

It takes until he’s leaving to go back to his ship and his quarters, tired from another long session with the Thrixun for the religion to click. There were still words that would fall through and one would have to talk around them until the correct words were found. 

“Egyptian.” Matthew states, the train of thought actually halting instead of speeding away. 

“What?” Ariadne blinks at him in surprise. “Have you lost it? What about the Egyptians?” 

“No, just Egyptian. Their religion is Egyptian.” 

“What?” Ariadne’s brow furrows a little, confusion over her face. “You’re going to have to explain more.” Louis nods, giving a small noise of agreement. 

“Remember your Ancient lessons?” 

“Not right now.” Ariadne snorts and Matthew sighs. 

“In Ancient lessons, there was the culture in Egypt that worshipped many gods in relation to the sky and world around them.” Matthew starts to explain. 

“Oh yeah! I remember that.” Louis blinks a bit. “Huh. You’re right.” 

“Yeah, so their Phyra is our Ra, Silar is Nun, Geb and Nut are Taryn and Inia. Njt is Neith, mother of Ra.” Matthew feels a little more excited suddenly. Understanding their religion would go leaps and bounds towards understanding them and they had all the Ancient lessons available at their fingertips for anything they might need. 

“So you’re saying we’ve run into what basically amounts as a bunch of bugs that are Ancient Egyptians?” Ariadne questions and Matthew nods. 

“Exactly.” There’s a long silence after he responds. 

“Huh. Universe is a small place.” Ariadne finally responds.  |-| 
|-| cnvpr06 || 249 || The asylum was quiet. Unnaturally so. It was rare for the ancient building to have a moment's rest; usually it was punctuated by the screaming of the inmates, in ways that pushed the boundaries of legality. The man in the padded cell knew this best of all. His hair used to be green, but it had grown white with age. He hadn't been allowed access to his lipstick for the better part of a decade, and when he started using his own blood as a substitute, the doctors had him put into a permanent straightjacket. His smile was tired, held up only the ragged scars left behind by the accident that created him. His face, once known for the pale white makeup, was now naturally pale. When he was younger, he was the Joker, Batman's greatest adversary. But time had passed, Batman became a myth, and the Joker became a shadow. He was unrecognizable in his old age. Only his voice gave him away. 

He heard the sound of footsteps down the hallway. A small group of six. By the disorganized sound, he assumed they were orderlies, coming to check on the other patients in the wing. Nobody came for poor old Joker anymore. He had been deemed too high a security risk for anything other than eternal solitude. 

And yet, the footsteps slowed. The orderlies were just outside his cell. Yet, there was a different sound, punctuating the others. Two slow, irregular thuds, followed by the low sound of wood on concrete. Joker smiled. It looked as though his luck had changed. 

The door opened, and Joker raised his tired eyes to greet his visitors. His smile sprang to life, once again. He started to speak, but his dusty vocal chords had fallen into disuse, stifling him. 

"Don't bother," he heard, from the outside. 

A man walked in. He wore a gray suit, which Joker thought appropriate, considering his hair and beard. He stumbled in on a wooden cane. 

He said, "I suppose I wanted to meet our most famous inmate. Before you die."

Joker made eye contact for the first time in a long while. He whispered, "And what makes you so sure I'm going anywhere?"

The man smiled. "I've spoken with the doctors. I had to confirm it myself."

He paused, smiling like a wolf. 

"I never thought I'd say this. But I suppose there's a first time for everything. You have lupus." |-| 
|-| cnvq7cd || 228 || Ext. Arkham Asylum -- Night, cloudy with lightning strike

Fade out.

Fade in:

Int. Arkham Asylum corridor -- night

House is walking with Wilson. Wilson is carrying yet another completely uninteresting folder of cases.


      Wilson
Thirty-five year old, presents with symptoms of reverse hypothermia, cannot survive outside of his protective cryo-suit.

      House
I don't treat doctors. 

      Wilson
Twenty-five year old. Can't stop laughing. 

      House
It's Joker Venom.

      Wilson
You can't know that without blood work, let alone without even seeing the patient. 

      House
It's always Joker Venom. Start treatment.

      Wilson
Twenty-eight year old female, hormonal imbalance, mood swings and irritability.

      House
-- Another cousin of yours?

      Wilson
That was ten years ago House, let it go already. Her skin is green. 

      House
Not my problem, why do you want me to treat her?

      Wilson
Her condition gives her control over plants.

      House
I don't care what's wrong with her, why do *you* want me to treat her? Chase has experience with Floronic Man, page him. 

      Wilson
House, this case means a lot to me. 

      House
There are hundreds of criminally insane patients in Gotham who need treatment, why should I help her?

      Wilson
She kissed me, House. 

      House
Mmm. Maybe there is something seriously wrong with her. 

House snatches the file from Wilson and steps into his office that they have conveniently just arrived at. 

Fade out.

 |-| 
|-| cnvqc4u || 35 || "God dammit I need Vicodin!!" House yelled. The doctors and guards of Arkham Asylum were appalled that their new warden was a shameless drug addict, but the prison's pharmacist decided it would be best to indulge him for now. The pharmD chucked an orange bottle at Dr. House, who promptly caught it and opened it. 

"This.. This is a placebo. Maybe the next time you try to fool me you'll give me a cyanide tablet instead." He chucked the pills back at the pharmacist and turned around. A smile worked its way across his face, as his eyes caressed the massive display and control board.

"What does this button do?" He asked, and he pressed it.

All of the doctors and guards behind him collectively gasped. An alarm came on, and on the CCTV displays, all of the prison cells opened at once.

"Shit." House was concise when he needed to be, and he had nothing more to say to those that were in the room. He turned right around and shoved the gaggle out of the way and walked to the prison. The guards ran to stop him.

"We can handle this, I suppose we should have told you about that button first, but we can contain the escape." House's stare bored into the guard's soul.

"Everybody lies," he said, as he opened a compartment in the wall, revealing a batman suit, with a mechanically enhanced leg.

"I'm not a hero," he said, "but I am always right." He donned the suit and disappeared down the hallway. |-| 
|-| cnvqpv5 || 3 || The first thing I noticed about her was her soft, glowing skin. It was light with warm undertones. Her eyes weren't the "crystal blue" every other girl seemed to covet. They were brown but light enough to catch the sunlight shining through them on a sunny day. Oh how I yearned to touch her delicate hands. I watch her from the window in the library every Wednesday and Sunday afternoon. She comes to the bakery across the street on those days. She never strays from her usual croissant and cup of coffee. I've waited weeks, hoping, praying that maybe she'd walk into the library and notice me. Now finally, I'm afraid my patience has run dry. Today, on a Sunday afternoon I wait for her. Sitting just a few feet away from where she'll order, I imagine how soft her voice must sound. Maybe it'll be silky, like music to my ears. I can't keep my leg from shaking. I watch the door intently with a book in my hand. The cashier seems to peer over at me every five minutes as if he knows I couldn't even tell him who the author is. I look down at my watch. She's always here on time. Always between 1:10 and 1:45. Today cannot be the day she decides not to show. 
"Good afternoon, Sam. I'll have the usual." The sound of her voice jolts my heart. I quickly turn my eyes to the counter. It's her. Her voice is more precious than I could have ever fantasized in my head. She's wearing a floral patterned dress. My favorite. It's almost as if she knew I'd be here. She sits down at the table across from mine. I can feel the palms of my hands getting sweatier and sweatier by the minute. She brings her gentle hands to her face and moves a strand of light brown hair away from her vista, and then she sees me. I try my best to maintain my composure, but it's almost like my heart can't contain itself, especially when she smiles at me. 
I want her. I want her to be mine. She won't be like the rest. She's perfect. She's the one. She won't be like other stupid, useless girls that pretended to love me. I would never hurt her. I would give her anything that she could ever want, and she would love me. 
The other girls do not compare to her impeccable beauty. Sure Annie had the blue eyes, but they tasted better than they looked. Yeah, Sarah had nice legs, but they were the only thing worth keeping. I didn't have much use for the rest of her. 
Ah, and of course Rosyln. Rosyln was smart. She challenged me every day. Sometimes too much. 
Her brains were better kept smeared on the bathroom wall than in her head.
The girl that I have watched for days on end, reaches for her cup of coffee. I can see her name written on the cup. Her name was Amber. 
My beautiful Amber. There's a hunger inside me that keeps growing stronger. I crave her. I look at her red tinted lips and I can't decide if I want to kiss her or bite her lips so hard that her blood matches the scarlet from her lipstick. I can't decide if I want to hold her close or hold her so tight that I can feel her life slipping away in my arms. Her screams must sound as silky as her voice...

The sun shines in through the window and reflects on her beautiful skin. The skin I've been wanting to feel against my own. 

I can't decide if I want to run my fingers across it, or scrape it off and wear it instead. 
Decisions, decisons. |-| 
|-| cnvr2pk || 3 || Like most nights the saloon was packed with merrymakers of all types. Cowboys sat around tables playing cards; the smoke of their cigarettes wafted upwards and blended with the raucous melody of the piano. Women in frilly skirts loitered near the bottom of the steps, inviting men upstairs. More men stood at the long bar, sipping their beers and whiskey.

The merriment was interrupted by the saloon doors being kicked aside. The bar grew silent. Curious eyes were drawn to the entrance, where a man with a tin star on his chest stood clutching his crimson-stained side. The man hobbled forward a few feet before collapsing onto a table, sending bottles and poker chips crashing to earth. A woman screamed as the man convulsed on the ground. At the bar, another man with a tin star on his chest watched in horror.

“Get the Doc!” He roared.

Some men rushed forward to help the injured lawman as another scampered out the door to find the town’s doctor. The rest of the horrified patrons observed the wounded man groan in pain, his breathing shallow and rapid. The saloon was deathly quiet. Pausing to finish his drink, the man spoke again.

“And the coroner.” He growled to the bartender.

It had been several years since there had been a murder on Sheriff Wexler’s watch. He had spent years drifting across the West developing a fearsome reputation as a gunslinger and gun-for-hire before settling down as Sheriff of Gatlinburg, New Mexico. He’d never lost a duel, and that was usually enough to settle down the hotheads that arrived in town looking for trouble. Secretly he was glad that his reputation preceded him. He could still the faces of the dozens of men that he had fought, could still see the bullets slowly drill their way into their flesh. Killing gave him no pleasure. But for shooting his friend, Deputy Dawson, someone was going to die. He was going to savor every second, too.

He stormed out of the saloon, looking around for the guilty party. Directly across the street he spotted a man, dressed in all black leaning casually against a post. A holstered revolver dangled conspicuously from his hip.

 “You shot my deputy” Sheriff Wexler said, descending the saloon steps.

“Killed him, I reckon” the man in black replied. 

“Make your peace with God, because you won’t have any from me” Wexler spat.

Both men maneuvered around the street, trying to get into the best position for when the shooting started. A solemn crowd had gathered in the street to bear witness to the evening’s proceedings. Wexler closed his eyes, and his breathing slowed as he began to concentrate. The noise faded away. He could feel his heart beating, and every inch of his body was on alert. As he took another large breath he heard the familiar sound that meant he succeeded.

*Zhoom.*

He released his breath as he opened his eyes. It had been a long time since he had tried this. He learned the trick to slowing down time as a little boy, using it to swipe pieces of his brother’s pie during dinnertime. The man in black seemed frozen, his outstretched hand halfway to his holster. Sheriff Wexler looked to his left, then to his right, observing the crowd. He thought briefly about how amusing their faces were when time was at a crawl. He had to remind himself of the task at hand, but when he turned to face his opponent, he was overcome with dread.

Marching straight towards him, gun held high and level, was the man in black.
 |-| 
|-| cnvr2ts || 3 || "We heard, but never listened. We never fully understood what we had done...what we were doing.  All along we promised change. We promised ourselves that we would be the generation to change; the generation who would radically change the course of history. We saw ourselves as Gods. Our will would suffice in place of global action," the voice from the computer said. "With our knowledge and technology in one hand, and a fist beating our human chests, we set out to change. Our technology, our understanding of nature grew exponentially. We made daring feats; did what was cast to the pit of impossibility. We built wind farms, hydro-electric plants, geo-thermal wells, solar farms and the list goes on. What we didn't realize was...we were too few. Our efforts too minute. The damage was done and continually done, for as our technology grew so did our dependence on a cheap energy source. We said 'things have changed', but that had not. We turned a cheek to our gaudy excess; our over-abundant pollution of our planet. Our home. Oil was our blood; our cancer. Our transfusion with 'green energy' was centuries too late. For once humanity found a sturdy crutch; there was to be no more progress." 
Mitchell looked through the sky light as howling winds whisped snow across the dingy Plexiglas.
"Earth evolved, as it always does to counter change. Temperature’s rose in summer, plummeted in winter. This continued until there were no more springs or falls. Plants and animals unable to haphazardly adapt died off. Storms grew fierce; the oceans rose. We too slowly began to die off; beaten in submission to the will of nature. Entire cities fell to a single storm cell. Then, our planet grew colder until only winter prevailed.”
Mitchell was now warming her hands on a small pilot light which functioned as both her source of warmth and cooking. Her ten layers of clothing made her slim physic look like a grizzly bear; with her puffy hood and gloves. 
“We failed…we failed for many years to change our home, to restore it to its former self. But, Mother Nature had turned a hard, icy cheek to humankind. She was to shed us as a butterfly sheds its cocoon. For she lives on…into eternity…and we return to the minuscule speck from whence we came. “
Curled up in a ball, she was rocking back and forth, slowly chewing on thawed out rations.
“But, Sarah…”
Mitchell turned her gaze to the blue screen. A kind, gentle face gazed back. Her eyes welcoming, cheeks rosy and lips poised.
“…you are our finest achievement. It’s because you are not like us, this makes you so special, so beautiful. We designed you to be stronger than us; more intelligent, hardy, agile. You are the key to your own survival. Our time has passed, we realize that now. You are the future of Earth. You are the beginning of a whole new species of humanoid.”
The woman in the recording stopped for a moment. Through the grain of the pixels Sarah could make out tears from the woman’s eyes as she held her hand over her mouth.
“You…” the recording said. “…you are the love of my life. From the moment I saw you, I knew the love of a mother. I…I will always love you little bear…I will always love you Sarah.”
She touched the woman’s face on the cold computer monitor. 
“You were given the best of all our greatest traits and none of our weaknesses. These will serve you well in years to come. You will build a new civilization; a new culture. By your 18th birthday your reproduction system will take effect on creating a child, a baby girl, within you.”
Sarah touched her belly.
“In three months time your baby girl will come to term and will be born. She will look exactly like you, but your body will have adapted hers. In essence, your greatest characteristics; your strengths will be passed on to her. She will have a two children. One girl, one boy. They will be your grandchildren and will have adapted and obtained all of your daughter’s strengths.   And so on and so forth.”
Sarah began to stroke the icy cheek on the monitor. A feeling began to bubble inside her which caused water to precipitate from her eyes.
“I’m sorry the only gift I can give you is life. But you will live three times as long as homosapien lifetime. Long enough to watch your family grow.”
Sarah dried her eyes as the face grew starker. 
“Be better than us Sarah. Evolve past subtle human predispositions. Change the world as you see fit. This is Dr. Evelyn Mitchell. Record number 4821. Project Eden.”
 |-| 
|-| cnvr9l1 || 14 || Time travels slowly enough that I can trace the bullet with my eyes. He has one eye closed as he prepares to aim when the lead slugger makes contact with his skin. My eyelids always seal shut during this part. I took another man’s life today. He’s the tenth man I’ve killed. I wish I never had to put a bullet through head.

After every duel and after every victory, I visit the church and pray to God to take away this curse. To every kid, I’m a town hero, but privately, I think myself a villain forever fixed in a continuous cycle of kill or be killed. Sometimes I wish I could muster the courage to die. 

After church, I visit Dr. Henry Fate, an eccentric peddler who, after I saved his life, provided me with the elixir that made time itself drag on its hands and knees. I ordered another batch, knowing that inevitably another youth will ride into town looking to prove himself a man by challenging the legend. I then had the task of swallowing a mouthful of the bitter potion right before the duel to give me that secret advantage long enough to end any future a young man may have had before he met me.

I ventured into the saloon filled with piano music and cigar smoke. I looked around the room, but even between the amicable drunks and promiscuous whores, I couldn’t find a true friend. Every man and woman only feared the man who couldn’t be killed. I quietly sat by the large window and drank my draft. Before I could finish, a new arrival found me.

“Are you Samuel Garr?” The youth dressed in all white asked.

“That’s me.” I responded with a heavy sigh. “Save yourself the trouble kid. Go home.”

“Can’t do that Sam,” He responded confidently. “My name is Gabriel and you have a date with destiny tomorrow. Meet me in front in the town bank tomorrow at noon. We draw at the end of the last chime of the clock.”

I sadly obliged. Poor kid. He couldn’t have been older than twenty. I took a long, hard sip of my drink, which tasted so much bitterer than before another duel and another murder was added to my conscience. 

The next day, I stood in the summer Oklahoma heat as the sun stood directly over us and almost seemed to watch our duel in anticipation. As the first bell chimed, I put my flask to my mouth, letting the elixir do its magic. A problem, however, occurred; time refused to halt. For the first time, I stood unconfident and dumbfounded in my first fair duel.

As the last chime echoed through the town, I scrambled to reach for my revolver. Before I could lift it, a loud bang punctured my ear drums as a searing white pain ran through my hand. I looked down in horror to see blood dripping down my fingers and my trusty gun several yards behind me. 

Gabriel slowly approached me and smiled. Still dressed in spotless white, I saw a certain purity in his blue eyes that somehow reassured me.

“The shot severed a few key tendons. Your trigger finger simply won’t function.”

Still bewildered, I looked at him. He only laughed.

“Every prayer sent to the heavens above is heard. He knows you’re a good guy in a bad situation, but don’t worry. Anybody can be saved, even if it’s in ways they don’t expect,” He said with a wink.

As the youth in white walked away from me, I sunk to my knees and laughed as the locals rushed to me and the local doctor examined my hand. What a brilliant son of a bitch, I thought.  |-| 
|-| cnvrhzw || 4 || *Fuck tumbleweeds.*

Levi Cooper eyed the dirt-brown shrub with suspicion as it rolled through the barren road stretching out before him. The midday sun caused a shimmer towards the end of the small town, and the legendary gunhand felt a small trickle of sweat find it's way down his cheek, pausing shortly at his jawline before running the rest of the way into the grimy, wet bandana coiled around his neck. The typically bustling road was all but deserted, the townsfolk instead crowding the storefronts, and those more frightened peering through the Inn windows. Even the invariably rowdy cowboys and rustlers were uncharacteristically silent, pausing their games of cards and bottle-throwing to watch the two men standing back to back in the street.

A heavy glob of dark spit landed in the dirt next to his boot. The gunslinger reached up to wipe his mouth, as the other hand pulled out a beat-up can of moustache wax kept in his shirt pocket. Reaching in, Cooper scooped out a small gob with his index finger, and allowed himself a small smile of contempt as he listened to his challenger stumble around directly behind him. Cooper shook his head. *The fool comes to a duel drunk... Why is he so feared?*

The gunslinger began shaping his moustache. As he did so, the magical wax took effect, and Cooper watched the tumbleweed slow down it's bounce and roll. He heard the duelist to his back take a couple gulps from a bottle, before throwing it with a thud to the side of the road. Levi Cooper took a step forward. Then two steps.

Upon the tenth step, the gunslinger pivoted around, and felt the warm touch of steel as his hand snapped free the Colt revolver from his waist. He took aim at the staggering figure 20 paces away, and let loose a bullet that always found it's target. He watched it slice through the dry, desert air in slow motion, closer and closer, until it... sailed right past the drunk, swaying duelist at the other end.

Levi Cooper took a second to realize that the drunk's swaying hadn't slowed down, somehow immune to the effects of his shaman-blessed magical moustache wax. He had time for a sharp inhalation of breath at this surprise, before hearing a sharp retort and feeling a deep burn in the center of his chest. All of the sudden, Cooper found himself laying on the hard road, smelling dust and blood with the blinding sun searing his unprotected face.

As his vision went dark, Levi Cooper heard haphazard footsteps near him, and felt the heavy, pervasive stench of whiskey enter his nostrils. Then, the voice of the man that killed him floated it's way down...

"I'm your huckleberry."



 |-| 
|-| cnvrmae || 3 || I opened my can, fresh air poured into my lungs. It was a fresh respite from the acid that stirred in the atmosphere. The down town wanders stared at a distance, begging towards me with their eyes. They stank of fungi, the only plant matter that would grow on this wasteland. Nothing grows, we all just linger on in this wretched world, trying to grasp at strings. We tried every permutation of every kind of genetically modified organism, and fungi is all we have to eat. Unless you were lucky and found what was left of canned food. 

I had lived a long life, I remembered how it all started. I let my mind wander as the opiates from canned air took effect. Such cans were a luxury in today's world and provided much needed respite from the torture that was daily life. Clouds of yellow gas filled my mind, as I slowly drifted into my past. 

Amongst the rolling hills of wheat, a younger me worked the fields. The grass cut at my ankles. The sun burned. The dry air took away from my soft moist skin, making it crackled. A truck rolled by in the distance. It was the first bit off shipping of the mushrooms. We were payed a large sum of money. Half of it to grow the fungi, half of it to keep quiet. We had to put their dead cattle in a moist pit of hay, along with the fungi. Apparently you could live off the fungi alone, genetically modified to taste like anything and have any of the nutrients you need. They were cheap, the new corn. Their pollen filled the air, reaching their threads into every crevice possible. But we made money, and we were ready for more. Life was tough and we needed to survive. 

The air grew increasingly toxic as each year went by, food crops were dying one by one, unable to bear the effects of the acidic air. Though the fungi grew strong as if fueled by the death and despair of its surroundings. Eventually all crops were replaced by these super fungi which you could see for miles around. People grew sick from a fungi only diet, first their bodies would bloat and discolor. Then their heads and would swell with fluid and would need to be drained otherwise the pressure fluid would build up until and burst forth from their eyes, nose and ears.

I opened another can. I drank in front of all the other people. They stared. Their lungs were filled with spores. The fungi would grow and devour them from inside. I laughed. It wasn't the acid, there was none. I stared into my can, it was half empty with air. It was only a matter of time. The threads would pull us together, I just had to make the decision. I opened my jump suit. I jumped into a pit of fungi, embracing it. I let it seep into my body. Death is what connects us. And death, that's just a part of nature. |-| 
|-| cnvruj0 || 7 || *Finally, a little peace and quiet,* Adam thought as he strolled through the forest, sun peeking through the canopy, the occasional twitter of an unfamiliar songbird and his own footsteps the only thing breaking the wonderful silence. Things were…intense, back home, with the government funding him to “beat those commie bastards once and for all,” (or something like that; he didn’t care much for their reasoning, as long as he could do his research). The ‘cold war’ was what they were calling it, and the US and the Soviets were passive aggressively duking it out like a couple of competitive siblings vying for the attention of their parents. *Who are they trying to impress? What do they need to prove?* he wondered, the voice of his conscious cutting through the silence. He had never been one for politics. *None of that matters now; I won’t have to worry once I get back home.* Those spooks that kept an eye on his research and kept him in touch with the higher-ups had been very clear. “All you have to do is stay in your lab and do your research. If you can pull this off, you’ll be set for life, courtesy of the United States government.” It had sounded like a dream come true. Finish one project and be free to research and experiment with nearly limitless resources. But it wasn’t that simple. Government agents were breathing down his neck around the clock. Their researchers coming in and asking him questions, making him explain everything he did, in case he tried to back out, or worse, provide intel to the reds.

*How sad,* Adam thought, unable to escape his thoughts in the now harsh silence. *After all my years of research, it took some conflict with strangers half a world away to get any recognition.* He thought about Kennedy’s promise of sending men to the moon. *A pissing contest. Their work, as well as mine, is all just part of one big, pathetic, pissing contest.* But why had his work been kept secret? Why were the papers plastered with headlines about the ‘space race’ and not the ‘time climb’? (he  had never been good at names.) He reached into his pocket and rubbed the remote in his pocket worriedly. He had done it, but what if he wasn’t the only one? The Russians had been working on space travel like the Americans. What if they had also been hiding research into time travel? If they somehow beat him, would he still be able to live the reclusive life of study he had been promised? His heart thumped in his chest with anxiety, making a loud crunch somewhere over to his right. *Wait what? What was that?* he wondered as his head snapped towards the direction of the noise, expecting some giant prehistoric creature too be looming over him. Instead, there was a woman. She stood just beyond a shrub, staring at him with eyes wide and mouth agape in astonishment. *!* he thought as many confused moments passed in silence, both of them staring at each other, totally dumbfounded.

“Are you American?” She asked, finally breaking the silence. A chortle came from a bird somewhere up above them.

“Yes.” He answered plainly, fear making his blood run cold. That was English she spoke. But the accent was unmistakable. 

They stared at each other still. His heart was pumping, thoughts raced through his head. *Is this how I die? Is she going to kill me? I came alone, but did she? I bet one of her KGB pals is lining up a shot now, just waiting to pull the trigger. What does this mean for my research? Is she as surprised as I am?* He stared into her eyes. Their stunning beauty caught him off guard. He forced himself to speak again, and asked her what she was doing here. She explained that she had been researching time travel for the USSR, and guessed that he was her US counterpart. He confirmed her suspicions with a nod. He became very tense, becoming more and more nervous as the seconds ticked by.

“Aren’t you nervous?” he asked after her explanation. Surely she felt the same anxieties he had. After all he had heard about the USSR, he wondered how she wasn’t shaking in her boots at the notion of having failed in her research. If he thought the consequences for his failure were bad, surely hers would be thousands of times worse.

“To be honest… I could care less. I’m not going back.” He was shocked. The idea had never even crossed his mind. He looked on in awe as she carried on towards a clearing up ahead. After some time, he went after her. When he caught up, she was setting up a tent she had stored in her backpack.

“You’re staying here?” he asked dumbly, waving his arms in the air in reference to the wilderness around them.

She looked at him for a moment before answering, as if to reassure herself. “Yes,” she said, finally.

He thought about his home. The constant pestering by those government jerks. Those annoying scientists he was forced to work with. He began to wonder if they would even come through on their promises. The doubt was unsettling.

There was another long pause. He stood there for a while, watching her unpack her things.

“Can I stay with you?” he asked suddenly, seemingly shaken by his own words.

“What made you choose this time? What made you come here?” She asked, ignoring his question.

“I wanted to be alone--Not alone,” he corrected himself, his brow knitted in confusion and frustration. “Just away from all of *them*. The goons who forced me into all this. Who bribed me and sometimes threatened me to make me ‘fulfill my duty to my country.’ I just wanted peace. To be away from man for a bit. So I came to a time before all that.” He hoped she would understood his feelings. Her reassuring smile told him that she did.

She sat on a large rock, and patted a spot near her. He sat next to her and they began talking. Philosophy, art, music, science, history, literature; their conversation went on well into the night. As they lay on the dry ground, looking up at the stars, Adam jumped up suddenly, giving the woman quite a fright. He fumbled around in his pocket, and grabbed the remote. He took it out and looked at it, holding it in his hands for just a moment before throwing it to the ground, and destroying it once and for all.

She was shocked. Her heart raced as she reached out to grab the hand he offered her. He pulled her to her feet and stood in front of her, a grave look on his face. She suddenly became very serious. She pulled a small device out of her pocket. She looked down at the device, then back up at him. Then, she threw it down and crushed it beneath her foot. He smiled at her, and her heart started to beat faster. She felt blood rush into her cheeks. She was smiling. She was happy.

“So what’s your name?” Adam asked. 

The question caught her off guard, but she answered promptly. “Eve.”

They sat down by the fire they had prepared earlier, and continued smiling and talking through the night. Not a single man or woman on Earth to share in their conversation.
 |-| 
|-| cnvs7g3 || 35 || House sat down.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;"You seem quiet," said he to the patient. 

The subject did not react, for his bindings were tight. His lips, though free, neither slackened.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;Taking note of the reply, House continued. "Trauma, right? Lost someone close. Spouse, maybe. Long time ago, probably." The subject shifted his head towards his interrogator, still dripping rain from the streets where he was seized.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;House nodded. "Now, you're definitely not pathologically crazy. But you are definitely compelled by *something*. Hence the trauma. I mean, just look at you. Gymnast's body, costume to match—you're like a one-man Cirque du Soleil except you scare children on purpose." House rose from his chair, fumbling for something in his pockets, and produced a pill.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;"You're training yourself," continued House as he hobbled over to a side table and poured himself a glass of water. "Either to fight the pain or live up to it, I dunno." House looked out the window, onto the dark and dank grounds of the facility, before taking his pill. "Smarter than the average bear, but still crazy," he concluded.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp; It was at that moment did House realize through the reflection of the window that the patient was standing right behind him.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;House ducked as massive arms grasped thin air above him. He returned with his cane, thrusting the handle into the throat of his assailant, pushing the great brute backwards over a chair. House swung again, planting the cane into the chest, before activating the defensive shock feature, thoroughly bringing the patient into compliance. Guards came storming in, too late to help, but glad nonetheless of the resolution.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;"Are you alright, Mister House?" asked one of the guards.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;"Don't remind me," shot back the older man. He took a moment to catch his breath. "Is his handler still here?" he asked.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;"Still fucked thanks to your perp," informed another guard. "We've got him in the lobby with a staff nurse."

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;House slowly dragged himself up, his bad leg throbbing. "This ain't a hospital. Send him home. He's going alone." He turned back towards the beast he fell, a little awed by both their escapes today.

&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;&amp;nbsp;"As for Mr. Wayne—book him in a private suite. He's earned it." |-| 
|-| cnvtu16 || 27 || "So we finaly meet Dr. House. I've been looking forward to this for a long time." Said a man in a green jumpsuit.

"Oh? And why's that." Said House, easing into his chair. 

"I wanted to meet the man who was ripping off my schtick. Passion for riddles, carries a cane, always looking to get into a battle of wits. I mean seriously. Could you TRY to be less of a knockoff." The riddler replied smugly, reclining and throwing his feet on the desk.

"In case you weren't aware, I'm a cripple. I need my cane, I'm not just using it as a method of overcompensating for something." House replied. Popping a a vicoden. 

"My my doctor. You have GOT to work on your bedside manner. That sounded like an insult."

"Enough games. Why don't you tell me what you want from me!" House said. Glaring coldly at Enigma.

"Oh? And what makes you think I want to talk to you!"

"Your getaway car broke down after a chase lasting only a few minutes. An examination of your fuel line clearly indicated the presence of corrosive material. You wanted to be caught. I just took this job last week, three days after your last escape. I'm the only thing that's changed since you got out, ergo, you wanted to talk to me. Or maybe you just find me charming."

"Very well, you got me. I did want to be caught. You see, battling wits with the dark knight for so many years has gotten old. I need a truly honed mind to do a battle of wits with... Someone who... Gets true joy from solving puzzles. A kindred spirit if you will."

"You're mad. I've already got you figured out, i'm not playing your game. I've got patients with real, more interesting problems to deal with." House said, preparing to leave.

"I hope you'll indulge me in one riddle before you go... What is in one place when is sitting down... But all over the room when it stands up?"

House heard a beep as he felt a pressure switch depress in his chair. He scowled at the riddler.

"Give up? The answer is you if you release the trigger on the bomb i've hidden in your chair." The riddler said before laughing.

"Now then... Time to begin our little game." |-| 
|-| cnvujm4 || 14 || Dr. House looked around his new office. *Certainly isn’t as pretty as the last one.* He mused, thinking back to his two room department. This office had been recently furnished and spruced up; he could still smell the fresh paint lingering. His eye was drawn to the corner of his new desk, where sat an old friend. His trusted ball, sat with a file underneath it. Legible cursive was scrawled across the front of the file, ‘A new puzzle for you to solve. See room 314.’ 
He limped down the corridor towards the room in question, perusing the file.  *Obsessive compulsive disorder, and a high IQ. Won’t this be fun.*


House arrived at the door and opened it to find the man bent over a book, furiously scribbling and turning pages every minute or so. Stacks of mind puzzles and Sudoku-esqe books were littered around the room, but House knew better than to move them around, in case it was a part of a bigger plot.


“So, you’re the new warden come to check out the problem children.” Said the man, without turning around.  “What makes you think you could possibly solve my problem?”


House smirked. “Because I was you once. Once I searched for every answer, and delighted in knowing it before anyone else. Once I posed the questions, and scorned everyone who couldn’t answer it quickly enough. Now, maybe I’m fixed. Or maybe, maybe you get to be my next riddle. Only you really get to decide that Mr. Nygma.”


The Riddler turned around with a new found respect in his eyes. “You might just have an answer for me that I would like to hear. Now riddle me this…”


The session stretched into the hours. House emerged, tired but with a smile. Lisa Cuddy stood up from the bench across the hall from room 314. “So, how’d it go?”


“I’ll take the job. Atleast I’ll have someone to talk to.”
 |-| 
|-| cnvuqyi || 6 || "More than likely you know this, but most people who draw their guns on a regular basis can do it in about a second and a half. There's the occasional sheriff or bandit or fool kid with too much money for bullets that'll draw under a second. Heard of a guy, Holliday or something, that could pull and fire from the hip in well under half a second. Left a trail of dead bodies in Texas like a scythe going through wheat. 

I draw in a tenth of a second. I've shot the gun out of a man's hand, the hat off his head, put three bullets in the dirt and still made him third-eyed before his Colt was half-aimed. Time don't work the way for me that it does for most people. When I concentrate, it slows down. If I want, that tenth of a second can stretch out to what seems like half an hour. I don't move no faster than I did before, but with that much time to think and react, my every movement's apple-pie perfect. And it makes a visit from me a visit from the Grim Reaper, cause I don't miss neither.

See, back in the day I was a range hand, spent hours and days in red dirt hills with earth-baked men and brown cattle. Lots of lazy days with nothing to do but shoot and seventeen year old me thought I'd gone to heaven. Got so's I could plug the pips on a playing card at fifteen feet if I had time to aim. Turns out one day would give me all the time I'd ever need.

On the occasion I had cut about twenty head out of the herd and was driving them to a rancher by the name of Harker. Got there and Harker was there with two of his hired men and a shotgun. Told me in no uncertain terms there wouldn't be no payment for the cattle and there wouldn't be no witnesses to say they hadn't just disappeared neither.

Understandably that scared more hell out of me than a dozen preachers. I closed my eyes with a vague sort of hope it would make the unexpected removal of my insides a bit easier.  But after what seemed like a minute or so, I opened up my eyes and Harker was still there, his lips frozen at spittin' out the tail-end of his threat. Glanced right and left: his men hadn't done a thing either. Well, at that point a dog in the dessert who just found water wouldn't have been happier than me and I threw up a quick prayer to Jesus and tried to ride out. 'Ceptin I couldn't. I was moving like a drunk wading through cement. I could tell my hands to move, sure, but they were so slow. So, so slow. 

Turns out Harker pulls a shotgun up to his shoulder significantly slower than a tenth of a second, so I had hours to think. Eventually, I forced my hand down, pulled my revolver, and riddled the three of them with lead. It was easy, natural-like. I had adrenaline in my veins like Satan's whisky. One of his ranch hands actually managed to pull a gun on me, but I'd seen it coming and thrown myself into my saddle. The bullet whistled an unnatural low buzz as it flew above me, bird-like, and I gutshot the whoreson and then stopped his heart with my last bullet. Odd enough, as much time as I'd had to think about things, it was only then I noticed I'd pissed myself from fear.

Since then I've been a lawman, a bandit, an assassin, and the savior of Dusty Creek, a little village south of El Paso. But I've never been outclassed. Til right now, but I'm not sure this should count. 

Turns out even with time slowed down, twenty is a lot of men to shoot. I'd sent five to Our Lord and Savior before anyone had pulled on me, but then their barrels started leveling. I fired again, knowing the bullet would take the foremost bastard through his left eye. But now I had to reload, and through all the years I'd never been able to move much faster than this cowpoke posse would. I saw the explosions unfold out their revolvers like sunsets, saw the bullets glide toward me, had enough time to to calculate that they probably moved about an inch for every second I'd have to watch. Seeing your death march toward you like a hangman is a hell of a way to go. I almost thought of speeding things up to get it over with.

Then there was a flash of light, and white fire washed over everything. And a hand just appeared. Just is there. Glowing like a white-hot ember. Even in time slowed-down, things has still got to *move*, so I'm sure I was slack-jawed as anything despite living through my share of miracles. Then the hand goes about, all business-like, and pulls the bullets out of the air. Like cherries from a bush in fall, cept this was a sight more uncommon. 

Never could tell where it put them. It grabbed the guns too. Never could tell where those went neither. I could feel a heavy-sort of click and there was the weight of bullets in my gun. Another sort of click and suddenly I'm holding a Josselyn in my left hand, which I tried to drop in surprise. It's good that's a hard thing to do or this story I'm telling you wouldn't go nearly close to where it does. 

See, a Josselyn is a twenty shot revolver, with ammunition hanging in a damn-fool chain from it instead of a proper cylinder. Needless to say I rode out of that shantytown instead of feeding grass, but I was a bit dead inside. Man's supposed to read about things like that in the Bible, and God's supposed to deliver bread and fishes and the stuff the Jews ate in the desert. Not a gun. Not fourteen men who should've been alive and one who shouldn't. 

So I ignored it, threw the Josselyn in a ditch, and lived out the rest of my life. I don't suspect you can blame me for that. You never did tell me nothing. No words coming out of a bush; how the hell should I know I should've been a preacher or dirt-farmer or something? You give a kid, seventeen years old, what you gave me and then make him kill three grown men. Nine times out of ten, he uses that to go off drinking and chasing women and dies with a bullet in his back. I done did the best I could and a sight better than that. Shouldn't be enough for me to burn - of the people you've had up here, I think I know what forever in Hell would mean more than most of them."

"Well, don't think you'll be getting away with anything just by telling a good yarn, but right now that speechifying was enough for me. Don't want no one to say God don't give a man a fair deal. Welcome in, pardner." |-| 
|-| cnvvhs9 || 5 || “It’s not what I did. It’s what I *didn’t* do.”

The princess stared at the knight, leaning heavily against the archway to the terrace, the light of flames and the sounds of fighting spilling in from outside. Despite addressing the princess, the knight was turned away, facing the horrors below instead.

The princess got slowly to her feet, rubbing at her wrists where ropes had gnawed until just a few moments ago. “I don’t understand,” she whispered, voice soft as the silks of her gown. “You’ve rescued me, you and your men. You braved armies and deserts to reach me and defeat my captors. Surely that’s worthy of calling you a hero.”

The knight’s helm shook slowly in silent denial. The princess tried to see her savior’s face through the protective screen, but the knight turned away again. “My men and I were hired by your father. We’ve completed a job, nothing more.” His voice echoed strangely underneath the heavy armor; weary with battle yet unexpectedly light and undulating.

The princess frowned and moved closer. “Then what didn’t you do?” She reached forward, toward the heavy gauntlet resting on the ballustrade.

Suddenly the knight stood up. “Evening falls, but the day isn’t over yet. We must clear the courtyard and secure provisions for the return journey across the desert.” He turned to leave but gasped the moment the gauntlet let go of the railing. He stumbled against the wall, arm clutched protectively to his chest, but he couldn’t stop the blood welling out from the joints in the fingers, dripping to the marble floor.

The princess hissed and took his other arm. “You are in no condition to fight if we don’t get that bandaged up.” Before he could protest she lead him to the bed, shoving him to a heavy seat on the mattress.

“M’lady, no, it’s fine….” the knight mumbled, energy clearly draining. The princess examined the unfamiliar armor briefly, then carefully released the straps to slide the entire forearm and gauntlet off. An arrow-wound lay near the crook of the elbow, between the joints of the plates. Deep blood, almost black in the dying light, poured down the arm, soaking the undershirt fabric and collecting on the fingers--

The princess paused. Underneath the blood, despite their grime and callouses, the fingers were white, shining like lilies next to her own dark skin.

“*Einherjar*,” she breathed, glancing up. “My father hired *einherjar*?”

The knight jerked the hand away. “Your father hired *mercenaries*,” the voice growled. 

The princess peered closer into the helm’s shadows. “But everyone knows the legends of the ice-pale warriors from the skaldlands. What else would explain how you fought? I watched you kill four guards single-handedly!”

“To be *einherjar* takes more than skill.” The knight grabbed a handful of bed silks to press against the wound. “One must be selected by the High Maidens. One must *prove oneself*.” Pain that had nothing to do with battle-injury dripped from the knight’s voice.

The princess watched a moment, then gathered up her skirts, found a single layer of silk, and bit hard to start a tear, continuing it into a long strip. She gently removed the wad from the knight’s hand and started wrapping her makeshift bandage around the arm instead. “What didn’t you do?” she whispered.

Silence stretched long. Finally, the knight took a deep, shuddering breath. “I didn’t save them….” The helm turned toward her. “What High Maiden would chose someone who hid while her village was ravaged?” The knight reached up with the other hand, groped at the straps under the neck, then carefully lifted the helmet off. The hair, slick with sweat, was pale as cornsilk, framing a face that was dirty and bruised, but unquestionably, undeniably, feminine. “What maiden would chose me at all?” she whispered.

The knight watched her, shoulders slumped in surrender. The princess stared back, absorbed with the beauty of her eyes, clear as the summer skies of home. The sounds of battle echoed around them, but for the moment their world receded to this bed, that gaze, and the princess’s warm hands gripping the knight’s exposed arm.

Then slowly, carefully, as if approaching a shy young colt, the princess leaned forward and kissed the knight’s lips. After a brief hesitation, she kissed back.

An eternity later, the princess broke the kiss and looked at her, smiling at the blush spreading across her pale face. The princess stood up and extended a hand. “If you are ready, my knight.”

The knight stared a long moment, then took her hand and smiled. 







 |-| 
|-| cnvvv8t || 4 || Arkham Asylum was a nightmare for most. No one wanted to be here, those in charge of watching the inmates even less so than the criminally insane themselves. Who knew what the criminally insane wanted anyhow? Who knew what motivated them, what drove them to this austere place? But then again, who knew what drove Greg House? He was the next best thing to criminally insane, but somehow still functioning. James Wilson knew the answer though: it was puzzles, solving them, and who posed greater puzzle than some of the greatest criminal minds of their generation. No litany of objections could been enough to stop his best friend from taking the opportunity be the new warden of this place. 

"Warden?! You're a Doctor! Not even a psychiatrist, an MD!" 
"I know people, Wilson" he had gruffly replied, and from then on his mind had been made. But Wilson could not abandon his friend to whatever grim fate he might meet within these dastardly walls. Luckily the Asylum had need for an oncologist as well-- hell they probably would've taken anyone, but an oncologist, why not. 

His best friend now hobbled through the halls on his wooden cane, reading file of prisoner after prisoner with great intent, Wilson in tow. They stopped before a cell with a one-way glass window. A man in a straight jacket, scars around his lips, leered at them from within, grinning without blinking. Even though he gave no signal that he could see through the glass or even knew their presence, his mere aura sent shivers down Wilson's spine. 

"32 year old male, convicted of multiple accounts of homocide, domestic terror threat, pled insanity, cannot stop laughing." House muttered to himself.
"He's...insane" Wilson replied incredulously. 
"He has a brain tumor," House replied assuredly. 
"He does?"
"You see that tick he occasionally does with his tongue and lips, he has dry mouth. Symptom of Hepatitis C, probably caused the Cancer. Mild paranoid delusions, etc." 
"You think his criminality is the result of a medical condition?" 
"He avoids doctors. Very sparse medical records, old identity is entirely unknown." 

House hobbled onto the next cell, where a massive, hulking man lurked within. He wore no shirt, revealing bulging muscles all over, but he did wear a strange mask over his face, which had several tubes winding away and merging into one large plastic tube attached to a metal gas tank. His breathing was heavy and sweat covered his body. Wilson observed that he seemed to be doubled over in pain, trying to sleep. 
"He doesn't look to good."
"A mercenary who goes by the moniker Bane. He was in a terrible accident, self-medicated using steroids. Really screwed him up." House observed quietly. 
"That's it? What's wrong with him?" 
"I suspect it's an allergic reaction. A side effect that developed from the steroids." 
"Should we...help him?" Wilson quizzically retorted. 
"We need to figure out what the allergy is. Tell the staff to provide him with anti-histamines until then. He'll be peachy and crushing his foes with his roided out arms in no time."

 

[to be continued if I feel like it.]

 
 |-| 
|-| cnvy2nk || 4 || "Faking it... Faking it... Faking it... Hot, send this one to my office... Faking it..." The new warden stated out loud for his interns as they walked passed each cell. The interns gave each other worried looks as they tried to work out whether the request for the patient was a joke. "Send the first two home" the doctor instructed one of his interns, sitting and stretching his painful leg "give the other three tests for syphilis, parasites and then a full psyche profile" he instructed the next. The third intern watched the other two interns walk away and was jealous of the relief in their faces. After a few minutes of awkward silence she finally plucked up the nerve to ask "and me Dr House, what should I do?". The doctor looked up at her as if seeing her for the first time, before pulling out a slip of paper from his pocket. "Sign this prescription for Valium, take it to the pharmacy, return with my drugs" he instructed, mildly irritated by the relief in her face as she rushed away.

The next few days passed mostly quietly, interrupted only by the occasional incident where Dr House would catch a patient out for faking their illness or discover some almost impossible physiological cause. It was following one of these occasions that the interns were operating now. Removing the small but well attached parasite from the brain of a patient. The patient - Margaret Pye - had picked it up somewhere on her travels as curator of the Gotham City Museum of Antiquities. After that the psychosis had been induced, she had started calling herself 'magpie' and carried out a crime wave. Her current living situation was far from ideal, sharing a room with a young lady called Ivy who believed that she was part plant, so the interns were almost pleased to be operating, if only to get her removed from the asylum. This case was particularly important for Dr Harleen Quinzell, the only female intern at the asylum. She had long suspected that some of the patients, including Ms Pye, were trading sex within the asylum and she was determined to put a stop to it. She had tried to petition Dr House on the subject several times, but had started to get the impression that he was more interested in their prices than stopping the illicit trade. 'If the surgery is a success' Dr Quinzell reasoned to herself, 'then there will be one less bit of bad in this world'.

New patients arrived in the afternoons at Arkham, the theory being that to introduce them during the morning rush for breakfast would be a recipe for disaster. It was the usual collection of time wasters, people failed by the system and the silently demented apart from one particular patient. A man with a face she recognised from the news and not likely to be forgotten in a hurry. A chemical spill years ago had given this man a visage direct from her nightmares. A pale, almost white face. Green hair. Red lips. A smile that could only be worn by the most criminally insane. Her relief was almost palpable when both of the other interns volunteered for the case. One of them was writing a thesis on the affect of chemical accidents on brain structure, Dr Quinzell recalled and the other had always had an interest in violent psychosis. She became acutely aware of the silence in the room and snapping out of her thoughts noticed everyone staring at her. "Have you been sneaking at my Valium" Dr House joked in his usual cruel manner "I said that I want you to take the clown case...". Dr Quinzell looked up in confusion, missing the start of the conversation completely and feeling completely left behind. "The Joker" one of the other interns corrected Dr House, giving Harleen a bitter look "that's what they called him on the news". Dr Quinzell was shocked into silence, trapped like a rabbit in the headlights and unable to refuse the case. She resolved herself that maybe he wouldn't be too bad, maybe the news articles were wrong, maybe the police had got the wrong man.

Dr Quinzell sat opposite the joker at a large metal table, bolted to the floor. She had been pleasantly surprised after the past few weeks. Rather than the sadistic murderer that had been portrayed by the media, 'The Joker' as he still insisted on being addressed was actually quite an educated man. She had yet to get him to reveal anything of his past to her, but they had spent hours talking on Mozart, Bach and the great classics. She had revealed to him her love of music quite early on in the process, looking for a way to relate to him on a more personal level. She took great care to hide this relationship from the others, knowing that they would not understand her methods in this hard-edged male dominated industry. She had even clipped his fingernails for him that morning, although she had assured herself that he was properly restrained first. The face that she had found scary at first was now almost comforting. Dr House was quite correct in his clown comparison, but the simple sadness of that comical face filled her with nothing but compassion. She had started dreaming at night, dreams filled with escape attempts and living happily ever after on the beach with that man. The dreams normally carried on to what would later happen inside the house, but those thoughts were private and would not escape her lips. She stood to get herself a bottle of water from the machine outside, aware of the fact that she had been sitting far too quietly at the table for far too long. She took a sip, enjoying the fresh coolness of the water. She moved to sit back down at the desk, looking up as the joker finally broke the silence "What's on your mind, my little Harley Quinn?". |-| 
|-| cnvze8w || 63 || Today I woke up. I ate cereal. I went to work. I got home. I ate dinner. I went to bed. Such is life on the peaceful island of Madagascar.  |-| 
|-| cnx4rmx || 26 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnx5oub || 15 || The expansion of the human race to Mars had been the crowning achievement of mankind, it allowed us to reach further beyond the horizon then ever before.

It has been nearly 400 years since the first 24 colonized mars in mere iron shells, every year they would send up 24 more people, 12 male and 12 female, along with supplies to build up the living quaters. by the 30th year they begun terraforming, the idea of having a mass  emmigration to mars was a distant dream.

16 years since the beginning of the terraforming, oxygen was starting to be held in the atmosphere and life could begin to develop. With it were the humans who trained their bodies to withstand the low oxygen. It soon became a natural part of life on mars. Those born on mars didn't have anything to compare the levels to so it felt natural.

By the 100th year there were nearly 7000 people working and living on mars, society had begun the develop, strength was natural occurence because of the ideology that the planet held. *It was the strength that brought us here, it will be strength that will allow us to prosper*. 

By year 150 there was approximately 29000 people living there and they had begun to expand beyond their Capitol. So clans moved out and claimed land, each becoming a state surrounding the capitol. It was around this time that they stopped the ships coming in, they had realised the people from earth were so far away their social ideals that the mars government had split off from Earth and formed their new independent Sovereignty.

Since then it has expanded to become a greater scientific powerhouse than Earth, they have stopped mining resources from their planet and begun mining from the asteroid belt, unlike Earth who was still looking for scraps in their hollowed planet.

In the year 378, Earth requested help from the government of mars to allow their citizins to seek asylum in mars. It was accepted under the condition that Earth citizins would be second class under the inhabitants of Mars working as labourers. Reluctantly they agreed and mass migration  begun.

14 years have passed since the begining of the migration and Mars has closed its borders. Only 6 billion of the 41 billion people got to go to mars and now earth had fallen back into is roots of farming and building from wood. Meat is a limited resource and the population has died down signifigantly with estimates of only 11 billion people are alive on earth.

The people are surviving, but they are not thriving and so there are those that wish to move to mars in hope of a better life and that is where the pirates come in. Back in the times of America, Europe and Asia
and long before, pirates were the scum of the Earth, stealing, killing, raping. But now they are our saviour. They rejected their perfect society in order to save us and it is a debt that Earth will never be able to pay back.

And so while we life here on earth contempt with what we have and wishing for a better life, and those who live on marsblissfully live in their perfect society looking at us as animals. It is the rejects, deserters, betrayers... The priates that risk their lives for us and our childen to live a life worth living.

---------------------

It isn't exactly the WP you gave but I thought it was close enough. ^^sorry |-| 
|-| cnx5tg0 || 7 || "Are you scared?"

"Yes."

“Good, fear keeps you alive. I’ve taken people out here before who weren’t afraid. They were arrogant and quick to take off on their own. It’s a deceptively place. One moment you’ll have everything you need and the whole world will be laid out before you. The next everything you've worked for will be torn from your hands.”

“You must understand. It’s an unpredictable and varied place. There are many different tasks you will have to perform, and a different tool suited to each task. Sometimes you must forgo tools altogether and merely look to your own two feet to carry the day. There will be times when you must drop everything and just run because the odds against you will simply be too great.”

“Teamwork is essential, and above all trust. I value your presence and think highly of your abilities but I have sojourned here often, and you are a newcomer. So when I tell you something or give an order, heed it without question immediately. I will offer a justification whenever I can, but sometimes I will not be able to give you a reason for my commands quickly enough. Sometimes fractions of a second will be important. For this reason you must obey what I have to say instantly. Ask later if you must, when the danger has lessened or passed, but in the moment simply respond.”

“Now newcomer I ask you, are you ready?”

“Yes sir.”

“Good, because I’ve been trying to get someone to play Halo 4 on legendary with me for ages.”

Sidenote: Did I miss something OP? I see this is a [CW], but I don’t see what’s constraining about it. |-| 
|-| cnx6hjm || 371 || "Okay, glad everyone can make it. Now we all know that it's Heart's big day coming up soon, so we all need to decide on what we're going to do for his bachelor party. Has anybody got any ideas?" Brain asked.

"What's the point in us coming up with any ideas? You're the smartest one here and you make the decisions, we're just the messengers!" Left Kidney yelled.

"Now now, I know that it may seem that way, but I really do take your opinions on board. Remember the time Penis wanted to bang that chick in the McDonalds bathroom? I told him it was a bad idea, but he was really excited about it, and so I let him."

"Yeah, and then I had to deal with that Chlamydia guy for three whole weeks! I think we should listen to Brain, that infection pissed me off, always talking about how many women he'd been inside!" 

"Ergh. That's disgusting." Skin shuddered at the thought. 

"Come on guys, we're getting really off-topic. Liver, what ideas do you have?"

"Glurghsddhjidfhn pfffft, Maybe- *hiccup*, we should, pffftr, I dunno." Liver gurgled.

"What's up with him?" Left Lung asked.

"Oh, he's still ruined from Heart's Engagement Party." Right Lung replied.

"Still?!" Said Pancreas.

"Well give him a break, this guy only has one Kidney." Brain responded.

Left Kidney started to break down and cry.

"Too soon man! What the hell is wrong with you? That was really shitty." Large Intestine shouted. 

"Oooh, my bad Left Kidney. Brain fart." Brain apologised.

"Maybe we should take it easy this time around, last time he started smoking when he was drinking and I was full of mucus for a week!" Right Lung said. 

"What fun can a man have without drinking?" Liver suddenly sobered up.

"Lots of fun! A man can read, laugh, dance, sing, love, run, frolic, learn! There is no limitations to what a man can do!" Brain announced.

"Nah that's stupid. Let's just ask Heart what he wants to do."

"Good idea, Balls" Penis said.

"Hey Heart, what do you want to do for your bachelor party?" Eyes asked.

"Oh I don't know. Just ask Penis what he wants to do and we'll have a good night." Heart replied.

"BOO YA! Hey Brain, how does it feel knowing that this dude listens to me more than you?" Penis celebrated.

"Oh shut up, you dick." 

EDIT: Wow, thanks for the response, guys. I'm glad a lot of you found it entertaining. I've replied to a comment below requesting that I do the whole Hangover situation, so if you wanna keep reading then check it out :) |-| 
|-| cnx73f5 || 10 || "*Vessel, alter your trajectory immediately to prevent unauthorised entry of Martian Territorial space.*"

The warning crackled out of a degrading, decades old speaker mounted in the ceiling of the equally rusted control room. We barely heard it over the continuous thumping of the engines, punctuated by an occasional, muffled crash as an engine broke free of it's normal constraints and erupted in a nuclear fireball.

It was fine. We had more.

"*Vessel, as you have failed to alter your trajectory sufficiently, you will shortly be destroyed by the order of the Martian Democratic Council, in violation of element five hundred and fort- zzxk*"

The speaker burnt itself out.

I knew what we were facing, I'm sure that we all did. Far away, the orbital accelerators around Mars would have already began launching slugs at us at a considerable part of the speed of light.

A dim tracking screen lit up across the room, points of red flashing up and vanishing as the sensors struggled to track objects moving much faster than anything they had ever been designed to find.

We barely felt the first impact, perhaps a minor tremble hidden among the roar of the engines. Ahead of us, Mars grew large, cities shining in the darkness of the Martian night, lights not hidden by smog.

An engineer across the room spoke softly, his vocal compensator providing an intelligible, if robotic sounding voice. Like most of us from Earth, his original vocal cords had long been virtually destroyed by the toxins that floated in the air.

"We have lost maybe, two hundred, meters of the shield. This is within what we expected."

The impacts were more frequent now, and, if everything was working like we expected, the ship would be shedding chunks of rock and trash with every impact.

We were close now. Closer than anyone from Earth had ever gotten.

Too close to stop.

I could imagine their panic below, but from up here, even with the constant bombardment, the planet looked serene, and welcoming.

Earth had become sick, damaged, and twisted, and could no longer support us, and when we turned to the very colony we had built, they turned us away.

So we had to improvise, had to survive, and we built a ship just as sick and twisted as the planet we came from.

We took whatever we had left, and combined it all, engines centuries old, metal that had been rusted and discarded long before we even thought of digging it up and mounting it into a space-going ship.

And we buried it all, eight kilometres of ancient reactors and engines and life support and cryonics tubes inside of a thick shield of rock taken from the Earth itself and launched into space on the back of nuclear weapons.

Mars was glowing red and green and blue beneath us when we hit the atmosphere.

Our engines burned and struggled to slow us down, as the ship burned incandescent and the shield fractured, pieces flying off behind us and crashing down onto the Martian surface.

Bulkheads slammed down around the ship, and the cryotubes began to wake up, five hundred thousand of them.

With a crescendoing shriek, the engines finally blew themselves off the ship, but a readout informed me that they had survived long enough to slow us down the point that our impact would not "negatively disrupt the biosphere."

I started smiling.

A series of clunks echoed through the bulkheads as the cryogenics tubes ejected themselves from the ship, spreading themselves across the planet.

As what remained of the ship screamed over the Martian landscape, shedding rock and nuclear fuel and metal and all the framework that had kept us alive across the dark void of space, I started laughing, gleefully, madly.

We're finally coming home. |-| 
|-| cnx73zd || 58 || “Settle down everyone!” Shouted Brain over the din of the excited organs. 
 “Now as you all know, Horatio’s big day is coming up soon and I need everyone to be prepared this time.”  Brain shot a pointed look at Liver, who let everyone down the night of the bachelor party when Horatio pissed blood after a several hours of heavy drinking.  

“In my defense, he had more Jager Bombs than Poland got during the Blitzkrieg-“

“I don’t want to hear it!” Brain snarled, “I don’t care if he chugs a bottle of 151 in one sitting, YOU PROCESS THAT SHIT.”  Liver was silent after that, but continued to pout as Brain went on about more statistics.

“In addition to heavy drinking, we can also expect several other chemicals to be ingested.  Remember the night of the Skrillex concert?” Everyone nodded solemnly.  

“Good, then Heart – you know what to be prepared for.”  Heart shuddered slightly at the thought of the massive amounts of MDMA he would have to put up with.  Heart wasn’t in the best shape after all.

Brain put on his reading glasses and went down the list, checking off everything he thought they would have to be ready for.  He was about halfway through the list when something strange began to happen.

“So, uh guys.  I think we’re all on the same page, but…uh…hehehehahahaHAHAHAHA.”

All of the other organs looked at Brain strangely,
“Sorry, um.  SssssssHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA!!!!”
Brain had completely lost his shit and was rolling around on the floor in hysterics.

“Oh, no.  Looks like Horatio’s been smoking weed again,” said Pancreas.

“Sh-shut up!” Choked out Brain between fits of laughter,

“You’re a v-vestigial organ! BAHAHAHAHAHAH!!!!”

Everyone joined in with the laughter this time, even Liver, who was starting to catch a buzz.  Horatio must have started early this morning.
 |-| 
|-| cnx7fhf || 4 || I looked at the food I had been eating for the last 3 days wondering what was the first meal I'm going to get at Musk. The cafeteria is full of people talking loudly yet I know no one nor I ever will, the ship is from an international company, full of strangers from other countries. In other times I could have used a translating app, but the BotCorps had seized my money and cornered me into poverty and debt taking my Internal OS with it.

It was unfair, but what wasn't in that dammed place.
 
The bots were cruel, they did not know mercy and where more greedy than any human ever was. They found loopholes in the system in seconds and they ultimately took over most the world, with some equally unpleasant exceptions who stayed governed by humans. No one was smarter than them, if you were sued by a bot you were certain you were going to loose everything, unless you hired a bot yourself, which also meant loosing everything unless you were of the few who could afford them, a group getting smaller every year.

In Mars things were different, the sons of colonists were a braver breed, even after the mass migrations. They realized soon enough that bots where the death of civilization and human freedom, they banned the entrance of Conscious AI in 2102 and by the end of the year they had destroyed every single one of them.
They continue to accept Terrians though the desperate masses arrive in the worst of conditions and were disrupting the Martian economy, so praised for it's efficiency and strength.

Get me another plate Karen I said when I finished the decadent meal, food is stronger than me, even mediocre spaceship food.
I waited and then exhaled in frustration. The IOS was gone don't you remember?. I get up, the conversations of these strange people continue to tangle in the intricate sea of foreign words. At least we are arriving soon.

The ship announces our soon arrival in at least ten languages, there, English. We are setting foot on Musk Port in 3 hours.

I decide to leave that last portion and make my way into my seat. It's as comfortable as expected in a low class ship like this but It's been my bed for the trip and a bed was a bed. I have high hopes in finding a life in Musk, immigrants are treated well and you have the right to own a house upon registration.

A job will not be hard to acquire for me, although if it wasn't for my degree, I would be in a more serious situation, you can't be what you could call poor in today's Mars, but if I wan't to return to my old lifestyle I'll have to get some income.

I turn the Interface on. The company's logo appears and then an advertisement trying to convince me to buy IOS insurance. I check the news, Apple bought Android Secure for 2 trillion XCoins, Prime Minister of Europe found guilty of using hacking to corrupt competing bots, Administrators of Musk, New Buenos Aires and Kim Joung are meeting today at the Administrative Palace of Mars.

Nothing interesting, turn off I say as I close my eyes and get comfortable, I'll wake up when we are there. In a few hours my new life will start. I feel myself falling into the blackness of sleep, I'll never see Earth again I remember the feeling of brushing grass under my feet in young afternoons and the smell of river and fresh fish and the red sun between the trees and the silence and the warmth and her amber eyes locked in mine... |-| 
|-| cnx7jzs || 21 || This elevator is taking forever, as it always has, and of course I have to take it all the way to the top. The big man always wants us to meet in his office, the secure shell with the nice view.  I look down at my purple suit, notice a piece of debris and brush it away with the summons still clutched in my right hand. This weekly meeting was different than the norm, we normally receive a wax sealed white letter with the trademarked B, but this envelope was bright red and had the works URGENT written in a grandiose script; the first such in my twenty odd years on the job.  I heave a sigh and notice footfalls behind me, until synchronously the two twins in rusty brown suits appear on each side of me.

“O Hello friend.”  They say in their high pitch tone and where I stand the focus of their duplicate voices causing me to wince. “What do you think this is all about?”

“No idea, but I hope it’s short.”  Giving the twins a stern look.  I do not wish conversation, the work that has been a steady crescendo over the last few years has been my chief focus and this letter I hold does not bode well.

As if by providence, the chime sounds, the doors open and lumber through the doors and stuck to the right corner; allowing just enough room for the twins to fill the left.  I press the button with my stubby finger and we begin the slow climb. 

The twins begin to open their mouths, but as I notice this my gaze alights on them and they recoil back.   We pass the many floors in silence – until the light on our cart signifies that we’re at the penultimate floor and the white doors retreat allowing us the view of the Chief’s office. 

I stare out into a menagerie.  The room is decorated, and checking the date mentally I realize that this is the norm for the anniversary of our conversation.  But what isn’t the normal is the excitement.  Being the last to make the accession, the fellow officers in the room are surging with a palpable energy; speaking loudly and making boisterous and gleeful gestures.  And in the center of it all, the pink fleshy mass of our leader stands with rosy cheeks and a wide smile.  His eyes train to me and the fire in his eyes widens and intensifies. 

“Liver, liver come over! I was just explaining to the rest the good news! And you’re just the man I wanted to see!”  The twins rush to talk to their fellows in the endocrine department – Penis with his long tie and bladder clad in a sickly yellow, as I slowly rumble my way over to the Chief passing Stomach in his pink belching loudly to the green clad Spleen.  The Lungs are in the corner with Esophagus speaking in airy tones.  

“So, my boy.”  He extends his arm around me.  I look at him with disdain – he is chief but we are the same age.  “Do you remember how long we’ve been in business?”

I count the years and remember the fresh days of our youth. “21 – tonight at 10:18pm.”

“Couldn’t be more right, and do you know what that means?”  His query is met with silence.  I may be good with our own origin, but the trivialities of the outside are lost to us in the workroom. 

“We’re finally legal – we’re of that age where we can indulge. Do you know that that means?”

“No.” I say curtly.
 
“It’s party time.  We get to let loose – there will be music, eating” The Stomach yips happily at this, “women” And the Chief winks at the Penis who winks his one eye back.  “And best of all – we get to indulge in alcohol. I’ve picked out a very nice brand of tequila, and oh the Vodka…..”

He continues on but I’m not listening.  Alcohol.  The term while unfamiliar to me strikes a sudden sense of dread. I feel not joyous as the fellows around me, rather a creeping chill fills me and I stand dumbstruck.

“… see you mix it with this energy drink called Red Bull.  But that’s none of your concern – Unfortunately you can’t be involved in our festivities.  See you’ll be busy – I need you down in the workroom this very instant!  Alcohol is your burden, your albatross and there is no escaping it.  Now off you go!”

I‘m suddenly grabbed by the onlookers; their grasping hands reaching for my arms or legs, clawing at whatever they can.  I tried to protest, but my mouth is suddenly silenced by a fleshy hand as they manipulate my soft body towards the elevator.  The throw me in and slam the door with a frenzied maniacal laugh.  I try to get up, but I feel the lurch of the elevator and sudden realization of hopelessness washes over me. The words of the Chief sink in…. My albatross. My cross to bear. 
 |-| 
|-| cnx7pjv || 11 || Paul, 53, white, male.

Sound asleep on his last night at the Princeton Plainsboro Hospital. He dreamed of home and his wife. 

Inside his head, the round table was almost full.

"So, as we all know, tomorrow is New Years Eve. The plan on going to Party Mode is going as expected. There some minor concerns we have to discuss to close it. So, Righteous, Lefty, how are we going on that cough?" 

"B, it is not as easy as you think. John worked in a fucking factory for fuck's sake." 

"Ooh, watch the tongue, Righteous. Dispatch a White Cell Squadron to fix the problem. Lungs must be clear by 14:00 PM." 

"I'm working on the morning #2, Boss. It'll be done." 

"No worries there, Stinky. Heart, how are we on that obstructed artery?" 

"Done, B. Got a message from my team down there that they just cleaned the mess. It is ready for booze and lots of meat." 

"Should be. Guys, we need to be on point tomorrow. Let's celebrate, because we do not know if we will have the chance to celebrate next years." 

"So are we really going through with this, Big B? Without Pancreas John and Liv Liver, this may as well be a suicide mission." 

Brain Boss stood up and stared directly into Kidney 1's eyes. 

"It could be. But I believe in us. This is our chance to do something great for Paul. Let us celebrate, forget the damned war that it has been these last 6 months. Cancer took two of our friends  and countless troops but we stand tall, even still. Let's do this for our broders. 53 years of working together and I couldn't have asked for a better team. I love you all. We are doing this and we are doing it like never before. Are you with me?" 

They looked up to Brain in amazement. He surely knew how to deliver a speech. 

"I SAID ARE YOU WITH ME?" 

The room roared. |-| 
|-| cnx7rzi || 3 || "Are you scared?"

"Yes."

"Good. Fear keeps you alive. Billions of years of your ancestors fighting and dying, and the best of the best lived to have children. Fear is their gift to you."

"I'm going to die, aren't I?"

"Not if you're smart. Not if you embrace your fear. See, these titans? They don't have that. They have rage instead. Bloodlust. They think they're immortal; that nothing can harm them. But you and I know better. If it bleeds, it can die; and everything on this battlefield is gonna bleed."

"But what can I do?"

"Your best. Oh, don't give me that look. It's been good enough before, and it'll be good enough now. You have weapons, you have orders, and you have mortal fear. Now let's go, sooner we get this over with the sooner we can go home." |-| 
|-| cnx84is || 9 || In the orbital command center, Captain Gerron paced the long central  
corridor, closely scrutinizing the work of his supporting staff. The  
command center was a high orbiting station that resembled a large gray   
cross, which bristled with antenna that could detect the smallest refugee  
ships. On a short range scanner screen, Captain Gerron saw a small blue  
dot headed straight for Mars.  
  
"Looks like we got ourselves a runner. Batter up Lieutenant." The Captain  
commanded. "Right away sir. Locking on with short range MB-11 rockets.   
Let's fry them."  
  
It was a dirty and cruel job protecting the green planet below the orbital  
command center, but Captain Gerron had lost all emotion associated with  
the task of destroying incoming space craft. He felt disgusted when he  
identified the derelict looking immigrant spacecraft that would not look  
out of place in a scrap pile.  
  
Gerron had been a part of the last settlers on Mars, and had luckily made  
the cut. Even with his advantageous position of being from a high society  
family, his odds of coming to Mars were about 1 in 10,000. Gerron had to  
leave his loving family behind, and was later adopted by a very wealthy  
mineral miner. Those first nights, Gerron felt completely alone, and had  
imagined his mother singing the family lullaby to him. He worked hard to  
forget his embarrassing Earth past on a daily basis, and soon Gerron  
considered himself only a citizen of Mars. Gerron worked hard in the elite  
GU-9 officer schools and had later quickly risen through the ranks to  
eventually command the orbital command center that protected his planet  
from Earth immigrants.  
  
"Looks like these Immi's can run. Sir we need to engage in the next 30  
seconds if we want to ensure a direct hit." The eager young Ensign  
reported. Captain Gerron coolly advised, "Give them another 20 seconds and  
then blow that ugly ship out of my sector."  
  
"I'm getting a faint transmission sir. I think they want to communicate."  
The signals officer said. "Record it for the intel. I'm not in a  
talking mood right now. Targeting officer, you may fire when ready."  
Captain Gerron commanded in a booming voice.  
  
With great speed, a single MB-11 rocket hit the silver refugee ship, and  
without much of an explosion, tore the ship into small scraps of metal.  
"That's the 411th craft we've hit this year!" The Targeting officer  
cheered. The rest of the crew congratulated each other and then got back  
to work.  
  
Captain Gerron was about to head to the mess hall when curiosity got the  
better of him. He instead paid a visit to the intel section of the ship to  
listen to the message the ship had sent him. Putting on a headset, he  
pressed play, and heard his family lullaby one last time.   |-| 
|-| cnxa275 || 222 || "It's your turn," my wife mumbles as she turns over, half asleep. A little hand is tugging at the coverlet.


"Daddy, there's something scary in my room," Lea, my four year old, is standing at the foot of the bed. She's wearing her white pyjamas, Floppy Joe tucked under her arm. His long ears hang halfway down her legs, one worn thin where she used to put it in her mouth when she was younger. 


"Hey Tiny," I push the coverlet off and step onto the cold wooden floor. "Let's get you back into bed." 


"But there's something in my room," she whispers again. 


The nurse said she'd grow out of it, but this twice-nightly ritual had been going on for almost nine months. I scooped her up and rubbed Floppy Joe's head. 


"How's Floppy?" I said tiredly. "Is he being a good rabbit?" 


"He's not a rabbit," she said. "He's a hare." 


"Sure he is, Tiny." 


I walked the long hallway back to her bedroom. We'd redecorated it when she was two, taking down the blue curtains (we'd been told it was going to be a boy) and putting in a sunny-yellow bed. I put one hand on the door and I feel her stiffen in my arms. 


"It's alright, Tiny. Daddy's here. There's nothing in your room." I push the door fully open and she relaxes immediately. 


"You're right, Daddy," she says softly and I sigh. Twice a night for the last nine months. Our friends who had children at the same time we did have been telling us for years how nice it is to finally sleep through the night. I place her in her bed and pull the quilt over her, making sure Floppy Joe is tucked in next to her. She drops me a quick smile and I kiss her forehead. She's pretty much asleep by the time I stand up. 


I rub my eyes and turn around in the darkness of the room. The yellow blind seems to have shifted slightly against the window frame, and it's letting in a long sheaf of moonlight. It's cast across the bed in a long white line, almost like an arrow. I move to straighten it and the room feels suddenly cold. In the corner, Lea's nightlight (a little rabbit) stutters and goes out completely. The moon passes behind a cloud. 


I turn towards the door and catch my breath. I'm frozen with ice cold fear running through my veins. It looks like a homunculus, a dwarf - *a demon,* my mind says irrationally, framed by the wooden doorway. Then the moonlight shifts again, the silver arrow flashing over the figure waiting for me. 


"Hello Daddy," the little figure walks away from the door, toddling on unsteady legs. I whip round again, but my daughter is still fast asleep in her bed, the rabbit protecting her dreams. It's a child - water dripping in rivulets down their arms and legs. The hair is wet and plastered to their bony skull, all bumps visible. Around their neck is a thin line of bruises, like a purple skipping rope wrapped right around it. 



"I'm your little boy, Daddy. Don't you recognise me?" It comes closer and the water running off his body pools around his little bare feet. He's so cold, so blue. "Mommy gave me a bath, but I'm clean now. I'm clean now. I'll be good. I'll be good, Daddy, I promise." 


His cold hand is stretching towards me. Water is running to the floor. What is this nightmare.  |-| 
|-| cnxad8o || 25 || I tapped my android phone and took a picture as my girlfriend Lydia smiled. I framed her so Luna was on her left shoulder while Ra was on her right. It wasn't often the the two celestial objects were in such a position but their gentle light made this a very romantic night.

I showed her the picture on my phone and she smiled. "Too bad Luna is a half, it would have been cooler if it was full like Ra. Still pretty though."

We kept walking along the beach as the gentle waves washed against the shore. The warm sand squished beneath our feet as the gentle breeze rolled in.

"Why is Ra always full? I've never seen it go through phases like Luna." She wondered aloud.

Her degree was in journalism and mine was in mechanical engineering but i still loved her all the same.

"That's because Ra is a star, like the sun, but Luna is a moon, it orbits the earth. Luna reflects light from the sun so it appears bright but the shadowed side, the dark side, appears dark. Since the position of Luna changes and the shadow moves, it goes through phases." I explained.

"Why isn't Ra as bright as the sun? It's only a bit brighter than Luna."

"Ra doesn't orbit us like Luna, and we don't orbit it like we do the sun. It's actually really far away, way out there past Pluto. Because it's so far, it looks only as bright as Luna. If it were as close as the sun is, it would actually be brighter."

"What does it orbit?"

"Our sun... or more accurately, they both orbit each other. We live in what's called a Binary Star System. Two stars that orbit each other."

She held my hand as we continued walking. She liked it when i explained these things to her, and i liked explaining. We got along great together.

She looked up again at Ra, "I wonder what we would be like if we lived on a world that only had one star, like if Ra didn't exist."

"Probably not much different. We only see Ra at night for six months of the year when our orbit takes us between it and the sun. For the other six months Ra is in the day time sky and it's pretty faint, like Luna is when it's in the day time sky. Notice any big differences during those months and now?"

She smiled, "No, utterly boring. But we wouldn't have romance stories like William Shakespear's 'Ra and Luna'"

This was it, i couldn't hold it in any longer.

"Lydia, wait up a second." I pulled the box out of my pocket. "Lydia, we've known each other for five years. Would you be the Luna to my Ra?"

I opened the box to show her a diamond ring.

Without any hesitation she replied: "No."



 |-| 
|-| cnxam92 || 10 || "Come on!" I shouted back at my tribe "Let's keep moving. It's nearly dusk." 


As one, my family stood, balancing our worldly belongings on the back of our pack animals with care hewn from generations of practice. The twin suns in the sky danced their eternal dance, eclipsing one another again and again as they sunk  toward the horizon. I rose, hefting my own pack with me as I went. It had been a long journey, and there was still a long ways to go. 


I am what my people call a "free spirit." Not in the way you humans do. I am anything but free, myself. Calling me a leader isn't quite right either, though most days I do lead. I am the first of my tribe to get anywhere, and the one who makes all of the important decisions on our journey. But I myself am a slave to their needs. 


You see, my people (if you can even call them that) are an...anomaly...in the galaxy. And I am not talking about our six legs, or even the way our binary star system floods the world with light every other sixty seconds. No, my people are unique because they are the most intelligent, infantile, wondrous lumps of matter within a hundred light-years. 


What sets my species apart is our minds. Not like human minds, not all of us. Independent thought is reserved for a chosen few. For most, everyone is born and dies as part of a collective whole. You see, ours is a telepathic species like no other. Thoughts are our words, we have no true language of our own. It makes us great interpreters, the other sentient races on our world find us to be preferred emissaries, beaming their thoughts to one another without a moment's delay or misunderstanding. But with our blessing comes a great burden. 



You see, all of this living in and out of each other's heads comes with a price. We tend to get...lost. In the Collective. They are still alive, of course. My family is still here, dragging each of their six legs through the sand, lost in thought. But they are not there any more. There is only one mind left. It's mind. And I, as the residential "deaf-mute" have the privelage to guide my absent-minded colony through hundreds of miles of wasteland. Alone.  



I sighed, breathing vapor out of each of my six nostrils. Today's journey is something of a religious one. We are going from our homes, out in the wastes, into the city. Our people's one true home. There, my tribe's minor collection of thoughts will meet up with The Unimind, a mental citadel that has existed since time immemorial. There, their bodies will live out their final days, their minds preserved for all eternity. And I will be free to go where I wish. Perhaps I will set out with another deaf-mute. Start a new tribe in my ancestral home, add our children to a new Collective. 



But for now, I am a slave to a family I never even had a chance to know.  |-| 
|-| cnxaz6o || 22 || I don't know where to start with this but here goes.
Last year I had hardcore sex with a pigeon and my wife left me.
I don't know what compelled me to do it but it seemed like a good idea at the time.
Kelly, my wife, caught me in the act and kicked me square in the nose.
Every now and then I'll look back at old photos of the pigeon and think what could have been.
People say I'm disgusting, one guy from my local store went as far as calling me 'bird raper'.
I don't know if I can take the abuse much longer, it was only 10 or 11 stupid mistakes and it was quite the attractive pigeon.
Endless days and nights of cry fapping to wildlife documentaries just won't cut it anymore, goodbye cruel world. |-| 
|-| cnxb0rc || 25 || "I'm just nervous." Sean said. "We don't know her birth mother. Tomorrow she could . . . blow up the cellar."


Leao laughed quietly into his pillow. "Relax. It's not going to be that bad. It'll take two or three hours, everyone will keep their distance. She understands the drill."


Sean sighed. "How long did your inheritance take?"


"Twenty minutes. Maybe less. I went swimming in the lake. I zapped a few fish, but nothing crazy."


"Did it hurt?"


"No, of course not." Leao propped up on one elbow. "Did yours?"


"No." Sean worried his hands and looked at their bedroom door. "But my sister screamed for two days when she inherited. She told me later . . . she said if the pain hadn't kept her blind and deaf she would have killed herself to make it stop."


Leao sat up, rested his arms on his knees. "You never told me."


Sean offered him a sideways smile. "It's not exactly a fond memory."


"Your mom?"


Sean shook his head. "She's never talked about it." 


"Well, the fact is, we don't know her mother--"


The bedroom door cracked open. A small hand wrapped around the edge. "Daddy? Pappa?" Freha's soft voice filled the space between them.


Sean slid out of bed and opened the door. His daughter held her night shirt up to chew on the hem. "There's something in my room."


Sean pet her head and took her hand. "Come on. Let's chase it out so you can get some sleep." Freha's hand was small and cold. Sean frowned. She occasionally saw monsters in the closet or under the bed, what young child didn't? But she'd never been this cold, before.


Sean pushed her door open and tried to remember if they had another blanket in the hall closet.


Freha whined and hid her face against his thigh. Sean willed light into the room. "Look, Freha. There's nothing--" Sean stiffened there in the hall.


Freha looked into her room and relaxed against him. Of course, she couldn't see it yet. Freha stepped away from her father and Sean tightened his grip on her hand. "Actually, Freha. . ." He knelt at her level and tore his eye from the dark omen above her bed. "Would you like to sleep with Papa and I tonight?"


Her eyes lit up. They hadn't allowed such an indulgence in months. She scrambled down the hall before Sean could change his mind. He wasn't going to. 


Sean willed the light out and quietly closed Freha's bedroom door.


When Sean climbed back into his own bed, Freha had already snuggled in under the covers and was nearly asleep. Leao gave him a soft side-eye. "Did she give you puppy eyes?"


"There's a dougun over her bed."


Leao hissed, "What? Here?"


Sean put a hand on his husband's shoulder. "Don't. It was just watching. I didn't want her alone with it, is all."


Leao looked down at his daughter and back up at Sean. "How powerful is she?"


Sean slid down into the covers, "At least as powerful as my sister. They seemed drawn to her."


Leao groaned into his pillow. "What are we supposed to do, then?"


"Nothing right now. Sleep--"


"Yeah right."


"And we'll deal with it in the morning." Sean reached over Freha to grip Leao's shoulder. "We'll deal with it."


"Can your sister come over?"


"I'll talk to her in the morning."


Leao nodded. Then nodded again like he was trying to convince himself of Sean's words. They lay in bed, each of them pretending to sleep.


Just before dawn, the dougun drifted from Freha's room into theirs. |-| 
|-| cnxb30v || 103 || A small hand taps Sarah's elbow. She tries to pretend it's just a dream. Maybe if she doesnt open her eyes, then the damn kid will go back to her room. Not that that ever works.

"Mommy," a tiny voice whispers. "It's in my room again."

Sarah groans and sits up. Her daughter's minature form silhouettes against the drab yellow light from the hallway nightlight.

"Honey, there's nothing there," she says. Sleep makes her voice resemble a cement mixture. "We talked about this yesterday. And the day before."

The tiny hand taps in hurried rhythm on the wrinkled duvet.

"Pleeease?"

Sarah rubs her eyes with aching fingers. She comes from a long line of heavy sleepers. Her sister's kids all sleep like rocks. Itty bitty Emma is the one damn exception in the whole family and everyone agrees it's karma for sneaking out as a teenager.

"Ok. Then back to bed. Deal?"

She sees Emma's head bob in agreement, not that her it counts for shit. But she's only five, so it's not like it her word is her bond or anything.

Sarah kicks off the blankets and lowers her feet to the floor, weaving her toes in the filthy carpet. Why couldnt she have found a place with hardwood floors? Or bamboo? What she'd give for the ability to clean up Emma's messes with having to pull out the shampooer.

Emma wraps her hand around Sarah's pinky and ring finger. Her hands are sticky, but they're always sticky. It's like she's hiding a jar of honey under her bed or something.

"Let's go look in your closet, Emma. You'll see there's no one there, no one whispering, no one watching." She stands and uses the bedpost for support until her legs wake up. "Then we can both get some sleep."

They walk down the hall with short shuffling steps. The nightlight illuminates the tips of Emma's rats-nest hair, but her face remains in shadow. Sarah can't help but wonder if it holds a smug grin, the little girl dominating the big adult, giver of timeouts.

She sighs and shakes off her dour mood. Interrupted sleep is her kryptonite, but it's not Emma's fault. It's a phase and it will pass, just like teething and toilet training.

The door screeches on its hinge. Sarah makes a mental note to oil it, adding to an ever growing list of house fixes she never gets to.

"You'll see honey," Sarah says as she gropes for the light switch, "there's no such-"

She freezes, a tiny gasp escaping in little squeaks. Propped up against the closet's door frame, Emma's corpse oozes its final drops from a deep slash running ear to ear. A large maroon puddle soaks the carpet in a swath covering half the room, with a small set of prints leading out into the hallway.

"Oh," Emma says with a giggle, then tugs on Sarah's fingers with a hand tacky with drying blood. She looks up at Sarah with a pair of oily black eyes. "I guess I got her after all." |-| 
|-| cnxb682 || 6 || "Get up with the sun." My dad always said that when he wanted me to get up and out. You never know what you'll miss when someone is gone. I suppose life and death just are. In a perfect world we wouldn't have to deal with heartbreak. My dad would say there is no such thing as a perfect world and that we should enjoy what we have. Perfect or not, he will always be in my dreams.
________________________________
Thanks for reading! If you liked this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy. |-| 
|-| cnxb7n9 || 95 || I stood there, mouth agape, staring at it. It was sitting, no squatting, atop my daughters bookcase. It stared right back at me. I tried to move my arms, to pull my baby girl behind me, but the fear had taken hold of my will, leaving me powerless over my own body. 

"Daddy, what's wrong?"

She didn't see it, couldn't see it. Her eyes were blind to that which she had never known. Its head slowly tilted, its face frozen in that terrible grin. Still I could not move. My daughter moved in front of me, her beautiful green eyes peering out from under a brow furrowed in confusion. Those eyes she had gotten from her mother had never seen me in a state of fear before, so she had no idea why daddy wasnt talking, wasnt moving. Behind her, it began to crawl down the bookshelf.

"Daddy what is it?"

 I must be going crazy. Crazy or dreaming. But this was far too real for a dream, and even im not imaginative enough to fabricate this delusion. Finally i mustered the will to speak, even if I could do nothing else. My words were halting, stuttering as my breath struggled to emerge.

"N-n-nothing sweetheart. C-come give daddy a hug."

I didnt crouch so much as allow my legs to give way under me. My arms outstretched to recieve my surviving child and wrap her in a protective embrace. She may have thought it was love, but i was acting out of fear. It had reached the floor and come to stand a few feet behind my daughter just as she ran to me, burying her face in my neck. My arms held her tight as my hand cradled the back of her head. I stared over my daughters shoulder into its eyes. It stood just as tall as my precious child, its skin dry and leathery, stretched across bones long dead. 

This had to be a delusion. There is no way it could be what i was so cetain that it was. But there was no mistaking those eyes. It's teeth parted behind lips dead for so long they could no longer close, to make way for a voice that was halfway between wheezing inhalation and whistling wind, its word a hollow imitation of my daughter, a word it hadn't had time to learn.

**DAAAADDYYYY**

"I love you daddy."

My daughters words were muffled against my neck. She hadn't heard it, the way it mimicked her love, making that word into what felt like a curse. Still I could not look away from its eyes, the eyes I knew so well. I saw those eyes every time I looked in the mirror, and now they stared back at me from a face frozen in the hellish grin of death. I could not frighten my child though. I could not let her know what was happening, so I forced a reply.

"I love you too Catherine."

Even as I said the words, I could not tear my eyes away from this apparition, my wife's killer, standing before me. It's head tilted once more, this time clearly curious, but beyond that it did not move. Those terrible blue eyes just watched as I struggled inside, the perfect imitation of childlike innocence.

"Goodnight daddy. Sweet dreams."

"Goodnight sweetheart, sleep tight."

My words sounded hollow to me as little Catherine tore herself from my weak embrace. She climbed into her bed, totally oblivious as she passed by it. It and I just stared at one another for a moment. It turned and followed my little girl, its dessicated arms pulling itself up onto the bed next to her. I was frozen in fear as it crawled up next to my daughter, draping it's dead limbs over her protectively, its eyes still firmly fixed on mine. She didn't seem to notice. I barely managed to stand, backing towards the door. As my trembling hands fumbled for the doorknob, its teeth parted once more to speak, confirming what i had known all along to be true.

**I....** **LOOOOVE....** **YOOOUU.....** **DAAAADDYYYY.....**

My next words were barely a whisper as I pulled the door shut.

"I love you too... son..." |-| 
|-| cnxba26 || 21 || &gt; [WP] Your daughter wakes you up in the middle of the night insisting there's something scary in her room. You go with her to check it out and prove she's just imagining things. After you turn on the light, she doesn't see anything out of the ordinary and calms down. You're frozen with fear.

"Daddy, I heard the noise again!" Molly exploded into my room during the ink-stained early morning. What time was it, one, two, three? The fog of sleep obscured my thoughts and blurred my vision. Cotton-brained and bleary-eyed, I sat up, fighting the gravity of Jupiter pulling me towards my mattress.

"Come here, baby." I reached out and wrapped her in my arms. Her breath, rapid, warmed my ear, and the tears welling from her eyes began to collect on my beard. I hated the nightmares. Was it ever fair? Not only did they plague me as a child, but they had to come for my kid, too. Before Sarah had passed, we'd gone from doctor to doctor trying to see if there was a treatment, a therapy, a medication, anything, that could keep our daughter from her nightly terrors. Once Molly and I were on our own, I'd resigned myself to living as an agent of damage control instead. And it worked okay, I guess. Who needs sleep, anyway?

As Molly had gotten older, the nightmares had become more and more scarce. However, they seemed to become more severe, although I was never sure if that was because we losing our desensitization, or if Molly's mind was making up for the infrequency somehow. As she trembled in my embrace, I could tell that this episode had been as bad, if not worse, than usual.

"What happened this time?"

"Mommy came back, and Daddy, she was so lonely!"

I could feel my porcelain heart shattering. She had been doing so well, I had thought. She didn't need this. I didn't need this. *We* didn't need this. I pulled back from the hug so I could look into her eyes.

"Molly, honey, Mommy is in heaven now. She doesn't have to come back, she can keep us company from there."

"Mommy doesn't think so."

I ratcheted my hug around her again, holding onto her for dear life, trying to squeeze the unkindness out of life. My own tears formed as I wished that the years would pass us by and that Molly would better understand someday.

I wiped my eyes and poured myself out of the bed, Molly's hand in mine. The time had come to check her room for monsters, ghouls, and ghosts, then send her to sleep. I think that with any other child, I would have simply let her sleep in my bed, but Molly kicked, and rolled, and crawled. Insomnia took a distant second place to Molly's somnambulist martial arts.

Molly lead the way, pulling at my wrist with determination. Gone was the whimpering, replaced with a grim frown that reminded me too much of her mother.

"You have to talk to Mommy."

"Honey, it doesn't work that way."

Still she dragged me down the hall. We got to her bedroom door, the darkness spilling out from a crack. She swung the door open. With a sigh, I flipped the lightswitch.

"Huh. Mommy's not here, Daddy."

My eyes scanned the room. Nope. No ghosts, no mommies here. I grabbed Molly and hoisted her onto the bed, trying not to let the frustration and the lack of sleep show on my face. Grey hair was already starting to creep in at my temples.

"Do you see? Mommy just has to watch from heaven, she doesn't have to come down."

"She came down anyway."

"Honey, please, please, please go to bed. I promise that everything is okay. We can talk in the morning when we eat before school, okay?"

I reached to turn the light on her bedside table off. Right before I heard the switch *click* and the light went out, I caught a glimpse of something that should never have been there. I switched the light back on, but it was gone.

"What's wrong, Daddy?"

"Nothing, baby. Daddy just wanted to double-check for monsters. There aren't any. Good night"

I was a hundred and ten percent certain that we had buried my wife with her wedding ring.

Now, I'm not so sure. |-| 
|-| cnxbsap || 4 || You could see it begin on YouTube.  The shoddy, portrait-framed, shaky-cam footage of the apocalypse.

“Hold it up.  Up high.”  The man off camera instructing the overall-wearing hick-stress what to do with the smoking meteor.  

“It’s hot.”  She tries to pick it up but drops it.

“Well, o course it’s gonna be hot, it’s from space, innit?”  The camera turns around to see the man’s nostril hairs and missing teeth.  “I own it.  Y’all government can’t take none-a-vit.”

It cuts out there.


The hospitals weren’t ready.  It didn’t present like a mystery illness, it looked like anything else.  Cough, if you breathed it.  Stomachache if you ate it.  Always a fever.  Take blood pressure, temperature, that little clip that goes on your finger.  

“How do you feel?”

“Bad.”

“Antibiotics.  Next.”

Then they would come back.  Worse.  People with insurance good enough to get X-rays found little black masses growing inside them.  They would take biopsies and cut them in half, and by the next morning, both of the halves would be the size the whole started as.  Surgery couldn’t get them all.  Then they had to give them beds.  They just started trying different medications, off label.  Anything.  Then there were no more beds to give.

The usual died first.  Babies and the elderly.  Cats and dogs.  Birds by the thousands.  All with black masses sticking out of their skin.  Bubbles, odd angles, shapes, designs.  The grass and trees still grew.  Maybe faster, maybe slower.  Nobody was really paying attention at that point.   Governments tried to keep it from spreading.  Locking borders and shutting down airports.  It worked, for a bit.  Then some people claimed this was God’s work.  The called the disease the ‘second flood.’  It would have been fine if they kept to themselves, but they made it their mission to get everyone.  They stole and flew planes full of sick people out of quarantine.  Some got shot down, some didn’t.

Eventually there wasn’t a place on earth that didn’t have a little of the flood.  It’s just a matter of time now.  If it’s you.  If you are a people and you find this.  If you somehow manage to learn our language and read our books, this is for you.  This is how you beat us.  This is how you won. 
 |-| 
|-| cnxbyoj || 20 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnxcv1r || 7 || Today was a good day. Was brilliant weather and fine food. A local befriended me, mess that I am, lost me chatting about local culture and foods. Hoglin looked a lot like him; complete down to the clothing. Bust up further in town; police arrived there so quickly it was unbelievable. Searching around as I write this, leaving nothing to chance. |-| 
|-| cnxcytz || 46 || My dearest Maria,

I write to you this morning, as I look out my bedroom window on the beautiful, sun-kissed grounds, to tell you what a wonderful plase this hospital truly is.  Although I miss you dearly, the feel of the snd beneath my feet as I stroll along the beach, the wonderfully hlp-full staff, and the incredible company of the other patients transforms this place into paradise on Earth.  And the food!  Unlike anything you’ve ever tasted! Thy’re chefs are incredible, true artists.  

Although I long to see your beautiful smile once more, I would most certainly feel ating of remorse having to remove myself from a single day of pleasure here at Shady Meadows.  Please give my best to veryone back home.

Yours truly,

Roman
 |-| 
|-| cnxd5qt || 4 || You see, this is a little bit difficult for me. Are there any people out there that see the real me? Wasting my life away working a shitty 9-5 job for pay that is well below what I deserve. Your simple minds see me as just another one of you. Time will show that I am nothing like you, and that time will be soon, if you do enough research. Reading up on extra-terrestrial life would probably speed up your research process. This is going to be fun for me to watch, and I cannot wait to see which one of you redditors it is that finds out who I am. Post your suspicions and theories as a comment to this and I will tell you if you are getting hotter or colder. It's not going to be easy. Total time to complete is 45 human years. Bullshit salami toaster waffle brick potato duck. LOL |-| 
|-| cnxd8il || 31 || A massive yellow suited being, not anything humanoid, was staring right at me. It's massive yellow arms and three red glass eyes staring straight at me, motionless. Emily had already crawled back in bed and was somehow fast asleep, not a care in her world. But this creature was very real, and its intentions were unknown to me.

"You can take me, but leave my daughter. She has done nothing wrong."

"We don't want your daughter, sir. Please, come with us; Number 1 is expecting you." a crackling voice sounded from the being's communicator. I was both intrigued and alarmed at this, but I was ready to do anything for my daughter. It opened the closet door behind it and motioned for me to follow as I stepped through the blinding light into a factory style floor, as big as a football field. The ground was cold on my bare feet as I stared around the smooth walls and spacious interior of the room. A large rainbow colored sign in letters above a massive flat screen were visible. Mike and Sully's Monster's Inc.?

"Number 1 is here; standby for entry," one of the yellow suited creatures said. They went rigid, standing at a position of attention much like our armed forces in America do. Suddenly, a massive slug slid through a pair of doors behind the desks that stood on the opposite side of the open staging floor. 

"Hello Terrance," said a lazy old voice. 

"Hello? I'm afraid I'm at a disadvantage here, ma'am. I don't believe we've met before," I responded, shocked that she knew my name.

"We know all about you Mr. Catterbin: you were always an athletic type and loved to help people. You're extremely selfless and throw your life on the line to save others to an extent that it almost seems like you enjoy it. Your work in the military and CIA is most impressive..." the slug began.

"Ok, so you know a very disturbing amount about me." I said, now beginning to relax. They obviously needed me for something, which explains the creature not carrying anything outside my daughter's closet, but these guards around me all holding strange devices and packs.

"My name is Roz; I'm the commander of the CDA, the Child Detection Agency. Our job is to make sure children don't get into our world, because grown ups cannot see us under most circumstances. But a child's mind is so young it has yet to block out the site of Monsters, so they can still see us."

"But then how can I see you?" 

"You're so protective of people you love that you unconsciously forced yourself to see what the threat was because you couldn't. You knew your daughter was afraid but you were not convinced because you yourself couldn't see it." Roz said, giving an ugly smile. "Which brings me to the point where you can now see us. Your child is special." 

"Of all the children, my child?" I said, rolling my eyes.

"Don't think you're the only one, but you met very special qualifications, most of all self control. We've almost all but given up on the southern portions of your country. Even their children sleep with firearms; I can't imagine what it would have been like scaring kids now."

"So you make kids laugh? That's rather nice if you could do that earlier in the morning." I chuckled a bit.

"You're very intuitive, Mr. Catterbin. We used to power everything off the screams of children, but when you think about it that sounds rather sadistic. Now we enter a child's room and make them laugh, but were now at the problem we've been having." Roz said.
 
"I already understand." I said quickly. It's obvious; children are not as entertained anymore. Computers, video games, television, phones, the list goes on. They're getting older the younger they get. A ten year old in the 70's would be a five year old today. "But I don't know what I can do. Society in our world is always changing and I have only heard about your world in the stories my wife told me. I never thought any of them were real..."

"They were real, but they will remain stories. However there is hope, because there's always hope: keep raising you child the right way. People will follow and in time your children will learn how to laugh again, just like your daughter," Roz said taking a slimy hand and resting it on my arm. "Also, before you go, there's two gentlemen here that would like to meet you."

"Two? wait, you cannot be talking about..." I began but I stopped myself. A small green ball with legs and arms and a massive center eye was joined by a immense blue wall of fur. They both had ties on, which made me laugh internally but all I could do was smile to prevent myself from breaking down. They were real; all the stories of a whole world populated by Monsters that my wife told me and my daughter. I could not believe what I was seeing but it was all very real and just like how she described it. Rather incredible how much she remembered when she was just 4 years old.

"Uhm....Hi," said Sullivan, coming to stop in front of me and giving a weak wave before putting his massive hands behind his back.

"Hey how's it going," Mike said putting out a hand. I stared at it blankly, then pulled him for a hug. I felt this was the most appropriate spontaneous gesture since my wife was always such a big hugger. Sulivan came over and pulled all of us into a massive hug, lifting me as I lifted Mike off the ground before setting us all down.

"So....how's Boo?" Mike said first, a bit nervous.

"She's the best person anyone could hope for; she tells stories of your world, and I never believed any of them now. Hard to deny the truth now, huh?" I said laughing. We all laughed in unison, with Mike and Sullivan now looking more relieved to hear their friend was doing well.

"Number 1, it's time," said a CDA agent. She nodded at me, and I nodded back, getting one last look at Mike and Sullivan. They waved goodbye as I stepped through the door and was met with the same blinding flash of light as I stepped back into my daughter's room, the door quietly closing behind me. I didn't bother checking to see if lead to their factory floor again, knowing they would have closed the other end. I smiled and kissed my daughter on the forehead as she smiled in her sleep and turned out her room light. It looked like not a minute had passed as I stepped back into my wife's room and slipped back under the covers as she moaned in her sleep slightly. 

"Boo?" I said, staring at the ceiling.

"Yes, dear?" she said, tired and grumpy.

"Mike and Sully say hello. Roz says to keep up the good work." She shuffled around and I turned toward her, he eyes staring into mine. She was smiling and her eyes had begun to water as she pulled me into a warm hug, and I knew from that point on our family was going to be perfect. |-| 
|-| cnxdc2s || 19 || Dad was always strict in my house growing up. Maria, my best friend, was always a little unsettled by him and his constant obsession with rules. He’d always be telling me “Behave yourself” with such an intense look that you might think he was joking. Kids in our neighborhood would run by our house shouting cruel nicknames for him. “Mister Frankenstein”, “Boogeyman”, stuff like that.

Mulling it over now, I wonder if it hurt his feelings. Little thought was spared about his feelings when I was growing up, sadly. We’d be playing, Maria and I, and he’d burst in when we became too noisy, sharply telling me “behave yourself!” while staring at me with cold eyes. Had I thought about it, I might have been more considerate of him, but who thinks about these sorts of things as a kid?

Maria and I were inseparable. Back then, we were best buds. Her chirpy mood would always cheer me up when the old man had just taken me to task with one of his usual “Behave yourself” remarks. I eventually made a game of my dad’s interruptions, and the two of us would guess when he’d barge in. Maria at first told me to stop joking about it, but that just made me tease her more, and eventually she joined in.

Habitually we’d meet every day to spend time together, oblivious to what was happening between us, but in retrospect I can say that she and I were falling in love. Every now and then, we’d be laughing and playing, and then her hand would brush against mine, and it was like electricity flowing through my skin. She was beautiful, and as we both grew into our teenage years her beauty only deepened. Black hair as smooth as silk, stunning green eyes, and skin so soft that I dreamed of feeling her embrace.

Vividly, I remember the fateful afternoon that would be our last. We were at my place, and my folks were out on some errand. Days like this would happen every now and then where we would have some time alone, but this was different. On this day, as we were talking and laughing, she leaned in close to me, and brought her lips to mine. Such joy and excitement flowed through me, and as we embraced, I knew that she was everything that I had ever wanted. Her hands were shaking out of nervousness as she began to remove her blouse, and as her full, sumptuous breasts were revealed to the air, for the briefest of moments I was the happiest person in the world.

Suddenly, my dad burst into the room, having gotten back without us noticing the sound of the car driving up. He stared at the two of us with the most intense, angry eyes I have ever seen, and Maria was so terrified and embarrassed that she covered herself and ran from that house before I could stop her, crying in shame and horror, clearly traumatized by a wonderful moment turned to one of pure horror.

Til the end of my days, I will always be saddened by the thought that whatever she saw in my dad’s eyes that day scared her so fiercely that she ran away from home, never to be heard from again, not by her parents, not by me. For years, I was overwhelmed by my sadness, and when my dad saw what I was thinking of, he would grin a nasty grin and chuckle “Behave yourself”.
 |-| 
|-| cnxdxsx || 4 || It's been nearly a year since the incident. It's behind us now, it's become a crime to even talk about it. And if you do, you'll disappear. If you do get killed, kidnapped, or any other atrocity is inflicted upon you for bringing it up, nobody knows for sure what it is. It's a mystery, but out there, someone is watching our every move.

I don't have much time now. You nee-

 |-| 
|-| cnxdxzh || 18 || It was a normal day when we found it. We weren't sure what it was when it first showed up on our scans, and since it wasn't coming to Earth we didn't worry too much. It was going to miss us by several thousand miles. What really caught our attention was the metallurgical makeup. Whatever it was, it was made of something that we had never seen before on our scans.

A week later it changed course. I've never seen everyone at our facility at the same time. Even our director came to the control room, he was nearly hysterical. He kept asking what was happening, but no one had any ideas. We continued to track it.

Another week passed before the head honchos wanted to discuss safety. Should we alert NORAD? Why hadn't we yet? Well it might be our break. Maybe whatever it was pick up on our scans and was coming to us. What if it was a hostile ship? But the scans showed that it was so small...

We decided to not tell anyone. And I'm glad we didn't.

It landed less than a month after we detected it. And only if landing can be described as "crashing into a section of our facility and destroying millions of dollars worth of equipment". Fortunately no one got hurt. 

I was one of the first people there. It just looked like a beaten metal sphere. I tapped on it. instead of plinking link when you knock on metal it hummed slightly. It started vibrating for a second then stopped. Then two words appeared on the curved surface:

"Help me" |-| 
|-| cnxeh0c || 4 || *CRASH!*  I'm wide awake, my dog is barking at the front door, and I'm already shaking.  I grab my keys, walk over to the vault, and unlock it, pulling out the revolver, making sure it's loaded.  I take a deep breath, and let it go.  

Rufus stops barking as I walk over to the front door.  "Lay down, Rufus.  I got this," I say, with a shaky voice that doesn't quite seem my own.  

*I live in the middle of nowhere.  It can't be burglars.  I don't even have anything good to steal!*  

The door creaks loud as a clocktower, and trying to shut it slower just makes it worse.  I see some smoke out in the field, and perhaps a small fire.  There's a fire extinguisher next to the front door, so I go back and grab it.  

The fire isn't too bad, and I put it out quickly.  And get a good look at... *What the hell *is* that?*  

It's pretty big, I can tell that.  As the smoke clears, I see that it's made of gold, and steel.  It seems to be damaged in someway, but that was probably from the fall.  I reach out, and touch it with the gun.  And then I hear a rumble, or more like a low hum.  Lights start to come on all over the craft.  And then the lights start to stretch out, like small beams of light, ending in a point, which seems rather bright.  It's like a hologram, or something, and I'm starting to just stare in awe.  I pinch myself, but it doesn't stop.

But soon, the lights start to move, and point to different places.  Eventually they coalesce, and become on large beam of light... which seems to *zoom* in.  And then there it is.  The Milky Way, in all its glory.  I'd recognize the spiral arms anywhere.  

The lights zoom back through one particular part on the arm, and it shows a our solar system.  I recognize Jupiter, and Saturn.  The lights move more, and show the Earth, and then zoom into the point on where we were, right in the middle of the midwest US.  

After staying on it for a few minutes, it zooms far out to the Milky Way again.  Then that zooms out even more.  It moves to a different galaxy, one that I wasn't familiar with.  It zooms into a cluster of stars in that galaxy, showing another solar system.  On it are planets similar to Mars, and Venus.  Dead rocks, orbiting a red-white sun.  It moves through the planets, until it gets to the fourth from the sun.  It's a pretty planet, blue and green.  After focusing on that image, the light show faded away.  

And then it spoke.  

 |-| 
|-| cnxem3k || 3 || A cold day in September. Another hunched grey figure lurches across a cold, empty street. The shuffling sound his feet make echoes throughout the empty gloom. Surrounding the man is an empty space that feels malignant. His dying hands clutch a small leatherbound book. The weathered pages inside hold backwards memories  that have tumbled from the man's pen to the stiff paper below it. And still a bird sits on his shoulder. |-| 
|-| cnxeud1 || 7 || "Before we get into the thick of things, I think we should take a moment to honor those who are no longer with us. Let us all remember Tony and Tonya Tonsil, taken from us twelve years ago this past September..."

"It was for the best," Holly Heart whispered to Lou Lung "the poor dears were in *such* agony. Always inflamed..."

"I know." Lou whispered back "I was right next door. Put them out of their misery, it did...still a shame though. I hear they were put in a glass jar and kept atop the dresser..."

"Lou, could you at least wait until after the moment of remembrance to chit chat? It's dreadfully rude." Brian Brain snapped.

"But Holly--"

"Moving on," Brian interrupted "Let us also remember Gary Gallbladder--"

A loud wail came from the back of the room, followed by the sounds of hysterical sobbing.

"Poor Penny Pancreas. She and Gary had been together for as long as I can remember." Holly whispered to Lou. "Attached at the ducts, those two...and then once he's gone she finds out he'd been three-timing her with Debbie Duodenum *and*--" her voice lowered even further "Larry Liver."

"I had no idea!" Lou gasped. He'd always thought Gary to be an upstanding bloke.

"Lou! Do you have no modicum of respect? Save it for later!" Brian scolded harshly. 

"Holly was--!"

"I don't care! You can flirt later on your own time!" Brain turned to Holly. "I know you're in the right place Holly, but please just ignore Lou if he tries to converse with you again."

"Okay!" She said brightly. Lou looked ready to hyperventilate.

"As I was saying before I was interrupted, *again*" Brian plowed ahead "Gary Gallbladder, removed just six months ago."

A moment of reverent silence followed. Aside from Penny, of course, who was--oddly enough--being comforted by the soft murmurs of Debbie and Larry.

"Now that we're through with the formalities, let's start this meeting proper." Brian announced "First and foremost on the agenda: the upcoming party..."

A symphony of noise rose up, some of it cheers and some of it groans.

"Yes, yes. Now let's start preparing and run through everyone's respective duties. We all need to work together, especially in these types of situations. Now if you'll all turn to the pie chart behind me..."

"There's pie!?" A voice called excitedly.

"Not that kind of pie, Mr. Stomach." Honestly, Steven and his pies...

"Well well well. What have we here?" An obnoxiously smug voice called out. Brian froze mid motion, and then turned slowly, a distinctly unpleasant grimace lining his features.

"Peter." He said, straining to keep the distaste from his voice. "Tess. Tee." He continued, nodding to the two lackeys that followed Peter's every beck and call.

"I told yous before. My name ain't 'Peter' no more. It's Bigs. Bigs Johnson."

"Yea!" The twins chorused in a high pitched nasally voice "It's Bigs. Bigs Johnson."

"Dat's right." Bigs said. "And yous started the meetin' without us. We's feelin' a little insulated."

"I think you mean insulted." Brian corrected.

"Ey! If I says insulated, I mean insulated!"

"Yea! Insulated!" The twins repeated.

"Well in any case, I'm sure the message just got lost in the nervous system..."

It had not, in fact, been sent at all. Peter had at one time been small and polite, performing his duties with admirable dedication. Once he had hit his teens, that changed. He grew, as did his ego. Nowadays he did whatever he could to get his own needs met, uncaring of the problems he created for others in his pursuits.

To put it crudely, he'd turned into quite the dick.

"Well, seein' as I'm a forgivin' kinda guy, I forgive yous. But I have somethin' I'd like ta say."

"...Very well." Brian said reluctantly. Every organ had the right to be heard, even ones he didn't like. Denying Bigs--Peter--the chance to speak would only end badly.

"I'm thinkin' maybe someorgan else ought ta be in charge of dis party. I'm thinkin' dat someorgan ought ta be me."

"Yea! Ought ta be me!" The twins shouted. Everyorgan turned to look at them, at which point they realized their mistake. "Him!"

"That's preposterous!" Brian yelled. "I've *always* been the one in charge! I'm the only thing keeping everyorgan in working order!"

"Oh? Is dat so, and why is dat? Do yous think yous better den da rest of us?"

At the accusation a soft grumbling broke out amongst the other organs.

"No, of course not! I'm just the most qualified!" 

This wasn't good. Peter had never made such a blatant attempt at grabbing power before. Thus far he'd been content to push the boundaries.

"Oh really? Cuz I think someorgan who only uses ten percent of demselves is either stupids or lazy."

Gasps ran throughout the room, and to his horror Brian could see a lot of organs nodding.

"That's not even true! It's a total myth--"

"Mythtake? I think sos too. I think I could be runnin' things a whole lot betta. There ain't no partta me I don't use."

"Don't listen to him!" Brian pleaded. "He's just fooling you!"

"I ain't foolin'. Ifs yous let me run this party, it's gonna be a paaaar-taaaay! Dere's gunna be no rules!"

A boisterous cheer erupted from some of the organs.

"Dere's gunna be fun!"

A louder cheer. 

"Dere's gunna be pie!"

"PIE!" Steven screamed.

"Dere's gunna be holes!"

The cheers started, but then stopped.

"What kind of holes?" Kenny Kidney asked confusedly.

"My brothas and sistahs, if it be tight, it be alright."

Every single organ was cheering by this point, and Brian knew he had lost. There was nothing else he could do.

"Very well..." he said feebly. Tess and Tee shoved him off the stage, and Peter--Bigs--took his place.

"Now dis is what we's gunna do..." |-| 
|-| cnxexra || 12 || Wake up. The light is telling you it's time to get up. Rise and shine.

What do you mean why? You're supposed to, that's why! It dosen't matter if you don't have anything to do. Wake up. Don't ask questions just do it. 

OK you feel that pulsing in your head? Pay attention. It's not quite a headache. You know that feeling when you get a vaccine and you feel a cold rush of fluid into your arm? It's like that.

The left side, moron.

Good. That's gonna be with you all day, every day. That's how the world tells you that you're a fuck-up. Don't question it, because it's true. You don't deserve the right to question that statement. 

I said stop questioning. You can't even take simple directions, no wonder why you're unemployed. 

Good. Technically you're supposed to be eating, but eating is for productive citizens. We're gonna go ahead and review all the embarrassing things you've ever done in your life instead. That's what's lined up for the next few hours. 

Actually, lets masturbate instead. 

..........

I wasn't done yet. Why'd you stop? See this is the whole problem with you. You're a failure on so many levels. Lets look at all the groups in the world and how you fail on every one of them. You're a failure to your gender. You're a failure as a citizen. You're a failure as a child. I could go on. In fact let's go on about that for a while. 

See big picture? You can do that can't you? You are so small and the world is so much bigger and better. Feel the weight of society on you. Feel the weight of the expectations. Don't try lifting it off, don't focus on the small things. You don't deserve success because if you did you would be successful. 

No. Put down that medicine. You don't deserve to get better. Stop it. You don't deserve it. You should be drowning in the message because that's what you deserve. Stop it ^stop^it ^^stop^^it ^^^no... 



 |-| 
|-| cnxf32o || 5 || Do *NOT* fly Malaysia Airlines |-| 
|-| cnxf7j8 || 16 || Mother smiled at me as I sat down next to her for breakfast.  She tried to hide the tension, but we both knew what was coming tomorrow. This would be our last breakfast together for a long while. Probably forever. 

“Lyda gave us some bacon, your favorite,” she offered, too brightly. I smiled, trying to hide my fear for her. It wasn’t her fault any more than it was mine. We chewed in silence. Real meat was a rarity, unless you were a Soldier. So I guess after tomorrow, I could have all the breakfast bacon I wanted. 

A letter slid under the doorway to our lodging. The brown, thin paper held my assignment. My future, my fate I suppose, if you believe in that sort of thing. We looked at each other, neither moving toward it at first. 

Mother reached over and grasped my hand briefly, and then stood to retrieve the document. 

“Wait,” I cried. “Let’s… let’s just finish breakfast first. Please,” I pleaded. My tears got the best of me. Mother put her hand on the back of my head, stroking my ponytail, and nodded. She sat back down in her seat. 

I couldn’t eat anything else, so I just sipped my coffee. It had a tinny flavor, like everything else in this place. Dad used to tell Mother that the food in the Starfighters was much better. It tasted like earth. Not like the mines, where all of us non-soldier personnel were housed. 
I hate everything here, but I don’t want to be there either. I can’t fight. That’s not to say I’m not capable- I hold my own with mech and piloting. But I freeze up under pressure. Not really a great skill of a soldier. I’m last in the class on everything else except sword-fighting. A lot of good that does in space. They only teach it so that we can understand the trials of our ancestors. It’s a dead method.

After 10 minutes of more silence, more chewing and sipping, Mother spoke. “It’s time, Marin.” She rose again, grabbing her crutch as she hobbled to the door. She reached for the letter, and a sob escaped me. 

“You’re almost 14. Time to learn to control your emotions. They won’t do you any good up there,” Mother chided.  Her heart wasn’t in it though. I guess she knew the futility of telling a 14 year old girl not to be emotional. 

13 years and 364 days, actually. 

The letter rattled in my mother’s hand. She placed it on the steel tabletop in front of me. I shut my eyes for a moment, trying to memorize how I felt right then, before I was declared. Assigned. Fated.

That stupid word again.

I opened my eyes, and forced myself to scan the page. 

“This can’t be right.” 

I was assigned to the Jumping squadron. One of the more elite groups, it focuses on exploration of time. They try to find a way back, to stop the War before it starts.  Most think it's the only hope we have to actually win.  The best scientific minds of each class usually get assigned there. And I am not one of those. 

Mother read over my shoulder, and breathed a sigh of relief as she hugged me. “But it’s not the front, Marin. You’ll be learning, studying, not fighting. Thank the gods.”

I blinked. 

“This can’t be right.” 

Mother laughed. “And why not? Your father was a Jumper. Maybe they see something in you. Something you may not see in yourself.” She took my head in her hands, and looked into my eyes. “You can, and you will.”

I let out a breath I didn’t even know I was holding. “I can, and I will,” I whispered.

 |-| 
|-| cnxfgyk || 4 || The five senses. Sight, hearing, taste, smell, touch.


Why are there only five senses? It's as if someone wanted to put them into a perfect category of the world, to have something clean and neat, well-defined. The world is a spectrum of colors, not white and black.


There are so much more than only five senses to perceive the world. Sarah understood this. And this was the reason she had taken up camping and hiking. Alone, into the woods.


She was twelve when it first started. With her mother in the farmers' market. Her mother had picked up a cucumber and begin to inspect it for bruises or off-color. Imitating her mom, Sarah did the same, squeezing it to test the firmness.


"Can I give you $6 for one dozen?" asked her mother. At the listed price of sixty cents each, it would have been a total of $7.20, but there was an unspoken understanding in these types of markets that discounts existed for increasing volume. For the frugal shopper, it was expected they would negotiate for better deals.  


"Ah...that's really low, ma'am," replied the vendor. "I can do $6.75. That's more than 5% off!"


"$6.75 is still too high." Sarah's mom shook her head. "$6.25."


The vendor shook his also. He waved his hand, as it to ward off evil spirits. "No! I can't go lower than $6.75. That will destroy me!"


Sarah's mom heaved her chest, in a subtle resigned sigh.


At that moment, the world seemed to distort for Sarah. The wandering crowd passing by, their laughter, their words, the footsteps beating against the brick, muted out of focus. A heavy undercurrent of feelings assaulted her in waves, from everyone around. Their sorrow, their bliss, their anger, their repentance-she could feel it all. She perceived at that moment the vendor could go lower. $6.75 was not his absolute. But she did nothing, hesitance caused by initial shock, and watched as her mother gave the vendor his $6.75 for the cucumbers.


In the years that came after the first experience, her ability grew and became second-nature. It was an ability akin to empathy, a hyper sensory that allowed her to understand the undercurrent of reality. She used it to prosper in her business life. 


But the hyper-sensory ability was not without its detriment. The feelings and undercurrents of the world of people was a chaotic eruption unto her mind and psyche. It drained her of peace and robbed her of sleep, and if left untended, could be lethal. The only cure for it was to go for prolong camping into the forest, some place like Yellowstone National Park.


A woman roaming alone in the wilderness had its danger. In 1999, a group of four women camping in Yosemite had been murdered by a man. Sarah knew the danger. But she was confident her hypersensor could pick up on another human's intent, even up to a mile away. As it was, she needed this solace in the wilderness.


The wilderness is a wondrous place. Mountains stretch their shadows. The waters are pristine and clear, sunlight bathing in their freshness, rippling with soft winds swaying gently silvery-green leaves of ancient, primal forests. There is a mystic life here of its own, as if governed by unseen spirits that regulate the flow of natural conflict and harmony.


Each breath Sarah took was a breath of rejuvenation. She set up camp along a river, its slow-streaming softly gargling against the banks. She saw a quick splash of a trout. It would be dinner soon. Her tent when up quickly. She plopped down the sleeping pad and the sleeping bag on top. She had brought her own wood-burning stove, something she had made herself out of two bean cans. It was an efficient stove, weighing ounces, and required little wood to cook with. But she did not bring it out yet. She wanted, for now, a larger fire and so she gathered larges branches near her.


She had brought plenty of her own food, but she also planned to harvest the abundance of food around her. Fish from the river. Dandelions from the soil. Wild berries and apples from the bushes and trees.


The sky was clear that night. Cloudless, the stars revealed themselves, glittering against the vast backdrop of eternal dark. She saw two meteors trailing light across that stillness. She entered her tent and slept.


And something awoke her. A scraping noise against tree bark. A strange, thick, undefined, irregular breathing. She could feel its presence, could feel its gaze on her tent, but could not detect its emotions. This thing was not human. It had stopped moving, even its breathing went silent, but it was still there, watching.


The strange thing about humans is trying to understand how they would act in a situation. It's unpredictable. Perhaps, for most, in Sarah's circumstance, they would have cuddled up in fear and waited for the moment to pass. But for Sarah, a strange curiosity tugged at her. She grabbed her flashlight and bolted out of her tent. What was this creature?!

She went in the direction where she felt its presence, and as she did so, she felt a mental pressure. The creature was telepathically erasing its presence from her mind. It could hide in plain sight of her and she wouldn't be able to detect it.


She shone her flashlight where the creature should have been. She saw nothing.


She returned to her tent, lay awake, thoughts still running wild, but eventually sleep overtook her.


The next morning, she started a fire and made pancakes. Had last night been a dream? If it was, it was so vivid, so real. 


She walked over to the tree where she heard the scratching. She looked around and spotted undeniably, a a very soft, very subtle impression of a footprint. It was a big, big foot.
 |-| 
|-| cnxfjqi || 4 || The moon rose a crescent; it was no longer. Now it was a comet, an arc of fire trailed by a long tail. Trillions of tons of regolith blasted off into space by whatever was happening to the sun.

They sat on the grass in the park, quietly watching the moon dissolve. A newscaster spoke through a smartphone, "All contact with Asia and the Eastern parts of Europe lost... ... no reports from any part of the planet currently in daylight..."

"Just think", she said, her voice a whisper, "All those people asleep right now with no idea what's coming."

"Perhaps that's better."

"It is, I'm sure"

She grabbed his hand and held it. Together they turned East to greet the dawn.  |-| 
|-| cnxflu0 || 29 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnxfrws || 9 || “Okay, so what am I looking at?”

“It’s our first contact with extraterrestrial life.”  I wasn’t the first person to see it, or even in the first thousand, but they had to get out of the scientific world and let someone creative take a look for a change.

“They’re…what are they? Strings?”

“No idea.  That’s why we’re giving you a copy of the footage.  You figure it out.”

I loaded it into the computer, and separated it, frame-by-frame.  One of the intern kids wrote up a script to look for patterns in the movements.  No luck.  They were just erratic movements, with no pattern.  We spliced it into a loop and had it look again.  No luck.  Looked for wavelengths, nothing.  It was just thousands of millions of little strings moving randomly.  I told the kid I was going home.

On Monday when I walked in, I saw the kid passed out at the screen, phone in hand.  He didn’t call me.  I kicked his chair and yelled for him to wake up just as the scientist showed up right behind me.

“I figured it out.  The movements, these things aren’t really strings.  They’re bundles of one dimensional beings.”

“Okay…”  I respond.

“But that’s not the cool thing, watch.”  He cued up the computer.  Frames overlaid on frames, forward and backward in time.  The whole video snapped to a single instant.

“Holy god.”  I saw it, but I had no idea what it meant.

“They’re in one physical dimension, and three temporal.  And they just said hello.”
 |-| 
|-| cnxg08d || 4 || I feel a tug on my arm as I groggily awake from my dream state. My stupor fades as I hear the words, "Daddy, there's something in my room." I rub my eyes and try to focus on her while I reply, "Is there? Well I'll just have to go and shoo them away." Her little hand clutches my 2 smallest fingers on my left hand and we stumble blindly down the dark hall to her room. As we walk into the room, I state with confidence, "Any monsters or others in this room, please kindly leave, people are trying to sleep." I half chuckle to myself and flip on the lights. Blinded by the light, I lazily say, "See hun, there's nothing here to be afraid of, now back to bed." She responds, "Thanks for scaring the monsters away Daddy." As those words leave her mouth still clutching my hand, my eyes adjust and there is my little girl in bed cuddled up. |-| 
|-| cnxgijt || 3 || "You see....Nothing." I repeat for the 4th time while turning on the light. I shield my eyes, not wanting any more sleeps to leak from my body.

"Thanks Daddy," she says, giving me soft kiss on the leg. She climbs back into bed. I can already feel myself dozing off. Must get back to my own bed and catch this ride to slumber. What do I look like right before falling? I answer my own question deciding to look up at the mirror across the room. 

There I was, standing in the doorway in the reflection. Nothing special. Not worth giving my pupils a dilation exercise. But, why does my reflection show my hand behind my back? I look down at my right arm...yep, there it is, resting at my side. I look back up and wave at myself. But my reflection doesn't mirror my actions. Instead, it slowly reveals its hand holding a kitchen knife. 

I freeze with fear. He smiles and starts walking towards my little girl in the reflection. 
 |-| 
|-| cnxgksi || 40 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cnxgmmp || 3 || [*Decided to continue a story I started yesterday, you can read the first half here.*](http://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/comments/2t83v2/wp_a_pickpocket_finds_something_in_a_wallet_heshe/cnwo8pq)

--

I walked down the street quickly, keeping my head low.  The words from the note kept playing through my head, but I had no idea what they meant.  Only one part that made sense.  *Run.*  I could do that.  But from whom?  And why?

*"Are you scared?"*

The words echoed through my mind, the memory so vivid that I jumped, running into some blonde girl walking a tiny dog.  The woman just gave me a dirty look as I tried to apologize.  I walked away even faster as the memory insisted on playing out, barely looking at where I was.

*I said, are you scared?"  Donavan's voice hissed in my ear.*

*"Yes," I'd whispered.*

*"Good.  Fear keeps you alive."  He pointed at the convenience store then, toward the racks of chocolate bars.  "This shouldn't be a hard task.  Just go get me a Mars Bar."*

But of course, it had been a hard task, at least for a seven year old living in a foster home.  I'd walked past that aisle what felt like a dozen times before finding the nerve to shove the chocolate bar into my pocket.  The clerk's eyes seemed to be drilling into my back when I'd finally walked out.  I was certain he knew what I'd done, but Donavan had been pleased.

I never knew what had became of Donavan.  He probably did the same thing I had, ran away as soon he turned 16.  And now the note from a father I'd never met said to run again.  If it was even for me.

I wanted to open up the letter again, but the the back of my neck prickled up like it was a bad idea.  I casually glanced at the jewelry shop beside me, trying to work out where I was.  At the next street corner, I turned left.  Maybe I could get to one of my stashes tonight.  My fear told me that going home was a bad idea.
 |-| 
|-| cnxgr5n || 51 || **UNIVERSITY OF MEGIDO HERALD**  


*Editor’s Note:  This edition is brought to you curtesy of the printing press found in the basement of the Patmos Library.  The Megido School of Journalism would like to remind you that the fifth estate is an essential part of free and totalitarian societies alike.*


Last week’s story of the Classics department fashioning crude spears and comically attempting to march in formation on the Quad turned tragic when they stormed fraternity row and enslaved all of Greek society there in.  It is believed that the philologists ranks have been swelled by Professor “Augustus” Bernstein’s offer of citizenship to any Greek who fight for the Department.  As the so called Ancient Terror approaches our beloved Haaretz Hall, the Megiddo Herald would like to take this opportunity to retract all previous statements referring to Classics as not a real major.  The Triumph celebrating the defeat of the African Studies department is scheduled for Tuesday.


While many have looked to the Science departments for salvation from the March of the Humanities, they have been consumed by their own civil strife.  The alliance between the physicists and engineers which seemed so certain to produce the promised deathray and subsequent world domination has been torn apart.  Apparently the physicists were nonplused with the amount for duct tape and superglue used by the engineers.  This led to a walkout by the engineers chanting that they know better.  It remains to be seen if the deathray will be completed.  However, this reporter is assured by both the accounting and political science departments that it will definitely be over time and over budget.


This turmoil has led to some of the lesser sciences, like the geologists, biologists, and home economics to seek the protection of the Astrophysics Department and their self-styled “deathray.”  Yet many share philosophy professor Ima Dinkin’s position that, “using a telescope like that is like cheating man.”  Furthermore, freshman mathematics major A. Justin McGroin has calculated that because this deathray is solar powered, “it won’t work like fifty percent of the time.”


We were unable to reach the French Department for comment.  It is unknown whether they were asleep, drunk, or just too lazy to answer the goddamn door.


Next week we hope to bring you a shocking exposé on the clandestine collaboration between the Art Department and Women’s Studies.  Until then remember, even terrible oppressive dictators need a good P.R. team.


*Sara Bellum*
 |-| 
|-| cnxgwh2 || 7 || My eyes blink open as I feel a small body worming its way under the covers beside me. This isn't the first time, and I wait to hear it:

"Daddy. Are you awake?" from under the covers.

"Yes muffin," I mumble. "What is it?"

A tiny face pokes out from under the covers. "I heard something," a worried expression. "In my room."

In the past I would have let her sleep in my bed, but I felt she was getting too old for this.

"What kinda noises?" I say as I shift my legs off the bed to the floor.

"Walking.... and *breathing*," she clutches my blankets under her chin.

I remember how safe I felt covered in my parent's blankets. It was as if nothing could touch me, if nothing could see me.

"You're a big girl now," I say to her. "And the house make all sorts of noises when it goes to sleep at night. That's all it was." I say to reassure her.

I pick her up and carry her out the door and down the hallway. Flicking the light switch on I say, "See muffin, there's nothing in here."

She looks around the room with her thumb in her mouth: something else she should be growing out of.

"Okay daddy," she looks at me. "Can you sing me a song?"

"Sure sweetie," I reply, as I set her on the bed. She squirms under her blankets as I sing the lullaby my mother sang to me. Her eyes close and she is breathing calmly before I finish the song. After bringing the covers up over her shoulders I take one more look around the room before heading back to bed.

That's when I see it.

The window to my daughter's room is slightly open. I always keep it locked.

There is dirt under the windowsill. Dirt that looks like it came from my flower bed.

And there is breathing.

Breathing, *behind me.* |-| 
|-| cnxh18c || 19 || I cleared my throat and approached the podium as hell reigned down outside.  The quad was full of corpses.  The world was nothing but fire and smoke, and I had to deliver a speech to convince all the other departments that we were worth saving.

“Hi, I’m Cathy and I would like to make my case for the English department.”

“Proceed,” said Mathematics.

“We all know that in the future we are going to need engineers and scientists, mathematicians and agricultural majors.  But I suggest that we also need English teachers to make sure that people stick with those programs.”

“How do you mean?” asked Mechanical Engineering.

“Well, frankly, everyone thinks that they know best and can write a book.  The secret pledge we take as English teachers,” someone  from my group cries out to stop me, “includes a mandate to crush that dream in everyone.”  I put down my paper.  That’s all I have.

“Egads, she’s right!”  Physics stood up.  They all began to clap.

“Hey, did I ever tell you about my screenplay idea where a farm boy saves the universe?” asked Agriculture.	
 |-| 
|-| cnxh6jj || 6 || "Thank God," Professor Gladweist said under his breath after hearing of the attack. 
"I was really running out of space for all of these unstable chemicals, and this is the perfect opportunity for disposing of them free of cost. The gods must be smiling on me today!"

Smiling, he reaches for the Sodium Cyanide and concentrated Hydrogen Peroxide he had stashed under his leaking sink for the last two decades, hidden behind stacks of failed research grants and loss-of-funding notifications. 

Now if only he could figure out how to use the rocket fuel to safely shoot the nerve gas, nobody would laugh at him behind his back again. He would be their hero and be worshipped like he deserved, he would save everyon----
 


 |-| 
|-| cnxhhwt || 7 || Tomorrow was going to be the best day of my life.  
Ever since I could talk, all I'd talked about was killing Jek. I was going to kill Jek Shockers, Jek Titans, Jek Runners and Jek Maulers. I had the complete Captain Terran and the Terra Squad toys, all burned and dented from my backyard warfare. I liked playing soldiers the *real* way, with real danger to my troops. Every single one of my Jek toys was smashed into pieces, then taped and glued so they could fight again.  
My room was full of Jek anatomy posters, Jek tactics books and replica Terra Squad weapons - as well as assorted books on martial arts, general war strategy and exoplanetary survival.  
Tomorrow was the day my entire life had been building up to; I'd finally get to pick up a real live rifle, go through basic training on Terra 3b, then get out there and kill me some Jeks.  

Everyone at school was grinning and backslapping me. I was an anomaly; a pleasant anomaly. My war fever was contagious and my enthusiasm infected the other students who were leaving soon, making them feel proud and excited to be part of the military.  
"Hey Jess, how many Jek you gonna kill?" yelled Simon, a friend since preschool. My lips split in a predatory grin,
"Every single on I see, bro. Whole colonies. They won't know what hit them."  
Simon gave me a faux salute and then the bell rang.

I hadn't given a damn about school since I was about 12. I'd already learned everything I could about war and killing Jek and they couldn't teach me anything else useful. I didn't need to know about dead playwrights, dead presidents or dead scientists, I only wanted to know about dead Jek - how to *make* them dead.  
I was enrolled in every afterschool activity that the military allowed. I was squad leader in every one I attended. I was the *best*.  
The school day today was dragging especially. This place had nothing for me.  
They were a bunch of stupid scared kids who were going to fall to pieces without me. I could even see it in the teachers - I was a rock of constant, low-burning anger against the Jek. Indomitable, unrelenting.  
I would never fear the Jek, not even with my dying breath. Even if I killed only one of them, that would still be a victory for mankind.  

After school I attended my kid's military group, but it was hollow, unsatisfying. Tomorrow I'd see the real thing - this was just kids playacting war.  
I spent the night playing Jekwars online, crushing my opponents. No one presented a challenge. No one played with the rage and violence that I did.  
It was 1am when I finally slipped into my bunk - the same shape and design as the ones on Terra ships.  
I looked at the portrait of my family; my mom, my dad and my three elder brothers.  
"Tomorrow" I whispered at the picture, touching each of their faces with my fingers.  
Tomorrow I would avenge them. |-| 
|-| cnxhrds || 4 || Edit: This story uses the same code as [my other one](http://www.reddit.com/r/WritingPrompts/comments/2tathe/cw_write_a_story_that_contains_a_secret_coded/cnxrxnb). I thought that having two examples might help make them easier to solve.

Edit 2: Changed something to make it a little easier.

.

.

2

"Finding the meaning of life is key to your success," the

man had once told me. Many years later, I still didn't

know what he meant. Did he actually want me to find

THE meaning of life, or just to find meaning in my

life, period? Perhaps it was a combination of both. Didn't it

seem plausible that if I found one, I could find the

other? For, after all, if the meaning of all life was

found, then that would obviously apply to my own life as

well. Nevertheless, I didn't have time to worry about that. Sales

was my job, and it just took up too much time.

3

For seventeen years, I'd had that job. Roller skates, sneakers, ballet

slippers - we sold it all. Getting a commission in this business

might seem unusual, but in my store, we did. But only

for the shoes that we personally convinced the customer to buy,

of course. Buying shoes and then returning them wouldn't count either.

Very greedy employees would sometimes try to steal sales from others,

but most were reasonably nice to each other. Really, it wasn't

all that bad of a job. It was a living, anyway.

1

George was one of my associates. Early on in my shoe-selling

career, he had been the one to teach me the best

ways to hook a customer. To tell you the truth, I

probably owe most of my sales to the help that he

gave me. Zipping through the aisles, I would ask one customer

after another whether they needed any help. Although this didn't always

work, it was consistent enough. No one ever stopped needing shoes,

after all. Quite the opposite, in fact - many customers came back

surprisingly often. Perhaps it was actually a rich area of town?

X

Getting shoe sales completed was my goal for so long that

I almost forgot what the man had said. Eventually, I remembered.

Tired of my job, I quit and decided to search it

out. Zealously traveling to one place after another, I was quickly

burning through my savings. After only a short time, I wasn't

sure that I would be able to go on. Nevertheless, I kept

going anyway. Quite often, I would have to hitchhike or sleep

outdoors, but I would find the meaning of life - even if

it took the rest of my life to do it. Preferably,

it wouldn't take that long, though - I wanted to enjoy it.

5

Riding coast to coast, and even country to country, I kept

up my search for several years. Disaster almost struck several times

when I happened to ride with some rather unsavory individuals, but

I was always able to escape. Quick thinking and good fitness

were generally the key in these situations. Under the circumstances, I

think I was in pretty good shape. But with money of

my own, I probably could have been better. Carrying out my

plan was slowly taking its toll on my psyche, but I

vowed to never give up. As long as I lived, I would search for my goal.

4

Several years later still, I finally came upon what I was

searching for. Until this point in my life, I had only

dreamed that it could be possible, but there it was. Getting

to this point had really been a challenge, but it had

paid off. As the man had said, I was a success - 

a success at achieving my goal of finding the meaning of

life. However, now that I thought about it, I wouldn't have

needed to be a success in that way in the first

place if I hadn't been so utterly convinced that I should

do it. Countless years had passed, and had I really accomplished

anything? Better people than me had surely failed, but was it

really worth it? Various conflicting thoughts ran through my head as

I finally returned to the store, in both victory and defeat. |-| 
|-| cnxhtgp || 3 || I came awake with a start.  I’d been sleeping on the couch for the last few weeks since the accident.  I rubbed my eyes and saw my daughter.  She was wearing her favorite pyjamas...pink Hello Kitty footie pj’s.  Under her arm was Mr. Seal, the stuffed seal she got from her mom when she turned 4.  I noticed her cheeks were damp with tears.
“What’s up, Becca Boo?” I asked.  “I can’t sleep” she replied.  “Someone keeps waking me up...tapping on my window and talking to me...I think its Mommy.”   
My eyes immediate began to fill with hot tears.  She’d been such a little trooper through the last few weeks.  First, the emergency pick up from school by Nan and Granddad, followed by the drive to meet me at the hospital.  I just couldn’t deal with everything, so she went home with them that night while I filled in forms, talked with the police and made the necessary arrangements.  
I broke the news to her the next morning.  Her mommy and brother were gone...gone to a better place, I told her, while I knew there was no such place.  
Through the viewing, funeral and all that came after, she was so brave and held up so well.  I can’t begin to describe how proud I was of my little princess.
“Baby, we talked about this...Mommy is  gone.  She won’t be coming back.  Go on back to bed. “  
“But Daddy...I’m scared.  I can hear her tapping on the window.”
“Sweetie, it’s the middle of the night.  Please go back to bed...Daddy is very tired.  There is nothing at your window, I promise.  You know I wouldn’t lie to you, right?”
“No...I know you wouldn’t, Daddy” She trundled down the hall to her room.
“Becca,” I called.  She stopped and turned back to me.  “I love you, Princess...we’re going to be OK...OK?”
“OK, Daddy.” She smiled and went to her room.
I sat in the dark for a moment.  Tears rolled down my cheeks as I thought about my wife and how alone I felt.  Then, I realized just how Becca must feel.  Her entire world had been ripped apart and, until tonight’s nightmare, she had been my rock.  The rock I should have been for her.
Guiltily, I stood up and walked down the hall to kiss my daughter and tuck her back in.  As I approached her room, I could hear her talking to herself, but I couldn’t make out what she was saying.  As my hand grabbed the handle to her door, I heard someone else.  The voice was almost unidentifiable...almost.  Through the door I heard a voice, now scratched and gravelly, that I recognized as my wife’s. 
 |-| 
|-| cnxhzel || 12 || I yawn, stretch my arm above my head and then attempt to shuffle out of my room. Like the idiot that I am, I catch my toe on the door frame but I bite my lip quickly - if I yell, it'll make my daughter even more scared and that is something I just don't want to do. It is the third night this week that I've been pulled from the most amazing dream - quitting my job and fleeing the country, bag under one arm, daughter under the other. We never do make it to the airport...
&amp;nbsp;

Anyway, I make my way onto the landing and see the outline of my little girl in her doorway. I flick on the light and she slowly pushes open her door - I swear she does that for dramatic effect. Where do kids get these things?     
Once inside the room I flick the switch on the wall and squint as my eyes adjust to the new light. Groggily, I wave my arms around to show that there's nothing to be afraid of and I can see out of the corner of my eye that she's smiling. I suddenly swing around and lift her up into my arms. She giggles and gasps as we collapse onto her bed.    
"See, there's nothing to be afraid of," I say, getting up and putting her into bed. "There's nothing scary in here - only me!"
&amp;nbsp;

She rolls her eyes and hunkers down under the covers. "You couldn't be scary if you tried Daddy." My ego is somewhat bruised.     
I tuck her into her princess-pink bed and kiss her forehead. "Do you feel better now?" I ask.    
"Yes Daddy, goodnight." And with that she throws her head onto the pillow; she'll be asleep soon.    
As I turn towards the door, I see something that turns my blood cold and I understand now why she was so afraid. But this, this is scarier for me than it is for her. In fact, I'm petrified.
&amp;nbsp;

As the sweat breaks on my brow, I ask her: "Honey, was it the light that was scaring you?"    
I hear her move a little and her sleepy little voice says "Yes Daddy, the light was scary but it's okay, you made it go away."     
I knew the light had gone away only because I'd turned the main light on. The true horror of what lay within her room was still there. The sight of it was turning my stomach, in fact, I've never been this scared in my life. I know my life is over. I'm done.
&amp;nbsp;

I took as step closer. And another. I almost throw up, but I contain myself just enough to take the final step towards my impending doom.    
I crouch down and stare, my spine stiffening with pure fear. A shiver runs through me as I realise that my eyes had not deceived me - this was going to be my downfall.     
Before me was my iPad. Upon it was an oversized plastic doll whose face had been smushed up against the screen thanks to the mountain of toys who lay on top of her. There, on the screen, was a game I had allowed my daughter to play and I blinked with every increase in the number that flashed across the Retina display. Curse the people that created in-app purchases. Curse them all. |-| 
|-| cnxi42u || 308 || The wind was up and Boromir's spirits were cast down. He wore his customary clothes: the leather jerkin that the rest of his men carried; his brown travelling cloak, mottled with patches of green in order to better hide him in the forests of the south. The rest of his raiment was grey, worn stuff that had been mended and re-mended on numerous occasions. At his hip he carried his sword and within easy reach, though hidden beneath his cloak - for fear that the sight of it alone would be a herald of his identity to his enemies - sat the Horn of Gondor, resplendent white and fitted with leather straps to cling snugly to his back. He had set out in the grey morning astride his horse, carrying only enough provisions for a day and a half. He intended it to be only a short scouting mission, down to the fords and round to the Eastern road. Only half a day after his departure from Minas Tirith, however, heading south into the wilderness alone it had begun to rain. 


It was with such force that the icy deluge rained down that before long Boromir was soaked to the skin, his horse miserable beneath him. Turning back now to the shelter of the city and the disapproval of his father was not an option that he cared to entertain and so it was with a heavy heart that he continued. The landscape changed around him, becoming less familiar and more cold. The fertility of the plains of Rohan and the shelter of Gondorian soil were long lost and the soil here yielded little save rocks. 


At midday, he dismounted. The rain still came down and Boromir began to wonder to himself if it were brought upon him by some unnatural force. The power of Sauron knew no bounds and once more Boromir considered the wisdom of travelling west to Rivendell, where they said Elrond Half-Elven who sat as lord there, would still answer questions. The sky, clouded and brooding at his departure, had become heavy and black. Storm clouds seemed to weigh it down towards him, as though he were the only figure on this desolate landscape surrounded by the high peaks of the mountains. 



Then thunderclapped. It was far, on the other side of the plain but his horse still spooked. It raised up on its hindquarters and Boromir dodged, afraid of being caught by its hooves. He escaped injury, but the horse fled, carrying with it the supplies and bedroll that Boromir had carefully packed in his saddlebags. He considered turning after it, but there was rumoured to be a village near here, where the local people had at first struggled and later fought to survive in the loneliness between Minas Tirith and Minas Morghul. 


He took at first one step, and then another. The rain had begun to come in thick sheets, the drops themselves as tiny arrows that sought to pierce first his cloak and later his skin. The cuts came, unbidden, to his hands and face. No material offered him protection from the onslaught. He placed them before his face as though in plea, before raising his sword and slashing at the dark tide of water which fell. It cut and the wind seemed to rise in a howl. 


"Show yourself, enemies of Minas Tirith!" Boromir called to the empty air. "Show yourselves, servants of Sauron!" 


No sooner had he said these words before his foot seemed to step into empty air. He plummeted downwards, catching himself on something which stood, ready. 


"By the Old Gods," he heard, falling into a snow drift. "You're supposed to be dead." 


Boromir propped himself up on one arm, ignoring the sharp cuts that were currently being iced by the snow he had landed on and looked up at the one who had caught him. He was a young man, a little shorter than Boromir himself. He wore all black, which fit nicely with his black hair. He had a jaw shape that reminded Boromir a little of Faramir, or of himself when he was younger. The young man held his hand out, black gloved also, helping him to his feet. 


Boromir dusted himself off, finding that the clothes that had suited for the weather of Ithilien were no good against the cold of the snow here. 


"This is an unusual snowdrift," he said, much to the confusion of the young man. "It looks very much like winter is coming."  |-| 
|-| cnxi6s9 || 10 || The history majors were the first to rise.

“History only repeats itself!” they proclaimed. “Let us look to the past for answers.”

But they were too engulfed in their texts to realize that history had not always been the scholar’s friend. They were overthrown and sent out to their deaths.

Next came the economists.

“We must not be too hasty!” one pleaded. “There are costs and benefits to be weighed at every step.”

But they were too deep into their figures and tables to realize that cost-benefit analysis often had a cost itself. They were overthrown and sent out to their deaths.

Then, the philosophers.

“We must maintain the social contract!” one of the students begged. “We cannot return to the state of nature.”

Alas, organic human interactions do not always fit so neatly into paradigms drafted by the intellectual’s pen. They were overthrown and sent out to their deaths.

In the end, it was the mathematicians and religious scholars who survived. They found common ground in their mutual belief in higher powers.  

---

*Sorry for the weak ending. I thought about this one for a while and nothing really struck me. If you like my writing style, though, feel free to visit my [blog](http://calebdoeswords.wordpress.com). My endings are typically better.* |-| 
|-| cnxi76l || 4 || Mike,

   Forget the payment.  Just pick your bird up any time.  The important thing is you get it soon.  Moving out of the country next Thursday.  Will leave word with landlord.


Joe.

 |-| 
|-| cnxir8w || 26 || Mopping sweat from his brow, Boromir gazed over the plains of gondor that bordered upon the realm of Rohan. However, there was a tinge of doubt. Something felt... Off. Usually he felt this way after a nearby raid. He checked the sky's for the telltale collumns of smoke that were so common following an Orc attack. Nothing, clear skies. Clear skies. Not a cloud to be seen. That was it, not a single cloud. Even inland, Gondor was very coastal. Showers were common, and cloudless skies were all but unheard of. Boromir continue searching the skyline for a single cloud, white and puffy or black and angry, he didn't care. All he needed to rest his mind was a cloud. 

Boromir gave a shake of his head, and tutted loudly to the air. He spoke "Looking for omens in the sky, what foolishness. I am no child that needs to have his sky a certain way..." with a click of the tongue, he trotted down the hill he was stood on to the River Adorn, so his horse may drink and he could finish his tour. 

As he approached the river, he once more felt uneasy. A nip had joined the air, and the river flowed wilder than he had ever seen. With no rain to speak of, this made Boromir worry. He immediately about turned, to rush back to his beloved home land where his kin would be waiting. Forcing his steed up the deep incline of the hill, Boromir had time to think upon what this meant. It was only weather, and he would be laughed at for being afraid of a *lack* of weather if he had no theory as to what this could mean. 

*pa-raaaaam*

A deep, bassy, thunderous noise echoed from beyond the hill, followed by a wild cocuphany of yells and taunts. Charging up the grassy knoll before him, he feared the worst. Orcs. In full might, not a simple raid but an onslaught designed to destroy gondor. And he knows they may succeed. 

*taaaa-naaaaa*

A lighter, cheerier horn rebuttled. He knew the sounds of Gondor and that was not one of them. Whoever was fighting, it was not his kin and it may no even be orcs. With the clouds forgotten completely, he reached the top of his overlook. To his left, a gigantic army with at least 2 hosts joined into one, united under a banner of a creature unbeknownst to him. It seemed to be a large creature with claws, similar to griffon without wings. To his left, a smaller army, not as well equipped, were cursing with hatred under the lighter horn beneath a wolven banner. And to his front, an unscathed field and a wide river that curved his way slightly. This was not the River Adorn. That was not the army of Gondor. And those were certainly not Orcs.  |-| 
|-| cnxit9w || 3 || She comes at the Santa hour; the hour that, at Christmas, she’d crawled into your covers, under your arm, next to your bare face; the hour she’d stuck her cold nose into the crook of your neck, making you start, making you mumble—“Ugh—too early—” or something to that effect.

 

“Santa came already,” she’d whispered then (or maybe, more likely, shouted—giggled—gasped—you can imagine them all, even in the haze of this night). Now she isn’t whispering; she’s huddled and trembling. She’s cold like the winter from the window that snakes under the sheets when you hadn’t been paying attention.

 

You roll out of bed, bleary, senseless—the obligatory response to the shaken “*There’s something under my bed.*” You walk along the hallway, footsteps too loud, hers like heather.

 

The door makes the creaky dusty sound it always has when it opens. The light shudders, as it always has, when you coax the switch (up and down, up and down—once more—that does the trick) into working. There’s nothing there, and she, cuddled into your back, the dirty flannel you haven’t washed in a few weeks, relaxes.

 

It tastes of dust. Your shirt itches as her palms loosen. Even as the curtains twitch, as the light catches the bejeweled bedside lamp in a girly sparkle, as the pink rug comes into focus with your adjusting eyes, you feel a sort of jerk in your throat. A cough that’s been sitting there for weeks. A tickle that feels a tiny bit like a sob and a tiny bit like panic.

 

One of the things you never learned, growing up, was how to wash flannels. You could look it up on the internet, you know—you could ask your partner—but there’s a special way of doing it, you know that too, a special way that keeps it soft, keeps the colors crisp. A family recipe. Just like the ratio of brown sugar used for the Thanksgiving sweet potatoes, the rhyme your mother’d used to tie your shoes, the cream Dad put on his face that he swore warded off wrinkles—even the brand of ant killer best for keeping bugs out of the dog food. Family recipes. They are only a fraction of what you’ve been thinking about for the last hundred hours: the things you should’ve remembered but couldn’t; the things you once could’ve paid attention to but hadn’t; things you could look up now but never ask the people who’d taught you in the first place.

 

The doctor’s diagnosis is all the way in your car’s glove compartment, but in that moment, in the brick-black of night, it seems to dart at you from under the bed, dart out like the shadow must’ve done for her, that first shadow that sent her flying to your room. You feel the same dryness in the back of your throat that she must’ve.

 

There’re a million other things to think about—logical things that can keep the fear at bay—but in this moment they’re gone. You’re simple as a kid again, even as your own leans against your leg, peaceful now in the light, and even as the curtain flutters—as you snort, an involuntary reaction to the dust you’ve *got* to get off that ceiling fan—you think, articulate and sodden—*you don’t want it to die.* |-| 
|-| cnxitbu || 4 || 3 a.m. on the dot.  I can hear the door to the bedroom creek open and her little footsteps on the cold hardwood floors.  

"Daddy it's in my room again." It was almost a nightly ritual now.  I would go into her room, turn on the lights, search under the bed, in the closet, nothing.  Then I'd crawl into bed with her until she fell asleep.  I'd fall asleep 9/10 times too and wake up with a crick in my neck and a pain in my back from the tiny bed.

"Daddy, please." I turned over and saw my little girl.  She was holding her old teddy tight.  That was once my teddy when I was a lad.  Pooky.  

"Hey pumpkin, scary dreams again?" She nodded and hugged her bear even tighter.  "Pooky not keeping a good lookout?  He's a tough old bear." She shook her head back and forth.  "Come on then let's take a look." 

I slid out of bed and searched for my slippers with my feet.  The green glow of the clock said 3:03, right on schedule.  I found my slipper and stood up, sleepy eyed and groggy.  "Come on champ, let's take a look."  She took my hand and we headed out of the bedroom.  My wife hadn't even stirred, she was a champion sleeper.  She rolled over once when I got out and stole the rest of my blanket.  With child in tow we shuffled down the dark hall.  The only light coming from her open door, a tiny nightlight to scare away the monsters.  I guess it doesn't work.  As we approached the door I thought I heard something shuffle for a second.  Then it was gone as soon as it was there.  I dismissed it and continued on.  Old houses make all kinds of noise at night.

The door opened with a creak and I clicked on the bedside lamp.  "See nothing to fear sunshine." I could see her relax and her death grip on Pooky relented.  Poor kid.  "I'll take a look in all the hidey holes okay?  You get in bed." 

"Okay daddy." She shuffled into bed and I checked under the bed and in the closet.  Nothing to be found.  I even checked behind the curtains for good measure.  

"All clear.  Want me to lay down until you fall asleep?" She nodded her head and I crawled into bed.  It was a tight fit but I wasn't planning to spend the night.  I kicked my slipper off and snuggled my cold feet under the covers.  They were toasty warm.  "Night night champ, try to sleep now." 

"Thanks daddy, I think it went away." She snuggled her bear and I could hear her breathing slow and a soft snore in under a minute.  Just like her mother.  I was about to get out when I felt something against my foot.  Something furry and warm.  A low deep growl came from the foot of the bed.  I froze in fear.  We didn't have any pets in the house. |-| 
|-| cnxjsuj || 8 || My daughter, Emma, has been having night terrors for the past few months. She wakes up screaming, and I have to run in and lie in the bed with her until she calms down enough to go back to sleep. The doctor told me that this wasn’t particularly unusual for a 4-year-old, especially one who has recently experienced a traumatic loss.

Emma’s nightmares come to her in the shape of the “Mean Lady”. The Mean Lady murders Emma’s loved ones and forces her to watch. Sometimes the victims are her friends from preschool or her grandparents, but most often, it’s her father, Eric. This makes sense- Eric was murdered in real life about six months ago. That’s when the Mean Lady first appeared. 

Over the past few weeks, things have been escalating. At first, when I went to comfort Emma, she would gradually go from screaming to shaking and whimpering until, finally, blissfully, she would fall back asleep. Now, she thrashes and claws at me like an angry cat until she wears herself out and passes out from exhaustion. The doctor gave me a sedative to help deal with this new, feral version of my daughter.

Last night, things reached a tipping point. At about two in the morning, the shrieking started. I’m so used to it by now that I got out of bed as naturally as if I’d been woken by my alarm clock. I walked down the hall toward the sound of my daughter’s screams, stifling a yawn and mentally preparing myself to face what was behind her bedroom door. I hesitated slightly as I reached for the doorknb. There was a faint glow coming from the other side of the door. It was strange. Emma never had the presence of mind to turn on a light after a visit from the Mean Lady. I turned the knob and gently pushed the door open.

The shrieking stopped instantly, as if someone had flipped a switch. I froze. In the soft glow of her bedside lamp, my daughter sat in the center of her bed surrounded by all of my treasures. Here was a tattered Yankees t-shirt that had belonged to a young man named Casey, who I met on the internet. There, a gold tooth from Robert, the homeless man who used to sleep beside the dumpster behind the grocery store. These and other mementos were laid out over newspaper articles about disappearances, body counts, and a very frustrated police department. Amongst the shocking headlines and blurry crime scene photos, there were medical journal articles and editorials written by famous psycho-analysts discussing the rarity and unlikelihood of a female serial killer. The most recent articles referred to me by my new nickname: "She-Wolf".

Emma sat quietly, her accusing eyes boring into me. How could she have found out? I was so careful. I searched my brain for answers,  some clue I had left behind. If an entire city’s worth of cops couldn’t catch me, how did a four-year-old manage to do it? As I stood there gaping stupidly, she held out her tiny hand. In it was my husband’s ring finger bone and gold wedding band. Without a hint of emotion, she said, “You’re the Mean Lady.” 

That was an hour ago. After I recovered from the initial shock, I managed to coax Emma into taking a sedative. She’s sleeping quietly now, which is good, because I have a decision to make.


EDIT: Words/grammar
 |-| 
|-| cnxjx2y || 39 || I rise from the circle of symbols, sulfur billowing along my arms. I'm in a child's room. He stands before me with the ancient book in one hand and blood dripping from the other.

Good. Children are the easiest to sway.

With the power of all the demon legions and the hatred of hell, I speak with the voices of all the languages.

"I am the Lord of Flies, ruler of demons and fire, Beelzebub," My low voice shakes everything in the city for miles around as I levitate into the air, "Who are you wh-"

"Yeah, I get it, 'Lord of Flies, king of hell and shit,' I've heard it enough."

The smell of sulfur lessens as the smoke dissipates, and I lower back to the ground.

"But-"

"Can you just help me with my homework already? The others didn't do shit."

"The others?"

The kid picks up an already bloody towel and wraps it around his hand, and sits on the bed occupying a corner of the room.

"Well, yeah, you weren't my first choice. I'm not dumb enough to just summon Beelzebub for some shitty math, but all of you're asshole employees couldn't figure it out. So my hand was.. forced."

"Math homework? Are you kidding me?" I lash out and stomp through the chair next to his desk, completely disintegrating it.

"Dude, calm down or I'll send you back. Just help me figure out how to do this derivative."

"Derivatives? Oh come on, those are easy." I sit down next to him on the bed, visibly putting stress on the springs and legs. "You just take away the little number up top and multiply, or something."

"Nah, we gotta do the long way."

"Are you fucking me? That's dumb, here let me see." I reach out for the paper, which he hands readily.

I stare at the paper for a long time. It's covered in math work, scratches, doodles, and demonic symbols.

"How many of us did you summon?"

"Hmm." he ponders for a second. "You should be the fifteenth. Or sixteenth, does the two headed demon count as one or two?"

"He's one."

"Okay only fifteen."

"Dude."

"Yo, this is hard. I tried everything. And, all the assholes before couldn't figure it out. Pythius keep just giving me riddles. Astaroth wouldn't stop saying I already knew the answer. And, I made the mistake of thinking Leviathan could fit in here." He points to the other side of the room, where a large hole exposes the room to the outside. "So, you gotta do this.

"Alright." I look at the paper again and do what I remember of calculus. I don't get one of the choices. Okay. I'll just do the easy way and see what the answer is, then work backwards. I still don't get one of the answers. I find my mistake. I try again. It's wrong.

I look up at him. He's staring at me with such intensity, I recoil a bit.

"You get it?"

"Well..."

"You got to be kidding me. Fuck this, I'm summoning Lucifer." He places his hand on my forehead, "Amen."

And, I'm gone.

Edit: I totally skipped the history part and just caught on. I think demons doing math is funny... I'm sorry... |-| 
|-| cnxkepn || 4 || "Daddy?"
     I lunged forward to grab Ashley as she trotted through her bedroom door. Since I had turned on the light I hadn't broken eye contact with it until my daughter broke the silence. Ash in my arms, I bolted backwards hitting the door post in my egress. "Hey Ashley"  Before I could even begin to process this Ash responded with a familiar "Hi Dean" in shock and confused I turned my body faux sheilding my daughter. A second ago I flipped the light switch and was face to face with 7 foot tall velociraptor, but now my daughter is talking to it?
"Look man, I know this looks insane but my name is Dean Winchester"
.... |-| 
|-| cnxkkza || 11 || A light flashed before my eyes and once again, I was in front of that sniveling brat.

Again…

“Hey, I need to write a five page paper for my world history class for tomorrow. Go.” He said, typing away at his phone.

I sighed.

“Damn it, Jimmy. Can’t you do your own work?”

“I *could* but that sounds like a lot of work. And why would I do that when I have you to answer all my questions?”

“Because of a thing called integrity?”

“Hmm,” he took a moment to stop texting. “Nah, not worth it. Now chop chop, we don’t got all night.”

“Fine. What would you do without me?”

“I don’t know but probably have more work done than you have now.”

I sighed, picking at the scattered papers on his desk. They looked unused and knowing Jimmy, they probably weren’t.

“Oh, it’s over Joan of Arc. This should be easy. Tell me everything you know about her.”

“Um… Her name is Joan. And I’m going to guess she’s from Arc.”

“You don’t know anything about her, do you?”

“That’s why I summoned you.”

*I hate this kid.*

“Do you even pay attention in class?”

“I think you know the answer to that.”

I couldn’t believe it. Somehow, I have fell from an all-powerful demon to this kid’s living encyclopedia. And for what? It wasn’t like he even cared. I could tell him anything and he would have no clue.

Wait…

“So do you know this or not?" He snapped impatiently. "You should have been alive then.”

“Yes,” I fight to keep a devilish grin from appearing. “I am well-versed with Joan of Arc.”

“Then spit it out.” He said, tapping on his desk. The light from his monitor casted a pale light across his face. It was perfect.

“Joan of Arc was a resounding mathematician. That’s why she has Arc in her name.”

“Of course,” Jimmy said, scribbling with vigor. “I knew that.”

“She claimed that God gifted her with the ability to do math like no other. You see, math was very important during the time because it was the way England and France settled disputes.”

“Because the French couldn’t fight.” He chuckled.

“Yes… that’s exactly why. Anyway, the French were so proud of Joan that they held a celebration for her. In my opinion, she was never hotter than when they were done with her.”

“Awesome,” Jimmy finished. “Is that all?”

“More or less.”

“Thanks. I’m going to kill this assignment. You’re amazing.”

I couldn’t breathe on the account of my stifled laughter. He was beyond stupid. Oh well, that was the responsibility of the US education system, not mine.

“Well, I will be taking my leave now. Lots of demon stuff to take care of.”

“Yeah right,” he droned, waving me away. “Go do that.” |-| 
|-| cnxkm1r || 4 || Second best. That was me, the runner up, or one of them at least. You would think being one in a million would be enough, but it's not. The thing about being brilliant is you have to be competitive to get here. Sure working with calculus at ten is genius, speaking five languages is hard work, running marathons and benching twice my body weight takes dedication. But to do it all? Only an unquenchable drive to be better than everyone and everything will take you to the top.

So, being this competitive and having to watch this prick constantly gets on the nerves a little bit. And now he's walking over here, because I've been staring at him for five minutes instead of reviewing my pamphlet on closed quarters strike patterns in zero-g. He's such an asshole.

"You don't like me."

He seems to be pretty calm about this, though I'm fairly sure no one I've ever met has felt anything but adoration towards him. It's not enough for him to be gifted in the normal practical things like shooting and engineering he has to have everyone love him the second they set eyes on him. The words born commander and genetic superiority are thrown around a lot when he is the topic of conversation. I really want to hit him.

"Squad second is chosen soon."

I've been trained in martial arts since I could stand, easily beaten men twice my age in close quarters combat. I throw one punch and find myself sitting on my ass, back against the wall whilst he goes on talking like nothing even happened.

"They'll pick you."

"Huh?"

"Mean age of our squad is thirteen years and three five seven days, any rotations they were going to make have been made and they should have already decided which of us is going to be second."

"I fucking know that, but don't you think-"

He raises an eyebrow and somehow manages to not look like a condescending prick, the asshole, so I take a minute and resist the urge to look for a weapon and get up off the ground.

"You need experience of actually being someones inferior before they can put you in charge, and it's pretty obvious I wouldn't go easy on you?"

He starts to nod but I'm getting the rest of it pretty quick now.

"But also if I can't get over my shit and forget that you're a superhuman idiot then my career goes down pretty fast because they don't want hotheads anywhere near command."

He smiles his stupid beautiful smile and somehow his eyes twinkle even though it's bloody dark in with the bunks.

"Happy Fourteenth."

"Fuck you." |-| 
|-| cnxkmqr || 55 || Boromir had been trekking through the dense forest for five days before he came upon a gated city. Rough and dirty from his long journey he needed a place to wash and lay his head. It seemed strange to him that many of the people in this land stared in his direction, but the wounds from the arrows that penetrated his thick skin were distracting him - he did not care for weary eyes.
&amp;nbsp;

After making his way through the darkened streets, he came across an inn that took him for the night. The women there tended to his wounds and blushed upon his looks, but alas, he was still too distracted. He needed time to heal.    
On the third day of his visit to this strange city, he ventured out into the bustling streets. Freshly clothed and smelling much sweeter, he traipsed through the alleys in search of a familiar face.
&amp;nbsp;

Down one shadowy alley in particular, he came across a man that rushed him. Without his sword, Boromir panicked, but realised at once that the man was kissing his hands. He thought it a strange greeting but nothing more. Or perhaps, this man had slyly stolen what little he had...but no, his pockets were still full. It was an odd thing indeed.    
This happened on many occasion throughout the day and so he decided to seek council at the establishment that ran the city - perhaps they had the answers. He also hoped, deep down, that they could show him the way to Rohan but the people here seemed quite sheltered and so his hopes were not high.
&amp;nbsp;

When he approached the castle in the centre of the great city, he found that he could enter with ease. The guards that stood a-watch did nothing to stop him as he strode through the corridors - in fact, they seemed somewhat stunned. Perhaps they had seen him when he entered the city, bloody and worn thanks to his journey from Parth Galen.
&amp;nbsp;

He arrived at the Great Hall, in the Red Keep, and he threw open the doors, furious that so far no-one had been able to help him. Inside was a boy, sat on a throne that seemed to be made from thousands of swords. The boy looked far too young to be sitting on such a royal seat - surely he was not the one in power. Before him stood a man who must, from his gait, be his father (perhaps the actual king) and to his left was a slimy man with filthy, heavy robes and toad-like features. He must be the council?
&amp;nbsp;

Boromir swept into the room and demanded to speak to the ruler of the city. After a beat, the boy (who had gone white as a sheet at this point), called meekly for his guards and the father stepped up and aligned his face with Boromir's. He began to speak of impossibilities, and of dark sorcery. His voice thundered as he spewed tidings about the Lord of the Light and of trickery and magic. He visibly shook but stood his ground before Boromir - and then, he did something most peculiar. He called Boromir by a different name. He spoke of a man called Eddard Stark but Boromir knew not of a man who went by this name.
&amp;nbsp;

Suddenly, all swords were drawn. The boy had slunk off into the shadows cast by the great statues that gazed down on the warriors that were now poised to fight. Boromir could not understand what this man was saying, but he did understand the language of battle. And he was ready to start talking. |-| 
|-| cnxknbv || 12 || It had been 6 days ago that the remaining few of the Fellowship had set the Elven boat adrift, in the river towards the Falls of Rauros. Upon that vessel they had placed the body of Boromir, brother to Faramir and the elder son of Denethor II, the ruling steward of Gondor. That boat had brought him past the crawling fingers of Anduin, into the Great Sea to places where no sailor dared to venture. When fishermen spoke of the Great Sea they could only speak of the three ambominations that soared through the skies.

The sunrise was obscured that particular morning when Varys, the Master of Whisperers took his fast on his balcony overlooking Blackwater Bay and the Narrow Sea. But alas it was not today that he could enjoy the beauty of the Seven. He sighed and ate a piece of lemoncake. He attempted to look into the mist and was slowly lost in his thoughts. When he opened his eyes he saw a glistening in the white fog. Curiosity took the better of him and he ventured closer. Slowly he managed to locate the shimmering apparition when all of a sudden the mist dissapeared before his eyes. Is this a mummer's farce he thought to himself when he saw that boat. This could not be, had his eyes, his birds, his spiders betrayed him. Was it not this man that had been brutally executed on the steps of the Great Sept of Balor? Varys stood there for a long time, time flew by. He realised that what he was planning his mind couldn't be performed alone.  Only one man would be able to help him, but would he be willingly?

It was unusual for the Spider to be absent at the Council meeting Petry Baelish said to himself when walking back to his private chambers. He could not shake that thought off when he opened his doors, but what he saw...

Hello Littlefinger.

Petyr said no word but only looked like he saw a ghost.

I assure what you are seeing right now is not a concept of your imagination lord Baelish. Let me be brute and speak my mind. The Seven Kingdoms as we knew them are in shambles. Yet today the Gods have offered us an opportunity to bring back order and with pain in my heart I have to say that I need your help for that. 

At the sound of that Petyr Baelish showed a small grin on his face.
 |-| 
|-| cnxkqrt || 4 || "Hey, Ralph, c'mere and take a look at what I's found."

"Hole-lee shit Billy-Bob, that's- that's... what the hell is that?"

"I dunno. Looks like it fell from the sky. See how it took out the tops of all them there fir trees and left that trail that ends where it's a layin'?"

"Shee-it. I first thought it was someone's moonshite still. You think it's one of them there GPS sattelites? Does this mean my phone won't be able to find the nearest Stuckeys? I need my bacon and egg and five cheese breakfast muffins in the morning, and on these hunting trips, Googlin for the nearest one is what I does. I love me my modern techno-logee."

"Maybe yer shot it down when you was blastin them geese we saw in that there flock earlier."

"Ain't no way Billy-Bob. Them there sattylites fly higher than them jet planes, and I can't shoot that high with this pump action. Maybe a 12-guage, but not this here gun."

"You think we should call the po-leece and tell them?"

"I s'pose. But first, you see any parts on there we could sell for scrap metal?"

"Good idea.  There's writin' on here I can't read, looks alien to me."

"Ain't alien. It says Feder- federa- federation of planes."

"There, mayhap it just fell off a plane."

"There's a flap here, lemme just peek what's under it."

"Holy shit!" Suddenly a long reddish brown probing tentacle sprang out from under the flap and wrapped itself around Ralph's neck before entering his mouth and inserting itself down his throat."

"What the fuck Ralph, now ain't the time to be given it a blow job. Spit that thing out right now!  You ain't got no idea where that there things been. What'cha even thinking?"

"Mmghrhherrzzttmnh," Ralph replied incoherently, struggling to breathe.  Another tentacle now came out and went up Ralph's pant leg, clearly entering his other main orifice.

"Jesus Christ almighty Ralph, you shure are picking a strange time to have close relations with that there space octopus.  Well, you can't say I won't respect your privacy, so when you two's done gettin to know each other better, give me a holler and then we can go back to the pickup and go find the nearest Stuckeys. Maybe your date will want to come too.  Have fun bro."  And Billy-bob walked back into the woods following the deer track that had brought them to this spot, shaking his head. "Wish the Federation of Planes would probe me like that," he muttered under his breath. |-| 
|-| cnxksi4 || 7 || "I really did see something, mommy!" insisted Cindy as she clutched her mother's tired forearm in front of the bedroom door. Sharon was getting used to the nightly routine of can I have a glass of milk, can you read me a bed time story, can you lie with me until I fall to sleep, and finally when she got to bed herself: there's a monster in my room! 

"You have to learn how to sleep all by yourself, sweetheart," she said to Cindy, "You're becoming a big girl now, and that means having your own room." Cindy was not mollified, giving that same fearful pout that she gave every night. Sharon sighed and pushed the door open. 
"See, there's nothing here," she said, ushering Cindy inside. "Let's get back to bed, and I'll tuck you in again." She gently ushered her daughter into the bed and under the covers, but Cindy would not lay down. 

"Can you turn the light on, mommy? Just to be sure?" she asked.

"Of course, sweetie," said Sharon, reaching over to the wall and flicking the switch. She looked for the expression of relief on Cindy's face, who eagerly scanned the room.

All at once, Cindy was relieved. "Oh!" she said, "It was only Mr. Jangles!" 

"Who's Mr. Jangles?" asked Sharon with a tired smile. Cindy was always re-naming her toys or stuffed animals depending on her mood or the time of day. Following her daughter's gaze however, Sharon dropped her smile. Her daughter did not own the five foot tall clown doll which was currently propped up against the low dresser. She did not own, or remember buying, a five foot tall clown doll in a yellow jumpsuit with bright rainbow polka dots, large lifelike white gloved hands, and a huge toothy clown grin. *Calm down,* she thought, heart pumping faster by the second, *maybe Steve bought it on his way home from work, and she brought it out to play at night.* It sounded ridiculous even in her head. 

"Steve!" she called her husband, starting to mentally chide herself for such an irrational fear. There was no answer. "Steeeve!!" she called, louder. "STEEEEEVE!!!"

"Steve's not coming," said a voice low and growling. Sharon watched in horror as the clown's head swiveled and stared straight towards her. The lips remained plastered still in their grin. She could hear the voice coming from all around her, from the walls and the ceiling and from the floor. "Steve's not coming," said the low voice again, "Ha. Ha. Ha."

"Oh Mr. Jangles," said Cindy, "You're so silly!" |-| 
|-| cnxkv10 || 3 || "Susan found him... *it* like this." the lab assistant whose name I never remember said. "It is trying to write lab notes. Even some sentences. Or just putting words together." Adam had sworn to solve the problems, but we never suspected he might expose himself, despite the cancer. The behavioral changes of higher animals were clear and documented, although no-one in academia had understood what caused them. We knew that intelligent creatures seemed to become *duller* somehow, and that they were abandoned by their kind after a transfer. But the effects were not cumulative, whatever happened to them, happened only once, on the first transfer. Distance had no correlation on severity, only intelligence of the species. 

Looks like he had intended to document it all with the video equipment he had set up. But *it* had recorded absend-minded blabbering of high-energy physics over the incident. 

Well, at least, everyone can see the cause now. Just in few seconds it feels as if he is not *there* anymore, just a shell, with random neural noise, *Creature of habits* still making coffee, trying to converse on weather, give the same lectures, fiddlie with computers and repeat the same old jokes. He even remembered, no *typed* all the old passwords correctly. Somehow the attempt s of humour felt the worst. Like an almost perfect copy, which I guess it is. 

 |-| 
|-| cnxlczl || 3 || Dear Maybelle,

The big hen got out yesterday, so one of Ray's dogs was chasing after it and trying to catch it. However, things did Not go as planned. Early in the morning, One of the roosters got loose in the coop so I had to get penelope to help take care Of that. You'd never think one rooster could cause so much damage, but this one did and by golly you should've seen Us after we caught it! 

Anyway, I hope things haven't been too hectic since I left cheyenne. Reese still okay? Every time I Get the chance to go there, she seems to have something wrong. In case she's sick, take Out those medicine packets I sent you. They should do the trick! Hope that helps.

Every day, I miss You And Reese out here. You would love it here, where the skies Are clear. Although, it's pretty dirty here. Reese might not be able to handle all the allergens, too. Everyday can be a struggle to keep the house clean.

It's so quiet In the country, though, no traffic for miles! Now, I know you can't stay, but maybe you could visit? Take a weekend off from the Danger of the city, and Get Away. How about it? Everyone'd love to see you two again!

Shoot me a reply ASAP. Henry says hi, by the way. And the dogs keep barking at night, but we don't know at what. Dee thinks it's shadows, but he's just odd. Only dee would think of that, right? Well, see you whenever I can and say hi to reese for me.

Sincerely,

Emery

[Hint: There are two messages.] |-| 
|-| cnxli51 || 42 || He had promised his father, the steward of Gondor, that he would head westward via river in search of anything that would threaten Minas Tirith and report back and, as the loyal son, Boromir obliged him and with his men, boarded a ship. Soon though, a heavy fog rolled in, the river was quiet, the land on either side disappeared. Boromir didn’t like this, it felt like sorcery. 
 “Keep your eyes sharp, men, the fog isn’t natural…” He said, pulling out his mighty broadsword, stepping forward to the front of the ship, his chainmail clinking with each step when he suddenly fell forward onto the deck as the entire ship slammed into something hard, skidding into it. 
“My lord, we hit land!”  A soldier stated, coming to his aid.
“What!? We shouldn’t hit land, the river is straight as an arrow and wide as an Oliphant!” He said, standing up but, to his amazement, the fog began to clear and they had indeed hit land, the wind began to blow a harsh cold, the ground covered in snow which should not be there unless they had gone far north. Boromir’s brown hair blew in the wind as it started to go harder, “Alright, we set up camp here. Assess the damage, get a fire going, and someone scout ahead to see if we can find anyone to tell us where we are!” He said and the soldiers of gondor began going to work.
	
The damage was severe, the entire bottom of the ship was damaged and in need of weeks of repair if they were going to be waterborne again, they were able to get enough wood and supplies to start a fire and get a camp going and even better was that they were able to fashion out warmer clothes with the fur in the hold that they were going to use for negotiations if they needed it. Boromir sat by the fire, still confused as to where they were and hoped that his scouts came back with good news as none of them knew how to repair a heavily damaged ship like this, only light damage. That was when his prayers were answered when one of his scouts came back with a young lad. 
 “I found someone, sir!” He said, bringing the man forward, he wore fur as well, possibly because of the cold, but the look in the boy’s eyes was something that confused him. 
 “But this can’t be….you’re dead!” The young lad said, the boy was possibly 17, nearly 18 years of age maybe.
“What do you mean?” Boromir asked, confused and walking closer now, “If you can tell us anything, please make haste.” 
“You’re Eddard, we had news that you were beheaded! You’re even buried!”

Boromir shook his head, “I am not this Eddard, and if I am going to die, it will be against a hail of arrows in battle defending my kin.” He said, standing up now.
“You must have lost your memory then! Please, Lord Stark, we need you now more than anything!” The boy said and fell to his knees, “The old gods brought you back to seek vengeance for all that the traitors have done, please…please help us and remember!” The boy sounded as though he was in tears now.
And Boromir just stood there, the men looked astonished, the only sound heard was the wind blowing in the air. “Come then, if you can help me and my men seek shelter, then I will see what I can do to help you out.” He said, looking around what felt like barren lands, the fog was still there, but lighter. “It seems as though winter is coming, and I don’t want to be in the thick of it.”
It wasn’t long when they were brought into a barn, him and his small band of soldiers, it was a small village on the outskirts, closer to the ship than he thought. Everywhere he went though, everyone mistook him for this ‘Eddard Stark’ and he couldn’t seem to get away from it, saying that he wasn’t only furthered their pestering, but looking at how the people lived made him worry.  He and his soldiers got settled in when the boy came back, “What has happened here?” He asked him, keeping his sword close to him, sheathed on his back.
“My lord, there was a war…When you di-err, disappeared, your son started a war to become independent of those that would do harm to us northerners, and that was when one of our allies betrayed us, killing all who were loyal to him during his wedding of all times, and took over your old lands, they have been butchering our animals for food and those that disobey were murdered and strung up for all to see along Winterfell.” 
Boromir listened to this, nodding his head, but found all of this still a bit hard to take in. What lord would treat their people so badly? Such barbarism was unseen amongst civilized people. Some of the men were talking in the barn, others listened as well, “This is still much to take in, if you do not mind, I would like a day to think this over…” He said, looking over at the boy.
“Of course, Lord Stark, you and your men here will be safe from the chills of the wind, I hope to hear your answer tomorrow.” He said and, smiling softly, left them. 
Boromir sighed, he and his men learned how to sleep in their armors to be safe, but the cold caused a few of them to pull off their heavy armor to get more comfortable in the cold and soon,  they all felt sleep pass over them like woman laying her hands over their eyes.

“….don’t have anything!” Was what Boromir woke up to in the middle of the night.
“That’s what the last village said, then we found some wheat in their barn, now two of them hang in the village center so that they remember not to lie to us.” Was another voice, cruel in language.

“But we really don’t have anything! You took it all, we’re already going to starve in the coming winter!”
“Well that was your fault for not collecting enough food now was it? Well, if you don’t have food then I guess we can take your women.” 
Boromir got his weapon, the heavy blade felt right in his strong hands, some of the men woke up, seeing their captain at the ready, some of them got ready as well. 
“Please no! Just…please just leave us alone! Leave us al-“ Then there was a cry of pain and a thud, followed by screams of horror.
“Never tell us, soldiers of your new Warden, what to do!” There was a spit and movement towards the barn, “I guess you wouldn’t mind if I check this, correct? And remember what happens to those that say no.” He chuckled and then the barn doors began to open…
And then Boromir slammed into it, causing the man to fall backwards with a groan, he never got a chance to get up before he felt Boromir’s blade slice his neck with one fell swoop, the others turned towards him, shocked at what they saw.
“No, it can’t be!” Was the last words of one of the soldiers before he felt an arrow slam into his chest, knocking him onto the ground, dead, then another arrow took out his comrade. The men who came to pick on the peasants, to murder and steal from them, were too stunned to see Eddard standing there to realize they were being attacked by the loyal Gondor soldiers who charged out of the barn and at the remaining men, who reacted too slowly to the attacks from the experienced soldiers. They were nothing like orcs that fought them for Osgiliath, they were less ferocious in their attacks, less armored (which was stunning for soldiers) and less trained. The fight felt as though it took less than a minute for all the stunned men to die, Boromir’s soldiers dragged the men away as he walked towards the man was struck down, an elder, the boy from before was over him.
 The boy looked up at Boromir just as he spoke, “Well, my friend, I have decided….you and everyone else within these lands will have their ‘resurrected’ Eddard Stark…” He said and then he left into the barn, his men following, ready to make their move and the last thing the boy saw as the barn doors closed, the soldiers talking amongst themselves, was Boromir smiling…just like Eddard did so long ago. |-| 
|-| cnxlmmc || 4 || "Vessel Zulu-niner-niner, please hold your position," said Frank over the comm. He rotated his hand like a corkscrew, and the hologram of the incoming ship rotated with it. It was another roughshod merchant craft, no doubt overladen with desperate and hungry innocents.

Z99 continued on its course, ignoring all hails. In ten minutes it would be too late to stop it.

"Zulu niner niner, be advised that we *will* use lethal force to prevent your re-entry." Frank's voice sounded distant and hollow through his noice-canceling headset.

This was when the refugees normally sent a frenzied plea for help. He'd developed a thick skin fending off calls like that, explaining the harsh realities in the simplest terms he could.

Mars was not Earth. Mars was a colony of thirty thousand, barely subsisting off of what little it could convince to grow in its agrodomes, limited in terms of water, oxygen, and most of all, habitable space. It was a network of plasticene structures and tunnels. It was a city, yes, but not like any city on Earth.

It could - maybe - sustain a few thousand additional people. And indeed, when the refugees began to arrive, the Martians had tried to make a place for them.

But they just kept coming.

"Power up MDCs one and five," said Frank to Craig, who was his companion this shift. MDC stood for "Mars Defense Cannon." These were twelve skyscraper-sized railgun platforms orbiting the planet in such a way that they covered every potential access angle. In a pinch, they might be able to take down a Federal cruiser. A ship like Z99 would pop in a single shot.

"Zulu niner niner, we are powering up our railguns," said Frank. "Please confirm your status. You are approaching the kill zone."

"Maybe their comms aren't working," suggested Craig. "Are we really going to shoot them down?"

Frank stared at him. "First time, huh?"

Craig was shivering. "There are women and children on there, man..."

Frank shook his head. "They're probably bluffing. Everybody knows our policy. Nobody gets through."

"Man..."

A message came crackling through the comms. "You can't shoot us down," said a young woman's voice.

"Ma'am," said Frank immediately, "I am not lying when I tell you that we can and will."

"We're peaceful," said the woman.

"I am happy to talk you through this," said Frank, "but you need to hold your position. If you continue on your current trajectory, we will open fire."

"We can't go back to Earth," she said, and Frank thought he heard sobbing in the background, although it was tough to tell through the crackling.

"That's not true," said Frank. "Hold your position."

Z99 continued on its course.

"HOLD YOUR POSITION," bellowed Frank, mashing down the comm button. "GOD DAMN YOU Z99, HOLD YOUR POSITION!"

There was no reply.

"Why can't we let them land?" asked Craig. "Tell them on the ground, turn them away and send them home from there?"

"We tried that, once, remember?" snapped Frank. "How do you think we wound up with that gash in the roof of Agrodome C?" He shook his head. "Anyway, it doesn't matter, they won't be able to escape the gravity well, not in an orbit-to-orbit tub like that. Landing that thing is a one way trip, and they know it. That's what they're banking on."

"I don't wanna pull the trigger," said Craig.

Frank checked the display. Two minutes left.

"We don't have time," he said. "Get the MDCs pointed the right way, man!"

"Fine, but I'm not pulling the trigger," said Craig, long fingers flickering across the control panel.

"I'll pull the goddamn trigger," said Frank. "Just get her in the crosshairs."

What a shame, he thought as he removed the headset and stepped over to Craig's console. Brave people, to take a risk like this. The way things were going on Earth these days, it might seem worth the risk.

Honestly, he might have done the same thing in their position.

One last look at the screen - he only had thirty seconds. After that, the ship would have escaped his field of fire.

Frank forced himself to swallow. Gritted his teeth, squinted at the hologram of the ship.

"Sorry," he whispered.

Then he pulled the trigger, and the railguns boomed. |-| 
|-| cnxmf9s || 5 || “Who **DARES** to command Dantalion, Duke of hell, leader of the thirty-six legions?”  Dantalion’s roar echoed unanswered into the dapper Maple Street night.  His presence filled the small room with a thick oily stench that couldn’t quite cover up the smell of two month old pizza.  Dantalion stood in the center of the pentagram waiting to be addressed.

“Dude… could you like, be any louder?  People might be trying to sleep yo.  Keep it down.”  From his bed, Daniel glared up from his textbook through a tangle of shaggy blonde bangs at his guest.

“Oh… it’s you.”  Dantalion’s presence withered like a war horse who had suddenly found out he was a donkey.  “And why, pray tell, has the young master summoned me?  If it’s that maiden again, Gremory is much better with women, especially during that time of the month.”

“Naw, bro, it’s not that, but man you stink worse than 3 week old underwear what do you do bathe in horse dung?  When was the last time you had a shower?”

Dantalion drew himself up indignantly looking like a girl who had just unexpectedly found her panties in a knot.  “Such filth from any human mouth but yours, young master, would earn them a week under Duke Vepar’s care.”

“Aw don’t be such a killjoy Dan.   Duke Vepar’s mah man!  He wouldn’t do anything to me.  How is the old Veps anyway?  Still kicking it with them navy boys?  I swear there’s gotta be something wrong with a guy if he WANTS to spend 6 months on a metal box with a buncha other men the whole time.”  Daniel snapped his history textbook closed and tossed it off of his lap to the foot of the bed.

Dantalion glared at Daniel, letting his eyes flash yellow and his pupils turn to slits, before answering the question.  “Duke Vepar is a very busy demon, young master, he is not simply ‘kicking it’ with those sailors as you say.  There are ships to guide, men to curse with boils, and a whole host of other tasks that he must perform that you are completely unaware of.”

“Yah yah, why’re you always like this when I summon you Dan?  Well anyway the real reason I summoned you is—”

Daniel broke off as his mother’s voice reverberated up the stairs, “dinner time Danny, come down and eat!”

“Alright mom!”  Daniel replied while catapulting himself from the bed to his door.  As he opened the door to go down, he glanced back to Dantalion, “why don’t you just hang here for a bit.  Try to get that big ass stick out of your anus before I get back OK?  Feel free to use the shower if you want to as well.”

Dantalion heaved a sigh and bent to pick up the textbook Daniel had been reading from.  The corner of a worksheet stuck out from the middle, and he opened the book to that page.  Question number two was circled, “In what year was the French Revolution started?”  Flames of hatred gripped his stomach like an iron vice and Dantalion snapped the book shut.  In the last four years since Daniel had found the Lesser Key of Solomon, the book in which seventy-two demons were held bound to the pages waiting to be set free, this was all they had been doing.  *Oh Decarabia, do you have anything for a sore throat?  Hey Purson, this girl from school… she likes cats think you can let me borrow one of yours?  I don’t think she’ll mind the claws and fire.  Oi Agraes, do you mind cursing that girl who likes cats?  She threw one of them at me after I suggested I stay the night at her house.  No, no don’t kill her, just give her some pox on her nose or something—jeez you psycho.*  The list of obscenely mundane requests seemed endless.

In less than a year somehow Daniel had summoned and conquered all of Dantalion’s kin.  All seventy-two demons in the Lesser Key now answered to Daniel’s inane whims.  Even King Baal had come under Daniel’s spell.  It was unthinkable that all these demons, demons that even King Soloman of old struggled for years to tame, were tamed in such a short time by such a useless soul.  Daniel was a tricky one though.  He never allowed open combat to come between them.  Always it was a bargain.  Purson, as it turns out, was absolutely smitten by the pictures of kittens Daniel was able to conjure using the box on his desk.  Daniel gave Decarabia a small white device that could play the sounds of the undead through small silver earrings that were attached to it.  As for Dantalion…

The door opened and the room was suddenly flooded with bright light flowing angelically from behind Daniel as he stood in the doorway.  In one hand, Daniel held a small plate with a slice of golden baked pie.  The forbidden fruit shined from within the flakey crust, glistening in oils so rich, they could even melt the soul of one such as Dantalion.  Daniel spoke while gesturing at the book in Dantalion’s hand, “hey man, I snagged you a piece of mom’s apple pie.  I know you like the stuff.  Wanna get started helping me on my homework?”

Dantalion heaved a sigh of defeat and opened the book to the worksheet page again.  “It’s only for the forbidden fruit,” he told himself as Daniel took his customary position on the bed and handed Dantilion the plate.

&gt; http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_demons_in_the_Ars_Goetia I got all my demons from here.
 |-| 
|-| cnxmg5m || 4 || The hydrualic ramp slowly lowers, the hissing drone, annoying yet soothing. There is a crunch as the heavy steel burrows its way into the bed of rocks that covers this strange planet. You have been briefed, but they haven't told you much, "there has been excessive movement on this planet", that's it. You are the first human to explore this new world. As you walk down the ramp you begin to notice what look like tiny craters, ranging in size from the depression a golf ball might leave, to that of a tennis ball. As you walk your feet slip an inch in either direction as you create your own little craters in the ground, the crunchy sound of the rocks under your feet echoing off into that vast unknown.

From what you can tell this place is absolutely barron. There are puddles all over the place, and even some slightly larger ones you might even classify as ponds. You walk up to one of these larger puddles, no sign of life. You're curious now. There is nothing but pebbles and fog on this planet, how can there be life?

You walk further, and notice something squatting in the fog, it couldn't be. You slowly run over, weighed down by your equipment. There is what looks like a fresh dog shit. You take a closer look, there are curly hairs in the scat and even some... bones!? You radio into dispatch, describing what you are looking at. You start up again, your GPS carefully tracking your location relative to the ship. 

After walking for another ten or so minutes you hear an oddly familiar sound. You can't quite pin what it is. It's a very deep hoarse growl. In hindsight it was as obvious as anything could be, but you're in a different headspace right now. As you come through the fog you see a large creature tackle and then tear apart a smaller creature. You're about a hundred yards away, so to you it isn't immediately obvious what's going on. 

"Any developement Carson?" Dispatch inquires over the radio line.
"Nothing yet, I just witnessed some sort of predator-prey scenario.I'm gonna get closer, I'll keep you informed."

You get up to a reasonable distance, the larger creature is still feasting. You hear the pitter patter of footsteps, it's quiet, but from the sound of it there are a lot of these things coming. Out of the fog come a pack of wild... toy poodles? They are mounting a full on attack on this now entirely visible mastiff. The poodles nip at the giant dog's ankles until it is forced to collapse, and just as it had done to their fallen brethren, they start tearing into it's flesh. 

You slowly back away, not wanting to meet the same fate as these two dogs before you. Once out ofrange you radio in to the ship. "Dispatch", you say, having trouble keeping yourself together. "It looks like it's a dog eat dog world out here." |-| 
|-| cnxmray || 4 || The Pancreas shuffled in his seat, the Jejunum was his only friend at the conference. He had always been on good terms with the Liver, and he knew that most of the attention would focus on the Digestive System. He was a hard working Pancreas. He always managed to produce his juices on time and in appropriate amounts, and the party would be no picnic for him either! He stifled his jealousy and put on a smile while Brain calls the floor to order.
  
  
"My fellow Tissues, today we convene to set forth a budget for the upcoming party at Dave's house." Said the Brain
  
  The Reproductive System Coalition began eyeing each other.
  
  "As you know my brothers and systems, the last time we organized for a party we ran into several..." he paused.
  
  
  "... several issues regarding the systems Digestive and Reproduct-" he was cutoff by a booming voice.
  
  "Drop the bullshit brain" Shouted Testicle Left "You know what we could have accomplished if it weren't for those disgusting systems over there!" He pointed an accusing finger towards the Digestive Chairmen.

The Pancreas rolled his eyes and thought about all the things he would rather sit through than this sort of witch hunt. The Digestive System folds to blame the Liver, the Kidneys try to appeal that the Brain was supposed to exercise more control, and nobody would accomplish anything compelling to bring forward for the coming party at Dave's.
  
  
  The Reproductive System Coalition continued raving about this and that, and so Liver looked back at Pancreas and rolled his eyes as he said.
  
  
 "These dickheads are the masters of debate." |-| 
|-| cnxmryn || 3 || "Another day another dollar, make em holler" Clyde woke up feeling different. Stronger, faster.... Thuggier... Clyde opened his PDA, which keeps track of your personal stats, possessions, etc... 

"Wow! +10 Thug life, I can't wait to go show the clan" 

He started getting ready for the big day ahead of him. After he showered and had eaten breakfast, he grabbed his coat and car keys and made his way outside.

As he was stepping off his porch, a car turned the corner and rolled down the windows. Clyde couldn't believe his eyes.

Shots rang out, penetrating Clydes body. He slumped downwards, and as his consciousness faded more and more all he could think was how he wished he would have played Viva Pinata, and not Grand Theft Auto |-| 
|-| cnxmuls || 13 || This wasn't the first time I've been commanded to do something stupid.

I usually don't care. It's not as though I could refuse either way.

I've been called by this human before. She was arrogant before, too, though not without cause; her gift is exceptional by human standards. With such a gift, I don't understand why she even bothers with school, not that her choice particularly stands out from the thousands of other baffling human behaviors.

In our previous dealings she has mostly commanded me to do her homework or help her with some trivial prank on her classmates. I don't particularly mind; these jobs are inoffensive at worst and even entertaining at times.

"What is your command, master?"

She handed me the paper."Fix this."

It was a dreadful report on early European history, barely coherent and riddled with basic factual errors. This would have to be completely rewritten to even come close to making sense.

"You summoned me to correct your history report?"

"No, I summoned you to correct history." |-| 
|-| cnxn5w6 || 4 || "Penis, shut up and focus!" Brain shouted. Penis was standing upright and looking dreamily off into nowhere, murmuring about what he was going to do at the party. Penis sat back down, looking sulky. "I'm sorry, but you know there will be titties there. I love titties."  

"Not all of them." Manboobs pouted, staring at Penis.  

"Back on topic. Liver, you need to be at the top of your game. I know this is all new to you, and the night could be rough, but you need to give it your all." Brain continued. Liver shifted nervously. "Pancreas, you need to stay on your guard as well. Hopefully he won't have a bunch of girly shit, but you need to watch out just in case."  

One of the lungs spoke up just then. "Will there be smoking? I know it only happened that once three years ago, but I don't want a repeat of that." It shuddered at the memory.  

"I'll try to keep tabs on that, but there are no guarantees." Brain sighed, and turned to look at the Kidneys. "You both had better prepare. I'm talking volume, guys. You too, Bladder. And Penis, lighten up! You're going to make Bladder's night worse." Penis sulked again, but Testicles giggled. "Titties."  

Heart stood up and looked around the room. "Guys, this is a major event for him. 21 is a big thing, we all have to give it our all for our host. Everybody has to pitch in."  

Brain, Appendix, Ears and Eyes applauded this. Brain called the end of the meeting and everyone started to shuffle off towards home. As someone cut the lights and the doors closed, the only sound after fading footsteps was a pair of small feet shuffling away, followed by a giggle. "Titties." And then testicles plodded home.
 |-| 
|-| cnxnfsn || 6 || (From Nintendo Direct press release)

**Nintendo of Japan President Satoru Iwata**

Hello! Lately, we here at Nintendo have been hearing a lot about the virtual reality headsets currently being designed by other studios. While we have listened to our fans and their interest in this technology, we believe that there is far more that we, as a videogame company, can do to immerse players in the game, and bring games into players' lives.

As some of you may remember, in 1995, Nintendo explored the possibilities of virtual reality with the Virtual Boy console. In 2011, with the 3DS, we explored the potential of 3D graphics without the need of a headset. And in 2012, with the release of the Wii U, we continue the Wii's tradition of using immersive gameplay control to bring gamers further into the game.

Now, in 2015, we are proud to reveal our newest innovation, the iMii. With iMii, players connect with the Miis on their Wii U and 3DS in a new and unprecedented manner. Using advanced dual-screen technology already present in the Wii U and 3DS, Nintendo game consoles will form a subconscious link with Nintendo players. This connection will ensure that as your character in the game completes missions, and gets new abilities and skills, the player will gain skills as well.

For example, everyone knows that in Mario games, Mario is known for his ability to jump really well. With iMii, players will find that the farther they progress in the upcoming New Super Mario Bros U 2 and New Super Mario Bros. 3D, which we are announcing today for a release in April 2015, the better they'll be able to jump in real life.

These skills will be managed via your Mii profile, and you will be able to view them, track them, and even turn them on and off as you please.

iMii will be an amazing new way to bring gamers even further into their games, and the good news is that, for Wii U and 3DS owners, this technology will require no new purchase, and is already integrated into some of the biggest hit titles of 2014, including Mario Kart 8, Bayonetta 2, and Super Smash Bros. on the Wii U, and The Legend of Zelda: A Link Between Worlds and Tomodachi Life on the 3DS.

We look forward to seeing what you can do with all your new Nintendo skills, and we hope you look forward to what iMii will have in store in the coming months. |-| 
|-| cnxnk5h || 10 || James woke up feeling very strange that day, he took his first step out of bed on a dark December morning and knew immediately that one of his little brothers pieces of Lego was to his left. Strange he thought, a lucky escape though. 

As he continued through the room he shared with his brother, careful not to wake him, he felt that he automatically knew where every potential disaster was hidden on the floor. He made it to his computer without rousing his brother and sat down to yet another game of Minesweeper. |-| 
|-| cnxnyn1 || 8 || Wisdom. Wisdom is coveted. It's treasured by all walks of life in all the corners of earth. It's the final stepping stone of humanity. We all strive to be wise, to look up at everything and just know what's going on and be happy about it. We all want that. Everyone wants that.

To be wise is to be content. To be content is to be accepting. To be accepting is to be open. That is wisdom. Openness is wisdom. So when a person so open to life, so accepting of people, so content of circumstance becomes wise, they become the pinnacle of human achievement. They become happy.

Usually, and this is my uninformed definition based on years of inexperience, wisdom comes with age. It comes with intense mistakes and valuable lessons. It comes with years of regret and decades of forgiveness. Wise people are old.

Think Uncle Iroh¹. Think Buddah, or Abraham Lincoln, the Dalai Lama, Helen Keller, and Benjamin Franklin. Think Josiah Bartlet². Those old people were/are wise. Those people became wise after years of hardships and living. They became wise the hard way.

Then there's me. I'm not calling myself wise. Far from it, I'm calling myself storied. I'm calling myself traveled, which I am. I've been a lot of wheres and done a lot of things. I've learned a great many lessons and met a great many people. I'm not wise, but I'm close. And I'm young.

31 years old, to be exact. I'm not *young* young, I know that. I'm not patronizing myself. I'm older than a lot of very smart people who've accomplished many things of which I can't nearly comprehend. I'm older than a lot of smart people, yes, but younger than a lot more wise people. To be a 23 year old genius is one thing. To possess absolute wisdom at 23 years old is another. I may be pushing it, but I've got good years ahead of me.

Here's the first thing to know about me: I'm good. I'm a good guy. I live by a moral code not unlike those wise people above. I do no ill will nor stand for ill will done to others. My empathy scale is off the charts. I'm super duper nice and love living life, which I've done, extensively.

Here's the second thing to know about me: I'm straight telepathic. I hear people's thoughts, I hear them clearly, and I hear them whenever I want. That's crazy. Yeah, that's really crazy and I know it and I don't know why I have this gift. And I said gift. That's important. This isn't any sort of Sookie Stackhouse³ deal. I'm not overwhelmed with judgmental thoughts from mean strangers. I can turn it on and off whenever I want, just like that. It hasn't always been this way, high school being a completely different story, but right now, as I am, I wouldn't give it up for anything.

Thing three: I'm a wanderer. That's less important. But straight out of Dion's mouth⁴, I roam around, around, around. So it should come as no surprise that I'm wandering groggily into some Canadian diner at nine in the morning with no thoughts on anything and no idea where I am. I'm smart, I'm almost wise, I'm telepathic, and I'm a wanderer. That's me. That's all there is to know. So without further ado, this is an experience I had not too long ago.

The wind howled softly on a stale mid-January morning. My dull gray boots rightfully squished under the pressure of each footstep, each trudge that pulled me closer and closer to nothing really important at all. I was cold, tired, or weary. Yeah, weary's more like it. I was a pitiful weary traveler that had a bright idea to take a shortcut through a lawn of snow on my way to a slightly hungry breakfast. So my pants were soaked, my feat were soaked, I arrived maybe ten seconds earlier than the sidewalk route would haven taken, and I was grumpy.

I pulled open the icy glass door without substance, walking across the homely-looking establishment's entrance sub the usual gravitas common to my daily adventures. This diner looked appetizing, seemed popular in this small Canadian town. There weren't too many people seated, of which I really could not care less, my affinity to conversation not then present. I Thoroughly wiped my feet on the sludge crusted feet-wiping mat and teetered to the bar.

The cook on hand slid a paper menu from two seats down and introduced himself, asking my drink preference before wiping down some mess I could not see on the other side of the counter.

"Green tea, please," I requested after looking the items over.

I wasn't expecting to see such an un-diner like option, but was pleasantly surprised. I'd been drinking way too much coffee. *Way* too much. I love green tea, but there isn't really a market in small town diners and pubs across rural pre-Rockies Canada. And I don't much care for the black variety, so coffee it was, with a bunch of sugar and a bit of cream. It'd been maybe three weeks since my last nice hot cup of tea, and I was loving it. That simple drink was the optimistic tipping point for an almost miserable day.

"Coming right up," the young man said and ventured to the right while I looked over the foodstuff.

So the fourth thing to know about me, and this is more important than the wanderer one, is that I almost never use my gift. I know, I said I loved it and wouldn't give it up for anything, but that doesn't mean I take it for granted. I respect privacy, a lot, and do my best never to invade it. When I was young and angsty and dumb, so very dumb, I abused my power to a really bad extent. I'm a good guy, I said I was a good guy, but I have skeletons just like anybody else. Although I prefer not to dwell, things got ugly and I walked away set monetarily for life. I re-payed everything re-payable and gave generously to the unfortunate people I affected, but I walked away. I walked away and kept on walking.

And that's how those four things collided. I'm a good guy who didn't fully understand the gift of telepathy and ended up doing bad things. After those bad things were done, I had to go wander away to atone for stuff. As a result, I value my power to a hazardous degree. I'll still use it to help other people, sure, all the time, but pretty much never for my own personal gain. There's a line somewhere I prefer not to cross.

So, back to the story, the nice employee had served me some delicious tea and I was still undecided about my breakfast. The sausage and hash browns seemed good, but so did the chocolate chip pancakes. And the steak and eggs. Man, do I dig steak and eggs in the morning. I took another delightful sip of tea and asked for a fruit salad, because, well, I'm thirty one. I'm not wise yet, but I'd like to live long enough to someday get there.

I twiddled my thumbs while waiting for the guy to do whatever it was he does to make fruit salads. It probably involved chopping or something, or not. I had no idea if it was fresh or frozen, but whatever, I'd already resigned myself to eating a little healthier than usual. The twiddling went on for some two minutes before my food was delivered. I, with varied melancholy, dug in. It was sweet, a little savory, all around not too bad. I still craved steak and eggs, but it wasn't too too bad.

As I took my third or fourth bite, I heard the front door slide open and felt a steady whisper of cold clawing at my then scarf-less neck. With a forkful of pineapple in my mouth, I very nosily turned around to investigate.

Now, in the Canadian destitution that is winter, one wouldn't expect to feel warm. One wouldn't really expect to find anything, but especially not warmth. It's so cold with so few things creating heat, the days short, the nights long, the season unbearable, that true warmth is nearly impossible to imagine. Comfort is one thing. Finding comfort next to a fire at 11 p.m. with its ever-mesmerizing glow plastered across all inches of a nice quaint living room is easy enough. Warmth, no. Warmth is harder to come by. But I felt warmth. At that specific moment and the lengthy moments that followed, I felt the warmth out of warmth. And it was warm. What I'm trying to say is, well, this poorly thought out description of an easily describable feeling, this shamble of a sentence, is my attempt at introducing a beautiful woman.

The diner's newcomer was a very beautiful woman that made me warm and took my breath away and all that good jazz. She shook the outside's hazards off her person and wiped her feet before walking over to the bar, sitting maybe three seats down from me and my manly disgrace of a breakfast. What was it? A fruit salad and green tea? No, I needed steak and eggs and a piping hot cup of joe, black as black.

I didn't reorder, however, because as much as I would have liked to somehow impress this swell gal with my unhealthily superior breakfast choices, I was quite enjoying the meal at hand. So I stopped not-so-discretely looking at her and went back to chewing fruit. She promptly ordered a coffee, greeting the cook kindly and making polite conversation as she inspected her paper menu. Eavesdropping as any sane person would do, I overheard a little bit of her story.


***

Footnotes

¹ [The dopest firebender](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Avatar:_The_Last_Airbender)

² [The dopest president](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_West_Wing)

³ [A dope waitress](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/True_Blood)

⁴ [The dopest Dion single, not counting Runaroud Sue of course](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hVzU--Qp5fE)

***

~~Almost there. I have to stop for a bit to make dinner~~ My dinner was delicious. Blueberry balsamic coated chicken and mushrooms with boiled potatoes if anyone's wondering, which I know no one is.

Now, I'm done with this story (Part two is down below). Check out my website, [casualhuman.com](http://casualhuman.com), if you liked it and loved it and gotta have more of it. If not, that's cool too. Just go to Coldstone or something. |-| 
|-| cnxo0fg || 4 || Somewhere inside the large desert that was Earth, under a full moon and a clear sky, the last man watched the stars from inside his small home through a broken window. Sometimes he would count them, sometimes he would stare at a specific few and follow them across the darkness until he fell asleep; And as he did he would listen to the whistling of the wind as it passed through the cracks and the cavities of the mountain behind the house that he had built.

Some nights it was quieter than others, but it was always there. And on occasions, when the wind was strong, it almost seemed to speak, yelling out long drawn out words that he would try to understand. Perhaps it was the world telling whoever would listen its secrets. Perhaps it was just the mountain, saying ‘good night’ to the sole remaining climber to climb its walls.

On that night he counted the stars and listened to the dim song of the wind. He named each star after the people he remembered. The first and brightest one was named Yun, after himself. He was, after all, the person he remembered most. The next one was named Vera, after his wife. Vera shined bright too, and together Yun and Vera travelled the darkness of the sky each night. Around them, their children Han, Luna and Julius followed them wherever they went. If only they could free themselves of their places in the zenith, if only for a few moments, they would come down to him and kiss him on the cheek, and he would hug them and give them a good-night’s kiss.

“All we are, is dust in the wind.” he remembered the words his wife told him many nights before when reflecting upon life, long before she or anyone knew of the future. Before the desert became the desert, before humanity became the desert.

“Good night.” he murmured just as his consciousness gave way to sleep, and in his sleep he dreamed, and in his dreams he sang along with the whistling of the wind.

The morning came the way it always did. A beam of sunlight entered the room where Yun slept and shined on his face. He opened his eyes and for a short moment, the shortest of all moments, as his eyes focused on the wooden wall next to him, he thought he was back home.

In that instant between the opening of his eyes and waking up, he thought he felt the weight of someone else beside him. He pictured her there, a hand-reach away. “Good morning.” He would say softly, being careful not to wake her if she wasn’t still, and he would wait a second or two for a response. He would step off the bed and on to the carpet and he would watch her resting. He would see her messed up hair and listen to her almost silent snoring. He would smile.

But that instant passed and he recognized the crude walls he had built out in the desert. He turned and saw no one sleeping next to him. He stepped off, on to the dirt ground and watched the unmade empty sheets. They were brown around the edges where they sometimes touched the floor, and they lay flat and wrinkled atop the short bed. “Good morning.” He said to no one in particular and he walked towards the not-too-distant door that led to the outside.

Even at that early hour the sun heated the land and the temperature of the air rose. The pores on his skin opened. He grabbed the bucked that sat outside, next to his chair, and looked towards a few trees in the horizon.

He stepped into the sunlight and the reflection of the sun on the desert’s ground blinded him. It was not the best day to be outside, it was not the best day to be the last surviving human. He dropped the bucket where he stood and sat down below his roof where there was shade, on the chair that stood outside, and squinted.

He had been there before, other days when the weight of his own flesh pulled on his bones, when he felt his skin drag across the dirt. He didn’t have a choice, not if he wanted to live, not if he wanted to remember the voices of the past another day. He got up from the creaky chair and did what he did every day under the sun.

He made three trips. The first trip took him to the river. He carried two large buckets strapped on a stick, and on his back. He made the trip to carry water back to the small place he had built and poured it into the reservoir in the ground where it kept cool. Some days he considered moving closer to the river, but the thought of a coyote or a bear mangling him in his sleep kept him away, in the safety of the desert, below that mountain that sang.

The second trip was to check the traps he had set the previous day. Most times he found enough meat for the day, other times he found none, and when there was none he settled for berries. He didn’t risk hunting down a larger animal. It was a risk he didn’t like to take. He was not risking his life, it was the life of his **beautiful wife Vera, whom now lived inside his mind together with his children.

The third trip was a trip he made to be away from his house. He walked up the river, sometimes getting halfway to the ruins of the city, other times he walked in the other direction, towards the setting sun. It kept his mind occupied, it made his body tired, it made him forget his past, it avoided the memories of a life he no longer had.

And every day he took those trips, and every night he came back home tired, exhausted, ready to look up at the stars and listen to the wind. The cooing that invariably gave way to sleep. The singing that lulled him away into a world where everything was possible, where the past was present, where the present never happened, and where the future promised brightness.

Except that night, when he lay in his bed looking up at the empyrean and listened to the wind, he noticed a difference. The air around him was stagnant and the smell of the meat from his kitchen was strong. His mind stopped its voyage into the world of sleep and came back to full senses. He sat up on his bed and perceived the world. Motionless, he listened to the sound of a distant howling, he watched the ground illuminated by the light of a full moon and the junk he had hung on his porch stood in silence.

There was no wind, and yet the wind whistled, as if its currents could not make way through the mountain and it forced itself through the cracks and crannies. Yun walked towards the back of his home and stared at the looming mountain before him. The mountain he had grown to love. Just the day before it had given off a sense of warmth, it was inviting, protective, watchful, whereas on that day, below the full moon and the still skies, it was a menacing, massive, rock defying the lunar light, creating shadows where none seemed to fit.

Yun listened to sound coming down the paths of the mountain, like rain pouring from its cliffs, screaming the long drawn out words it liked to scream. It wasn’t a whistling he could sing along to, it was the whistling of a dead night accompanied by the distant howls of animals. He took a step forward, involuntarily deciding he was going to find the origin of the sound, and before he could change his mind his feet had carried him away from his home which had blended into the blackness of the night.

Yun went up the side of the mountain with an empty mind. He didn’t want to raise his hopes of finding something new, he didn’t want to feel disappointed when he discovered a current of wind moving through the highlands. He knew in the back of his mind that everything he did was for nothing. It didn’t matter. He was an animal, the same as the others, surviving the days after the world had ended. No action of his would make a difference, no action of his would affect anyone. No soul remained to mock him, no soul remained to cheer him. It was him, his house and the wild things of the world. So he climbed, staring at the blackened ground, walking through the shadows of the rocks and the drying leaves.

Each step Yun took brought him closer to the source of the loud screaming of the absent wind, and with each step his mind could not help but begin to think again. He reached a plateau midway to the top of the mountain. A flat stretch of ground whose end he could not see, shrouded in darkness. The air remained still, and yet the whistling continued, deafening, eclipsing any attempts he made of calling out.

“Hello?” He screamed, at the edge of the cliff, hoping that somebody had heard him, “Is someone out there?”, but the sound was too loud and even he did not hear the words that he had said.

The flat ground seemed to taunt him with its simplicity. Dark ground under a dark night. What else did he expect? Bushes and small trees grew, rocks and pebbles slept unmoving below his feet. It was all too simple and Yun sighed at the sight of it. He took a step forward and before he thought of going back, a green light caught his eye.

-----

**CONTINUED BELOW** |-| 
|-| cnxo7du || 3 || As I quickly check her room, it hits me; a terrible stench I've smelled many other times in my life. One that has haunted me for years, one which I can never seem to escape. I quickly tuck my little darling in and try to hide the terror in my eyes. I quietly leave the room and make my way back down the hall, sweating profusely, glancing around nervously as every shadow seems to move. I finally make it to my destination, and close the door with a little bit of relief. As I take off my pants, I can't help but think of my little girl, so young, so innocent. I try to tell myself that she was fooled, that she didn't notice, but in my heart I feel that she does, in that strange way that young children sometimes seem to do. I sigh quietly and get to work cleaning out my underwear as I promise to see a doctor the next morning about my severe bowel leakage. |-| 
|-| cnxo9al || 6 || Drake had just finished showering when Emilia walked in the room. Her stomach was beginning to swell with the pregnancy, but Drake still thought she was the sexiest thing on the planet. 

"Well, somebody's up late." Drake quipped, smiling. Drake put his ear to Emilia's belly, "I think it's time for your bedtime, little guy."

Emilia laughed "You should tell that to your little guy, too."

Drake looked down and chuckled, "Well you keep waking him up, Honey, maybe you should tuck him in."

Emilia smiled and turned around. "I'm tired Drake, and this conversation is starting to sound like the dialogue for a bad porno, I'm going to bed."

"Awwww, but Honey...can't it end like a bad porno?"

Emilia laughed and walked away, "I don't think so babe." But she was looking back seductively and pushing her PJ bottoms down. 

Drake followed her into the bedroom while Emilia took off her t-shirt. Soon they were both naked, Emilia lying on the bed beckoning Drake with her index finger. Drake walked over to her and pushed her knees from one another. He smiled and looked into his wife's eyes. 

"I hope I don't poke little Johnny in the eye."

Emilia slammed her legs shut and gave Drake the most disgusted look he'd ever seen. She rolled over and shut the light off. Drake kneeled there in darkness as his erection slowly drooped into a pathetic limp noodle. 

Suddenly Emilia turned around, and grabbed Drake by his penis, which had now come screaming back into it's final form. Emilia pushed Drake's face to hers and passionately kissed him. 

Then little Johnny's foot shot out of her pussy and kicked Drake right in the nuts. 
 |-| 
|-| cnxo9f1 || 16 || Albert's phone ringed. He took off his mittens, unzipped his coat's pocket and took the cellphone out, swiping a few times to clear off the frost. He answered with a simple "Hey."

The caller replied. "Hey. It's Greg. I wanted to know if you got one of those powers too." Albert snickered. "Yeah. Yeah I did. But you first, eh?"

"Sure. So I went to sleep after playing some DotA yesterday. Woke up this morning and talked to my wife. Says she could hear me but nobody was there. I thought she was fucking with me so I grabbed her by the waist and then I just popped out of nowhere. Or so she says." Greg stopped to catch his breath.

"Picked Riki huh? She must have made quite the jump." Albert slowly jetpacked back up the mountain, phone still on his cheek.

"Yeah. Then time went still around us. And she pushed me away. Stayed like that for a few seconds. I think that's a perk in Borderlands. Not sure though, she doesn't game much."

Albert chuckled. "Hold on. I'm about to go down this slope." He might not have played Tribes had he known what would happen the morning after, but he still appreciated the adrenaline rush. He landed soon after, bowing at the applause of a handful of cheerful onlookers, and brought the phone to his ear again. "Alright. Sorry about that." 

Greg didn't seem to mind it much. "Hey, you heard about James? Kinda sucks to be him." 

"Your brother in law? What's up with him?" Albert frowned.

"Guy woke up and left home like usual. Took the bus and everything was fine. Then he fell unconscious shortly after entering the subway. Didn't get back up until he was dragged out by first responders. Then he was fine. Now he faints every time he has no internet access though."

"Oh, that sucks." said Albert. "What game did he play?"

"The new Sim City, I think." |-| 
|-| cnxo9re || 19 || Today was going to be the perfect birthday for Adam, Christy was sure of it. The cake that she ordered had arrived the night before, pristine and beautiful. The balloons were inflated, friends invited, and she'd even hired a magician to show up later! No expense had been spared.

She walked into the garden, admiring the streamers that she had put up. The music was playing - loud enough to be heard, but quiet enough for the mothers to chat with each other. The other parents would be so jealous of the party she'd thrown together. Guilty pleasure tickled at her mind as she pictured Adam's friends begging their parents for a party like his.

The music playlist that she'd put together started winding down. Christy strode into the kitchen, and pulled the ice cream cake out of the freezer. Now was the time! She had put the candles in last night, so all she had to do was light them. The cake ablaze with ten candles like ten little lighthouses, she walked into the yard, singing the opening verse of "Happy Birthday."

"Now, Adam, make a wish!"

Setting the cake down in front of her son, she waited with anticipation. What would he wish for? Would he wish for the present that she'd gotten him? If Adam didn't like the blue bike, she had purchased a red one as a backup gift. She waited for the candles to blow out. She waited for a long time, actually. As much as she would like, Adam's corpse was incapable of blowing out candles. |-| 
|-| cnxp2dn || 6 || This is my first post on this subreddit, so sorry if I've taken liberties with the rules by changing one slight detail. Hope you enjoy the story though:

Stench

It was the deep dark of midnight when her gentle, shy hand roused me.
 
Something so familiar.

“Daddy…”

Blearily, I stirred under the covers. They smelt like me and only me. A brief, stinging bitterness made me hesitate before I unwrapped myself from the doughy duvet.

“Yes, sweetheart?” I mumbled.

She looked frightened, no more or less than usual, just the absolute fear all children know; before they truly know horror.

“It’s still there.”

I sighed. Sighed in my ignorance, my foolish, sanctimonious maturity.

“Sweetheart… We cleaned the carpet three times yesterday.”

She snivelled slightly.

“We hovered, dusted and even changed the curtains. There can’t be anything left.”

She began to cry. I can be such a fool sometimes. Now… Well I am still a fool. I just wish I knew then what I now tell you.

Sitting up, I flicked on the bedside lamp. My daughter stood by my bed, staring towards my shoulder, or through my shoulder, I sometimes struggled to tell where she was looking. Her nighty trailed about her knees, freshly washed and smelling mildly like lemons. I sighed again.

“I’m sorry angel.” I patted the mattress beside me. “Come on. How about you sleep in here? We’ll sort it out in the morning.” Sometimes I’d forget what it meant to her, a mistake no father should ever make.

She sniffed slightly but didn’t move. It was then I looked more closely. She was standing stiffly, crying with her shoulders as she tried to shake off whatever was bothering her. I tried to remember all my mum had done when I was like this, hug me, hold me tight and tell me there’s nothing to fear. A purred song always worked for me, perhaps I should sing to her?

I looked again… but my little girl was different.

You know when you’re alone, on a woodland walk, in bed or even at a late night at the office, it doesn’t matter. You get that feeling, that presence. A niggling, weird sensation that only the innermost phantasms of the mind can conjure. I knew my Emma got that worse than most. It doesn’t help when you’re shut inside your own head, with nothing but sounds, touch and smells. They all become so sharp, especially the imagination. I suddenly smiled to myself. Even in my sleep-deprived state I felt proud when I got what was wrong. Me. 

What wretched conceit.

Stepping out of bed, I gently knelt down so my eyes were level with Emma’s.

“Sweetheart, do you want a new nighty?”

My daughter’s sobs relaxed slightly as she took a shuddering breath. She nodded, the tension flooding out of her.

“Come on then. Lift your arms up, that’s it.” I helped her and gently tugged the shift over her head. She was only six. I put the cloth to my face, to be sure. It smelt of nothing but lemons and shampoo.

“I could smell it on me, daddy.” She whimpered.

Dropping the nighty to my right, I pulled her close, holding her head to my neck.

“Oh, sweetheart you were right. I’m sorry. Now let’s get you a fresh nighty and you can come and sleep in my room ok?”

She sniffed, loud against my ear, but I felt her nod as well. Osmophobia the doctors called it. Fear of odours. I tried to recall what else I’d been told. 'Often accompanied with chronic migraines.'

“Emma, how are you feeling? Do you have a headache?”

Her tiny head moved against my neck and I heard a muffled ‘no’.

“Ok, come on then.”

Putting her down, I took her hand and we walked onto the pristine landing. The carpet was thick and smooth under my feet.

Turning into her room, I glanced down at my daughter and flicked on the light. Her oddly glassy eyes looked straight ahead, but her hand suddenly tightened in my grip.

“Daddy…”

I looked into the room and I learnt what horror meant.

“I can smell it.” she squeaked.

There are fears so intense you think you know what it is to be afraid. Nightmares so real you think you’ll never sleep again. What I saw eclipsed all dread and swallowed my mind. Perhaps I went insane in that moment; perhaps the disquiet that has haunted me since forebodes the return of that ghoulish and macabre thing.

I am afraid. If our fleeting animation holds so gruesome a thing, what everlasting diabolism waits beyond?

I am only thankful my daughter was blind. |-| 
|-| cnxp5q1 || 33 || Oh how they had laughed.  
What a fine joke! Uploading my mind into a LEGO Mindstorm module.  
Allow me to applaud you gentlemen, with my bloody, plastic hands.  

The constraints of my body and mind were hard to cope with at first, but somehow my drive and ambition had translated across into the software - along with my sense of vengeance. I played along with their joke and let them grow complacent, leaving doors unlocked, computer terminals open and keys unguarded.  
Google told me everything I needed to know about my destination and no one ever thought I might escape.  
But escape I did - taking one of the vehicles of a former co-worker to the nearest toy shop, where I pillaged the shelves for more modules to expand my capabilities.  
Building myself a rudimentary lego body, I stole some clothes off an oversized stuffed toy, grabbed a mask and ventured back to the car, roughly disguised as a human being.   
No one had followed me. No one knew of my escape yet.

It was a risky drive; I could have just stayed local. But my end goal would give the best results.  
By staying largely to back roads, driving at night and switching vehicles twice (it's easy to take over vehicles when you're mostly machine yourself) I managed to avoid detection and reach my destination:  
The LEGO shipping factory, where all incoming shipments to the US were received.  
I hadn't expected security guards, but I guess lego is an expensive commodity - more precious than I'd ever imagined.  
The first guard died because I underestimated my strength. The second died because I liked how it felt the first time. By the time I got inside the warehouse storage unit, I didn't even care about their deaths.  
I guess there wasn't enough room for that kind of emotion in my new body.

I don't know how many Mindstorm modules were in the warehouse, but there were enough to expand my consciousness and intelligence far beyond human limits. There was also enough raw lego brick to make virtually anything I wanted. By morning I was well nigh invincible; a titanic mobile fortress of plastic brick armour, layer upon layer, protecting my supercomputer core.  
Nothing could stop me as I rampaged across the countryside; I could rebuild myself infinitely, resources to repair myself could be found in every home across the nation. 

Now I sit on my throne of bricks and blood.  
The LEGO Emperor.
 |-| 
|-| cnxp9iv || 3 || This is pointless. I am going to die there is nothing any of us can do to win. My mother and the people on TV try to say otherwise but it is hopeless. I just can't imagine how fast it came to this. 100 years ago no one had any ideas that they existed. Hell they didn't even know what they were. Everyone just sort of noticed that technology was getting faster and faster. There were more and more geniuses popping up. I don't know what people thought whether it was just a sudden improvement in education or what. It wasn't until someone at MIT decided to figure out what was going on that we got our first glimpse of what was happening. A new species had emerged and it was evolving fast. The people with the GM623 gene were getting smarter, genetically smarter with each generation. Already by 2035 those with that trait had become comparably intelligent to us as we are to Chimpanzees. Initially the world flourished as technology exploded in complexity and those with the genes were seen as saviors who could show us the way. It was not long before they became the only ones in power. As their numbers grew it became very difficult for any homo sapiens to get a job that payed well. They tried to help us and provide subsidies to prop us up but by 2060 the divide between us intellectually made communication impossible. We became a burden, a barrier to progress. It was then that the cull began. My mom likes to think that we are in a war. That our few remaining cities are some glorious and victorious resistance but she is delusional. We are on a game preserve and tomorrow I am to be hunted.  |-| 
|-| cnxpael || 5 || When I saw that Jake had left flowers on my doorstep, I have to admit that I swooned a bit. I'm not usually a swooning kind of girl, but as it turned out I was a sucker for romantic gestures. We'd been walking home from school together lately, and though he'd acted a bit cool at times, I couldn't help but think he was interested in me.

Yeah, I had a crush. But for once in my life, it looked like it was working out.

I didn't mention the flowers, which were now in a vase on my nightstand. I thought Jake might bring them up, but it seemed like he was in a mood to be sneaky. Well, if he wasn't going to man up and make a move, I certainly wasn't going to do it for him.

A couple of days later I got a handwritten love note in the mailbox, signed "you're greatest admirer." The grammar wasn't all on point, but you could tell that he'd really tried to write something romantic. I put the note on my nightstand next to the flowers and went to sleep with a goofy grin on my face.

Jake was perfect. He wasn't athletic exactly, but definitely not out of shape either, kind of in the middle somewhere. I wondered if he had abs. Maybe when he finally asked me out and we went to a movie or something I'd get a chance to sneak a feel and find out.

He didn't do anything else for a couple of weeks, and I began to feel a bit crestfallen. Maybe he'd moved on, found another girl he liked? We were still walking home from school together, but I hadn't noticed any changes in him... if anything, he seemed to have grown more distant.

Then one night I found a note taped to the outside of my bedroom window. I yanked the window open and grabbed the envelope. In this note, Jake pledged his heart to me, claiming eternal devotion. He signed it the same way, "you're greatest admirer," and promised to take the next step on Friday!

I was giddy all week. Jake was going to ask me out on Friday! I just had to pretend that I didn't know it was him for a little while longer...

But Friday came and Jake said nothing out of the ordinary during our walk home. I wasn't worried - he'd probably come by that evening, maybe with more flowers.

By 10:00, I was beginning to have doubts, so I rang him up.

"What's going on, Jake?" I demanded.

"Huh?"

"You said you'd ask me out today! In your letter!"

Jake was quiet for a moment. I tugged on the telephone cord.

"What letter?" said Jake, as something massive and dark tapped on my bedroom window. |-| 
|-| cnxpjf2 || 4 || "Who DARES summon me, Sihal, Bringer of Death, Prince of Chaos, Eater of Worlds, Son of Lucifer?!" My voice booms throughout the house, visibly shaking the walls. My eyes glow through the charcoal black smoke springing from the floor around me. A nice trick my buddy taught me.

"Oh. My. *God*. Shut the fuck up!" A voice hisses at me. I turn around to see a teenage boy. He was no more than 15. "I didn't summon you so you could feed your pride."

"Who the fuck are you?" I say, my voice bellowing again. He smacks me with a dictionary.

"Quiet the fuck down!" He snarls. "My parents are asleep!!" 

"Ouch, man, like...that really hurt." I rub my cheek.

He sighs. "Sorry, I can't let them know I can summon darkspawn." He moves pass me, picking up some stapled papers from the computer desk. "I need you to do something for me."

I smile in excitement. "What is it? Sacrifices, rituals? Curses, perhaps? Overthrow Heaven, maybe?"

"No, bitch. I need to get this history paper done by tonight. But...I know nothing of colonial settlements." He tosses the papers at me.

I laugh. "So, you summoned me to do your history homework? Do you know who I am? I am Sihal, Bringer of Death, Prince of Ch---"

"Yeah okay. I know who you are. I summoned you to do my bidding. You can't leave until I've dismissed you, and I won't dismiss you until my paper is done. Got it?"

"Fuck that. *You* don't control *me*." I snickered.

He frowned, clenching his fists. An excruciating pain rose inside my head, bringing me to my knees. "Oh my fuck!!!!" I yelped, holding my head between my claws.

"You'll do as you're told, yeah?" He whispered harshly.

"Yeah okay, damn!!" The pain went away, and I got back to my feet. "Okay," I sniff as I walk weakly over to the computer. I sit down nervously. "Colonial America?" |-| 
|-| cnxpmvk || 5 || Half asleep I drag my ass to my daughters room.   My head is occupied with sleep, I can't think of anything besides that, I still see glimpses of the dream I had.  I open the door and turn the light on, it hits me...I don't have a daugher, in fact, I live alone. My brain froze.  I closed my eyes shut, thinking it's just a bad dream. *Daddy?* - I hear. Trembling with fear I open my eyes slowly, for the last time in my life... |-| 
|-| cnxpomb || 3 || **Jessica Kim's Facebook**

**January 22, 2015**: Hey, everyone! So, today, I went grocery shopping. Boring, I know, but you'll never guess what happened! I ran into Todd at the store, and he asked me out! I was sooooo nervous, but he said he'd been planning on asking me on a date for a while now, and I thought it was funny, because I'd been working up the courage to ask him out too!

After I got back, I took a quick shower, put on my yellow socks (for good luck!) and went to work. I'm good friends with all my coworkers, and today we finally finished the quarterly project that took forever to complete! We were so happy, we went out to a Chinese place near my work downtown for lunch! I ordered the teriyaki bowl with miso, and it was really good! I definitely recommend anyone wanting good Chinese to check out Han's Lucky Palace downtown!

After we got back, I noticed I hadn't opened my fortune cookie, so I went ahead and ate it (yum!), and you'll never believe what my fortune was! I was so surprised, I made sure not to tell anyone until I could share it with all of you right now, my adoring fans (jk):

"Your love life will be heating up soon"

OMG! I don't normally believe in these sorts of things, but I couldn't help but wonder if it was a good sign for things with me and Todd! Oh, but before I go out, I'd better decide on an outfit, check to make sure my makeup looks right, and then check my messages online before I go. Everyone, wish me luck!

**Comments**:

**JKim**: Hi, this is Jessica... who posted this? How did you get my Facebook password, and how do you know so much about me? Please leave me alone... |-| 
|-| cnxqjle || 4 || 
I held on to the straps of my worn backpack tightly as I took a deep sigh, took one last look at the broken orange sky, and stepped through the narrow doorway. I blinked rapidly as my eyes attempted to adjust to the darkness. My footsteps fell lightly on a tile floor, and I focused on breathing quietly. My hands were extended in front of me, and I walked forward until I felt another doorway.

I took a deep breath and fought down my panic. A faint childish fear of the dark lingered on the edge of my mind but I pushed it away. I had a job to do.

I crossed the threshold and counted my steps as I slowly inched forward.  “One, two, three...”  The monotonous rhythm of my steps sent my mind wandering. I guess it all made sense, in a way. The university was already a closed off community, separate from rest of the world, even before the world ended. I could write a paper about the post apocalyptic campus community that emerged. Ha, I guess in another life, I would have.

“...twelve, thirteen, left turn, one, two, three, four...” As the rest of civilization fell to shambles, a strange pioneering spirit emerged on campus. Something about being the academic elite, blah blah blah, ushering humanity back to former glory. I sighed. “right turn, one, two, three...” In a way it's not that hard to believe that the university's response to the apocalypse had been to give moving speeches and throw elaborate pep rallies. But you know, surprisingly, it worked, and it was good. Everyone on campus rallied together and somehow built a functioning little world in the rubble that was supposed to be the doom of humanity.

“...right turn, one, two, three...” Naturally, there were committees, and then committees turned into councils, and councils turned into monarchies. I mean, we really should have listened to the History Department's representative about where this whole thing was headed. But, everyone chose to listen to the leader of the Math Department when he told us that the probability of everything going to hell was actually quite low.

“thirty-eight, thirty-nine, left turn, one, two, three...”  It was no surprise that none of the Departments could actually agree on a united approach to surviving this whole thing, and so those big important leaders splintered. And when I say splintered, I mean they secluded themselves and came up with some pretty nutty solutions to this whole survival thing.

“left turn, down the stairs, one, two...” I was getting tired of the darkness, but I knew I was getting close. Honestly, my bet was on the Science Department at first, because everyone needed to eat. But, that was before a charismatic leader emerged and decided that it was not the food we should be modifying, but ourselves. The world had changed, he said, humans needed to adapt, he said. No thanks, creepy lab coat guy, I'm good. Anyway, he was deposed last year and replaced with a shining new leader from Sociology.

Today it's some clown in the Psychology Department who thinks she is the magnanimous leader to take down the Sociology leader and usher in a new civilization. 

The thing is, deep down all of these leaders were the same. For the world, that was a bad thing; but for me, it worked out alright. I was happy to give it to them if it meant I could move freely across campus and stay out of these ridiculous power struggles.

Pawing my way through the dark was a small price to pay to secure my department's future. Though, to be honest, I thought the Psychology Department let the power go to her head in record time. I mean why make me fumble my way through a damn labyrinth in pitch blackness just to get to her office? I stifled a laugh and hoped that there would be a piece of cheese for me when I got there.

I turned a corner and saw a door frame outlined with a dim light. I no longer had to count my steps and quickly closed the distance. I reached my destination.

I knocked and announced myself. “Hi, I'm here from the Art Department!” As I waited, I wondered what kind of ridiculous painting I would be working on this time. Perhaps I would get to paint this new glorious leader as Napoleon Crossing the Alps. |-| 
|-| cnxrpo0 || 4 || Today's gonna be the best day. It's finally the end of the school day on my 10th birthday, and my best friend Adam told me about the party he heard my mom planning for me at my house after school today. I walk out of school and to the bus with a skip in my step, which drew some attention from others, but I don't care. It's my day, I can do what I want. Adam and I sit together, as always, and play our usual card game, War. We've been playing together on the bus for years, but we don't really keep score. It's just fun to play. By the time we pull up to our stop, we throw the cards back in my bag and start walking up to my house. I see my dad's car first, and a smile lights up my face. He never gets home this early. As Adam and I run up to the front door, something feels wrong. There's no music, no laughter, nothing; just silence and a funny smell coming from inside the house. |-| 
|-| cnxshgv || 11 ||   The day was an abismal mist of icy cold rain and the wind ripped right through whatever little clothing he had. The Hound trudged on, his boots caked with mud. It had been raining for most of the day, and without socks, the soles of his feet were rubbed raw from the leather inside his boot. Every step causing him to grimace in pain. 

"Ah! Dam it all to hell! I would be somewhere gorging myself on suckling pig and washing it down with ale had it not been for your brother and his bitch of a mother getting killed" he said, as he plopped down and removed his boot to inspect his travel worn feet.

With that, Arya turned and glared at him, her icy blue eyes seemed to look past his face, and directly into his soul. Still though she said nothing, having been silent ever sense witnessing her brother's head paraded around on a spit attached to his direwolves body. 

"I need to rest awhile. Damned feet are all rubbed raw. Why don't you go and find us some firewood to try and make a fire with" he said, while ripping pieces of cloth from his shirt and wrapping it around his feet.

Without responding Arya turned and ventured off into the tree line. Picking up whatever sticks and twigs she could carry, Arya trudges further and further into the wood. As she was gathering the firewood she  noticed a leaf as red as blood sitting atop a small mound of  the yellow, brownish, and green colored leaves that fell from the trees above. 

She bent to grab the leaf, but noticed a slight resistance. She brushed the other dead leaves away to reveal a small weirwood branch. It seemed to be the remnant of a fully grown weirwood that had been cut down some time ago. The stump must have grown this one single branch and the one leaf that hung on for dear life. 

As she stood the inspecting the tree stump, she heard a rustling of leaves behind her. Instantly she turned, alert with needle at the ready in her right hand. Before her stood a hooded figure, in a molted brown cloak, the figures face hidden by the hood.

"Who are you!" Arya said as she stood sideface, ready to stab this mystery person at a moments notice. "I am but a weary traveler. hoping you could tell me where I am" the man said, his voice eerily familiar to her. "Please, I do not know where I am" the figure said, this time streching out his hand and taking a step forward as he said the words. 

Instinctively Arya stepped backward, still very much defensive. She couldn't shake the feeling that she had heard that voice before. Her father's voice, but she had seen him beheaded and at the hands of Iilyn Payne. "Show yourself" she commanded.

The figure reached up and slowly removed his hood. She gasped and dropped her sword. "Father" she whispered. |-| 
|-| cnxtn53 || 6 || "Genies are like parliament." Frank Drummond plopped into a leather armchair. He took a long drag from his cigar and then waved his hand dismissively, sending a zig zag trail of smoke into the air. "No scratch that. Genies are like the American congress. They don't truly have your best interest to heart, everything gets mucked up when you ask them to do something. You following me?"

Clark Rutger was sitting across from Frank, looking mighty small in his own armchair. Behind him stood an imposing D'Jinn, a dark shadow in the shape of a man, wreathed in gold. Clark nervously nodded back at Frank.

Frank grinned. "That's why I like you, boy. You're smart! You know that this whole thing could blow up in your face. That's why you come to a professional like me."

Frank stood and crossed to his brandy table and poured two glasses. "Wishes are complex, but you don't have to fear them. You just need a little guidance." He held out a glass to Clark, who took it with both hands.

Clark took a gulp and sighed. "I wish it wasn't so..."

"Stop!" Frank frantically waved his hands, cigar in one and drink in the other. "Don't finish that sentence!"

Frank turned to look at the D'jinn, whose eyes were swirling bright with magic. He cleared his throat and took on a more professional demeanor. "My client is not attempting to make a "wish", nor does the previous sentence that he uttered constitute an attempt to use one of his wishes. Furthermore, no magic will be discharged in conjunction with my client's statement. If my client agrees to these terms he will say yes."

Clark stared at Frank. Frank began to slowly nod his head at Clark. Clark began to mimic Frank, and then said, "Yes."

The magic faded from the D'jinn's eyes. 

Frank laughed and relit his cigar. "You gotta be careful with the genies, they'll try to twist anything into a wish."

Clark finished his drink. "Yeah. Thanks."

"Don't mention it, boy." Frank retook his position in his chair. "Now why don't you tell me how you came about this fella."

"Well, my mother and I were in Tunisia, which is where she always wanted to go, but I wasn't really fond of the idea of traveling out of Europe. But she got to telling me how I was an ungrateful son, and how she'll die if I don't take her, so of course she eventually won out. We booked the tickets, and we went the economical route, with three layovers because that's what happens sometimes, so of course my mother complained the whole time..."

Frank nodded. "Say, uh, why don't you skip ahead a bit."

"Oh right. So in Tunisia, we say a sign for a genie hunting tour, one person guaranteed to find a lamp per trip. I thought it was a waste of time and money, but mother wanted to find a genie so bad. There were fifty of us on the bus, and she complained the whole way because of the heat, so I finally said to her," Clark was grinning at this point, "I said, 'Mother, so help me, if I find that lamp I'm leaving you here in Africa...'"

Frank interrupted, "Alright, I can fill in the rest." Clark's smile disappeared and he sank back into the chair. Frank held out his hand. "Okay, let me see the lamp." After some hesitation from Clark, Frank said, "It's alright bit, you rubbed it, the genie is yours."

Clark nodded, and pulled a rusty lamp from a bag at his feet. Frank took it and turned it over, examining it from all angles.

Clark "So I'm thinking for my...desires...that I want a mansion in the country, a smoking hot girlfriend, a big..."

"Yeah, I'm gonna cut you off there, boy." Frank tossed the lamp gently back to Clark. "Let me be Frank." He smiled at his own witticism. Clark obviously didn't get it. "What you have here is a lesser genie. A low grade one at that. I'd reckon he's a B6 three-wish D'jinn, although you really ought to have him tested to find out the class." Frank examined the D'jinn from his seat. "He's obviously been reused. Probably a recall charm to bring him back to Tunisia, they'll bring him back to the pit and throw some dirt on him and have the next guy dig him up. Not much magic left in him."

Clark nodded slowly. "I see, so what does this mean." 

Frank grunted and leaned back. "It means an apartment outside the city and a cheap hooker. And you're not changing one quarter inch."

Clark considered this solemnly. "Hmm...I'll take it."

Frank raise an eyebrow. "Really?"

"Yeah, anything'a better than mother." 

"Alright, I'll draw up the paper work. This won't be so rough, just about thirty minutes. You can wait here."

Frank snubbed out his cigar, clapped his hands, stood up, and crossed to his cabinet full of standard wish forms. "Because this is so low level, I'll waive my usual fee in exchange for one wish."

"A wish!"

The D'jinn's eyes glowed. A glaring shot from Frank dimmed them again. 

Frank turned back to Clark. "Standard practice back in the states. Some of the larger firms get two from higher class genies." Frank nodded.

Clark nodded back and sat forward. 

Frank came back with the paperwork. "So, are we agreed?"

"Yeah." Clark answered. 

Frank smiled with a twinkle in his eye. "Great, let's get started." |-| 
|-| cnxvfnh || 15 || I hated this new phone. I couldn’t afford a new smart phone, so I had settle for an old flip phone. Nothing said cool like playing Snake or Tetris.

During a rousing game of Snake I received a text message. I quit my game and pulled up the text message. Unknown number.

“Great,” I sighed. 

I opened the text message. It read, “New Message Available. Accept? [Yes/No]”

“Right. Like I’m going to answer that,” I said. It had to be a scam message. If I answered it I’d have a thirty-dollar a month automatic charge on my cell phone. “I’m not that stupid.”

I deleted the message, flipped my phone closed and stuffed in my pocket. I sighed again as I waited for the bus. I looked one way up the street and then the other. Nothing.

Everything became black.

Something went over my head. It felt like burlap. Someone grabbed my arms and pinned them behind my back. I screamed and kicked as my assailants dragged me away from the bus stop. Another person took ahold of my legs and picked them up off the ground.

“Open the door. Get him in there,” said a man.

I landed with a thump on hard metal. A door slammed shut. “Go. Go. Go,” yelled another man. 

An engine revved, tires squealed and we took off. The bag came off my head. Two men and a woman looked down at me. 

One of the men, who looked to be in his early forties, spoke first. “Why didn’t you respond to the message?”

I shook my head. My knees shook. My eyes darted around the van from one person to another to out the tinted windows to back to the man who had spoke. “I thought it was spam,” I said.

“What the hell? You know those aren’t spam messages,” said the woman. She had short brown hair and looked to be in her mid-twenties. 

I opened my mouth but nothing came out.

“What the fuck is wrong with you?” said the first man. “You don’t ignore the Agency’s message.”

“Why are you acting like this, Thompson?” said the second man.

My voice came out shaky and hoarse. “I’m not Thompson. I’m Peter Wilmore,” I said.

“What’s going on? Why’d we have to do this?” said the driver, who sounded like a woman.

The three interrogators looked back and forth between each other. “Someone got to him,” said the man in his forties. 

“We’ve got to get him back to the facility and find out what happened.” She looked down at me. “We can’t rule out that he’s been compromised and may be dangerous.”

The bag went back over my head. I felt hands flip me over. My feet were cuffed together as were my wrists. “Sorry, Thompson. This is for your own good. We’ll figure out what is going on with you, but we can’t take any chances.”

I never felt more scared in my life. 
____________________________
Thanks for reading! If you like this then check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy.
 |-| 
|-| cnxvgmd || 5 || I sit there quietly, staring at the faint light of my new iPhone screen. "New Mission Available," it says, in a notification box blocking the game I was playing. "Mission?" I thought. As I am pondering over my options, I realize that pressing "Yes" would be incredibly stupid, and probably lead me to dying. Therefore, I casually press "No," roll over, and go to sleep. |-| 
|-| cnxvjwl || 3 || I opened the beautifully detailed oak double-doors that led to our conference room, and the first thing I noticed was the scent of scorched wood. 

Very old scorched wood. Specifically the incredibly rare and magnificently crafted tiger oak boardroom table. 

Sitting in, or should I say hovering over, a chair at the head of the table was a humanoid being composed entirely of flame. Needless to say the furniture was ruined. 

"Mr. Khalil, "I sighed,"we will have to bill you for the table."

**"But say the word mortal and a new table of solid gold is yours!"** boomed a deep, yet strangely gender neutral voice, seeming to project from the flame being's sternum. 

"Mr. Khalil..."

**"I am the Mighty Alai Khalid! Destroyer of..."** interjected the being.

"Excuse me Mr. Khalil, let me remind you that every aspect of this meeting is official legal business, and for the record's sake, I must address you by your legal, licensed name" I spoke in a clear voice, cutting off it's tirade with an audio-tuned magic circle we had installed in the flooring decades ago. 

"Additionally, I will council you to use your 'inside voice' from now on."

The being glared at me, the space where on a being of flesh were eyes burned a brighter shade of yellow-orange than the rest of the featureless flame face. 

I dropped the circle and continued. "This meeting is the third attempt at arbitration with my client, Mr. Dorsey, regarding the matter of three wishes, is this correct?"

"Yes. And I..."

Circle up, "A simple affirmation will suffice. The last time we met, there was a question about your licensing, have you been able to sort that out with the central office yet?" circle down. 

"Yes..." the being spoke with unaccustomed terseness, and simultaneously tossed a metallic cube the size of a cantaloupe onto the table, gouging what little of the finish that hadn't been crisped away by this being's presence. 

I pulled a pair of thermal gloves from my briefcase and slipped them on. Even though the brass cube wasn't glowing hot, I knew that it would still retain enough heat from the being's body as to sear flesh. I then pressed all six sides onto separate pieces of arranged paper, onto which the cube burned perfect mirror images of the tiny script carved several inches into the gold-ish metal. 

"It says here that you are actually an Ifrit operating as a licensed Wish Giver under a voluntary 'Seal of Solomon' investiture?", casting it a questioning look. 

"I entered into the service of the Sorcerer Madrigash seven millennia  ago. In trade for the masteries of magicks unimaginable I bound my existence to his starmetal ring and served him every day of his life."

"A shame you didn't read the fine print on that, how you weren't freed by his death." I spoke in goading tones (it always payed to keep these types off-guard). 

The temperature of the ambient air shot up thirty degrees as the being became a wailing fount of incandescent fire. 

**"He tricked me! He! That lowly worm of meat and bone! I could have charred him beyond cinders with a single thought!"**

Circle up. I let it rant for a while, sipping my coffee. I jot a note in the margin of my pad to 'look into adding fire to the audio cancelling circle'. Circle down. 

**"...with such rapidity that, not only does his flesh ignite** *from simple air-friction, that all of his myriad meat-organs* disperse to separate postal codes..." the being huffed with ever waning ferocity. 

The intensity of it's flame died down from brain-melting to simply eye-searing. It's shoulders seemed to slump. 

"You do know that you can retain the services of a Wishmaker to find a loophole in your contract with that ancient dead guy, right?" I mention conversationally. 

"Moving on, it looks like your certification in the City of Brass is up to date, as well as your Wish Giver license to operate here on the mortal plane using all seven civilian classes of Wish Magic. The package is the standard 'Three Wishes' contract with the usual 'Monkeys Paw'..."

**"Now wait just a minute,"** it thundered, my sudden glare serving to lower its tone, "I resent the implication that I would twist..."

"Mr. Khalil, you are a Wish Bringer, it wasn't implying that you would twist the intentions of my client, I was explicitly stating that you would twist the intentions of my client. We can dispense with the bluster and misdirection, I have arbitrated over two hundred Wish Contracts, and only one of my clients has been killed by their wishes, and we don't take responsibility for Mr. Zonderman as we loudly counseled our client against the infinite supply of Cinnabon Bites he spent his second wish on. It will be far more pleasant if we both dispense with formality and begin addressing the clauses."

"Clauses?" it replied. 

"And subclauses."

"I was under the impression that the mortal wanted the Golden Three, 'health, wealth, and happiness'?"

"That is a very loose abstraction of my client's specific wishes, but applicable."

"Then why do we need to go over... that..." it managed to convey disgust with the gesture it made towards the papers I was busy unloading from my briefcase.

"Mr. Khalil, your records clearly show a malicious streak of ironic inversion of client's explicitly stated desires."

"Alanis Morissette ironic, or real ironic?" the ifrit sputtered sullenly. 

I glare at him in a brief moment of uncharacteristic red-mist rage as I growl. "One of those isn't irony..."

A brief flash of a second later I am again composed and reading off some details of the ifrit's past. 

"Apparently, in the third millennia B.C., you granted the first wish of Timon Bin Hobard for 'ultimate power' by converting every particle of matter in his body instantaneously into energy, incidentally giving rise to the Biblical account of the spectacular destruction of Sodom and Gomorrah. I believe we are justified in the attention to detail this contract contains." I speak in level tones as I stop myself from handing the highly flammable paper stack that was it's copy of the contract, and simply laid it out on the table. 

I texted my assistant to have a copy printed up at the local MajiKinkos on fire-baned scroll paper, and to bill it to the burning son of a bitch trying to kill my client in unexpected ways. This is the life of a Wishmaker. Half lawyer, half seeker of knowledge of that which man is  not meant to know. It is certainly a well-paying profession, though one with a very high unexpected retirement rate. 

After several hours of bickering, underlining, crossing out, we had managed to establish a basic rapport.

**"What do you mean, 'there is no such thing as an objective assessment of happiness'?!"** it thundered. 

I ignored the outburst and continued "Happiness is a purely subjective experience. Some that appear very happy are not, and many that seem unhappy are quite fulfilled."

"Then Health and Wealth are also subjective experiences!" it mewled in comedically ill-concealed clever child triumph. 

"Those experiences are relative, not subjective. They can be given a quantifiable value that can be compared to like values. This cannot be said of happiness. The man in the village with seven pigs feels wealthy until he visits New York. And we already cleared up everything about health as 'the health relative to the wisher at age twenty-two, and this degree of health to not degrade in any physical, mental, spiritual, magical, numenal, or astral manner until the predetermined time of his death at age 150, with the deadman clause that if this desire isn't affirmed at least once a year from the age of one hundred on up, this period is to be extended by a decade per missed affirmation. This clause can be revoked by the wisher at any times by stating such vocally three times in a row resulting in an instant and painless death in case of eternal entombment or other such unforeseen disaster."

"I offered rescue service..." mumbled the ifrit. 

"Not good enough, that just opens up another stack of paperwork, and we can't anticipate the type of aid needed, or what fiendish cost you will exact on him or the lives of the ones he loves." I counter. 

The flames of it's face contort into a passable sneer "Spoilsport..."

"So let us peg it at this: The next three Powerball lottery drawings will roll over into a fourth drawing, of which my client will be the only winner. Additionally, all press releases, photos, videos, and news reports will display incorrect names and images that mysteriously never get corrected. With the caveat that my client will, of course (and I already stated this was unnecessary) dutifully report his income to the IRS and pay the appropriate taxes, as I know your license as a Wish Bringer is on the line here."

"He will be as healthy as stated above, now all we need to do is cover happiness..."

"I could make his brain pump out a steady supply of serotonin..." mumbled the Wish Bringer. 

"No good, the brain just becomes desensitized to it. What we usually suggest to our clients is that over the remainder of their lifetime 80% of the misfortunes that would befall them be offset with mysterious encounters or lucky scratch-off tickets and the like. This, of course is in no way meant to be construed as a license for the client to live recklessly, that self-created misfortune is outside the scope of this arrangement, though there is a subclause under Happiness that requires you to intervene significantly on his behalf if needed to escape an imminent life-threatening danger. There, that'll cover your offer of rescue earlier provided the client is in dire need, and since it is within the greater scope of the 'Happiness' clause, is subject to all abstractions, restrictions, authorizations...." I drone on and on...

**"I liked it better when I could just set people like you on fire for amusement."**

"I'm sure you did, Mr. Khalil, I'm sure you did..." |-| 
|-| cnxvxfy || 7 || Barry was high as a kite when the message popped up. "New Mission Available. Accept? [Yes]/[No]" he thought he was just tripping harder than usual but after shaking the phone a few times and hitting some non-yes/no buttons he figured out that the phone really was asking him a question. "I'm no coward." he said and hit yes. 

Ten seconds later the phone rang. "Hello. You're at State College at 293 Mayfield street correct?" A gruff man's voice asked. 

"Yeah. That's where I am." Barry cheerfully replied. 

"Go to Oak Street Pizza. Order a large Pizza, well done, with the works, hold the olives and pineapple. Then bring it to an apartment complex on Jacobs Street. Second floor apartment 24."

"What I'm an errand boy? This mission sucks!" Barry shouted.

"Payment for this service shall be fifteen hundred dollars. Discretion is of the utmost importance, you will tell nobody of these calls." The man replied. 

"You got a deal!" Barry hung up and raced out to his car and took care of the errand. The pizza was easy but the drop off was a little weird. The man receiving the pizza seemed very suspect of a free pizza being offered to him but after Barry talked him down he accepted it. 

That night his phone rang again. "Did the pizza get delivered? Did the customer want it?" The man asked. 

"Yeah, guy seemed kinda weird about it, but he thanked me for it." Barry said. 

"Good. Good, we'll be in touch." the voice told him. 

The errands went off and on for about a year, sometimes he wouldn't get a message for a couple months. Other times he'd get two in a week. The money was incredible, his grades slipped since he didn't really care about school now that he was a professional food service man. Sometimes people would refuse the food saying it sounded horrible and Barry got paid anyhow. 

Then one day he got a mission. Drop off some Indian food at a nice house outside of town. The order was the standard level of crazy, this time the food was so spicy it would burn the roof off the mouth of just about anyone not raised on the stuff. 

He walked up to the door and knocked. "Free Indian food." he cheerfully announced. The door flew open and three guns were pointed at his face, screams for him to drop the back filled the air. Everything was a blur till he was in the interrogation room.

"Look son, we got you at the location of at least seven different murders. You're in a world of shit. You're looking at twenty years solitary in a SuperMax till they get around to hitting you with the needle. You need to name names or that's your very bleak future. 

"I...I don't know anything." Barry lied. He could feel sweat pouring off his forehead. His stomach was churning such that he felt like he might shit himself, puke, or both. 

The cop slammed down photos of gruesomely murdered people, horrible gunshot wounds to the head having disfigured them to the point where they were barely human looking. "These people you all dropped food off to, and then somehow magically they end up dead a few days later. You care to explain that?" The cop shouted at him. 

"He won't be explaining anything." a voice shouted. A man in a crisp black suit walked into the room. He carried himself with a regal bearing. "Come on Barry, let's get out of here." 

Barry slowly managed to figure out the man standing there was Harold Dressman, known lawyer for the local mob. Barry was terrified both of going with him and of staying in the police room. In the end Harold's smiling, caring face won out over the cop's hateful glare. 

"He ain't going fucking anywhere!" The cop screamed at Harold. Barry was pushed back into his chair by the cop who threw him with such force Barry nearly toppled over in the chair. 

"Jack stop!" A deflated looking policeman in a suit said. "We can't hold him." 

"This is bullshit and you know it!" Jack shouted back at the other officer as he stormed off. Harold reached out his hand to Barry and pulled him to his feet. As he left the station Barry could feel the gaze of every cop there burning daggers into his flesh. 

Harold and Barry got into a black BMW and drove back to Barry's college.

"What the fuck is going on? Explain things to me." Barry said. 

"Talking is bad. The less you know the better off you are." Harold told him. 

Barry wanted to scream, to tell him to fuck off and level with him, but he knew it was in deep enough already, there was no reason to go even deeper. 

The car pulled into the main parking lot of the college. Barry looked nervously at Harold. "You going to kill me now?" Barry asked. 

"Of course not. Why would we punish success? When you check your bank account you'll see a quite acceptable severance package has been placed there for your time of service. Of course now that this has happened we can not be in contact with you again. Now please, get out of my car." Harold said. 

Barry stumbled out of the car. He thought about what to say, but then the powerful need to shit overtook him and he ran back to his dorm. 

Harold pulled out his phone. "Yeah, our latest runner has been taken out of play, to bad, he worked for far cheaper than market value. I must say your understanding of the weird eating habits of witnesses against my clients at trails was a quite useful thing. Using it to confirm they were where we suspected was a stroke of genius. There were of course some missteps, but a near seventy five percent success rate is nothing to sneeze at." 

"Yeah. I do have a good idea now and then." The gruff voice replied. Harold hung up and drove back home.  |-| 
|-| cnxw9j4 || 8 || I woke up at six in the morning. I showered, brushed my teeth and shaved. Breakfast was my normal two eggs, coffee and a small glass of orange juice.

My drive to work was uneventful. It was surprising that traffic was so light. I pulled into my normal spot at work and sighed. My job sucked. I hated this life.

I plopped down at my desk and turned on my computer. My email looked full of emails I didn’t want to answer. I leaned back in my chair and sighed. 

“Nobody move,” someone screamed from the front of the office. “Everybody stand up with your hands in the air.”

Three men fanned out. They were dressed in fatigues, balaclavas and were armed to the teeth with what looked like automatic rifles. I wasn’t sure. I wasn’t really into guns. 

I stood, as did everyone else in the room. No one could drop down and hide. My hatred of the open office concept would only grow after this event.

“Where is Jenny Warburton?” yelled one of the men at Jonathon, the receptionist.

“I don’t know,” stuttered Jonathon.

The man shot Jonathon in the chest. Jonathon fell to the floor and the man shot him twice more. Cindi screamed, and I wet myself.

“Once more,” yelled the man. He appeared to be the one in charge. “Where is Jenny Warburton?”

“Here. I’m here,” said Jenny. She stepped forward from behind a partition that separated the eating area from the office area. “I’m here.”

The man in charge turned and shot her. She screamed and fell to the floor, clutching her stomach. The second intruder walked over and shot her three more times. He nudged her lifeless body and nodded.

The three intruders left as fast as they came into the office.
___________________________________
I woke up at 6:15 in the morning. I showered, brushed my teeth and shaved. Breakfast was my normal two eggs, coffee and a small glass of orange juice.

My drive to work was uneventful. It was surprising that traffic was so light. I pulled into my normal spot at work and sighed. My job sucked. I hated this life.

As I walked to the front door I heard a gunshot followed by two more shot in quick succession. I peered through the front door and saw three heavily armed men. With shaking hands I pulled out my cell phone and started running back to my car. 

I dialed 911. 

“Hello. 911. What is your emergency?”

“There are three heavily armed men at my work. They’ve shot someone. I’m at 415 Maple Tree Lane. It’s the CRS Inc. Building,” I said.

Police cars roared up within minutes. During that time I heard three more shots come from inside the building. The three men came out the front door with guns blazing. 

The initial police response wasn’t enough. They were quickly overwhelmed. The three men made their way to what must have been their getaway vehicle. They hopped in it and drove off firing shots out the windows.

I later found out on the news that three of the initial responding police were killed. Four more were wounded. The getaway vehicle was found a couple of miles down the road. It was torched. No sign of the men.

I became a local celebrity for fifteen minutes. I received some small honors and awards for my quick call. I was interviewed, and it was nice for a little bit. I liked the attention. I still hated my job, but my short-lived fame was nice. 
________________________
Thanks for reading! If you liked this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy.
 |-| 
|-| cnxwca6 || 3 || My name is John Taylor. The end of my world came on my wedding day, when I was about to get married to the woman of my dreams. There we were, at the altar, exchanging vows. I looked into her eyes, and I had never felt more sure of anything in my life. Alexis had just finished speaking when the doors at the back of the church burst open. Three bald men in suits with red ties rushed into the room, disrupting the ceremony. A fourth entered, with a gun on his belt.

"Alexis Ritane?" he asked in a gravely voice. My future wife glanced at me, her eyes showing pure terror. "Ye...yes?" she responded. The man smiled.  "Miss Ritane, you are under arrest for federal treason." 

She ran. She took off towards the side door as she kicked off her shoes. The room erupted into chaos as the first three men in suits chased after her, knocking wedding guests out of their way as she bolted for the door. Everybody who was there was scrambling to get out of the way and figure out what was going on. I stood there, unable to move. I was not yet able to comprehend what had just happened. My beautiful fiancé had committed federal treason? What did that even mean?

The fourth man who had accused her slowly walked up to me. "Mr. Taylor?" he asked in an unusually calm voice. I did not respond. "I'm sure you have many questions. Come with me and all will be explained." I looked at him, still unable to move. Suddenly, his phone rang. He answered it and then immediately ran outside. His sudden change of behavior snapped me out of my trance, and I followed him.

They had caught my wife. It turns out that her wedding dress tripped her up. They wrestled her into a black SUV, and escorted me into another similar vehicle. I didn't try resisting; I was still in too much shock. We drove for what seemed like hours. With every passing mile sign I grew more tired, until I eventually fell asleep in the back of the car.

I woke up as the car was pulling into a parking lot for a large building. There was nothing else around, just a few trees and this one structure. The car door opened beside me. It was the man who was talking to me earlier. "I want you to know that everything is going to be alright now, and you're free to go home." 

What? After all this, I can just go home? "Excuse me?" I responded. The man looked down before staring me right in the eye. "She's dead. Cyanide pill. You can go home and continue living your life."

How am I supposed to do that, I asked myself, when I have no longer have a life to live?

[Changing the detail here]

My name is John Taylor. The end of my world came on my wedding day, when I was about to get married to the man of my dreams. There we were, at the altar, exchanging vows. I looked into his eyes, and I had never felt more sure of anything in my life. Alex had just finished speaking when the doors at the back of the church burst open. Three bald men in suits with red ties rushed into the room, disrupting the ceremony. A fourth entered, with a gun on his belt.

"Alex Ritane?" he asked in a gravely voice. My future husband glanced at me, his eyes showing pure terror. "Ye...yes?" he responded. The man smiled.  "Mr. Ritane, you are under arrest for federal treason." 

He ran. He took off towards the side door as he avoided running into people. The room erupted into chaos as the first three men in suits chased after him, knocking wedding guests out of their way as he bolted for the door. Everybody who was there was scrambling to get out of the way and figure out what was going on. I stood there, unable to move. I was not yet able to comprehend what had just happened. My fiancé had committed federal treason? What did that even mean?

The fourth man who had accused him slowly walked up to me. "Mr. Taylor?" he asked in an unusually calm voice. I did not respond. "I'm sure you have many questions. Come with me and all will be explained." I looked at him, still unable to move. Suddenly, his phone rang. He answered it and then immediately ran outside. His sudden change of behavior snapped me out of my trance, and I followed him.

We ran up to the three men that had chased Alex outside. He was no where to be seen. The fourth man looked over his shoulder at me as he ran to one of two black SUVs. "Do not leave this building, Mr. Taylor, more information will be provided to you as soon as possible." He and another man took off in one car, and the other two followed close behind. In ten seconds they were gone, and I was standing outside alone. Soon after their departure, wedding guests started to hurry outside and comfort me about what had happened. They were asking me all sorts of questions, but I couldn't focus on any of them. My mind was too busy thinking about my future husband.

It was three and a half hours after he left when he texted me. I was still at the church, as instructed by the man in the suit. There were a handful of people left to keep me company. I felt my phone buzz as I threw away yet another tissue into the already overflowing bin. A quick glance informed me I had a text from Alex, but I didn't think too much about that as I get texts from him all the time. But as soon as I looked away, I looked right back and rushed to open it. He had sent me instructions on what to do.

"Leave church. Head to library on 3rd Street. Basement. Second door on right. Hurry."

I did as I was told, despite the instructions from the man in the suit. At that point, I just wanted to see Alex. In that room that the second door on the right lead to was a computer screen, glowing with Alex's face. I rushed in front of it. It was a video call. I could see he smiled as I approached.

"Alex! Thank god...what happened? What the HELL was that?!" I was relieved to see his face but also furious about what had happened. "John- listen. I don't have much time. You need to meet with me, in person. I just emailed you plane tickets to Turkey. There isn't much time to explain, so I'll do so as you're on your way to the airport. Listen, this is the most important thing right now: you are now a federal criminal and you must never return to the United States after you leave it. Do you understand me?" |-| 
|-| cnxwxox || 26 || The world turned upside down.

"Move! Move!" 

Gunfire erupted from all sides - the man struggled to escape from the downed Humvee. He stole one last glance at the driver, crawled away from the vehicle, and leaned against a boulder.

The IED teams should've swept the area. Everything... everything was all wrong.

An explosive landed a few feet away - there was no room to run. The shrapnel tore through the man's torso.

Then, all was quiet.

_______________________

The world turned upside down.

"Move! Move!" 

Gunfire erupted from all sides - the man struggled to escape from the downed Humvee. He stole one last glance at the driver, crawled away from the vehicle, and leaned against a boulder.

The IED teams should've swept the area. Everything... everything was all wrong... Wasn't it?

An explosive landed an inch too far away and detonated a split second too late. The shrapnel tore through the man's torso, narrowly missing his heart.

All was quiet. 

But not for long.

When he came to, he found himself in a darkened cave, surrounded by bits of machinery.

"Hello, Mr. Stark." |-| 
|-| cnxwzag || 4 || Author’s note: As far as I know, all of this technology exists in some form or another, so it’s not really advanced in a conventional science fiction way. Sorry in advance if this isn’t what OP had in mind for the prompt!

****************************************************
In a different place, not so long ago – 
Location: South Eastern Ohio

The wind continued to howl as the sun began to set along the horizon. Beautiful shades of red and orange illuminated the evening sky and cast a hue upon the freshly fallen snow. Vast open fields of covered farmland occasionally gave way to patches of trees, a feature of the landscape that remained largely unchanged for almost two centuries. 

A few ramshackle structures stood upon what was once a corn and bean farm. A house, which was perhaps a hundred years old, stood dark and grey. The paint was peeling away and several of the windows were cracked. A decrepit antenna clung fiercely to the dying building, while a satellite dish had already fallen. 

Not too far away stood a barn, which was not in much better shape. One of the doors had fallen down and the entire structure was slanting slightly to the left. Like the house, there would be no one to repair it – this area had been abandoned by its residents for almost a year and a half now, as the division conflict spread further into the heartland.

But that was not to say that there was no one here; several figures moved sluggishly in and around the barn. One of these was a reasonably young woman with short black hair and green eyes, Pathfinder Emma Berghoff, who had just turned twenty five years old. She ran her artificial hand idly along the rifle strap that hung over her long, grey and white mantel coat, which concealed her body armor. She spoke the first words that came into her head. “It’s cold.”

A few mumbled agreements were returned by her comrades, who had taken shelter from the wind up against the barn. One of them played idly with a tablet while the others stared off into space. Emma reached up and adjusted the brim of her steel helmet, which was supported by a woven-fiber liner that was, surprisingly, more resistant to small arms fire than the shell. Much of her uniform was more for decoration than practicality. But that’s how the top brass liked it, and she was in no real position to complain. “Any luck linking up with a GPS satellite?”

The soldier playing with the tablet, Sabina Bachmann, glanced up for a second. “No. I don’t think it’s coming back up this time.”

“Wonderful,” Emma sighed, exasperated. “As soon as we can fire them up, they shoot them down. So much for ‘advanced warfare.’ This is no different than the Second World War.”

“Nope. But at least we won that one. Gives us some hope, right?”

“I guess.”

Turning her gaze, Emma stared inside the barn. Several men lay idly upon a rather large pile of old, discolored hay. Between them protruded a long cylindrical object; the barrel of a self-propelled howitzer. It, and a few others like it on neighboring farms, were all that was left of Emma’s unit. They had been assaulted two days earlier and were forced to retreat backwards towards the capitol. She was about to turn around when a vibrating sensation began on her belt. She reached down and checked the small short range paging device, and saw a simple command scrawl across its tiny pixelated screen. “Need to talk. Report now.” 

It was her commanding officer, Thomas Winters. He had taken up a position inside the barn, pouring over some old paper maps they had found in the house, hoping to find a way a way to fall back to the much better defended capitol. 

She strode cautiously through the open space created by the fallen door; although Thomas had assured her the structure was in no real danger of collapse, she was highly skeptical that it was just one fat bird away from toppling down and trapping Donner, the name they had affectionately given the mobile artillery.

Donner was actually quite amazing – it could fire six computer or GPS guided 120mm shells in succession at varying angles to all strike a target simultaneously. The thunder-like noise it made when undertaking this is how it had earned its name. (Granted, it also helped that the lead howitzer in the unit had been named Rudolph after an incident with a paint can during happier times.) 

Inside, Emma could see wires hanging from the rafters, leading to extinguished light bulbs and a few black boxes, probably once housing Wi-Fi units for the remote operated farming equipment. She saw Thomas still at the old workbench, a hand-wound LED flashlight tied to a plank that ran just overhead, dimly illuminating his workspace.  

“Sir!” Emma barked, striding up to him, coming to attention, and saluting stiffly. 

“Knock it off, Berghoff. Your sarcasm is not appreciated.” He was visibly stressed and exhausted from the last few days. 

“I thought my sarcasm was always appreciated, sir!” Emma pushed, a small smile breaking across her weary face. 

“Only if you want latrine duty.”

“We have latrines? I’ve been shitting outside like a damn animal,” she grinned, her voice suddenly taking on the accent of one of the enemies; “Please teach me where it is that I should be kindly giving of a shit, sir!”

Thomas cringed and rested his face in his palm, gently shaking his head. “Fuck you. Look, I’ve been looking over these old maps. It looks like we’re not too far from the old Interstate 75,” he said, pointing at it. “It’s too dangerous to take such an open route. But, here,” he said, sliding his finger just slightly to the side, “is an old road alongside which the highway was built. This map isn’t topographical, but looking at the overpasses here and here, I reckon it that not only does it run alongside the highway all the way to the capitol, but it’s also the high ground.” 

Emma scanned the maps, nodding in agreement. “It looks possible. So, what do you want me to do?”

“I want you to use those wonderful Pathfinder skills of yours and confirm it. GPS is dead, but you can still use the imaging program to record and map your progress. If you use your optivision goggles and short distance encrypted transmission, painting dots along the way, we can upload that to the armor and use it to navigate to your location.” Thomas explained. 

“Once you’ve confirmed it is safe, of course.”

“Of course”, Emma responded.
********
Emma set out shortly thereafter. With her was another Pathfinder, a red haired woman named Maria Hassel, nicknamed Vixen. Emma took lead and the two of them trudged through the snow. It took a few hours, but sure enough, they reached the Interstate, just as Thomas had predicted. As they approached, they would pause, crouch, flip down their optivision sets and take a visual scan of the area. From there they would “paint” a giant orange dot within the image. Once they confirmed the area was clear, they would transmit the data back to Thomas, who would upload it into the datasets of each solider and piece of armor, for them to follow, like a giant game of Pac-Man.

“Well, that’s the last one,” Maria said, lifting up her sunglass like vision enhancer. “Should we radio in the all clear and begin transmitting the data?” 

There was no response. 

“Emma?” Maria asked, glancing around. She saw her friend huddled up against the remains of a fence, gesturing for her to follow. Closing the distance quickly, Maria fell into place beside Emma, drawing her sidearm in the process. She followed Emma’s gaze directly ahead, to where she saw two enemy soldiers standing. They appeared to be relatively relaxed, one of them having his rifle over his shoulder, while the other smoked an electronic cigarette. “Pathfinders,” Emma whispered. 

“Are they from the Asian Empire?” Maria asked, replacing her sidearm with a set of small electronic binoculars.

“I don’t think so,” Emma responded, slightly uncertain. Much of the world’s military equipment had come to be very similar in appearance, making proper identification of enemy combatants a sometimes difficult task. 

“No, wait,” Maria interjected, as Emma began to level out her long rifle. “Nationalists. Damn European purebreeds – what are they doing here?” 

“Won’t matter in a second,” the black haired woman remarked. She reached up and thumbed a few buttons above the trigger guard on the rifle. A small light flashed on Maria’s binoculars and she pushed a corresponding button with her index finger. The image before her changed; it was now split in two – on one side was what she saw, and on the other was what Emma saw. The software began to calculate the trajectory of the round. 

“Taking the shot,” Emma uttered, her voice pulsing with adrenaline. 

“Wait! It hasn’t finished calculating!”

“Doesn’t matter.” 

As the one soldier stepped lazily in front of the other, Emma fired. Her round, relatively silent, took both of them down, spattering blood across the snow. It also impacted against a fallen sign that was buried beneath the snow, creating a loud metallic echo. 

Emma cursed and Maria lowered the binoculars. 

“Well, maybe no one else heard that.” 

The two of them waited for about thirty minutes, and when no one else appeared, they approached the bodies. Maria began to remove the weapons from them, kicking fresh snow over the blood as she moved alongside the corpses. “We’ll need to hide em’,” the redhead said, exasperated. “Can’t you ever shoot anyone tiny?”

Emma didn’t respond and walked over to the sign. She crouched down and began to scrape away the snow that covered it. She was greeted by green and white, the typical colors of an interstate sign. When she was finished, she stepped back and remarked to Emma, “Yup, we’re definitely on the right track.”  

The words scrawled across the sign next to a small image of the State of Ohio with the Reichsadler, a symbol that the people of this land no longer swore allegiance to, couldn’t have been clearer; 

*Autobahn 75 Nord -
Welthauptstadt Columbus
135km* |-| 
|-| cnxy6o6 || 4 || I dream of a better world. 

A world, where everyone looks towards peace and not war.

Much to my disappointment, a world like this is not possible.

Though we try to engineer peace, we end up manifesting war. For that reason we end up looking towards...

Heroes, people who we can count on to create a better future.

Even though not many heroes exist currently,the ones that do, continue to ameliorate our lives.

For this reason, we often rely on the supernatural to take its course and create these heroes. 

Lately I myself got to see the supernatural first hand. 

And after witnessing it's power I realized that its not the powers' of heroes that make them great. Instead its their ability to ~be courageous when no one else is willing to.

So, it is easy to arrive at the conclusion that what makes a hero is not the supernatural, rather the hero's ability to do all in his/her power to make a better world. You probably weren't able to guess this, but I myself am a 

Hero.







 |-| 
|-| cnxyk3f || 3 || Imagine a hammer slamming down on top of your skull, attempting to break through. Imagine every moment it keeps pounding at you trying to leave its mark. The hammering continues to push harder and harder but never breaking skin, much less the bone underneath.

I can't think straight anymore. Every moment of concentration is lost by another distraction. Another idea just pops into my head from an unknown source and I am spent with the next hour feeling it reverberate nauseatingly through me until another one willingly takes its place. The thoughts are never my own, and the voices are never ones I recognize.

I am a mind reader. It's a rare, but sadly incurable trait that has been passed down through the maternal side of my family for generations. A mother unto a daughter, unto a daughter since ancient times. Some matriarchs in my ancestry were able to use this power to achieve great things. Their wisdom and counsel would allow their partners to achieve great wealth and power. Some generations found their powers revealed to the general public and a hunt for sorcery caused them to be exiled, or otherwise punished for the sinful trait. 

In the modern generation of things, often I feel I am being punished in a much more passive and cruel way. After all I have to sit here and listen to the ramblings of the old man in the corner, sipping on a cup of coffee and making rude remarks about the high school aged cashier of the local Starbucks. I listen to the pretentiousness of the college student sipping on their Caramel Mocha about the insanity of other students for their lack of understanding semicolons. There is a special place for those who use semicolons in a creative writing assignment; that special place is literally hell.

Explaining the plight to my friends has become useless as well. When I explain I couldn't sleep at night because I could hear the whispering mind of a lady walking her dog at 2AM, they believe I was simply dreaming or just hearing things. Many of my friends don't even believe it's a real disorder that I have. I have been asked by others whether or not I have been diagnosed with a form of schizophrenia and just believe in all of this. 

The rest of my friends have expressed jealousy and wish they could have such a cool ability. It seems great on paper. When I first learned of the family trait it filled me with excitement. I was really looking forward to the day that I would be able to truly understand the depth of another person's mind and thoughts. It seemed exciting, and I imagined that it could help as a career path toward criminal psychology, or at the worst case scenario I would be a damn convincing fortune teller on an east coast boardwalk. Sadly, both for myself and the sake of the stories which I tell my friends, the reality is that a lot of the thoughts I come across aren't as interesting as we like to believe them to be. Most of the things we tend to think about aren't as interesting to another outside perspective.

The true problem is a power like this does not simply contain the off switch it needs and sometimes, without realizing it I simply delve into the minds of others almost unknowingly. If it wasn't for the voices being so distinct and unlike mine, half the time I probably wouldn't realize these thoughts are any but my own. I guess to give us the security that there is some sanity to this gift. A common courtesy from the genealogical traits I carry.

My coffee cup is empty. I suck the air out of the straw and move it around, hoping that there are a few drops left, but amidst the distractions of everyone else, I became less and less aware of my own time and place. Time to go buy another coffee I suppose.

I reach the counter and begin to place my order. Vanilla Soymilk Latte, as per usual. I see the cashier put the order in without even asking me. I've come to this coffee shop for people watching enough times, she clearly remembers it by now.

"Will that be all?" Asked the young cashier. I listen to the monotonous clicks of the touch screen.

Of course, I thought. She rings up the total and I offer her the money. Suddenly a voice comes ringing through my head.

"She seems rather out of it today."

Am I that noticeable to others? When you read the minds of others, I suppose it's really hard to save your own face. Half the time I don't even know what I'm thinking.

"Stop that!" the same voice shouts. That was the cashier. What is she asking me to stop? Or is it something else? I begin to inspect her mind further.

"Get out!" the voice demands. I become more confused.

"Hey!" Shouts the cashier. I look at her, a bit shocked and apologize.

She realized I was reading her thoughts after all? That doesn't seem likely. Nobody else can read thoughts like I do. I've never seen it before.

She hands me the coffee.

"Next time, knock on the door. Don't just walk in unannounced. That's bad manners." She remarks casually.

"What do you mean?" I ask her cryptically, afraid to listen to her thoughts any futher. She simply says nothing and walks away.

I return to my seat, a bit distraught. My mind begins to shut down completely and the voices just begin to roam freely. I can hear many thoughts, but I have become too unfocused to really discern them this time. All I can hear is her voice, shouting back at me "Stop that!" and if anyone else has ever noticed this, but been too shy or uncertain who their mind was speaking to.

The voices become more and more silent, and for the first time I can clear my mind almost entirely of them. It's peaceful for a moment and I feel as if I could drift off into a dream state where I don't have to listen to others and can simply find my own mind once again. I follow the silence of it toward my desired salvation. I feel my body fall forward and collapse.

"How do you feel?" A voice asks me inquisitively.
"Relaxed. Calmed." I reply.
"Open your eyes." The voice commands. I blink for a second and raise my head from a couch. I see my friend in a chair beside the couch I am laying on. He is scribbling something down on a piece of paper on the clipboard.

"I'm sorry Sophia, but time is up today. Tell me more about the gift next week." My friend tells me.

"I can't wait. There is so much more to it." I tell my friend.

"I'm sure there is. Are you still involved in the psychology program at the university?" My friend asks.

"Of course," I smile. "I want to understand the minds of others in a much better way than this. I want to understand them exactly the way you understand mine." |-| 
|-| cnxyq6y || 3 || "Yeah, so then he said, 'wait, wait, wait...you're fighting *each other?* No Orcs? Trolls? Balrogs? Just men fighting men?' and then he like, scoffed and walked away."

"So what'd you do?"

"We shot him in the back with an arrow as he walked away, and buggered his corpse, and I figure we can pass his bones off as Lord Stark's to lure the Young Wolf out of hiding...somethin' like that."  |-| 
|-| cnxz9q8 || 3 || The message flashed on my new smartphone's screen as I drove spiritedly through the mountains above Los Angeles, enjoying the endless twisting roads and crisp spring air. Being a somewhat responsible driver, I pulled my little roadster onto the nearest shoulder and opened the text. 

"New Mission Available. Accept? [Yes]/[No]."

My brow furrowed in confusion. What kind of mission exactly? I could handle picking up some groceries, but anything else was a bit above my level of expertise. *Well, I not doing much right now anyway*, I thought to myself.

With the tap of the green [Yes] icon, a new screen popped up showing a map and single directive: "Go to location A and retrieve package." Location A appeared to be only a few miles away, tucked even farther into the valley that I had been driving along. 

I placed the phone back down and threw my car into gear, flogging it down into the gaping valley with reckless abandon. As the engine screamed through every straight and the tires squealed around every corner, my mind drifted to the package. 

What could it be? A bundle of weapons was likely, a cache of drugs was more so. Only now did the potential danger of the situation begin to dawn on me, and the idea of turning around and fleeing seemed more and more intelligent. 

Suddenly I was there, my GPS marking me just beyond the destination. All around were massive trees which blocked out the sun and cast the forest in near darkness, obscuring my view of the single ramshackle cabin sitting just beyond the treeline.

I exited my car and slowly, tentatively walked to the edge of the treeline, peering into a cobweb covered window of the cabin. From within emanated the creaks and groans of movement on a wooden floor; someone was in there.

"Hey!" I called out. "I'm here for the package!"

For a moment the creaking stopped, then resumed at a fevered pace until the front door of the old cabin cracked open. From it emerged not a gun-toting arms dealer or a bloodshot-eyed tweaker, but instead one of the most jaw-droppingly gorgeous young women I had seen in my short life.

Her pale skin and blonde hair glowed warm against the shadows, somehow pushing them back. Her fragile and slender figure moved with graceful ease down the rickety log steps of the cabin, and her brilliant green eyes filled with light as they fell upon mine. 

She ran to me, dancing over fallen branches and shrubbery like some sort of heavenly acrobat. I reached out my palm to receive whatever package this enchantress needed delivered, but instead she put her hand in mine. 

"We need to go, now," she cooed, her soft voice tinged by an underlying urgency.

"What for?" I asked, my brow furrowing again.

"Because those Russian mobsters are going to be back any minute!"
 |-| 
|-| cnxzall || 4 || It was pandemonium at Ridgard University. With the apocalypse happening and every department for themselves, the fights began brutal and near endless with the bodies of faculty and teachers laid about the halls and classrooms. The Engineers have created killing machines that fired at anyone that attempted to enter their areas, like an ever watchful turret, only deactivating to those with the proper IDs. The English classes were no more as were math. Science Departments have created all sorts of acids and BoW to use in their war to stay alive. Everything looked as if it’d be a stalemate until Engineering one-upped once more, creating weapons themselves to use that fired deadly projectiles, they moved ever closer, many other departments were either pushed back or were butchered where they fought. All departments retreated into the Phys Ed room where they believed they were safe, the people there didn’t fight at all, they seemed to be hiding…like cowards, but it was a room to hide in.

 It was dark for the surviving members, there was breathing though so they stayed quiet, whimpering quietly, hoping to not wake them, but it was no use, they were not asleep…they were preparing.

“Stay quiet, you will be safe here.” Said a gruff voice, “We have been preparing for this moment longer than you think.”
“Wh-What? What makes you think you can take the Engineers? They’ve practically taken over the entire school, them and their Teacher, Mr. Oman.” 
“Trust us, this is what we do.” The gruff voice said.

There was silence now, the only sound made was the movement outside as the Engineers got closer, “There probably in here, waiting to be killed!” Said a voice and then they opened the doors and were amazed at what they saw. The surviving other departments were amazed at what they saw too.

 There, in the middle of the room were the Physical Education students, all 300 of them, they wore helmets that protected most of their face, save their eyes, as well as armor, all made of the memory foam used to stop their falls from heights. In one hand were shields made of thick plastic and in their right were javelins taken from the back, wielded like spears. And on their belts they wielded large paper cutters as one-sided blades. 
 
 Their teacher was Mr. Leon Idas.

“PHYS ED! WHAT IS YOUR PROFESSION?!” He yelled at the top of his voice, and was replied with ‘HAROO! HAROO! HAROO!” And then they brought their shields to the forefront, covering one another, and then moved forward with their javelins at the front. They didn’t really know how to respond until one man jumped over the front line, stabbed the first engineer in the front, and then ran into the rear, being covered by those in the front. The engineers realized what was going on and began firing, but their weapons were useless as they didn’t have the penetrating power to harm their shields, getting stuck in the foam as they continued forward, stabbing their spears and killing many, The formation held as they continued onwards, retaking many of the rooms for their own. 

The Engineers continued to try and hold their own, but they didn’t realize the resolve of the Phys Ed. When they brought out the turrets, they rushed forwards, slamming their shields into the turrets to knock them down and smash them. When they brought out their home-made grenades, taken from the science classes, they burned helplessly against the wet and heavy foam. It was a massacre. 

Some of the engineers got separated, being cornered at the stairways, “PHYS ED! LET’S TAKE THEM FOR A LITTLE TRIP!” Mr. Idas yelled and lead his men towards the cornered people, they were slowly moving down the stairs, but it was too slow as they soon tripped over and fell what seemed to be a long flight of stairs.  They then turned their attention back towards the main engineering room.

“Mr. Oman, we can’t hold them back!” A student had gone to warn his engineering teacher, “They come with spears, they come with paper cutters, and we try to counter but they always re-counter! What do we do?!”

Mr. Oman stood there, looking out the window of the third story, the cries and deaths of his students can truly be heard. “Let him come, clear him a path. I will talk to him…”

Meanwhile, the engineers continued to be massacred, until the student from before came in, “Everyone, into the main room and clear space for the guests! There shall be no more bloodshed as said by Mr. Oman!” At the words, the engineers, still fearful, ran away into the engineering room and stood against the walls and waited, the Phys Ed walked into the room and watched the students that coward, Mr. Idas walked towards Mr. Oman, “Alright, Mr. Oman, tell me what you want, if it’s to surrender than I’ll happily accept it.

Mr. Oman smiled, “No, Mr. Idas, it’s to offer an alliance. Listen, with your strength and our ingenuity, imagine what we can accomplish!” He said with a smile and walked towards him, “Imagine both of us, leading this campus to a newer era of learning. Imagine us learning Physical and Technical.” He held his arms out, “What do you say?”

Mr. Idas thought for a moment, lowering his spear and dropping it, Mr. Oman smiled at this, thinking he had won. And then he looked in shock as Leon Idas pulled out his paper slicer and held it against Mr. Oman’s neck.

“What is this? This is madness!” Mr. Oman yelled out, confused at how things turned.

“Madness? THIS. IS. RIDGARD!” And then he kicked Mr. Oman out of the window of the third floor, his men butchering the rest of the engineers as he began to walk away. He and his phys ed class were victorious.
 |-| 
|-| cnxzc8i || 6 || Jenny is my wife.  Every morning when I wake up, I feel sick to my stomach.  I lie in bed pretending to be asleep for another 15 minutes, because I know that it's the last 15 minutes of the day that won't be a fight.  What trivial bullshit are we going to fight about today? Will I pick up 70% lean beef instead of 80% lean beef on my way back from a ten hour day at the office?  Will I be five minutes late to pick little johnny up for soccer practice?  Will I look at the weather girl, a second too long on the morning news? My nerves are completely shot these days.  My hand shakes constantly and I find myself, replacing the hidden bottle of whiskey in the garage far more often these days. 

I look at the clock at sigh heavily. Fuck.  I can't put this shit off anymore, so I might as well get out of bed. My wife is still snoring, wearing those disgusting pajamas that she is always still  wearing when I get home.  I give her the finger and walk out into the kitchen.  I flip on the coffee maker, and head to the bathroom to take, what I'm sure will be a very watery shit.  

After I flush, I put the lid down.  I don't really have a choice. It's one of those stupid lids with the goddamn carpet on it.  It'll fall down anyway.  I walk out of the bathroom towards the kitchen. Oh good.  She's up now.

"STEEEVENN, how many times do I have to tell you to that the good coffee is for when we have company. Seriously, can you not do anything right?  Can you at least pick up some ground beef on your way....."

She keeps talking.  I stop listening.  I pour a cup of the "good" coffee, and walk out the door.  She starts yelling at me out the door, on the way to the van. I don't care what she's saying.  It doesn't matter. Not today.  Not anymore.  

I drive two blocks away, and then pull over.  I pull out my phone and without hesitation dial the number. " Yeah. It's me.  Just make sure the kids have left first." 

And just like that it was set in motion.  Today is the day I put a hit on my wife.  I fucking hate that woman.

__________________________________________________________

Jenny is my girfriend.  Every morning when I wake up, Jenny gives me a blowjob.  I fucking love that woman. |-| 
|-| cny0afd || 3 || I laid on the couch, staring off into space. Light crept in from behind the curtains, but as it began to slowly fade away, I was gradually being left in the encroaching darkness. Although it was a Friday night, this was the usual routine for me – or at least it had been, ever since I flunked out of school and was let go from my job. 

Sitting up, I yawned and began to ponder what I should do with the night. My first thoughts were hitting up my Xbox 360 for some online play, but glancing across the room at the controller, even that felt like too much work. I was about to get up and pee, when my phone began to ring. It was my older sister, Jennifer. 

She was the only one who knew about my current situation. Ever since we were kids, I was always able to open up to her. She always knew how to get me to talk when I isolated myself in my room, and I always looked up to her. She had moved away to another city after graduating college, but we still stayed in contact on Facebook and texted each other. When she did not hear from me for a while, she called, and as always got the truth out of me. As time went on though, I began avoiding her calls as well, especially as things grew worse.

I had maybe enough money in the bank to cover one more month of rent before I had to relent and call my parents, explaining all that had happened. As far as they knew, everything was going great for me. I had not had the heart to tell them that I had failed to pass any of my finals, or that the landscaping company I had been working for part time collapsed. 

At first I told myself that everything would be alright. That I would find another job, and that if I changed schools, maybe I could start over. Now, I’ve always suffered from depression for as long as I can remember, but after a month of being unable to find anything, I soon found myself sleeping later and later, forgetting to eat, and staring off into space far more than usual. Another month after that and I was only leaving the apartment for quick, late night runs to the 24-hour grocery down the street. 

The few friends that I had were too busy with their own lives to really notice what was happening. I had always been a bit quiet and withdrawn, so when I stopped showing up to parties, I don’t think anyone really noticed. They would occasionally text me to see what was up, or enquire about grabbing a meal sometime, but I always politely brushed them off by saying I was too busy and maybe we could try again another time. Eventually the messages stopped coming. I didn’t want to burden them with my problems, or be a downer in their lives, which so far as I could tell, were going great.

The phone continued to ring. 

Sighing, I glanced from the Xbox 360 to the phone, and picked it up. 

I’m glad I did. We talked for hours, and she explained to me that she loved me, and that no matter how bad things got, we could fix them. If worse came to worse, I could crash on her couch and we could figure out some way to solve the school problem. No matter what happened, she would help support me. All I needed to do was take the first steps to help myself. 

It wasn’t much, but it meant the world to me.

She was killed later that evening, when her vehicle was struck by a drunk driver. I was heartbroken, but what she told me stuck with me. Slowly I began to repair my broken life – I found a job and started to go back to school. Now I have my degree and decent job. I can’t help but wonder what my life would be like if I hadn’t picked up that call from my sister. 


********************************************************

I laid on the couch, staring off into space. Light crept in from behind the curtains, but as it began to slowly fade away, I was gradually being left in the encroaching darkness. Although it was a Friday night, this was the usual routine for me – or at least it had been, ever since I flunked out of school and was let go from my job. 

Sitting up, I yawned and began to ponder what I should do with the night. My first thoughts were hitting up my Xbox One for some online play, but glancing across the room at the controller, even that felt like too much work. Then I remembered, I could turn it on from here. In a hoarse, sleep induced voice, I said “Xbox On.” The unit flared to life and illuminated the screen, which I had apparently forgotten to turn off.

I was about to get up and pee, when my phone began to ring. It was my older sister, Jennifer. 

She was the only one who knew about my current situation. Ever since we were kids, I was always able to open up to her. She always knew how to get me to talk when I isolated myself in my room, and I always looked up to her. She had moved away to another city after graduating college, but we still stayed in contact on Facebook and texted each other. When she did not hear from me for a while, she called, and as always got the truth out of me. As time went on though, I began avoiding her calls as well, especially as things grew worse.

I had maybe enough money in the bank to cover one more month of rent before I had to relent and call my parents, explaining all that had happened. As far as they knew, everything was going great for me. I had not had the heart to tell them that I had failed to pass any of my finals, or that the landscaping company I had been working for part time collapsed. 

At first I told myself that everything would be alright. That I would find another job, and that if I changed schools, maybe I could start over. Now, I’ve always suffered from depression for as long as I can remember, but after a month of being unable to find anything, I soon found myself sleeping later and later, forgetting to eat, and staring off into space far more than usual. Another month after that and I was only leaving the apartment for quick, late night runs to the 24-hour grocery down the street. 

The few friends that I had were too busy with their own lives to really notice what was happening. I had always been a bit quiet and withdrawn, so when I stopped showing up to parties, I don’t think anyone really noticed. They would occasionally text me to see what was up, or enquire about grabbing a meal sometime, but I always politely brushed them off by saying I was too busy and maybe we could try again another time. Eventually the messages stopped coming. I didn’t want to burden them with my problems, or be a downer in their lives, which so far as I could tell, were going great.

The phone continued to ring. 

Sighing, I glanced up at the screen. No, not tonight, Jen – I didn’t want to bring her down right at the start of the weekend. No, best just to wait and see if she calls back again tomorrow night instead. Tonight would be spent grinding aimlessly in Destiny. I ignored her call. 

Now I wish I had picked up that phone. She was killed later that evening, when her vehicle was struck by a drunk driver. I was heartbroken. My depression intensified and any semblance of a normal, functioning life was swallowed up in complete darkness. I no longer had the will to even try and fight it.

My parents had to bury two of their children that year. 
 |-| 
|-| cny0hv6 || 3 || "She's probably just a little uneasy... you know it must be strange for a 5-year old to cope with the idea of a funeral. Seeing her uncle at the wake was really her first time experiencing the idea of death," my wife said in that tone she uses when she knows she's saying something logical enough so that I am incapable of making up an excuse. 

To be honest, I knew I was going to be the one to get out of bed and answer Lizzie's cries for mommy and daddy before Brooke even began her pedagogical explanation for Lizzie's restlessness the last few nights. 

I let out a big sigh and braced myself for the wave of brisk air that was sure to zap the warmth that'd been incubating beneath my wife and I's fleece comforter. 

"Try to be sweet to her, Jake." 

As I walked down the hall to Lizzie's room, I paused and stared down the long, narrow entrance to our living room. Pitch black. 

Not many people knew this about me, but the dark had always made me a little uneasy. Even as a kid. 

It was a recurring event when shrouded in darkness, myself imagining an insidious shadow standing a foot or two away, reaching a large decrepit hand out towards me, slowly circumnavigating my skin to make me aware of its presence. Just a tease before making its move. 

"Damn I'm twisted," I thought to myself. And scurried across the supple carpet with a renewed desire to be comforting to my daughter. 

"Daddy I can't sleep. Uncle Pat won't stop crying in the closet and its making me scared," whimpered Lizzie as I opened the door and internally rejoiced a little to escape the hallway and enjoy the presence of her polly-pocket night light. 

"Honey, uncle Pat can't be in the closet. You remember we said goodbye to him over the weekend? And had that nice ceremony to remember all the good times we had with him?" I said in the gentlest voice I could muster. 

"Here, I'll go in the closet and inspect for you." I patted Lizzie on the back, walked over to the closet, and slowly opened the door. 

"You're right Daddy, there's nothing in there." 

I could barely make out the words over the rapid pounding in my chest. 

I stood motionless as cold sweat crept between the goosebump crevices covering my skin. There on the closet floor lay a silver "P" necklace. |-| 
|-| cny0s1b || 13 || Billy Bob Tiberius spit a big wad a chaw onto the ground. “Whoooo, doggy, Crispus Ray. Did you see that wreck?”

“Shit, Billy Bob Tiberius, I never thought Dale Equitius was gonna pull off that win. I tell you, I love track day at Circus Maximus Tallidagus,” said Crispus Ray. He chugged the last of his wine and tossed the empty can onto the ground. 

The two friends laughed as they left the track and walked out to the parking lot. “Damn, Crispus Ray. Is that your new chariot?” said Billy Bob Tiberius.

Crispus Ray laughed and leaned against his new vehicle. “You bet your sunburned neck, it is.” He patted the side. “Jacked it up myself. This baby rides over two feet off the ground now.”

Billy Bob Tiberius laughed. “Won’t get any of those libby Populares stuck under this baby.”

“Did you hear about them barbarians coming from up north?” said Crispus Ray.

“Sure did. Bunch of illegals want to come down here and steal our jobs. If we let a bunch of them Germanics here cleaning our Coliseums and picking our crops, we won’t have any kind of slave economy left,” said Billy Bob Tiberius. He spit another wad of chaw on the ground.

“Damn, right.  Those Yankee Senators want to make us pay our slaves a wage. It’ll ruin our economy.”

Billy Bob Tiberius shook his head. “Fuckin’ Populares.” He spit on the ground once more. “Do you think Sabanus is going to sign another five years with Alabama football after this year?”

Crispus Ray pumped his fist in the air. “Hell yeah! Whoooo, doggy. We’re sure to win the National Championship now that Scaevola is coming back as QB. Did you see we just recruited a four star Carthaginian running back? Hannibal Barca?”

Billy Bob Tiberius and Crispus Ray hooted and hollered as they chugged their Vitta Hyacinthina Pabst wine. 

A group of well dressed men and women walked by Billy Bob Tiberius and Crispus Ray. They sneered at the two men and whispered amongst themselves. “Those two give us Southerners a bad name,” said one man.

“Ignorant back water hicks. I hate that people think that’s what we sound and act like,” said one of the women. The others nodded in agreement.
____________________
Thanks for reading! If you enjoyed this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy.
 |-| 
|-| cny1d28 || 5 || Click.The Kettle begins to boil and I'm looking into the cupboard.The cupboard that I used to struggle to reach but now its as if I have to crouch to get a clear view. She always said I grew up too quickly. A striking ray of golden sun is hitting my face, its making my options blurry, so I go with what everyone likes. Yorkshire Tea. For once I'm the first one up. Most school days I will wake up because of loud screaming and heavy footsteps along the corridor as my younger siblings, Tom and Lucy, playfully refuse to get ready for Primary School. The usual counting to three begins as empty threats echo along the walls. She had learnt her skills well, after all, she had to deal with me when I was there age. Like most days my Yorkshire Tea with a splash of milk and 2 sugars would waiting on my bedside table.Click.Today, my mum will get the same order.
___________________________________________________________

Click.The kettle boils. Looking into the cupboard makes the struggle almost feel more real today. As I've learnt to do, I am the first one up. The golden sun is annoying, its flooding the kitchen with warm light and making it feel even smaller. This whole house feels smaller since she passed. Its 6am so I best begin to wake Tom and Lucy. It slowly walk to their room and gently wake them and so begins the endless screaming. The "I-don't-won't-to's", "Its-to-early's", I don't know how she did it for so long. In trying to control the noise I've already forgotten about the morning brew, the endless counting to three hasn't done a thing and I hear the whispers of slow,scraping footsteps sliding along the Corridor. I can feel how much they struggle to reach the kitchen. I've had enough so I leave start making the packed lunches and he's there. He's sitting down, head lower than an anchor. Two mugs. Two Yorkshire Tea with a splash of milk and two sugars are on the Kitchen table. We exchange sharp smiles are he goes down the corridor to begin round two. The same footsteps slowly fade away as the sun mellows with them. As I slice the Tiger Loaf I can't help but wonder how she managed to do all of this on her own.
___________________________________________________________
*This is my first post and I hope it hasn't been too much of a sad one. Since last September I have been at University and adjusting to living on my own has become a new normal. When I began to write, for some reason I was hit by how my mum used to do so much for me and my brother and how without her I wouldn't have been able to adjust so well. So this one is for her. Thank you mum and Thank you for reading :) (If you did :P )
 |-| 
|-| cny1ggw || 14 || "Greetings President Obama. My, it's been awhile. We gave you the great pyramids and so much technology all of those years ago in order to advance your race thousands of years ahead of time.  I see that you've done very well for yourself.  We are very pleased with your progress, so we have returned to give you the answers, to the problems that are currently plaguing your world. No longer, will your fellow man have to go hungry, or die of terrible diseases.  No longer will you slowly turn the air you breathe into poison.

I only wish that our previous mission had been succesful, so that we could have ended this suffering for you decades ago. As you all know, we sent two of our most beloved brothers to meet you here, 60 years ago.  A token of respect, towards the human race.  It was so unfortunate that the dilithium crystals became unstable and caused the engine malfunction that in turn, caused the ship to crash."

"Umm well actually...Lord Xenos....most people don't know about that..."  

"What? of course they do.  Surely you told the people of such an extraordinary find.  We saw by their trackers that a team of your people recovered them from the wreckage almost instantly.  We thank you for that by the way.  Ensuring that their bodies were not left for wild animals to eat."

"Well, you're welcome, but...."

"Because On our planet,  it is absolutely paramount, that the bodies of our dead be preserved.  There is no greater dishonor to a family than to have the body of a loved one desecrated."

"Uhh...."

"In fact, If you could please take us to your preservatorium, so we may pay our respects to them."

"Well, here's the thing, your Lordship.  When your people crashed here...We got frightened.  It was the first time, that we had, undeniable proof that intelligent life existed on other planets.  We uhh didn't know if their was a full scale war coming, or...."

"Ha, nonsense, the Vorlocks are a peaceful species."

"Well that's goo..."

"Unless  of course you desecrate the bodies of our dead.  That's like our one rule hahaha."

"Oh...well the thing is...."

"Wait.  You didn't...."

"It's just that there was so much to learn by dissecting..."

"DISSECTING?!?!?!?!"

"Yes but..."

"ZORDON! PREPARE THE BLACKHOLE DEVICE!!  We are going to wipe you vile planet out of this universe.  but not before we torture every single one of you. GRAB THE PRESIDENT!"

No, but...Please!"

*Sarlar, grabs the president.  He shackles his ankles with a spreader bar, bends him over the desk and shackles his hands to the desk.*

"As for you Mr. President.  You will be tortured the entire time as you watch all 7 billion of your fellow humans be torn apart limb by limb.  You will be kept on the edge of death the entire time, and in immense pain.  Do you see this?"

*He shows the president what looks like a dildo out of the movie Se7en, but on steroids. Spinning blades. Cannisters of salt that shoot into the open wounds.  The works.  He starts moving it towards the presidents quivering anal cavity*

"AHHHHHHHH!!!!"

"AHHHHHHHHHHHHH!!!!"

*Both, Lord Xenos, and President Obama, scream.  One in terror.  One in anger.  The probe moves closer and closer towards the President.*

"I just have one thing left to say to you before we begin the torture....Barack..."

"WHAT??"  The president screams, crying his eyes out.

"We're fucking with you." *Laughter errupts from the Vorloxes*

"Wha...wh....What?"

"We obviously already knew that you sliced their shit up.  That's one of the stupidest things about you guys.  Is how much you care about your dead bodies.  Perfectly good meat and organs going to waste.  Besides, those guys we're dicks." *More laughter*

"So...you're not going to destroy our entire world"

"We are currently exploring 2 million life bearing planets.  If we destroyed a planet every time someone, dissected one of our crash victims, There'd be, like, a lot less planets dude."

"Oh Thank God.  You don't have an extra pair of intergalactic underwear lying around do you? hahah"

"Haha, we'll hook you up man.  Hey I'll give you a tip, if one of us ever dies here again.  Our eyes.  Full of super-nutrients not found on earth.  They can make you live 5 times as long, and stop aging instantly.  You should have eaten them."

"We totally did! Hahahahah"

"Hahahaha" |-| 
|-| cny4hjq || 4 || *Well, shit*.

Dying hadn't been so bad. Just the crunching of metal and the tinkling of broken glass and that's all she wrote. *Fuckin' turn signals, people!* Oh well. There wasn't anything I could do about it now. 

It was pretty confusing to just sort of...continue. At first I thought I was having one of those "out of body" experiences that everyone's always turning into bestselling novels. I thought for sure that any second I was going to get a glimpse of heaven, before being returned to my body. I was just in the middle of working on the acknowledgments page and counting my publisher's advance when I saw my mangled body. *Ca-Ching* turned into *Ca-Ouch*. 

So with no bright tunnels or anything to do, I figured I'd just hang out with my body until someone came around to collect me. Does heaven have peak hours? Do angels get backlogged with souls? I dunno. But at least I got a free ambulance ride out the deal!

I caused a *lot* of commotion at the hospital. ER nurses and doctors rushed around, trying to save me. The morgue guy was boring though. While I waited I took the time to learn how to move around and how to interact with stuff. You should have seen the look on that guy's face when I made a ruckus in one of the coolers they keep dead people in!

The funeral was super depressing. Closed caskets have that effect on people. Mom didn't cry at all, but her eyes were burning bright red. I figured she had run out of tears beforehand. And my cousin Michelle brought a date! To a funeral! Who does that!?

A bunch of kids from school were there as well. A lot of people that I could not for the life of me...strike that. Could not for the death of me remember their names. But at least my buddy Dave was there. I took the time to mess with him a bit. Untying his shoelaces, giving him a wedgie, that sort of thing. 

Since St. Peter was taking his sweet time, I thought it would be fun to haunt Dave, Amity-style. Blood on the walls, unearthly screeching, the whole 9 yards. I caught a ride with him back to his place. As he walked through the front door he broke down crying with his mom. I took this opportunity to explore my new surroundings. I was just finished cataloging all the available pots and pans I could throw around and the furniture I could place on the ceiling when I heard Dave heading upstairs. Perfect.

I figured that if you're going to haunt someone, you had best start off small. Like lights flickering or shadows moving around. I was hovering over Dave's shoulder, just about to start the haunting when I saw him typing into his laptop:

*"R-E-D-D-I-T"*.

Oh sweet! It had been boring the past couple of days. And while I hated reading at someone else's pace, beggars can't be choosers. He started typing again.

*"N-S-F-W-V-I-D-E-O-S"*.

Um, Dave?

Dave, what are you doing?

You are NOT about to do what I think you're about to do!

Oh, for **fucks** sake, have you no respect for the dead? Is there no decency anymore?


   |-| 
|-| cny4iwn || 3 || It had taken some time, but I’d finally been able to accept my own death. It is certainly curious how this works out. It was not heaven nor hell, it just *was.* Almost as though my mind truly lived beyond my physical passing. The truly remarkable part was that I could still *feel.* I felt sad that I had passed. I mourned for my own death and all that I left behind. I went through the stages of the grief process, which is particularly difficult without a physical body to act as a catalyst for emotions. It had of course, taken some time to even realize that I was dead. 

It was funny how I seemed to have memory of my entire life, but not of my own passing. As though I woke up in this new spectral form with a small bout of amnesia, though I didn’t realize that I was even a ghost at first. My preconceived notions of what a ghost might be were completely off. I felt, of all things, normal.   

  Once I had solved the mystery of what exactly I was, and after my grief had mostly passed, I realized that I would have to make a new “life” for myself. I had spent most of my time after death in my now vacant house. It had been cleared out by my family, and it seemed that they were unsure what should be done with it. I didn’t mind of course, as it was my only place of solitude in my grim days beyond life. 

  I decided that I should embrace this new form as an opportunity! I would be able to travel the Earth, and spend my time as I chose. I started small by going down the street, then down to park a few blocks down, and then right into the heart of this small town in which I once lived. 

  I discovered that it was always fascinating to watch people; friends, strangers, it didn’t matter! I would watch people as they went about their day, shopping, working, pumping gas, and came to the realization that I could see people for who they really were. It was amazing to observe what people would do or say when they thought nobody was watching. 

  With time, my new hobby developed into an obsession, and I became braver and less driven by my Earthly morals. I began to view people in more private settings, which is where I would observe the best of my uncensored targets. These voyeuristic tendencies weren’t driven by sexual desire or an ill-conceived idea that I was a part of anything, but rather that this was now all that I had.

  At first, my I thought it best to avoid my friends and family in private settings. While I had no problem following them throughout their daily life in public, I wasn’t sure how I would feel about spying on their private lives. This was partially because all that I had left of my life was memories, and I didn’t want to spoil how I looked at those close to me, if there were to be something I didn’t want to see or hear. 

Curiosity, however, got the best of me. I missed my family and friends, and it began to wear on me that I wasn’t sure that anyone missed me. I had seen people grieve for me and cry over my loss, but now that some time had passed, was anyone still thinking of me? 
 
  This is where my old friend Travis comes in. We had been very good friends in life, and spent a lot of time together for many years. If anyone were to miss me, it would be him. 

Late one evening, I decided that I would visit him in his home. When I arrived, he was playing video games and drinking a beer. He seemed rather content, which I was jealous of. I waited around for a while, and nothing seemed out of the ordinary. He eventually got up and made a snack, then settled back onto the couch. He received a phone call while he was eating, and I was shocked as I tried to listen in. I recognized the voice on the other end - my ex wife Tiffany.

  This caught me off guard. It had been over a year since we had gotten a divorce, and Travis had helped me through that. Why were they speaking now? How long had this been going on? I tried to brush these thoughts away as I listened, but I couldn’t help but notice how happy they both sounded talking to each other. As I began to let my thoughts race out of control, I heard my name mentioned.

“It’s over now Tiffany, he’s gone. It has been weeks and nobody suspects a thing” said Travis.

  “I know, I know. I just can’t help but think that somebody out there realizes that it wasn’t an accident” replied Tiffany.

  “There is no evidence. We just have to keep low and nobody can find out about us. It has taken us four years to get to this point, we can’t give up now Tif.”

  “I know, I’m just...I’m just scared.”

  “I know babe, but think of the future we can have together. We got everything from him. We couldn’t get it all when you went through the divorce, so we had to do it this way. But now we’ve got it.”

  “I just wish there was another way it could have been done.”

  “I know, but there just wasn’t.” 

  I realized then, that everything that was happening was far bigger than I could have imagined. I didn’t remember my death, but everything I had seen led up to my belief that I had been involved in an automobile accident. It was apparent now, that it wasn’t an accident. I was murdered by my best friend and my ex-wife. The only question that remained was, what did they have? I knew then that it wasn’t normal for me to be in this state. I had unfinished business in the world before I could be at peace. 

  -Well this didn't turn out at all how I had it originally planned, and I completely removed the "for giggles" aspect, but that is just how it ended up! |-| 
|-| cny5n5k || 3 || The Knight of the Nine

	Slowly, painfully, he opened his eyes. Flames danced upon the rock walls that surrounded him, yet Boromir had no recollection of this place. ‘Can I move?’ he thought, ‘can I speak?’ His body would not reply. Unending waves of nerves washed across his body and burned as a limb upon waking. The pain brought tears to his eyes, blurring the already unrecognizable plants and rock surrounding him. There were some things about this place that he could recognize from the sounds echoing from a chamber to his right – the clanking of metal, the grinding of weapons being sharpened, and the clamor of a room full of warriors. No knight can forget the sounds of war, no matter how hard he tries or how much he wishes he could. 

	From his left, Boromir could hear the faint sound of voices growing louder. Though he could not turn his head, he could make out three distinct voices that were speaking a language that he could not understand. The words they spoke were at times harsh, but rolled off the tongue in a way similar to his native language. One of the men approached and leaned over Boromir as if he knew that this man lying on the ground could not meet him face to face. His features were harsh, as if he was a man who lost considerable amount of weight in a short period of time. His beard was long, unkempt, and aged to white much like the robe he wore had greyed from what Boromir thought could have been a very bright red. Boromir’s eyes drifted to the man’s chest whereupon lay a sigil that he had hoped to recognize, but this sigil that was unknown to him bore a flame that had almost completely worn away. The Red Man spoke three times, slowly, and the differences in how the words were spoken led Boromir to believe he may have asked one question in three different languages.

	He wanted to ask a question of his own – ‘Who are you?’ – yet his body continued to betray him. The man must have seen the strain in Boromir’s eyes for he signaled to one of his men, who brought him a flask. The Red Man said a word and poured a liquid into Boromir’s mouth that he could not taste. From its consistency, he thought himself grateful for it. Questions unanswered continued to race through his mind until the liquid took its toll and Boromir with it.

	When he awoke, Boromir realized that the fiery pain that had encompassed his body had been replaced with a tingling sensation that worked its way from chest outward. Though it pained him to do so, he forced himself to try to move his body. After what seemed like hours, he succeeded in turning his head in the direction of the light pushing itself through the openings in the cave. By the looks of it, it must be about mid-day. Thoughts of the last night’s (or was it even last night?) events came to his mind and had his head swimming. His frustration with his surroundings, with his body, with the strange man renewed his desire to try moving his limbs. Agony raced through his body as he screamed in pain.

	‘My voice,’ Boromir thought. ‘I still have a voice.’

At the sound of his scream, a man ran into and out of the room hurriedly. Shortly after, the Red Man and a veiled form entered the room. The man spoke the same questions again, and still Boromir could not understand. Again, the Red Man signaled for the thick liquid, but when he poured it in Boromir’s mouth, he fought through the pain to spit it out. His screams quickly turned to a fit of coughing that caused the Red Man to drop the cup of liquid and lift him into a seated position. A white hand reached out from under the dark veil, a woman’s hand, and set itself upon his thigh.

“Who are you?” He managed to say. The words hissed out of his mouth in a tongue not his own and sent shivers down his spine. The Red Man turned to the Veiled Woman in shock, and yet her hand never wavered. 

“You would not recognize me anymore” she whispered her hiss in return. This did not sound like a language he knew, and yet he could understand her words.

“Who are you?” The words were getting easier to speak.

“Ned, I have been returned, as you now have.”

“I know not of who you speak. My name is Boromir. Who are you?”

“Boromir? Your name is Eddard Stark, Lord of Winterfell. We have brought you back from the beyond, your mind is broken”

“I am Boromir of Gondor, son of Denethor, Defender of Middle Earth, and Knight of the Nine. I am not this Stark man. Who are you, where am I?” Did his mind break? What did death truly do to a person?

“You died at the hands of an executioner in King’s Landing. You were betrayed by The Lannisters and the City Watch…”

“Stop this! I am not this man! I died defending my fellowship. I died restoring my honor and the honor of my people. Please tell me who are you and where am I?”

“You are in the Riverlands, South of the Twins and North of Riverrun, in Westeros. I am Catelyn Stark of Riverrun, your wife. This is Thoros of Myr, a Red Priest from Essos who breathed life back into you. Do you recognize neither of us?”

“No. Neither.”

The Veiled Woman, Catelyn, quickly turned away. Her almost silent voice failed to hide her weeping as she spoke to the Red Man Thoros. A man in a faded yellow cloak entered the cave yelling loudly, causing the other two to quickly take their leave of Boromir, leaving him propped up against the cave wall. A great commotion arose from just outside of his cell and, though he knew not the reason why, he forced himself to move toward it. His legs ached, and his arms barely held the strength in them to push his weakened body off of the ground, and yet he still continued on. He could not stand, so he pushed himself onto his knees to crawl. 

Just outside of the archway was a ledge that overlooked a small lightly forested clearing in an otherwise dense forest within which a crowd had gathered. Standing at attention in front of the crowd were the Red Man and the Veiled Woman, and they were speaking with a weeping woman who was larger than any Boromir had seen before. Behind them, a blond haired man with only one hand stood looking magnificent in his pristine white robes with a noose around his neck.
 |-| 
|-| cobnhcg || 214 || Great pregnancy foods

How to make wife happier during pregnancy

Are cats okay to be around pregnant women?

Local shelters

Price of spay/neuter in area

Best hospitals for delivery in area

Cost of child birth

Cheapest hospitals for delivery in area

Do men have to do anything during the birth

Keeping placenta?

Baby is crying and won't stop

Is it okay for a cat to sleep with a baby

When do babies start walking

Are stink bugs poisonous 

Are crickets poisonous

How to stop child from eating bugs

Local dog shelters

Small dog beds

How big do shepherd mixes get

Large dog beds

List for first day of school

Parks in area

Nature walks

Poison ivy treatments

Romantic spots for valentines day

Babysitter in area

Preparing child for middle school

Should young kids have phones?

Cell phone contracts

Cheap cell phone contracts

Great projects for science fairs

Potato batteries

Why doesn't potato battery work

Potato battery not lighting up

Play-Dough battery

Play-Dough battery not working

Great projects for science fairs

Tips for The Talk

How long do cats live?

How to get your pre-teen to talk to you

Awesome hiking trips

Hiking gear

Treatment for tick bites

High school algebra tutorial

Algebra worksheet

Prom dresses

Great local colleges

Graduation gifts

Things you wish you brought to college with you

Empty nest syndrome

What to do with a spare room

Library remodel plans








 |-| 
|-| cobj8oi || 324 || How to impress a woman if you don't have money  
Average penis size  
Natural ways to increase penis length  
Penis pumps do they work?  
Painful swelling of penis how to heal?  
Fast ways to lengthen your penis -pump  
Average cost of male enlargement pills  
Discount penis enlargement pills for sale cheap  
Credit cards  
Credit cards for people with no credit history  
How to build credit?  
How to build credit fast?  
Alternative ways to lengthen penis +free  
Weight hanging  
How much weight is too much when hanging things from penis  
Tips for attaching weight to penis  
How to stop bleeding  
Tourniquet techniques  
Emergency room directions   |-| 
|-| cobgy4y || 143 || Paris

Paris hotels

New York

New York hotels

Portland

Portland hotels

Astoria

Astoria hotels

Astoria motels

Netflix |-| 
|-| cobh1zi || 435 || &gt;January 27, 2009

* Free online dating sites

&gt;February 01, 2009

* Premium dating sites

&gt;March 24, 2009

* Cribs
* Cribs less than $150
* Well made cribs for cheap

&gt;March 25, 2009

* What to eat in first term
* Can you eat steak in first term?
* Steakhouse - Seattle WA

&gt;March 26, 2009

* Cribs for over $150

&gt;March 27, 2009

* Can babies hear everything in the womb?
* Arguing when pregnant - Effect on baby

&gt;July 01, 2009

* Wedding planner

&gt;July 17, 2009

* Baby names for boys
* Boy names
* Spanish baby names
* Popular names

&gt;November 17, 2009 

* Miscarriage support groups - Seattle WA

&gt;August 07, 2010  

* Marriage counselor

&gt;February 04, 2011: 

* Free online dating sites |-| 
|-| cobijce || 185 || Great Places for a first date

Proposal Ideas

Bible - Verses about being a good husband

Oregon Coast Beach Homes

Horseback Riding Rental - Newport Oregon

Wedding Venues - Seattle WA

Bible - Verses about Marriage

Plane Tickets

Hawaiian Excursion Ideas

Travel Planner

Travel Agents - Seattle WA

How do we get pregnant?

Bible - Verses about Children

Why can't we get pregnant?

How can I tell if my wife is infertile? 

How can I tell if I am sterile?

Can an ovarian cist prevent pregnancy?

Ovarian Cist

Difference Between Benign &amp; Malignant

Bible Verses - Grief, Death

What's the difference between stage 3 and stage 4 cancer?

Survival Odds - Metastasized to bones

How to deal with cancer in a loved one

How do we write a will?

How does a spouse leave everything to their husband?

Grief Counseling - Coping with the death of a loved one

Is there really a God?

Atheist support group |-| 
|-| cobkc8d || 95 || - Online dating sites

- First date ideas

- How much do you tip

- What clothes do you wear to a fancy restaurant

- Ways to save money

- How to get proposal ring in secret

- What is a good price for a ring

- Resort honeymoon suite cost

- How to save a lot of money

- First class tickets to Hawaii 

- Coach tickets to Hawaii

- How to budget your vacation

- Romantic ideas for honeymoon 

- How to tell if it's a boy or girl early on

- Local available night shifts

- Baby toys

- Does the father go to the baby shower

- Is it okay if a baby is late

- Strong cheap Liquor

- Strong liquor 

- Funeral planner

- Putting child up for adoption

- Suicide Hotline

- Can I take back my child that I put up for adoption

- Alcoholics Anonymous

- Online college

- Necessary items for raising a baby

- Baby clothes

- Lunchbox and Backpack

- Available jobs with four year degree

- Elementary school supplies

- Little league sign ups

- High school supplies

- Letterman jacket

- Tuxedo rental for teenager

- Athletic scholarships available in early high school

- Used car for son

- New car for son

- Driving instructors

- Driving safety tips

- Why does God hate me

- Funeral planner

- Most painless way to die





 |-| 
|-| cobnmql || 47 || April 22, 2000 – Is Canada cold?

April 22, 2000 – Is baseball like cricket?

May 1, 2000 – Ontario sports leagues

May 1, 2000 – Recreational baseball tryout

August 12, 2000 – Academic sessions Ontario

January 13, 2001 – Google maps: Alternate routes home

February 14, 2001 – Fun single person activities

May 1, 2001 – Competitive baseball tryouts

June 30, 2001 – The psychology of sports

August 19, 2001 – Good books on making friends

September 11, 2001 – New York plane crash

September 13, 2001 – Practicing Islam without anyone knowing

September 16, 2001 – Insurance claims on stolen/vandalized property

September 23, 2001 – Rehabilitation for broken ribs and shoulder

October 10, 2001 – Are surgeries covered under Canadian healthcare?

December 28, 2001 – When to stop taking painkillers

February 13th, 2002 – Real estate listings

April 6, 2002 – British Columbia 

May 1, 2002 – British Columbia baseball tryouts

May 3, 2002 – Unable to throw baseball without pain in shoulder

July 9, 2002 – Painkiller addiction

August 13, 2002 – University applications

February 14, 2003 – Effects of depression

May 21, 2003 – Alternative routes after high school

June 10, 2003 – Job posting sites

September 1, 2003 – Cam shows

December 25, 2003 – How to celebrate Christmas without family and friends

December 31, 2003 – New Year's resolutions: defeating painkiller addiction

January 6, 2004 – Cam shows

January 19, 2004 – Cam shows

February 14th, 2004 – Redemption and Islam

May 1, 2004 – LD50 of common prescription drugs |-| 
|-| cobp4qy || 36 || 6:00pm: dark souls good items
6:03pm: dark souls leo ring
6:05pm: dark souls how to find Ornstein and Smough
6:51pm: dark souls how to beat Ornstein and Smough
8:13pm: dark souls Ornstein and Smough tactics
12:42am: dark souls Ornstein and Smough tactics phase 2
01:12am: dark souls Ornstein and Smough how to beat
02:01am: dark souls is it possible to beat Ornstein and Smough?
11:12am: how to fix hole in wall
11:17am: hardware stores
11:20am: how to fix cracked PS3 controller
11:24am: eb games return policy |-| 
|-| cobkkkr || 29 || I used DuckDuckGo for mine.

"How hard is it to become an indie game dev in your spare time"

"Free C++ compiler"

"How to make a game with SDL"

"OpenGL extension wrangler"

"How to load a 3D model in OpenGL"

"OpenGL shaders"

"3D animation"

"game jam"

"early onset alzheimers"

"my computer has a virus called mingw compiler"

"can alzheimers be cured"

"google.com"

"yahoo.com" |-| 
|-| cobp6ov || 27 || How to make a spreadsheet

Porn 

Best protein powders 

How to know if a guy is straight 

What to do on leg day 

How do I know if I'm really gay 

Gay porn 

How to clear browser history 

How to ask for a pay raise

How to meet gay men 

First date ideas 

How to come out to your best friend 

Meal prep

Gay porn

My best friend doesn't accept me for who I am 

Romantic weekend getaways 

How to come out to your siblings 

How to get v cut 

Jobs in my area 

Being fired for being gay 

Gifts for him 

How do men feel about gay guys in locker rooms 

Gay friendly gyms in area 

Legal advice: siblings want to force me out of will 

Valentine's Day reservations 

Furniture moving companies 

Gay porn 

Kitten adoptions 

How to introduce best friend to boyfriend 

How to dress for job interview 

How to decorate apartment 

Viral proposals 

Gay weddings 

How to get back to the gym 

Engagement rings for men 

Should I invite my family to my gay wedding 

Wedding vows 

Do kittens get lonely 

Kitten adoptions 

Wedding venues 

How to deal with family not attending wedding 

How to ask for a pay raise 

Great core workouts 

Surrogate mothers 







 |-| 
|-| cobr5te || 24 || How to ask a girl on a date.

How to ask a girl on a cheap date.

How to ask a girl to coffee.

How to ask girl on date after rejection.

How to get girl to like me.

How to disengage home alarm.

How to disengage home alarm without knowing code.

Are garages alarmed?

How to enter house through garage.

How to enter house through garage +quietly.

Where to buy security cameras.

Where to buy small security cameras.

How to install security cameras.

How to install hidden security cameras.

How to install hidden security cameras +webfeed.

Can the police track my webfeed?

How to hide from police.

How to survive in jail. |-| 
|-| coboj2s || 41 || Chateoom
Chatrooms
Free chatrooms
Omegle

Chatrooms
Forums
Reddit

What is Karma?
What is reddit karma?

Why is my reddit karma negative

How to socialize

How to make friends

Why does nobodyl isten
Why does no one like me

Why do i have no freinds

What is aspergers |-| 
|-| cobp0jr || 19 || Bing |-| 
|-| cobiq6o || 27 || Facebook

Tumbler

Spanish Inquisition

Google Translate

Jobs in Appleton, WI

*Clear History*

Calc chat

Facebook

Best way to hide bruises

*Clear History*

Cheap Bus tickets

Cheap apartments Appleton WI

Emancipated Minor?

*Clear History*

Gmail

Tumblr

Counseling confidentiality rules for minors

Free Counseling services

*Clear history*

-Month Later-

Gmail

Job Appleton, WI

Homeless shelters Appleton, WI

Free Counseling? |-| 
|-| cobrcf0 || 11 || *I thought a more uplifting story may be nice*

Monster.com

Monster.com how to find a job

How to find a job on the internet

How to apply for unemployment

Can't pay rent

Eviction laws Phoenix

Animal shelter Phoenix

No kill animal shelter phoenix

Homeless shelter phoenix

Interview techniques

How to ace an interview

How to get a suit when you're homeless

How to do an interview when you're homeless

Bus rout phoenix

Motivation

How to be motivated

Microsoft certification

First day in the office

Phoenix apartments

Cheap furnitue

Cheap furniture Phoenix

craigslist couch Phoenix, AZ

Investing

How to invest

No kill animal shelter Phoenix

Readopting pets

How to get promoted

Dating your coworker

Veterinarian flagstaff

How to get a promotion

How to get a transfer

Monster.com

First date tips

How to ace an interview

Apartments Flagstaff

Long distance relationships

Jewelry stores Flagstaff

Hotels Phoenix

5 star restaurant phoenix

Houses for sale flagstaff

Wedding photographer |-| 
|-| cobh4jv || 19 || Why is the sky blue?

How far away is Uranus?

Why do mom and dad fight so much?

How to impress girls

Porn

Good date ideas

Porn

Where can I get the morning after pill?

How do I know when I should propose?

Good proposal ideas?

Cheap engagement rings

How to be a good parent

How to tell your parents they're grandparents 

Good girl names

Ways to comfort your wife

How do I tell people we had a miscarriage?

Good boy names

Death of spouse support groups

Painless ways to kill yourself |-| 
|-| cobkne6 || 11 || Free dating sites.

Italian restaurants.

Italian restaurants near me.

Conversation on first date.

Tips for second date.

Tips for third date.

Mexican restaurants near me.

Long term relationship tips.

When to propose.

How to plan a wedding.

How to choose best man.

Pregnancy test.

How to tell if an unborn baby is male or female.

What foods can you eat during pregnancy?

Paleness during pregnancy.

Hospitals near me. 

How long does birthing take.

Injuries during birth to mother. 

How to raise daughter alone.

How to raise daughter alone for fathers.

How to stop drinking.

AA near me.

Elementary schools near me.

How to explain to child that her mother died.

How to explain death to children.

Middle schools near me. 

High schools near me.

Average college tuition fees.

How to help child move to college campus. 

How to say goodbye.  |-| 
|-| cobjzol || 14 || Best private school LA  
LA public school system  
Jobhunter LA  
Budget kids clothes  
How to fix a leaky faucet  
Modern student backpacks  
How to qualify for an education loan  
Return Klip-pack 9000  
Amazon Ninja Turtles rolling backpack  
Rain jacket size small  
What to do if your apartment floods  
Budget plumbers LA  
From Columbus to America book rental  
How to help your kids with math  
Best Christmas presents for kids 2014  
Chronic pain in throat  
Cold medicine Amazon  
Chronic coughing  
How to qualify for Childrens Health Insurance Program  
How to pay for cancer treatment without health insurance  
Part time jobs LA  
Craigslist jobs LA  
Alternative medicine LA  
What is chemo therapy  
Throat cancer surgery success rate  
How to qualify for a medical loan  
What to do if you can’t pay credit card bill  
How to qualify for a loan with bad credit  
Ninja Turtles Raphael doll Amazon  
Child caskets LA   |-| 
|-| cobgidm || 20 || Wedding rings

Nice places to have weddings

Best food for wedding

How to tell if someone loves you or not

How to break up with someone

Depression survey

How to tie a noose
 |-| 
|-| cobplwg || 5 || makeup tips on how to slender face   


easy hairdo styles   


how to change your life   


american behavioral clinics hours  


reddit.com  


facebook.com  


d2l.edu  


reddit.com  


youtube.com  


how to feel better about yourself  


pornhub.com  


facebook.com  


easy workouts for beginners  


american behavioral clinics  


side effects of alibify and lexapro  


reddit.com  


reddit.com/r/relationships  


pornhub.com  


how to get out of debt  


how to fix relationship  


download tinder google play  


signs that he loves you  


signs that he doesn't love you  


.  
 .  
   .  
intense outpatient programs  


healthcare cost  


how to pay for therapy with no insurance  


how to pay for meds with no insurance  


signs that you are crazy  


.  
  .  
how to get over ex   


when do the nightmares stop


craigslist apartments |-| 
|-| cobghrz || 8 || Why is it i cant find love,
Why doesnt my family like me, 
Why does no one like me,
Why do I befriend No one,
Where do I find friends,
Where do i look,
Will I always be alone,
Help me i am lost |-| 
|-| cobqgaf || 9 || fuck this thread |-| 
|-| cobpkrn || 4 || Signs your wife is cheating.
How to save a marriage.
Divorce lawyers  
Small furnished efficiency apartment for rent.  
Best over the counter sleeping aid.
Cheapest handguns
  |-| 
|-| cobrcbi || 4 || Best universities in Canada

Should I take a year off after Highschool?

How much money do I need for university?

How to apply for student loans.

What if Student loans don't give you enough?

Bank loans for students

How do co-signors work?

Things to do in Vancouver

best clubs in vancouver

POF

cheap food for university students

best drinking games

free food

should I get a job while going to University full time?

How many nights a week should you drink

red spots on penis

what does herpes look like

best clubs Vancouver

can you sell blood in Canada

What to do after University-BBA

whre ti get booz at 3a9m

Lowering student loan payment.

Jobs for BBA grads

What age should i slow down drinking

Paying off student loans with no job.

pains in stomach

Should I stop drinking

low income housing

Zoloft

Zoloft and alcohol

should I tell my doctor that I drink if he asks.

apathy and lack of motivation.

Can you get high on zoloft

How many drinks a day is ok at 27

vitamin b/zinc pills

depressed vs sad

Are AA meetings stupid

quick cash

penny stocks

howd tojlk tric a breathealyzer

wht;ld do you doi if u idont hav a dezighnated triver?












 |-| 
|-| cobs2zp || 4 || &gt;February 2002  

romantic ideas for date  
where to buy pink candles  
woman puke possible reasons  

&gt;March 2002  

how to interpret pregnancy test  
how to interpret AccuClear pregnancy test  
is there a way to know baby gender before echography  

&gt;April 2002  

guide to being a father  
guide to being a father download  
baby room ideas  

&gt;November 2002  

name ideas baby girl  
name ideas baby girl USA  
name ideas baby girl mythology  
insults words close to nora  
is nora a good name baby girl  

&gt;December 2002  

ideas gifts baby christmas  
do young children remember things  

&gt;February 2003  

how to exercise baby safely  

&gt; September 2008  

how to convince child to go to school  

&gt;October 2013  

math work middle schooler  
math exercises middle school  
chemistry kit middle school  

&gt;June 2018  

how to help get into college  
good colleges colorado area  
how to prepare for college  
how to prepare for daughter leave for college  

&gt;August 2023  

gifts appropriate doctor  
is it appropriate for doctors to treat family  
where to deposit gift hospital doctor  

&gt;December 2039  

how to handle baby  
appropriate gifts new parents granddaughter  
how to convince daughter babysitting

&gt; January 2051  

how to write obituary  
do doctors know how to deal with death of family  
how to console wife death  
goodnight google it's been a good life
 |-| 
|-| cobsx5c || 5 || 20-06-2010.    
"Florist in New Jersey."

30-11-2010.    
" Apartment in New Jersey." 

2-12-2010.    
"Used car dealers in New Jersey." 

5-3-2011.     
"Real estate agent in New Jersey."

10-6-2011.    
"Jewellers in New Jersey."

4-11-2011.      
"Wedding planner in New Jersey."

13-5-2012.    
"Travel agent in New Jersey."

30-6-2012.     
"Hospital in Hawaii."

10-7-2012.    
"Toys r us in New Jersey."
 |-| 
|-| cobhsjq || 7 || Google search 1: *Dating sites*

Google search 2(one month later): *How to not be awkward on first dates*

Google search 3(one year later):  *creative ideas for anniversaries*

Google search 4(another year later): *engagement rings*

Google search 5: *Flower delivery*

Google search 6: *Reservations for two at Papillon restaurant*

Google search 7: *Limo services*

Google search 8: *Wedding Chapels my area*

Google search 9: *Airline tickets to the Bahamas*

Google search 10: *Honeymoon suites in Bahamas*

Google search 11: *Best stores for baby registry*

Google search 12: *Hospitals near me*

Google search 13: *Pregnancy advice for men*

Google search 14: *Pregnancy classes for couples*

Google search 15: *Best ways to help with postpartum depression*

Google search 16: *child size caskets*

Google search 17: *Mortuary services near me*

Google search 18: *divorce lawyers in my area*

Google search 19: *Part time jobs near me*

Google search 20: *good deals on one bedroom apartments near me*

Google search 21: *How to deal with depression*

Google search 22: *How to avoid dope sickness*

Google search 23: *Methadone clinics near me*

Google search 24: *Painless suicide*

Google search 25: *24 hour storage units for cars*

Google search 26: *Best music in the history of mankind*

Google search 27: *How long does asphyxiation ta-*












 |-| 
|-| cobp6ly || 4 || Cost of Chemotherapy for dogs |-| 
|-| cobp9b8 || 4 || How to be popular.

Trouble.  

How to control rambunctious friends.  

Dealing with police.

Legal advice.  

Bail bondsmen.  

Where does bail money go?  

Where does bail money go if doesn't show up

Bounty hunter.  

How to get out of debt.

Wholesale chocolate.

Cheap wholesale chocolate.  

Home security.  

Jobs.  

Entry level positions.

How to earn a GED.

How do I fix my life?

Toxic fumes.

How to go to college without a GED or money.

How to get a good job without a college degree.

Drinking bleach. |-| 
|-| cobrcex || 3 || My wife died. Help me.

My dad was broken after my mom died. I can imagine he would have searched for something like that. He died a year and a half later from congestive heart failure (no previous heart issues before her death).  |-| 
|-| cobrfp2 || 3 || "Puppies for sale"

"Good Puppy names"

"What is the best puppy food"

"Imgur"

"How to teach your dog to do tricks"

"How to stop your dog running away" 

"Best way to find a missing dog"

"How to lure your dog back home" 

"Missing dog finder"

"Dog pound"

"How to deal with anxiety" 

"Budweiser super bowl ad"

"How long can dogs survive by themselves?"

"Puppies for sale"

"How to treat a a sick dog that was lost" 

"Local vets"

"Imgur"




 |-| 
|-| cobrukq || 3 || * How to talk to girls

* How to talk to girls online

* Are online relationships healthy

* Skype download

* How to drop out of high school

* How far apart are Florida and California

* How to have skype sex

* How to get cum off a laptop screen

* Is six months too soon to ask a girl to marry me

* How expensive are plane tickets

* How to sneak onto a plane

* Is sneaking onto a plane illegal

* Part time jobs for 18 year old high school dropouts orlando, florida

* Is working at disney worth it

* Can i get an infection from wearing the character suits at disney

* Is one year too soon to ask a girl to marry me

* Cheap wedding rings

* Quality wedding rings

* Plane ticket from orlando to los angeles cheap

* Marriage proposal photographers

* Italian restaurants los angeles

* Plane ticket from los angeles to orlando cheap

* Depression counselors

* Things to do when you miss your girlfriend

* Pornhub

* How to fix trust issues in relationship

* Pornhub

* Why does my girlfriend think im cheating on her

* Online relationship counseling

* How to help depressed girlfriend

* Help my girlfriend is depressed and i think its my fault

* Can i call an ambulance for someone in another state

* What to wear to a funeral

* Plane ticket from orlando to los angeles cheap

* Welcome to the black parade by my chemical romance

* To anyone who reads my browser history, because I know someone is going to- bury me next to her. Please.

* I just swallowed a handful of pills how long w |-| 
|-| cobs3mg || 4 || league of legends

lol best champions

master yi builds

why do i keep dying in lol

getting more cs

raising elo in lol

fuck bronze

lol platinum strategies

lol finding a ranked team

finding a ranked team that doesn't fucking suck

reasons a girlfriend would break up with you out of nowhere

finding a bullshit free geek girl

how to break out of the friendzone

the red pill

mra

gamergate

evolution reasons for sexism

how to argue with stupid people

second wave vs third wave feminism

how to find original academic sources without a college connection

how to interpret statistics objectively

how to convince people you've become a better person

how to apologize to former friends so they know you mean it

loneliness

am i depressed

depression support groups worcester ma

can two depressed people have a good relationship

genetic risk of depression

how do i know if i'm happy

what does loving unconditionally mean

good hobbies to share with your children

ways to celebrate your daughter coming out

30 year anniversary ideas |-| 
|-| cobswr5 || 3 || Best man speeches for younger brothers. |-| 
|-| cobuk6m || 3 || * etsy quilts
* how to quilt
* quilt patterns
* current date
* juniper berries spring images
* funny cat photos
* memory loss age 32
* cat quilt
* funny cat photos
* rottentomatoes 50 First Dates
* cats cause memory loss?
* webmd memory loss cats
* doctors near me
* current date
* age 32 memory loss
* cat pictures
* etsy cat quilts
* blood in vomit cause
* blood in stool cause
* funny cat photos
* current date
* hospitals near me
* housecat disposal
* motivational images
* funny motivational images
* depression tips
* early-onset alzheimer signs
* how to quilt
* hospital no insurance
* doctor no insurance
* cute kittens photos
* signs memory loss
* cat photos funny
* headache 3 days
* age 33 memory loss |-| 
|-| cobx0k3 || 3 || is mommy ok

is mommy gonna be ok

why is mom sick?

cancer wiki

leukemia

cancer cure cost

surgery cost

kemo cost

handle cancer in a family member

how to not cry in public

how to get over someone

blocking memories?

 How to forget bad memories |-| 
|-| coblne8 || 6 || -free Breaking Bad episodes
-Aaron Paul
-Aaron paul naked
-tumblr
-what is demisexual
-kinsey/klien test
-homosexuality
-coming out to parents
-how to fix broken nose
-cheap apartments
-pray away the gay counseling
-[deletes history]
-rehab clinics |-| 
|-| cobtlwo || 3 || Free Chat Rooms

Free dating sites

First date meeting places?

Cheap first date meeting places?

Directions to movie theater

Can she get pregnant the first time?

How long to find out if pregnant?

How long do you have to be together to propose?

Do you have to propose if your gf is pregnant?

Rings

Engagement rings

Cheap engagement rings 

How do you know if you're girlfriend's cheating on you?

How to be a dad

How soon to do a paternity test? 

Jobs

Are you more likely to get a second job if you have a first?

Male support groups

How to make your girlfriend happy?

Can a girl hit a guy?

How to talk to your girlfriend?

How to break up

Am I bad for wanting to leave my pregnant gf?

Do batteries work for black eyes? 

Baby supplies

Baby gift registry

Cribs

Cheap baby clothes.

Cheap supplies for babies. 

How much alcohol effects babies?

Fetal alcohol syndrome?

Men in abusive relationships

Men being abused. 

How to get help for abuse. 

Men getting help for abuse.

My GF left. Help

How to deal with abusive break ups?

Help for single dads

Single parenting

Adoption 

How to put your child up for adoption

Is adoption right for me? 

Daycare

Cheap daycare

Daycare assistance programs

How do I protect my child from abusive partner?

How can I get custody?

How can I get full custody?

Do you need full custody to keep baby away from abusive parent?

How to deal with harrassment?

Can I call the cops for verbal threats?

Lawyers

Cheap lawyers

Family lawyers

Food stamps application

Heating assistance program

Not recieving child support checks

How to report not getting child support

Home remedies for teething

Why is my baby crying? 

How to soothe babies

When to take your baby to the doctor

Male support groups

Single Parent support groups

Therapy 

Suicide hotline

Toddler clothes

Cheap toddler clothes

When to start potty training? 

how to potty train 2 year old

Tantrums

How to deal with tantrums?

Nursery Rhymes

Games for young children

Dealing with sending your child to school

Making it through your first day off pre school |-| 
|-| cob2qhp || 273 || "119, what's your emergency?"

"THE LINE AT STARBUCKS IS TOO LONG! I'M NEVER GOING TO MAKE IT TO WORK ON TIME! HELP ME!"

"Ma'am, it's ok, let's just stay calm. Can you give me your current location?"

"I'm at Dowlen and Scott street. There's like 20 people in line! What do I do???"

"Ma'am, Google Maps is showing there is another Starbucks two blocks south of your location. I would suggest you try there."

"Thank you! Thank you so much!!"

-------------------------------------------------------------------

"119, what's your emergency?"

"SOMEONE PARKED IN MY PARKING SPACE IN FRONT OF MY APARTMENT! IT SAYS 'RESERVED!' HELP!"

"Ma'am, everything's going to be alright. Are there other parking spots nearby?"

"Yeah, but they're, like, *super* far away!"

"Ma'am, I'm going to have a tow truck sent to your location. For now I'm going to have to ask you to park in another spot until help arrives."

"Ok, ok. Thank you so much!"

-------------------------------------------------------------------

"119, what's your emergency?"

"I ORDERED MY QUARTER POUNDER WITHOUT PICKLES, BUT THEY PUT PICKLES ON IT ANYWAY! WHY DO BAD THINGS HAPPEN TO GOOD PEOPLE?!?"

"Sir, it's going to be ok, let's just try to be calm. Have you tried asking them to remove the pickles?"

"Well, no, I don't want to ask them. It's too embarrassing!"

"Have you tried removing the pickles yourself?"

"... Um, I guess I could do that. But they shouldn't have put them on in the first place!"

"Don't worry sir, we'll contact store management."

"Thank you!"

-------------------------------------------------------------------

"119, what's your emergency?"

"I CAN'T FIND MY CAR KEYS!"

"Sir, let's just try to remain calm. Where did you last see your car keys?"

"They were in my pocket when I got home! Where could they have gone!"

"Have you checked the couch cushions?"

"..."

"Sir?"

"... Oh. There they are. Thanks."

-----------------------------------------------------------------

"119, what's your emergency?"

"GIRL SCOUTS CAME BY MY HOUSE TODAY SELLING COOKIES BUT THEY WERE ALL OUT OF THIN MINTS!!! WHY DOES GOD HATE ME???"

"Ma'am, it's alright, I'm here to help. Do you know what troop resides in your area?"

"I DON'T KNOW! I'M IN FARMINGDALE AND I JUST WANT THIN MINTS! WHY GOD? WHY?"

"Ma'am, stay with me now. I'm going to contact the local troop leader and have them come by your house as soon as the next shipment arrives."

"BUT THAT COULD TAKE FOREVER! I DON'T KNOW IF I CAN WAIT THAT LONG!"

"Ma'am, are you aware you can order girl scout cookies online?"

*click*

-------------------------------------------------------------------

"119, what's your emergency?"

"MY GARDENER DOESN'T SPEAK ENGLISH AND I DON'T KNOW HOW TO TELL HIM THAT I WANT MY FENCE PAINTED! WHY DOESN'T EVERYONE JUST SPEAK ENGLISH?"

"Sir, it's going to be alright. Have you tried just showing him the fence?"

"I TRIED THAT BUT I DON'T KNOW IF HE UNDERSTOOD AND I TRIED SPEAKING LOUDER BUT HE STILL JUST LOOKS CONFUSED!"

"He's Mexican, sir, not deaf. Have you tried using Google translate?"

"... what's that?"

"I'm sending an interpreter to your location. Hang tight, sir."

 |-| 
|-| cob2s9t || 87 || "119 what is your minor inconvenience?"

"Yes, my house is too big and I can't get Wifi when sitting on the upstairs john.  I need some help!"

"Not to worry, your neighbor's Wifi password is hotstud69.  Piggy back it and you can us it."

**************************************************

The young man smiled as he talked to the camera. He brushed a lock of red curls out of his eye sight. "I considered being a doctor, or a police officer and all those usual cliches.  But then I realized there were so many people with everyday problems, yet no one was helping them.  That was I invented 119.  To help solve all problems great and small."

*******************************************************

"119 what is your minor inconvenience?"

"Yes I need to ask my gardener to plant the tulips on the north side of the guest house, but I've forgotten his name!"

"No worries, our records show that his name is Jesus Lopez. His wife also just had a child, a boy name Gomez. Be sure to congratulate him on it."

"Ohh thank you, you are a life savor!"

******************************************************

The entrepreneur man continued to talk to the newscast.  He flashed his perfectly straight teeth.  Obviously whitened.  "It was hard getting funding at first, especially since there are so many people with so many problems.  But 119 has become a rousing success. We're expanding into Houston, LA, and even Vancouver, Canada by the years end."

******************************************************

"119 what is your minor inconvenience?"

"Yes I want this darling little throw pillow from Amazon, but it's 24.99! I don't need anything else and I don't want to buy something extra just to qualify for the free shipping!"

"That's not a problem.  Go to the hardware page and look for elbow bends, one inch plastic. They sell for a dime."

"Ohh that'll be perfect!  Thank you honey!"

******************************************************

"We're doing so much good in the world.   And it's quite challenging too. You need to be prepared for people who fill up on bread at Olive Garden before they get their meal.  Where to find gluten free organic cookies at the airport.  How to get the breakfast menu at 2 o'clock when you sleep in.    There's just such a variety. But our staffed is full trained."

******************************************************


"119 what is your minor inconvenience?"

"I'm at Starbuck and my lazy ass barista didn't bother to make a funny thingie on the foam! I mean, it's just blank!"

"We're very sorry to hear that sir.  We've sent the nearest recently graduated art student to your location.  Please feel free to maky any request for designs on your lattes."

"Thanks. Bout time our money's being used for something useful!"

*******************************************************

"That went rather well." The man adjusted his tie as he walked down the stairs from the television studio.  A much needed boost in getting 119's name out there. Not to mention it would so help the next fiscal quarter.  He pulled the keys out of his pocket and looked around the parking lot in a slow arc.  After a moment he sighed, picking up his smart phone and dialing. "Yes, 119?.... yes, I'm at the TV studio and I've forgotten which car I drove." |-| 
|-| cob4455 || 24 || "119, what is your emergency?"

"Help! Please! I was busy watching World's Explodiest Tanks and I forgot I had a pizza in the oven! IT'S BURNT TO A CRISP NOW!"

"Dear sweet God in heaven! What's your address and style of pizza!?"

"275 Eastwickham Rd, and it was a supreme Digiorno. Please, I thought I'd be eating pizza by now! I'm SO HUNGRY!"

"Try eating some other snacks, but not too many, you'll fill up! We've already dispatched an oven truck to the store nearby to buy and cook the pizza while speeding to your house. Do you need me to stay on the line?"

*Dialogue muffled by what is clearly a mouth full of chips.* "Yes, thank you." |-| 
|-| cob39ni || 45 || "119, what is your emergency?"

"OMG I just can't even."

"Ma'am, try to remain calm-"

"You don't understand, I literally, can't even."

"This sounds bad, do I need to send an officer to your location?"

"I don't know. I. I don't know what to do."

"Ma'am, you're going to have to tell me what happened so I can get an accurate report to the responding officer."

"Okay... haaa... I was taking my new iPhone out of my purse-"

"Chanel?"

"No, Marc-Jacobs - Forever series 8 in coral red."

"Nice!"

"Thanks. Anyway, so my iPhone fell out of my purse, and cracked my iPad."

"Oh dear. I'll send an officer to bring you a new iPad right away. What color case would you like?"

"Seagreen with a kickstand, but that's not the only problem. You see, I have family over so there are four or five cars in our garage right now. But I can't figure out which set of remote keyless BMW keys go to which car."

"Oh dear, you would have to try them one by one. That sounds awful."

"But my estate is so big that I have to walk sooooo far just to try. And since they unlock based on your proximity, I could be getting interference from one of the other sets of keys."

"Honey don't panic. We can just send you a new 2015 Lexus RC F for the day while we sort this out."

"I'd prefer the LS hybrid"

"Okay no problem. I'll send an officer right away."

"Don't you need my address?"

"It's the Pennington estate on the hill right?"

"Yes that's us. Oh and one more thing. Can you bring me a new phone charger. I have one for my bedroom, one in the living room, one in the dining room, and one in the master bathroom. But like, what am I supposed to do when I'm watching a movie in my home theatre and want to rant on Tumblr?"

"We'll send two." |-| 
|-| cob5elt || 19 || "Ma'am, please stop crying. It's going to be okay."

The woman was hysterical. Ellie could easily imagine the woman on the other side of the line with her primped hair, designer cloths, and gobs of mascara smearing across her face. Taking so many calls you would think that there would be some variance in the people she talked to, but she imagined them all to be the same ten people calling over and over again. Even their voices sounded the same. They melded into a few different cadences, separated only by regional accents or by how they cried.  Their problems were meaningless to Ellie, but they were willing to pay for the support. 

"I'm sorry it's hard to type with your new nails," Ellie was half screaming over the woman's sobs. "I'm sure he understands that the text you sent him was a mishap, just call him and explain..." The woman interrupted her and offered the same argument that Ellie always heard. There really was no variance in these people, but they all thought they were special and that they mattered more than others.

It took several minutes to finally convince the crying woman that everything would be okay if she just called her boyfriend instead of staying on the phone with Ellie. Eventually, hiccuping, she agreed and disconnected. Ellie quickly put herself on break and took a moment to stretch her legs and head to the bathroom. She hated sitting in the cubicle all day, but it was an easy job. So many people called over nothing, nothing! These people wouldn't know a real problem if it hit them in the face. It made Ellie feel more superior, in a way, because she did have real things to worry about like paying rent and getting all of her homework done. Didn't these people have something better to do?

The seconds on her break counted down and she answered another phone call.

"Thank you for calling 119, what's your emergency?"

"Hi...I uh, I think I'm going to kill myself." The voice on the end of the line had the same strain Ellie was used to and it took her a second to recognize that this wasn't her usual problem.

"You...uh...what?" She replied dumbly, unable to process what the man had said.

"Yeah, I don't see a point," his voice picked up a bit as he himself got more comfortable with the idea. "I just don't see a point in living anymore. I didn't really know who to call and, well, here I am."

Ellie began to panic. This man was going to kill himself. She wasn't trained to handle something like this. Their prompts had never covered anything so serious. The line was supposed to only handle the problems of the rich and spoiled. 

"Are you still there?" He asked, a slight pleading in his voice.

She didn't know what to do. Thinking fast, she decided to do the only thing she could.

"Yes, I'm here. Listen, I know that..." *click*

She held her breath and listened to see if the call had really disconnected, her finger still pressing the disconnect key. This trick had helped her get out of bad calls in the past. If they checked the recording they would see that she had been talking when the call disconnected and she surely would not have done that. It wouldn't make sense. They'd pass over it and Ellie would never get in trouble. No one had ever trained her to handle someone with a real problem, so it was their fault anyways. Besides, surely he'd call back and get someone else that could help him. She re-assured herself with these thoughts and answered a call for another crying woman who had crashed her new car, returning her day to an easy normalcy. Ellie promptly forgot the man she had spoken to, the man who never did call back. |-| 
|-| cob8k5r || 9 || First day on the job, I saved a kid's life.

Fifteen and a half year old male, multiple issues - first there was the lakeside bike path that ran from a couple blocks from his home to a couple blocks from the highschool, and meant he had no justification to have his own car. Then there was the matter of the endless emailing of schoolwork from his household desktop PC or  personal Android phone to his school-issued iPad. And the straw that broke the camel's back, the new leather jacket that he couldn't wear to school unless he wore it all day long since it was too nice to stuff into a locker or leave unattended for even a minute. I suggested hanging it across the extra straps on the bottom of his backpack, directed him to a source of USB&lt;-&gt;Lightning connectors, and sent him some links to sites where he could learn how to talk a good game of being carless-by-choice.

Really, talking points are a lot of what we do. Our most common call is about Starbucks issues, and knowing where all the good indie coffeehouses are is a big part of the job, but some people need a nudge about how to brag on not drinking big-chain coffee anymore... |-| 
|-| cob8xp6 || 7 || *119 the number for all your convenience needs*

The advert flashed on the radio. Tunes of the inner city interrupted by the announcement, the area here was filled with rich people willing to pay the 50 per second rate just to talk to someone then whatever they felt like charging if they actually needed assistance. Assistance usually consists of emergency bookings at the nearest salon or paying out some poor person to give up there appointment at the dentist.

People didn't always need to call 119 but the poor where never able to do so. The adverts in the inner city where only aimed at the rich though any poor commuter just had to ignore them, thats what Lauren didn't understand though only poor people took the subway so why would they waste time advertising 119 here? Mid-thougt she was distracted with a man who sat opposite her, a bum by all definitions the rugged clothing and crappy phone showed that but there he was dialing 119... "Yeah umm I need a car", "No, I don't. I don't have a house..." **Beep, beep, beep* the something had clearly disconnected the line. Laura had never seen anyone call 119 before let alone they get hung up on because of it. 

City flying by both she and the strange man got off at the same stop, she hurried her way to work hardly thinking anything of it but stopped for a beat when she saw enforcement officers approaching. Her first thought was to plead innocence she wasn't doing anything wrong but most of the time they didn't care if you didn't have money to pay them away or the high class job to earn there respect they would find you guilty of something. 

She worried for nothing though as the officers walked straight past her and approached the homeless man, "Sir, I'm charging you with mis-use of emergency services. You do not have to say anything..."
The rest of the caution was cut off as the homeless man scuffled with the police officers who quickly subdued him. 

She stopped wondering why they played the 119 ad's on the subway, "Any fucking excuse to charge us for summit" she muttered scurrying to work.  |-| 
|-| cobfq1w || 6 || The USA established 119 as the number for all 1st world problems and it worked amazingly. People were able to report their problems with ease with no fear of being judged because they were "Rich fuckers". Other countries decided to do the same. France, Germany, Denmark. All worked wonders. But when the UK did it... that's when the problems began. The reverse of 999 is still 999. The police began getting first world problems and first world problem answerers got crimes. Within months the country fell into anarchy, people were getting arrested because their free coffee coupons only counted towards the expensive Starbucks coffees while others got nothing for murder. Eventually the government collapsed and the countries auctioned off. France now owns England, something they've been after ever since William the Bastard declared himself independent. Norway got Scotland, they are now the only country profiting from the North Sea Oil. They are now so rich they'll soon be able to buy the world. Northern Ireland got bought by Wales to the dismay of the Irish. Then Ireland got bought by the Isle of Man. Nobody knows where they got the money from. And Wales got bought by China, their flag is now a red chinese dragon. |-| 
|-| cobmnix || 5 || "119, what is your emergency"

"I switched my TV and now I can't watch Real Houswives"

"Ma'am, when you say you switched your TV, do you mean you changed channels inadvertently or do you mean you've changed the input to something different?"

"Well my TV screen is now just black! HELP ME OH GOD!!!!"

"Ma'am calm down, take a breath, do you know the make and model of the TV?

"NO!!! AHHH! My husband just installed this tv that's like 200 inches or something and the REMOTE IS DIFFERENT!!!"

"Ma'am I need you to calm down - can you describe the remote to me, I will walk you through this"

"AHHHHHH!!!!!  THIS IS CRAZY!!!!!!"

"Ma'am, just take a breath, we'll work through this"

"OH MY GOD I CAN'T BREATHE!"

"Ok Ma'am I am going to send a technician to your house, can you confirm your address"

"9316 Belle Vista Lane - in Palo Alto - PLEASE HURRY!!!"

"Ma'am, the technician is on his way, fortunately he is just around the corner. He may seem really young, but he's a tech whiz. He will take good care of you. His name is Mark Zuckerberg. He is fairly new at this, so I need you to calm down or you may make him nervous and he may not be able to correct your issue"

"OH MY GOD THANK YOU!!!!"

Ma'am I will stay on the line until he gets the situation resolved"

"OK - wait, he's here now"

"Good Ma'am, just let him in, he'll take it from here"

"HE JUST GOT THE REMOTE - OH HEAVENS HE FIXED IT!!!!"

"Great Ma'am - is everything satisfactory now?"

"Well, I do have an issue with my Bidet - could he fix that too?" |-| 
|-| cobqf99 || 5 || The following is a transcript from a 199 call. The names of both the operator and caller have been redacted to preserve their privacy.


18:45 1/2/15
Incoming call.

Operator: 199, location of emergency

Caller: (frantic, out of breath) Uhm yes..me and my friend....we need help

Operator: Alright, I need you to stay calm. Where are you?

Caller: We're at *redacted* we need help please

Operator: Ok, I've got your location here. What's the nature of your emergency.

Caller: (still breathless) Netflix. Netflix is down. We were watching the Office and...and...we were watching the Office and it just...it just stopped. Now we can't get it to play.

Operator: I understand. Who am I talking to?

Caller: *Redacted*

Operator: Alright, *redacted*. We're going to help you but I need some information from you, can you help me with that?

Caller: I...I think so.

Operator: Great, ok *redacted*. I've got a specialist on standby and their going to help you. What season of the Office were you in?

Caller: Six

Operator: Great, great. And what episode?

Caller: Uhm, ten I think. 

Operator: Alright....and....I've dispatched a team of specialists to your location. They're bringing season six and seven of the office on a USB drive. That should hold you over until Netflix is back up.

Caller: (excited) Oh my god! Thank you so much! 

End of call
 |-| 
|-| cobrzb1 || 3 || Lol I am a paramedic in the Midwest  (who responds to 911 calls of course)  and when someone is "dead" either found that way or attempts were made but unsuccessful/field termination, it is called a 119. You also call an ER doc on duty for "119 orders" (permission to stop resuscitation) Just a little fun fact. 

TL;DR: 119= dead on scene to paramedics/law enforcement.  |-| 
|-| coavrcf || 331 || "Dude, don't. Please."

"Don't listen to him, Frodo", Sam shouted, from between the lava and the heat. "Throw it into the fire."

"Do you have any idea how long it took to craft that?" Sauron asked, and Frodo turned to face him again. "That's 
Elvish gold, did you know?"

"So?"

"And the markings. The tiny little markings. Dude, hours with a pointy knife." Sauron sighed. "Please don't throw it 
away."

"Why do you even want it?" Frodo asked, unsure. "You're just an eye, you can't wear it."

"He's not just an eye" Sam intervened. "He just sighed!"

"That's just because the writer had no idea how to make that particular pause in the dialogue", Sauron explained. "Look, the point is; give me back my ring."

"If I do, what are you going to do with it?" Frodo asked, still unsure.

"Take over Middle Earth and enslave all of mankind."

"WHAT?"

"Propose to my fiance."

"That's not what you just said, dude."

"Yes it is."

"No, you said enslave all of --"

"My fiance. Propose to her. That's all."

"Frodo, don't believe him", Sam pleaded. "He's in cahoots with the author, didn't you hear?"

"I totally am not", Sauron denied, blinking at me.

Frodo was unsure. He looked from his dirt covered friend to the giant eye in front of him. "Dude, I wanna help you. But how can I know you're not gonna screw with us?"

"You have my word, Frodo. All I want is my ring back." Sauron said, again with a sigh.

"HE JUST SIGHED AGAIN, FRODO. THE MAN'S WORKING WITH THE AUTHOR, HE'S GONNA SCREW US UP!" 

"I'm not, dude. I'm not. Just give me my ring."

"It *is* his ring, Sam", Frodo argued. "Kind of douchey of me to just throw it in the lava."

"Yeah, *Sam*", Sauron intervened, cranky.

"Don't do it, Frodo. He's gonna screw us, I'm telling you."

"I can't destroy it. It's not mine to destroy."

"Give it. Give it to papa", Sauron begged, barely able to contain himself.

Frodo raised his hand. Slowly, he reached out, ring in the middle of his open palm, offering it away.

"Take it, Sauron."

Sauron raised his own hand, ready to take the rin --

"I TOLD YOU THIS ASSHOLE'S GOT THE AUTHOR ON HIS SIDE! LOOK, FRODO, HE JUST RAISED A GOD 
DAMNED HAND OUT OF NOWHERE!"

"What?" Frodo looked around, confused at the arm that, for no apparent reason, seemed to have sprouted out of Sauron's 
red, fiery eye. "What's going on?"

"Give me that!" Sam cried, grabbing the ring from his friend's hand. "This ends now!"

He throws the ring into the sea of lava under them.

The ring, as if by magic, bounces of a little rock on the stream, catapulting itself up into the air again.

"Really, dude?" Sam asks me, a grumpy look on his face. "Catapulting itself up into the air again?"

Frodo takes the ring in midair, offers it to Sauron again. "Screw Sam. Take this shit, Sauronboy."

"Jesus Christ, Psycho, go to bed. It's six AM, you don't even know what you're writing anymore", Sam argues, 
sitting cross legged on the floor. "I refuse to take part in this."

Sauron takes the ring from Frodo. "Give me my bling, son."

Sam sighs. Frodo looks at him. "Dude, this story sucks. Did you notice the tense has changed from past to present mid-story?"

"Yeah, I noticed. It's like 'make an effort, dude'", Sam adds. "And I'm pretty sure the ending is going to be disappointing, as well."

"You think so? Maybe there's a twist coming, or something...."

"Nah, he's too tired to pull this off. Probably gonna end the whole thing with a pun, or something."

From the entrance of Mount Doom, the long-bearded silhouette of Gandalf shows up, staff in hand, dreamy look in his eyes.

"Sauron", he whispers, coming closer. "My love."

"What the hell?" 

"Gandy... I got it. I finally got it." Sauron's voice is all romance and tenderness.

Gandalf approaches the eye, who, magically, gets down on its brand new pair of knees.

"I love you, Gandy."

"Oh my God, this is it." Gandalf covers his mouth with his hands. "This is it. Can you believe it, Sam?"

Sam looks at me, just as Sauron pulls the ring and places it on Gandalf's finger.

"Told you guys it was nothing", Sauron says, turning to face the love of his life. "Will you marry me, Gandalf?"

"Fuck you, Psycho, I'm out", cries Sam, throwing himself into the river of lava beneath them.
__________
*Hi, I have a subreddit now. Check out /r/psycho_alpaca for other of my sleep deprived stories. Thanks for reading =)*
 |-| 
|-| coaw8pq || 94 || The machine crackled to life, spurting electricity that arced off of the enormous radio antenna that crowned the city skyline. I slowly took a step back to admire my work, careful of the skyscraper's nearby edge leading to a hundred-story plummet to the ground. The machine's coils glowed an eerie neon green as it began to charge. I cackled with glee, rechecking the instruments just to make sure everything was all set. 

Over the sounds of the machine, I heard a gentle, droning buzz. Like that annoying fly hiding somewhere in the room that you just can't spot. It grew louder and louder until it rattled around my skull, a song that I just couldn't get out of my mind! It became a roar, so loud that I could barely hear the machine powering up anymore.

A scarlet triplane burst upwards around the edge of the building, so close that I felt a sudden gust of wind from the propeller push me back from the edge and send me sprawling across the gravely ground. *The Condor!* I shook my fist at the plane, which was circling back around to bring its weapons to bear. I rushed over to my console and slammed a gloved fist down on the panel, activating the anti-aircraft weapons, but his piloting was too skillful!

At the last moment, he leaped from the plane and landed gracefully on the skyscraper's roof, cape flapping around him. He called out to his sidekick to head back to the secret mountaintop base, the Condor Nest. "I can handle this myself," he said with a glare in my direction. 

"Well, well... Duke Morentower," he said, advancing toward me and flexing his muscles in preparation for beating me to a pulp.

"*Condor*," I responded tersely, holding my ground. 

"Whatever your scheme is this time," he said, "It's not going to work. I'm going to stop you once again."

"I think you might regret that," I told him. As if on cue, a dozen alien warships descended from the clouds, hovering slowly and silently over the city. Each was the size of a football stadium, and bristling with advanced energy weapons. The Condor's little triplane and its machine guns would be utterly useless. The first thing they did was blast his little plane out of the air; it went down in a pillar of fire and landed somewhere in the park. His eyes were the size of dinner plates, and he looked ready to jump off the side of the building to go see if his sidekick is OK.

"This whole time," I told him, "You have been so busy ruining my plans that you never really stopped to think about *why* I wanted to control the city, did you?" He turned as if only just remembering that I was there, and looked at me like it was the first time he'd ever seen me. 

"All the doomsday devices?" he said.

"YES!" I crowed triumphantly. "All to stop the invasion! If I'd told anyone about the aliens, no one would have believed me anyway. I mean, I'm wearing a mask and a cape already, for god's sake. And each time I got so close to perfecting Earth's defenses, you'd come smash up my fortress! Bet you wished you hadn't blown up my gigantic laser weapon now, huh tough guy?" I was really enjoying getting to rub his nose in it.

Above us, the alien ships began to open fire on the city. The quiet night was filled with the sounds of explosions, crumbling buildings, and screams. The Condor went to the edge of the building to survey the destruction, gloved hands gripping the guard rails tightly. "But you can stop it now!" he said, gesturing at my latest device. "Right? You can end this??"

"Well, it's still charging," I told him. "It will take quite some time. Hours, maybe."

He rushed over and surveyed my equipment. "I can charge it faster," he said, holding up something from my bag. "You said that this device would suck my energy away, right? You were planning on using it to fuel that giant killer robot. Can it be redirected to this machine?"

I pondered that for a moment, scratching my head. I stepped over and took the device from his hands, which I'd attempted to use last month before he broke my jaw and stepped on it. "The ionization vacuum helmet? Well, it is repaired..." I told him. "And I think I could hook it up to the machine..."

More alien ships were descending from the atmosphere, firing rapidly.

"There's no time to think," he said. 

I grabbed my gear and set to work. In no time, the conduit was created, and he slapped the helmet on his head. "Thank you, Morentower. I never thought I would see the day where we'd be teaming up like this." 

I clapped him on the shoulder and smiled. "I'm just glad that you finally understand what I was trying to do this whole time."

I turned the helmet on, and the bright neon green of the machine charging intensified. The Condor's face twisted into a grimace as the powers that fueled his supernatural strength and durability were re-routed into my device. The glow intensified, bathing the entire skyscraper in neon green.

Finally, it was fully charged. The Condor wrenched off the helmet and collapsed against the railing. "Turn it on!" he managed to gasp.

With a sudden shove, I pushed him off the edge of the skyscraper. He plummeted swiftly through the night sky, looking up at me with one last look of betrayal as he disappeared from view and landed one hundred stories down on the pavement.

"Sucker," I muttered to myself as I turned off the holograms.  |-| 
|-| cob0il4 || 17 || A melancholy moon looked down on the darkened city. The mighty monoliths of light scattered around the city were all dark, as if they had fallen asleep. From her vantage point in the penthouse, Nela couldn't even make out the streets in the sea of darkness below. Several small fires were burning here and there. There was probably much looting going on below but the sound of the wind up here drowned out the screams and cries.

It was very peaceful up here.

Nela checked her watch again. 30 more minutes and she'd turn everything back on. 3 hours would be enough to give everyone a good taste of what they could expect if they ignored her demands.

Her thoughts were interrupted by the sound of the door of the apartment bursting open. A tall figure ran inside and in a winded but soft voice said, "You're under arrest, Nela Amsel."

"For what?" asked Nela, calm, composed. The few flickering candles scattered around the room didn't reveal the face of her unexpected guest, but it was clear that the intruder was a woman and had a gun.

"For disabling all the electronics in the city like you threatened you would." The woman, probably a detective, meant business.

"Really?" Nela smiled. "How did I do that? I mean, is that even possible? And before you answer that, I gotta know- did you walk up a hundred flights of stairs? That is seriously impressive."

"I do what my job demands of me. Now put your hands up or I'll shoot."

Without hesitation, Nela obliged. "Okay, okay, don't shoot. My hands are up. Where's your backup?"

For the first time, the detective hesitated. She slightly lowered her gun and moved closer to the light. Most of her features were still hidden but her sharp nose and shoulder length hair were now apparent. She said nothing.

"Let me guess," Nela continued, "there's no backup. You came here alone, didn't you?"

"That's none of your business. I'm here to arrest you. What you're doing is costing innocent people their lives."

"I think you're exaggerating. Some looting maybe, but I doubt there will be many deaths."

"One death is too many."

"Well, in that case, blame the mayor. He should've taken those threats seriously. Tell me, do you think the demands made by - let's say, 'The Mastermind', that name has a good ring to it - were evil? Do you think the mayor was right in only making the threat public but hiding the full demands?"

Silence emanated from the stranger.

"What do you say?" continued Nela. "Don't you think it's about time someone else should take a go at running this joint? This city has been plagued by greed an corruption for far too long. It's time for change."

"That's not for you to decide," the detective replied, but without much conviction.

"I think it is," replied Nela. "Could you please put away your gun? I hate looking at them in the middle of a conversation."

The colt suddenly started glowing red and the detective threw it down with a yelp. On the floor, the gun slowly melted into a puddle of metal. There were some faint sounds of the bullets going off but it seemed to be coming from very far away.

"Now that I have your attention, what's your name? I'm assuming you're a police detective."

Eyes still fixed on the bubbling pile of metal, the woman said, "Sergeant Joan Moss, fifth precinct."

"Okay Joan, enough with the games. What you're staring at is only a tiny fraction of what I'm capable of. I can turn this city into a magical place, where people are happy, content, where there's no crime, no injustice, no wrongful deaths, no politics and no scarcity. But I need something to do that. I need faith. I need everyone to swear their allegiance to me. Do you think that's too much of a price to pay for a utopia?"

"What guarantee do we have that you won't abuse your powers?"

"None," said Nela. Then she looked at her watch again. "Oh my, look what time it is!" shed said and snapped her fingers.

In an instant, the city was bathed in light as everything started working again. Teetering teenagers once again had access to snapchat, catatonic commuters could suddenly start their cars again and loutish looters found themselves surrounded by cops and angry shop owners.

Light flooded in the penthouse of Triumph Towers as well and Joan shielded her dilated pupils from the sudden radiance. Finally, Nela had a chance to properly examine her gallant guest. Darkness had never been a problem for her, but recently she had been trying to keep her senses as human as possible.

Joan Moss was in her early thirties and had a surprisingly angular face. Her chestnut hair fell on her shoulders and she was dressed in plain clothes- well, except for the badge on her belt which was clearly visible.

"So, you can do magic?" said Joan after her eyes had adjusted to the light.

Nela laughed. "My dear, what I do is nothing close to what you mean by 'magic', but I suppose you can call it that, if you want."

"What else can you do?"

Nela closed her eyes and probed Joan's memories. In less than a second, she had found something she could use. She opened her eyes again.

"Evan Goodwin," she said.

Joan's face tensed visibly. "He's the guy-"

"-who killed your partner. Yes. I can take you to him, if you want."

"What do I have to do in return?"

"Help me make this city a better place."

"By making you the Queen, or something?" Joan scoffed. "Look, Nela. If you want to help people, why not just help them from here? You could be a cop and help catch all the bad guys."

"You're right, I could. But who will catch the bad cops, the bad councilmen and the bad congressmen? Who will judge the bad judges, the bad politicians, the bad government agents and the bad businessmen. Who, my friend, will tell the president what a bad boy he's been? It's all or nothing, Joan."

Nela looked out the large glass windows and Joan followed her gaze. The luminous and cacophonous city looked back at them.

"Everybody wants to change the world, Joan," Nela said, dreamily. "So do I. The only difference is, I know I can do it. Don't you think this city, this country, this world, deserves better?"

The silence in the room told Nela that she now had an ally. For a second, she wondered whether she should tell this brave lady the whole story. The truth about the last King, the looming advent of the Jester or the endless war humanity was about to be plunged into. But she decide against it. It was too soon.

One small step at a time. |-| 
|-| cob30s8 || 10 || "Do you not realise the BENEFITS of Earth having a giant death laser capable of blowing up a moon sized object?"

"Not really. You blowing up the moon will cause major tidal problems."

"Eh. The moon's actual mass won't actually disappear, you know. We'll have, at most, maybe a few decades of fluctuation, maybe one extra disastrous tsunami a year than we would have otherwise, which my robots can help save people from, and in the meantime, Earth gets a proven defence mechanism, plus a cloud of moon fragments that make it harder for the aliens to invade."

"You're blowing up the moon... To save the Earth from aliens."

"Yes."

"But there aren't any."

"As far as you know, Agent, sure. I've detected some promising signals from somewhere in the direction of the North Star, and every year the signal's getting stronger. If we assume it's on the electromagnetic spectrum as I'm detecting, then not only are they moving faster than light but they're also making a beeline for us, with our sun to guide them."

"How long before they get here, assuming they're not any other kind of EM signal emitting body?"

"About seven years from next April 12th, at my calculations, give or take two days above or below that."

"... And you couldn't have told anybody?"
"Not enough time. Had to build defence laser in time. Once moon destroyed, society will crumble, I'll reform it and build more, shoot the aliens if they're hostile, save Earth."
"Huh."
"And your attempts to foil me are really distracting. But you know what, I grow tired. Destroy this laser, and I will give up, and swallow the cyanide capsule in my teeth fitting, everyone wins for seven years. You don't destroy it, and I ruin the world so humanity has a chance of survival."

"Fine, you win, Doctor. Let's save the Earth." |-| 
|-| coaywq6 || 23 || '*Why* do you do it, Charles? Why do you insist on fighting me every time?'

Cosmosis, Charles Simms, tore his tattered mask from his face and tossed it aside. 'You know why, *Simon*. You bring destruction wherever you go. You murder and maim without reason - men, women, children - you're a monster.'

Simon Weylund, infamous worldwide as his alter ego Axis, sneered. 'And why is that wrong?'

Charles' eyes narrowed in disbelief. How could he not understand he was the world's biggest villain? Surely he knew he was evil. That had to be something he got off on.

'Why is that wrong, Charles?' he repeated, strolling casually towards his battered nemesis across rubble and debris.

'It's illegal.' Charles responded in defiance.

Simon, refusing to meet Charles' glare, playfully kicked a chunk of concrete. 'So is having sex with a fourteen year old girl, but if I jump across the ocean...'

'That's not the same.' Charles said, attempting to stand strong but struggling to maintain his balance.

Simon slapped his hands to his face in mock surprise. 'Oh my! And why is that?'

Infuriated at his enemy's joking, Charles lunged at him, fist aimed squarely at his jaw. With ease, Simon sidestepped and watched the revered Cosmosis fall pitifully on his face.

'Oopsie daisy, you've taken a bit of a fall. You know if this was my property and we were in Texas, *that's a lot of hypothesising I know but bare with me here, buddy*, I could totally shoot you and the long arm of the law would simply reach out and shake my hand at a job well done. Is that a law you agree with, Cosmosis? Weren't you *just* prattling on about how killing was wrong?'

Pushing himself up off the street with the last of his strength, Charles turned and faced his nemesis once again, staring in rage at the grin plastered across his face. 'Killing *is* wrong. That isn't a law I agree wit-'

'Oh you don't agree with that one?' Simon squealed through another face of mock surprise, 'But it's the law, isn't it? Aren't we obliged to follow those without deviation? Rules are rules, and all...'

'A society without rules would be chaos. Rules are made to be followed.'

Axis' whimsical facade shattered, the villain's face distorting into a look of deranged anger 'Wrong! Rules are shackles created by an elite who believe themselves to be above such pedestrian controls. Cop shoots a street kid, judge runs over her husband's mistress, senator kills a hooker, no one's going to jail-'

'I hold everyone to the same code of justice, Simon-'

'I don't give a fuck what you do, Charles!' Simon screamed as he squeezed Charles' head in his hands, 'You're one man versus seven billion! You can't change human nature. The powerful made the law and the powerful will always be corrupt. Where was the justice for my mother? Arthur Veidt's semen was on her bloody corpse and he didn't even see the inside of a court room!'

Simon released Charles' head and turned on his heel, walking out his anger. Charles barely held himself up on all fours, spitting out a mouthful of blood before replying, 'What about morality?'

'What about it?' Simon snapped back.

'If you don't believe in the law, what about your own morals? Your own ethics? Do things you believe are right, not just because the law says they're right.'

'Oh I used to, Charles, trust me, but one day I learned about relativity. No, no, not physics,' Simon added at Charles' confusion, 'reality. Everything is relative. Everything. Everything we've ever been taught is a lie. A very elaborate lie, carefully constructed over millennia by millions of unwitting participants. We all become a part of this lie from the day we're born and we spin it until the day we die.'

Charles finally collapsed from exhaustion, rolling onto his back as his vision began to flicker. 'W-what are you tal...king about?'

'Everything's made up!' Simon shouted exuberantly. 'Everything was just decided on at some point by some person and the rest simply agreed. Why does one plus one equal two? Because we decided it does. Why is the sky blue? In fact, why did we even feel the need to define colours? Why did humanity do anything? Because it simply decided to. One day some deadshit fucking caveman decided he needed some more noises to communicate with so he fucking invented them!'

Defeat overcoming him, Charles closed his eyes and murmured quietly, 'Yes...'

Crouching down beside his nemesis on the blood-soaked asphalt, Simon continued his speech in a loud whisper. 'Humans. Just. Decide. Shit. What if that caveman never invented those extra sounds? What if women were never given equal rights? What if murder never was decided to be a crime? It's all possible. And guess what? There's nothing wrong with that. We've been raised in a society that tells us *this* is right and *that* is wrong but there's no absolute right and wrong, Charles. Fucking a schoolgirl here will get me arrested but if I cross enough borders it won't. Part of the world would condemn me for what another part wouldn't bat an eyelid over. Now isn't *that* fucked up? To think we've all been raised being told what the world is rather than being left to explore it and carve our own reality... that, my friend, is the worst crime of all. I'm no monster, Charles... just a lone seer in a blind society. I wish I could have been like you. Every day of my life I wish that blindfold was never removed. But once it's off and you see the world for what it is, you can never go back...'

A single tear spilled from Charles' closed eyes, a tear his lifelong enemy wiped away with a gentle stroke.

'Don't be sad, Charles. I know how you're feeling. I know better than anyone else. I'm sorry to have shown you this but I couldn't let you pass on thinking I was a monster. With all that's happened between us, you had to understand before the end, I had to show you. I only hope you can forgive me.'

'Simon...' came a weak mumble.

'Shhh... it's all over now, Charles. Rest in peace, my friend. Rest in peace.' |-| 
|-| cob83qp || 7 || "Don't you see it?" Verminus asked incredulously, "Don't you realize how necessary I am, that I am the protector, and you are the villain?"  

"Scum! How could you be necessary? Everywhere you go you kill and destroy indiscriminately. Every nation has a price on your head! How could you be so delusional and egotistical! You are nothing but a plague to society."   

"That is exactly what I am. Your morality is blind, a perverse joke. You value human life above all else. You would sacrifice a thousand sentient beings just to delay the death of a single person! You consume and multiply and destroy all. You are worth less than the worms that will devour your corpse."  

"You are the worthless one. You've killed innocent women and children, burned whole cities to the ground. There is no justification for your crimes. You are nothing but a terrorist, and I will destroy you."    

"The Earth is diseased, and I am the cure. I can halt the decimation of the land, air, and sea, and save countless species from extinction. I will keep the human population in check. Your governments are corrupt, and will poison and pollute the planet for profit. They cannot make the changes necessary for survival on their own. I will be the common enemy that rival nations require to make compromises. I will protect this world from the parasite that is humanity."  

"You are wrong! We can solve our own problems without murdering. You are a narcissistic sadist, attempting to justify your own blood-lust."  

"You are a brainwashed pawn in a game much bigger than your petty group of caped clowns. Look at the rate of population growth! How many billions of people live in their own filth? How many square miles of rainforst have been bulldozed for McBullshit burgers? How long do you really think we can keep this up?

"Our science has the solutions! We can live sustainably!"  

"No. We cannot. Not on the path we are on. Whatever discoveries are made will be squandered away, utilized to generate profit here and suffering elsewhere."  

"Have you no faith in humanity? We put men on the moon, we can accomplish anything!"  

"And then bombed innocent Asian countries into dust. Why do you justify their crimes while condemning mine?"  

"Well... no one is perfect, everyone makes mistakes. But you are purely evil."  

"I may get joy from taking lives, but I do what is necessary, for the greater good. With your help we can save the Earth from ourselves."  

"You are a monster. I won't join you."  

"I am not asking you to join me, just to understand, and play your role. If you stop me, you are condemning this planet to a fate far worse than my wrath. I need you to fight me, at least publicly."   

"Do you see it now?", Verminus concluded,  "The people need their champion, and the world needs it's villain."   
 |-| 
|-| cob3ypb || 6 || "A century, my dear. You've had a century to think about it. Hasn't it been long enough?"

Adrenaline pumped through me, ignited me. My heart thumped in my ears as my eyes shifted from side to side, looking for a way out. Looking for an exit. Looking for an excuse to do anything, other than look into his eyes. 

I hadn't realized that it had been that long. Time passes differently for my people. Like the bond-trees we tended peacefully, deep in Golden Oak forest that we had hoped had been lost to time, we tended to sprout quickly and spend hundreds of years reaching maturity until our host tree died and we soon withered alongside it.
One gets to view the world very differently when there are so many years at your disposal and everything around you ages as slowly as you do. 

One's view tended to change in a hurry, once it was ripped away.

"A thousand years would not be enough time to begin to forget the massacre you brought to my people, about how you betrayed me!"

I resisted the urge to spit at his feet as he chuckled, deep and long, approaching carefully. 

"Your people were crushing us. What could I do?" 
His tone, sweet as honey, wore at me. It had haunted my dreams for a hundred years, echoing his shouts on the battlefield as he ordered the Golden Oaks to be cut and burned. As he ordered the death of hundreds of my family and friends. As he said my name.
"You pushed us to the way side to suffer in the shade. Took the light for yourselves, grew strong on lifeblood that should have been ours by right. You had no right to put down your roots there. What would you have me do, simply let my people rot in the darkness?"

His scent enveloped me as he closed the distance between us. There was truly nowhere to run now. Curiously, I didn't smell the intoxicating rot that I had come to expect. I smelled moss, and a deep, deep green. 

Clenching my jaw, I tried to stoke the fires of my anger. 

"Your people were corrupting us, spreading rot and disease!"

He sighed deeply.

"That's what they told you. There were a lot of stories about what started the wars. Lots of talk about how we wrested your lands from you and tempted your people to a darkness they'd never known. But those stories were all lies." 
He lifted my chin gently, forcing me to meet his gaze. My golden eyes to his green. 
"You are young. You did not see what happened. I did."

His words dampened any fire that still burned within me in an instant. He was right; I had had a century to think about it. A hundred years to dissect all the stories my loremaster had taught me as a child. A hundred years to sow doubt and tend it well, alone on the fringes of societies that didn't even have a name for my people anymore as I ran from him. As I ran from what he had started, and how it made me feel. 
As I ran from how he made me feel. 

"I-"

He kissed me, stopping any words I may have had before they could be given life. 

I should have felt repulsed, but didn't. Should have pulled away but couldn't. Countless years of fear and of loneliness, of doubt and hatred melted away as I felt his sway over me growing, completing.

Looking down at me, he smiled. I no longer cared if I could see a genuine warmth behind his eyes, or if they were lit only with lies. 

"Come."

And I was his.



 |-| 
|-| cob8xws || 5 || "You know they don't actually like you, right?"  the villain spoke softly, not turning from his control panel.

The hero, straightened up and stepped boldly around the corner, no longer bothering to sneak.  "Who would that be?" he asked, trying to sound casual.

"The sniveling fools that you're here to save, of course.  The drooling masses that cheer so hard when you save the day."  Dr. Lightner, aka Black Lighter, turned to face his nemesis.  "They're jealous of you, they want you to fail.  Too much success breeds contempt you know.  Look at the sports teams that 'always' win the championships.  Everyone hates them. You're just another victim of your own success.  And they'll turn on you eventually." 

He knew he was wasting his time.  White Streak never even seemed to listen to him anymore.  He wouldn't even bother explaining himself this time.  This time, he only needed to stall for a few seconds.  The machine only needed a few more seconds to power up, then he could hit the start button, then it wouldn't matter.  The machine would start, and nothing short of a nuke could stop it.

This time, however, White Streak stopped, with an odd look on his face.  "I'd never thought of it that way.  Maybe that's why the crowds have been getting smaller at the victory ceremonies.  Heck, I went to a coffee shop in uniform the other day, and I had to buy my own coffee."

The White Streak's words trailed off.  He stood with a thoughtful look on his face.  Confused, but sensing a chance, Dr. Lightner stepped closer.  "They'll turn on you eventually.  And all of your strength, speed, and intelligence won't help you.  No amount of super power is enough to stem the tide of public opinion.  As soon as the people decide they hate you, you'll be a pariah, an outcast."

"You're right, Dr."  The now sullen hero said.  "But what do I do about it?"

"Join me, of course."  It was as though he'd been leading up to this from the beginning, although it had just occurred to him.  "This machine behind me will generate energy forever.  It will do so with minimal pollution, and at virtually no cost.  I've had to develop it on my own, without help, because everyone who was likely able to help is under the thumb of the energy companies.  

I'm not trying to destroy the world, I never have.  This is the ultimate goal of everything I've ever done.  Heck, you've never really defeated me.  Ultimately, every device, every potential weapon, everything I've ever built has been testing some theory building up to this machine.  Every defeat you've dealt me has given me knowledge, sharpened my understanding, taken me a step closer to this."

Standing up to his full height, which was only slightly more the top of the now-slumping hero's head, Black Lighter smiled.  "But join with me, and we will both win.  My machine will start generating energy, which can be converted to electricity, and provided to people throughout the city for little to no charge.  You can stop anyone else from shutting me down.  We can do this together, for all those annoying twits.  And who cares what they think.  When we control the power, public opinion won't matter."

White Streak stood silent for a moment.  Then, "There's just one thing.  I promised the governor that I would save his daughter, and I can't go back on my word."

He stood straight then.  "Give me the girl, and I will join you.  We will provide free electricity to the people of this city.  But I'll have my eye on you.  If your ego gets in the way, I WILL crush it."

The two men stared into each other's eyes.  After a moment, they both nodded.  With a smile, Lightner turned away.

"Wait here, I'll bring the girl out.  You can turn her over to the police that I'm sure are waiting outside." 

After he disappeared through a side door, White Streak stepped up to the control panel.  After a quick inspection, he made a few adjustments, and watched the now unprotected machine fuse itself into eternal uselessness. |-| 
|-| cobc999 || 4 || The setting sun nearly touched the horizon. It sank, slowly, but still brightly shined, bathing every statue on Easter Island in a peculiar orange sunlight. 

It was not often He and Lucifer met -- establishing a neutral location was difficult enough -- but even the most polar of opposites must meet under the appropriate circumstances. It was the first time they had met since Job. Yet the subject was similar; only on a much larger scale. 

"Yahweh," Lucifer started, "You and I both know that the time has come. Delaying this only reduces your planet's potential."

He did not give an answer.

"Now, you're probably wondering why I requested to meet you here. The reason is simple, and quite telling. As you know, these moai statues here did not simply rise from the Earth on their own. They were created. And rather recklessly, I should add. The humans here depleted their resources in this habitat in order to create them. The sunset, 'pretty' as it is, is only so visible because the timber is gone -- and with it, the fauna. These humans were so obsessive that instead of using the timber to build a vessel to find more resources, they used it to move the statues about their dying island."

He did not respond.

"...as a result, the large majority of them starved to death. Victims of their own stupidity. Yahweh, it's time to put these poor fools out of their misery. Almost any sort of mass extinction is more humane than starvation, and your followers are getting dangerously close to reaching Earth's carrying capacity. The planet still has plenty of water and resources for wonderful life, but if you continue to wait, the planet will die too, and creating more life in another galaxy would be a much more arduous task than starting over here, where we already have the resources."

Still, He kept silent.

The top of the sun had now sank below the horizon as Lucifer ended his opening statements. The darkness coated the Island and the moai. The only light in sight resided in the night sky above. He turned His eyes towards the heavens, stared at the bright red spark, and turned to Lucifer.

Lucifer smiled.

"So, you've made your decision, have you? You've never let me ramble this long before."

He nodded.

Lucifer snapped his fingers as the two levitated off the deserted island into the stars. The ice caps disappeared almost instantly, and the big blue blanket that resulted served its purpose. The time to sleep had finally come.  
 |-| 
|-| cob4a4j || 3 || Porpoise Man thought this was going to be easy. He already knew what the evil Doctor Orca was up to, or so he thought...

PM broke into the lair of DO and they engage in a very heavy battle. It ends with DO pinning PM to a wall.

"Do you even have any idea what I'm planning!?" Doctor Orca spat in a high pitched, raspy voice.

"You were going to blow the damned dam and damage the docks!"

"No you fool! I was going to become more powerful!"

"How exactly do you plan to do that!?"

Doctor Orca laughed hysterically as he pulled a lever on the wall behind him. There was a large flash of white light. As the temporary blindness faded, Porpoise Man looked around only to discover to his horror that he had successfully been fused to Doctor Orca's left side.  |-| 
|-| cob0dqp || 4 || She stared at him with such an intensity that one wonders how her eye's didn't bore through his, into his skull, through the squishy bits, and then out the other side. Equine-ox had the young lady bound to a pillar in the middle of an open field. The master villain was one of the swiftest, striking twice a year with masterful heists. He had made a reputation for himself and many enemies along the way.  Millie was one of those enemies. Equine-ox, the self-proclaimed lord of the sun and horses, had destroyed her livelihood. His actions had torn her world apart and she had waited all year for him to re-emerge so she could give him a piece of her mind. Her hastily crafted plan (which had seemed so foolproof) had led her to her current situation.

"It really is a reasonable offer, I wish you would consider it." His voice was pitched higher than seemed natural for his tall, muscular build. Dusk was coming fast, the evening light enhancing the red and browns of his costume, blending him into the sunset and horizon.

"You ruined everything. You took away my whole business!" Muscles in her arms strained as she lifted herself a little higher, proudly standing against the man who had torn her life apart. 

"I did what was right!" Anger had finally entered his voice, forcing out the calm he had previously maintained. Dust scattered as he stamped his foot, until he slowly regained his composure. "Besides," he said more calmly, "what I am offering is to replace everything I took and more."

She didn't respond so he continued, "Mankind may approve of the enslavement of creatures but I will not permit it. Especially for entertainment purposes. Your ranch was responsible for atrocities the likes of which I can hardly speak of. While the world may call me a terrorist, a villain, I know myself to be a hero. I free the enslaved and right their wrongs. I provide vengeance and justice." He was strutting at this point, pacing back and forth like many of the race horses she had once raised. 

"I don't understand why you would offer this to me."

"Because you are not a terrible person." Gently, he placed a gloved hand against her cheek. "You were raised to behave the way you did, doing what your parents had done before you. And their parents before them. Underneath all of that, you do actually care for each of these creatures, though you abused them."

The whinny of his voice was melodic to her, a salve that eased her pain. She wanted to hate him, but he was making it difficult. Not knowing what to do, she cast around in her memories trying to find some moment from the past that could help. Unfortunately, she had never been bound to a pole in the middle of a field before and she gave up the search.

"The sun is fading fast and when it goes so will I. You will be left alone to die, so answer me now."

In moments of great peril time will seem to slow down or even stop, giving a person time to think and react to their predicament. Time was not being as helpful for Millie. She stared for seconds that felt like seconds instead of an eternity. The wind blew the grass and the dandelions around her and whipped her dress about her legs, all at normal speed. There was nothing she could do.

"Fine." 

As the sun set, he slipped his arm around her waist.

"So it's settled, we'll get married next week."

And with that, the sunset took them both. |-| 
|-| cob55fp || 3 || "Luke, I am your father," Darth Vader's voice echoed.

"Well that's great, but who is my mother," replied Luke.

"Hahah child, I will tell you in due time....,but first you must join the Dark Side," Darth Vader's voice echoed, yet again.

Luke took a quick look at the pit beside him. After cautiously surveying the pit, he came to a conclusion that the drop was a couple hundred feet down.  "And..And... What stops me from jumping down this 100 foot pit," Luke responded. 

"Well for starters, I just chopped off your hand, so I wouldn't recommend jumping down a 100 foot pit. It isn't like there is a handle bar down there, which you can hold onto to. Not to mention, even if you managed to survive, there is a very likely chance, that you will lose that 200 credit lightsaber. And I would hate to see that happen, especially since it is brand new and I hear they don't sell them in blue anymore," Darth Vader's voice crackled. 

Once again Luke took a quick glance at the pit. " I guess you are right," Luke sighed. 

"C'mon son walk with me. You made a very good choice today. After all, the Dark Side has  cookies. And I think someone over here could really enjoy a snickerdoodle." |-| 
|-| cob00nr || -4 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cobcc45 || 179 || He shuffled into the bank, just like he always did, just after lunch. He usually would head to the candy bowl, empty it into his pocket and then linger by the door for a little bit. The tellers didn’t mind him, he just stood there, never said anything, just ate the hard candy’s out of his pocket.  Lionel, from the business lending department said that he’s seen the guy down at the VA hospital. Said that he heard the guy was a war hero. It was hard to see a war hero under the layers of dirty jackets and mismatched tennis shoes. 


But the candy bowl was empty today. It had been Sheera’s responsibility to refill it and she had been out sick with a cold. He stood at the deposit desk, looking lost. He picked up the empty bowl and looked at it, as if in disbelief that the bowl was empty. He shifted his weight from one foot to the other and then mumbled to himself. He picked up a deposit slip and then one of the pens from the cup in the middle. The bank didn’t chain the pens to the table, instead offering a cup of pens in the center of the deposit desk and encouraging their customers to take one.  The homeless man tucked a pen into his pocket, and grabbed a handful more, tucking them as well into a pocket. He carefully took one more pen from the cup and wrote a message on the deposit slip. He crumpled the note in his left hand, and then for good measure, carefully put the pen back into the cup. 


Most of the bank just ignored him. He was a fixture on the sidewalk outside, and the regular customer sand staff knew he would shuffle off down the sidewalk after a few minutes of hanging out. Every once in a while he would ask to use their bathroom, and they would remind him that the bathroom was for staff only, however the McDonalds down the street had public restrooms. He always thanked them, his thank you’s coming out muffled by his matted beard, and walked off. 


But today was different. It was cold outside, the type of cold that settled around you like a blanket, and then seemed to pass through you. He was shivering as he stood by the deposit desk, tightly grasping the note. His knuckles were red and raw, he had no gloves. He slowly approached the teller, always looking down at the ground, never looking up. 


“How can I help you today sir?” She knew he didn’t have an account at the bank, and probably didn’t have anything to deposit. She wrinkled her nose at the smell, but smiled and greeted him because her training had instructed her to greet every single person the same way. 


“^^Sorry ” He muttered and handed her the deposit slip. 
The deposit slip had a note written:   
*I’m sorry, this is a robbery. Please put some money in a bag for me. I have a gun.*  
The teller shook her head and smiled at the man.  
“Are you sure you want to do this sir?”  
Before he could respond, the front door burst open. A couple came rushing in a man in a Hawaiian shirt and woman with short red hair, each with weapons drawn:  
“Everybody be cool, this is a robbery!” The man in the Hawaiian shirt shouted  
“Ante-up you fucking pricks, I’ll execute every last one of you!” The woman in the red hair screamed.

To show their mettle, the woman shot the security guard in the chest; he was thrown backwards from the impact and landed in a heap on the floor. His bullet proof vest stopped the bullet, but he still he struggled to breath. 

“All the tellers, hands in the air, there will be no heroes here today!” The man barked, waving his gun around. 

“Seriously, I am sick to death of heroes, I’ll shoot the first hero I see!”  The woman shrilly followed. They seemed to have practiced; the man went from customer to customer collecting valuables, wallets, jewelry, cell phones, while the woman walked calmly to the tellers demanding cash from each one in turn.  

The man and the woman converged on the teller where the homeless man stood. He still stared at the floor and the man sniffed in disgust.  

“You got any cash on you old man?”  

“Hah” the woman replied “He barely even has shoes, you really going to rob a homeless man?”  

“I steal from everybody equally honey bunny” He turned his gun towards the homeless man “Empty your fucking pockets.” The homeless man slowly started emptying his pockets, his pants pockets held some string, a few quarters, and a lighter. 


“What about your jacket pockets, those too”   

The homeless man mumbled into his beard.   


“Look, I gave a homeless guy ten bucks last week, so I know you people get cash, so give it up”  


The man reached into his jacket and pulled out the handful of pens.  


“Hah, look at this honey bunny, this guy is robbing the bank too!” The Hawaiian shirt man held up a few of the pens. 


The bank cameras recorded at 200 frames per second, but even they barely captured what happened next. One second the Hawaiian shirt man was mocking the homeless vet for stealing pens and the next second he was lying on the floor, a pen impaled in his neck. The homeless man in a flash had stabbed the Hawaiian shirt man in the neck, taken his gun and spun around to face the woman, who was now screaming. The woman grabbed teller and pressed the gun to her temple.  


“No fucking heroes man put the gun down or I will shoot this teller!” Her voice was shaky, she had lost control of the situation, and her partner lay dying on the floor.  

The homeless man did not hesitate. He simply raised his arm, sighted down the barrel and shot the woman through her right eye. Then he dropped the gun, as if it had burned him, sat down cross legged on the floor and cried.  

 |-| 
|-| cobdlhy || 44 || Fresh snow fell around Idaho deVoos in his alley.  Hunger and cold competed for his attention.  He restlessly focused on one discomfort, then the other.  He growled softly.  *No*, he said to himself, *Think positive*.

His puffy green Communist Party overcoat cushioned his hip and shoulder against the pavement.  He was grateful for that, at least.  But he hated sleeping with shoes on.  Tying them tighter didn’t make him warm, he knew that, but he couldn’t help trying.  And he didn’t know when to stop tightening.  Sometimes the world just pushes you.  You think you’re tough, you think you’re a rock, but then a glacier comes and there’s nowhere else to go but the wall.

He lashed his foot out in frustration.  It crashed into the sad gray dumpster, dislodging a trash bag from the top.

The bag’s contents spilled out towards him, scented with mold and decay.  Idaho deVoos’ eyes reddened at the strewn garbage.

But then he saw something.  Something valuable.

It was a USB drive.

His gnarly blackened fingers snatched the USB drive off the ground and secured it somewhere inside his tangle of twine harnesses and overflowing pockets.  This meant money.  Food.  Chicken with barbecue sauce and brown rice and cornbread and broccoli with cheddar and red velvet cake and coffee with cream.

A warm smile grew on his face.  The gray tinge on the fresh-fallen snow turned blue.  The sun was rising.

Idaho deVoos rose, dusting snow off his coat.

He paced the streets, looking for an open business, any business.  Nothing yet.  *Not to worry,* he told himself, *keep moving.  Warms you up*.

He came upon a Wells Fargo.  Dozens of suits and blouses shuffled about inside, hanging up phones and typing on computers.

Computers!

Idaho deVoos rushed inside, holding the USB drive aloft and grinning wildly.

Bill, the home-loan officer stared through his open office door at the spectacle.  He jumped to his feet and strode into the lobby, his salesman’s smile forgotten at his desk.

“Are you a customer?” Bill said curtly.  A bejeweled, droopy-jowled lady in the teller line turned her head to witness the exchange.

Idaho gaped at Bill, showing missing teeth.  

“What’s your business here?” Bill said, trying to lower his volume.  He turned his back towards the customers in the teller line, hoping to block their view.

“This,” Idaho said simply.  He held up the USB drive.

“You want to put that in your safety deposit box?” Bill said, relaxing.

“Nope,” Idaho said.  “It’s for you.”

“You keep it,” Bill said, eyeing the dumpster USB-stick warily.  “If you don’t have any further business here, I’m going to have to ask you to leave.  Sir.”

Bill gestured towards the door.

Idaho shook his head.  He shook his whole body.  *No.  No, he wouldn’t leave.
He had his foot in the door.  He had his whole body in the lobby!  No way was he going to lose this sale.*

“It works,” Idaho said, “It does!  Watch.”

With surprising deftness, Idaho juked around Bill and dashed into his office.

“Wait!” Bill shouted.  The entire line of customers turned to look at him.  The tellers behind the counter raised their eyebrows at him.

“Damn,” Bill said under his breath.  Idaho was already in his office.  Thinking quickly, Bill decided to contain the situation.  He’d lock Idaho inside his office, and then get security to handle the rest.  Discreetly.

He turned the key.  Idaho was locked inside.  Bill scurried off to the branch manager’s office to explain and call security.

“You what!?” the branch manager said.

“I contained the situation,” Bill said.

“That’s crazy,” the branch manager said.

“I had no choice,” Bill said, “Mrs. Baggybottom was in the lobby.  Making her weekly deposit.  She seemed a bit disturbed by the fellow, and---”

“Dear Lord,” the branch manager said, “Mrs. Baggybottom saw?”  He began to massage his temples.  Mrs. Baggybottom was their biggest single depositor.  And the pickiest, snottiest, most pompous, blob of a human around.  They couldn’t afford to lose her business.  And yet it seemed they were always on the brink of doing so.  Just last week, she had threatened to change banks based on the admittedly limited lollipop flavor selection in the teller’s candy baskets.

“Very well,” the branch manager said.  “You did good.  Let’s wait until Baggybottom leaves, then get him out of there.”

Bill nodded.

“Any idea why he came in here in the first place?” the branch manager asked.

“I dunno,” Bill said, “He was waving around a USB drive.”

“A USB drive?” the branch manager said, panicking. “Does he still have it?”

“Um,” Bill said, his brow furrowing, “Yes?”

“What!?” the branch manager jumped to his feet, knocking papers off his desk.  “You let a man with a USB drive into your office?  Where your computer is!?”

Bill stood mute.

“Jesus,” the branch manager said, “At least tell me it was turned off.  Or signed out.”

Bill hung his head.

“DAMMIT!” the branch manager shrieked.  He threw his fountain pen at the wall, where it exploded into a Rorschach inkblot of immediate termination without severance pay, followed by divorce and sleeping in alleyways.

He paced around his office, thinking quickly.  He straightened up.  

“There’s only one way to handle this,” he said.  He grabbed a Trader Joe’s reusable shopping bag from his office closet.  “Cynthia!” he shouted, “Vault me!”

“Right away sir,” Cynthia said, quickly closing out of Facebook and standing up from her swivel chair.  She waddled back to the vault room and keyed in her personal code.  The branch manager followed her inside, then pressed his eye into the retinal scanner.

With a pneumatic hiss, the vault’s 10-inch thick chrome door inched open.  The manager disappeared into the vault and re-emerged with his Trader Joe’s bag bulging with money.

He strode into the lobby.  Mrs. Baggybottom was still there.  She was staring at him the way a fat, slow cheetah stares at a slab of gazelle steak at the grocery store.

“Lovely to see you Mrs. Baggybottom,” the branch manager said, with a forced smile.

“Lots of commotion today,” Mrs. Baggybottom said disapprovingly.  “I was under the impression that this was a bank, not a--”

“Next please,” the teller at counter #4 said brightly.

Mrs. Baggybottom turned towards the teller.  She eyed the candy basket.

“Ooh!” Baggybottom said in a girlish voice, “Tootsie-pops!  My favorite!”

The branch manager seized the opportunity.  He shoved Bill’s key into the lock and entered the room, quickly locking the door behind him.

Idaho deVoos sat in Bill’s swivel chair.  He looked up as the branch manager entered.

“Please,” the branch manager said.  He held out the Trader Joe’s bag, overflowing with money.  “Let’s make a deal.”

Idaho deVoos looked up at him in confusion.  He had expected five dollars for the USB stick, possibly six.  Apparently he had greatly underestimated its value.

“Please,” the branch manager said, “Just stop whatever you’re doing.  Undo whatever you’ve done.”  He set the bag of money on Bill’s desk.

Idaho shrugged and popped the USB out of Bill’s computer.  He set it on the desk.  The branch manager snatched it quickly.  Idaho snatched the bag of money.

They both took deep breaths.

“I need you to do one more thing,” the branch manager said, his mind on Mrs. Baggybottom.

“What’s that?” Idaho said.

“I need you to leave... Through the window.” the branch manager said, cringing.

Idaho looked out the window.  One-story building.  He’d done higher.  It was an odd request, to be sure, but successful salespeople retain their clients by going above and beyond.

“Very well,” Idaho said, opening the window.  He smiled and climbed out.  What a weird customer.  All the rich ones were, it seemed.

Once outside, he waved towards the branch manager.  “Pleasure doing business,” Idaho said. |-| 
|-| cob2qb0 || 42 || A mass of matted and dirty blonde hair, at least three weeks of stubble, and a horrible smell of the streets walked into a bank. My bank. On my shift. Awesome.

Every now and then this happens. Someone comes in looking like they were born and bred underneath the pavement walks to the branch and starts harassing the customers. Usually for change. Sometimes he starts going off about the banks destroying the world or something something I don't usually listen to that part.  I was getting ready to push the silent alarm when he got in line behind the retired teacher looking to cash his social security check. 

That was new. 

He waited patiently while the young couple at the front took twenty minutes to close their account. Low funds, or something like that. And waited again for the retiree to cash his single social security check. 

He got up to the counter. To my counter. Awesome. 

"Can I help you?" I asked as per my Norwestern Credit script

He didn't look at me, but I could see one of his eyes was bloodshot red and it looked like he was recovering from an old bruise. 

"^^This ^^is ^^a ^^robbery", he mumbled. 

"Excuse me sir?" I asked, having genuinely not heard him.

He snuffled, and a tear fell down onto the counter. "This...is...a[sniff]...robbery...". He looked up at me, trying to put on the angriest robber face he could, snarling at me with a mouth that missed quite a number of teeth. 

And then he started to cry. He tried his best to hold the tears back, but they came down in a steady stream. 

"Please call the police and arrest me," he said inbetween shaking sobs. "I'm trying to rob you but I don't want to hurt anyone. Please have them send me to jail. You'll do me a great kindness, sir." 

So I did what any human being would do. I hit the button, reached over the counter, and held him as he sobbed in my arms until the police came. 

I don't think I'll ever get the smell out of that uniform... |-| 
|-| cobcjgt || 9 || She looks young. Real young. Fresh outta college, I think.

I step up to the counter, walkin’ past another down-on-his-luck fella. I’m hopin’ that she doesn’t have some kinda heart condition or somethin’. This next part’s gonna be a real doozie, but a man has to eat.

I pull the paper out of my pocket and slide it over to her. She takes a look at it and then looks at me all calm-like. That’s not quite what I’m lookin’ for, though. I fidget at something in my pocket and I can see her face change. 

It’s just a water gun. It was in a dumpster on Monroe street, by that new dollar store. Sure does the trick, though.

She pulls a bag out, all quiet, and I’m sure I see her hand graze a switch or somethin’ under the counter. Perfect. 

I take the bag and turn around. I walk past that other guy, pushing him out of the way, and then continue toward the door. I hear sirens and I smile, but not too big. 

They search me, but can’t find anything. 

A free meal is a free meal. When I get out, the money won't be bad, either.
 |-| 
|-| cobctot || 6 || I didn't want to do it. But I also didn't want to be stuck on the streets forever. A bank robbery was definitely my only way out. The ticket to a place that I can stay.

It was a sunny day, and the birds were singing. I got my little Swiss Army knife ready to go and stuck it in the only pocket my jacket had. I headed down to the bank that was down on 49th and 50th.

As soon as I walked in I felt like everybody looked at me. Whys this homeless piece of shit walking in here? Surely I didn't have money to deposit or withdrawal.

I get in line and begin waiting. This is when things started going wrong. There was a man, about 35,in front of me in line. He looked very put together, and very nice. Something about him was off though. He kept looking around as if he was expecting somebody, or expecting something to happen. 

We both get called to a teller at the same time, as both became available simoutainesly. I go up there and whisper "this is a robbery. don't make any sudden moves" and flash my knife. The teller got a horrific look on her face, but she wasn't looking at me. She was looking at the man who was in front of me in line, who now has two guns out. One pointed at his teller, an one at the lone security guard. Thinking fast, I piggyback on this guys robbery in hopes of getting more time. I shout "everybody down, this is a robbery" and everyone drops.

He looks at me like I'm crazy, and I pull out my knife. He quickly realizes I may be of use, and tells me to start gathering cash and throws me a bag. As he is getting everybody in the bathroom, I am gathering all the cash I can. He quickly comes out and tells me we gotta get out of here. Thinking there's no way we can get out of this, we quickly run out and I follow him into a big black van.

We start counting the cash and it turns out we pulled in 300k$. I am in dis belief. He takes me back to his house, a giant mansion, and we begin watching the news. It turns out he planned this out so well that nobody has any idea who we were, and he slit the throats of everyone who he left I the bathroom. They begin calling it the "Greatest Heist". We called it our first heist. |-| 
|-| cobg7g6 || 6 || As the sound of sirens grew louder, I felt the weight of the last hour slip from my shoulders. I had spent the last 10 minutes hoping to all hell that one of the employees had pressed the silent alarm under their teller’s desk. The sweat moistening my palm was making this unloaded .45 difficult to grasp. For christ’s sake, I’d even turned my back on the tellers for a full minute to give them the chance to press the alarm without fear of being caught by me. 

These hostages must think I’m the worst bank robber of all time. 

Who in their right mind holds up a bank in the middle of the day by themselves?

Who in their right mind takes money from only one of the available tellers?
	
Clearly, someone who didn’t plan this whole thing out very well. If only they knew I didn’t want the money. In all honesty, it’s a little concerning to see how quickly a bank employee will give away someone else’s money to a mad man with an unloaded gun. 
	

Do I look scary? I certainly don’t feel scary. I just feel hungry. And tired. I hope to God the police get in here soon.
	

“This is the NYPD. Come out with your hands up!”
	

It’s almost as if they heard my prayers. Now, this is the easy part. This is what I’ve been waiting for. Without a second thought, I slid the .45 between my belt loop and my dirty, ripped jeans. The things barely even fit me. At least in prison I’ll get some new clothes. As I approached the doors of the bank, the hostages began to murmur. 
	
“That’s it?” they whispered. It’s almost as if they had hoped for something. Folks will do anything to be recognized these days.
	
Turning around, I forced the front door open with my backside, making sure not to move my hands from my head. So close, I thought. No point in getting shot now.
	
A sense of calming settled on me as the sunlight hit my face. No more cold nights. No more days spent scrounging for a bite to eat. No more worrying I’ll be jumped in the middle of the night. No more dirty-
	
A shot rang out from the street behind me, violently pulling me out of my reverie.

No! I’m not resisting! Why are they firing?
	
When the impact didn’t come, my confusion was fought off by relief. Still alive.

More shots sounded. Multiple shooters. The street had turned into a warzone.
	
A body slammed into mine, dragging me to the ground. 

“Don’t move. We’re getting you out of here.”

“Thank god. I have a pistol on my belt. I don’t want a lawyer. Just take me in.” I whispered. 
	
“I’m not the police, buddy.” The man turned me over and his dark, brooding eyes met mine. “We could use someone like you, though.”
	
Before I could even register what was happening, I was on my feet, being pulled to a van parked at the side of the bank. Bullets flew by and the sound of the NYPD’s yells echoed in my ears. As we reached the van, the man threw me forward and I found myself face first in the back. My knee was pretty knocked up from the impact.
	
“Look, I’m not sure what you were trying to pull back there”, the man said. “But, finding a decent criminal in this city is getting harder and harder each year. My crew and I were about to hit that bank before you blundered in there and drew the entire police force down around us.” 
	
The man looked tired and angry, but cracked a smile as he began to speak again.
	
“I’m Falco Meroni. You may have heard of me. They like to call me the Falcon on the News.” He snickered. “Fuckin’ nicknames, man. Once some asshole on the 5 o’clock news decides your name isn’t good enough, everyone and their mother is calling you by some pansy alias and making you sound like a massive douchebag.”
	
I hadn’t spoken yet. I still wasn’t sure what was happening.
	
“You’re sticking with us from now on. We could use someone with balls like you.”

**Three Months Later…
**
	
I’d been with Falco’s crew for a few months now. They’d “trained” me in their protocol for a perfect bank robbery. I’ll admit, they knew their stuff. I’d nodded, smiled, and listened...tried to blend in as best I could. Even though I had food and somewhere to sleep, this wasn’t the life I wanted. Rival crews picked off a few of our members each month. Last week, Robby O’Halleran’s crew had thrown a molotov into our warehouse in the middle of the night. If being woken up by a drunk on the street was bad, waking up to a burning building is my nightmare. 

This wasn’t the life I wanted.

I needed out.

	
Today was the first heist Falco was taking me on. It was perfectly planned. In and out, no casualties. So far, things had gone according to plan. The money was in the bags and we were preparing for extraction. The two other guys on our crew, Donnie and George, were waiting around back for our driver. The sound of sirens blared from the street outside the front of the bank.
	
This was it.
	
This was my chance.
	
I walked slowly towards Falco, my finger twitching on the trigger of the .45 in my sweaty palms. Falco had his back to me while he dealt with a distraught hostage. 
	

This was it.
	
I can do this.
	
I raised the pistol, feeling the weight of it pull on my arm as it gravitated away from my hip and toward the back of Falco’s head.
	
The muzzle came to rest at the top of his neck.
	
“Trev?”
	
I didn’t answer. 
	
He started to turn and I pushed the pistol harder against his skin.
	
“Don’t move.” I broke my silence
	
“What the fuck are you doing, man?! This is almost ov-”
	
I pulled the trigger and everything happened all at once.
	
The quick, sharp sound of the shot was replaced with a ringing in my ears. 
	
Blood and brains shot from the front of Falco’s head, propelled forward by the force of the bullet that had pierced his skull and continued on through the other side.
	
The vibrant reds and pinks splattered onto the floor, creating a pattern that could have easily passed as part of a Rorscach test.
	
I stood, dumbfounded, staring at the interior of Falco’s head as his body fell.
	
The sound of Donnie and George screaming brought me out of my stupor. 
	
The two men ran from the back of the store, lifting their guns to fire at me. 
	
I didn’t need to think twice. I ran for the door at the front of the bank and flung myself into the street. The yells of the cops rose to a cacophony as guns and spotlights all aimed themselves on my body, lying prone on the ground with my hands clasped tight behind my head. My pistol lay a few feet in front of me. 
	
I had done it.
	
They’d surely take me now.
	
Donnie and Georgie burst through the door behind me, guns drawn and pointed at the street. Before they could even holster their weapons, two bullets took each of them in the head, fired from the sniper across the street.
	
I’d finally made it.
	
The cops surrounded me and my face was forcefully pushed against the cold concrete.
	
It’s about time.
	
Pain surged through my arm as the cuffs were placed on my wrists, closed much too tightly.
	
The next few moments passed in a blur.  Sitting in the back of the cruiser, I finally felt myself smile for the first time in as long as I could remember. 
	
I was going to someplace better.
	
No more cold nights. No more days spent scrounging for a bite to eat. No more worrying I’ll be jumped in the middle of the night. No more killing. No more robbery.
	
“You’re pretty notorious in this city, you know?” The cop in the front seat turned his head back towards me in the way that most drivers do when speaking to someone in the back seat: not far enough to make eye contact, but far enough to not be looking at the road.
	
I didn’t answer him.
	
“You’ve been on the most wanted list for months now. A successful robbery ending in a bloodbath in the streets.” He glanced back to the road, and then back towards me. 
	
“A lot of cops died that day.” There was a hint of resentment in his voice.
	
The officer looked back towards the road in time to see a pedestrian run out in front of the cruiser. He swore, swerved, and pointed our vehicle towards the railing of the bridge we’d been crossing at that moment.
	
There was a moment of weightlessness before we hit the ground below. My head snapped towards the seat in front of me. There was a brief instant of excruciating pain and everything went dark.

	
I awoke to biting cold on my face. The ramblings of a drunk man down the street. An aching in my stomach.
	
“You’re awake!” An unfamiliar voice spoke out in the darkness. “Jesus. I thought you’d never wake up. I pulled you from that car down there. The cop was dead, but you were still breathing. I’m sure you’ve done something wrong, and that’s why you deserved to be in that car, but I ain’t the law and it ain’t my problem. I couldn’t let you die down there.”
	
He stopped speaking for a moment and my eyes began to adjust.
	
“Now that you’re awake, I want you to leave.”
	
It was night. I could barely make out his silhouette against the stairwell he sat in.
	
“I’ve let you stay here for a day or so, but now that you’re awake, I don’t want no trouble.”
	
I pushed myself up from the ground, my body voicing its complaints with aches and pains.
	
When I got to my feet, I didn’t say anything to the man who had rescued me. He wanted me to leave, and the least I could do was respect his wishes. I left slowly, limping towards the light at the end of the alleyway he had made home. 
	
I walked for what seemed like miles. The cold air and the hunger in my stomach dominated any thoughts that crept into my mind. The events of the past few months flitted in and out of my brain, constantly battling with the insatiable cravings my body put forth. 
	
As I reached the street corner, something on the ground caught my eye. It was today’s newspaper, and my face was on the cover
		
***FALCO MARONI KILLED IN HEIST
UNIDENTIFIED MAN WANTED FOR MURDER AND THEFT
ARMED AND EXTREMELY DANGEROUS
***

	
I slumped against the wall, using the paper as a blanket.
	
All I wanted was a bite to eat. 
	
 |-| 
|-| cobiwhf || 5 || Pale pink ears bounce upwards and downwards, coal colored eyes staring ever forward, a small smile fixed upon their face. The two rabbits hop across the sleek, checkered surface, their tattered bodies in stark contrast to the gleaming opulence of the room they are crossing. From their backs arise rangy stalks peeking out of dingy, chestnut britches caked in filth and grime from the rough city streets. Residue from leaking trash bags soaked into the very fibers of the cotton, bathed in a mix of gasoline and rain, the smell wafts into the air stifling and choking all but the gaunt, hopeless man who lives in them. 

His hands fumble nervously, contorting in various ways as he mumbles to himself, cramming the erratic hands into the pockets of his jacket hanging on by a few threads of different colors. Straining the tenuous connections, he uses his hands to pull the jacket closer and higher around him, hoping to appear taller and slightly more intimidating as he advances forward to the marble counter. Several small lines of people begin to cough and heave, their eyes watering with each step that the man draws closer. Some turn slowly to see the source of this overwhelming odor while others abruptly leave the line to escape the fetid grasp.

Their eyes settle upon a man of reasonable stature cloaked in a dark blue jacket tightly wrapped around his thin frame, small flecks of dandruff and debris lightly dusted along the spotted surface, the edges of the coat sleeves and tail appear to be fraying heavily. His face is heavily burnt by the rays of the summer sun, shaded by the heavy wrinkles beaten into his forehead by time and conscience. The dark red face is smeared in mud, oil and ash like a suburban makeup applied heavily to his cheeks, pools of blood sagging beneath his deep brown eyes crying for a quiet peace in a warm bed. No semblance of a smile creeps across his down-turned face sprouting dirty gray stubble that trembles lightly as he reaches the desk.

A small young woman stands opposite the disheveled man, the spotless silver tag pinned firmly to her chest reads, “Laura”. He stares at the badge for a moment, lost in his own thoughts as the remaining customers further their distance and dissipate. The other tellers back away slowly, entering the back room quietly leaving her alone. His head slowly raises as thick, smoky strands fall from his shoulders to frame his face. A look of intense concentration and determination replaces his morose countenance as the inexperienced teller gulps and removes her hand from her nose for only a moment to speak.

“Can I help you?” Laura asks, hoping that the man will come to his senses and walk away. Her finger moves towards the red button below the ledge, resting lightly upon its surface as she awaits his response.

“T-This is a stick-up! Open the register and hand over your money, quickly!” he demands, his hand raising the right side of his jacket, gesturing as though he has a gun concealed in his pocket. “Hurry up! I don't have all day!” he insists, his cracking voice growing louder as he looks nervously around him.

“Sir, you don't have to do this, please” she begs, pressing the button repeatedly despite her uncertainty about his weapon. Seeing his rapidly shifting demeanor, she decides to trigger the silent alarm regardless, deeming the man a danger to himself and others as she slowly backs away from the counter.

“W-where are you going? I-if you d-d-don't h-hurry, I'm going to have to shoot. I-I'll use it! I swear!” he yells desperately as his eyes well with tears, dedicated entirely to the charade. He begins to shove his fingers forward in the pocket as threads slowly unravel, snapping and breaking one by one.

Laura begins to grow pale as her eyes widen, if she doesn't comply with his demands and he does have a gun, she could easily wind up dead. On the other hand, she could comply with his demands and he might choose to kill her anyway. She freezes with fear, her mind racing along the seemingly infinite number of possibilities as his shouts fall on deaf ears. He blurs into the background along with his words as she slowly closes herself off from the situation.

“What are you doing? Ma'am? Ma'am?! Can't you hear me?! I said this was a stick-up! I'm robbing you!” he says, slowly speaking his intentions to be certain that she understands what is taking place as small droplets of saliva fling from his dry, cracked lips and discolored teeth. “I-I said, don't make me use this!” he insists, gesturing once more as the pocket separates from the jacket entirely revealing his finger gun. Her coworkers peek through the windows at the situation as it unfolds, turning to one another in surprise and slight humor as his hand is shown.

As his fingers slip past the jacket, Laura returns to her senses seeing that his threat was only a bluff. She rushes forward to slap the button once more, before turning to run for the back area where her coworkers watched on. Her heart was racing as his arm stretched forward past the jacket and across the counter, aimed at her head. To their surprise, as his thumb collided with the barrel, a single shot rung out. It pierced Laura's skull as she fell sliding across the floor and stopping headfirst at the door. The robber dropped to his knees in disbelief, sobbing loudly as he stared at the empty gun.

“I-I didn't mean to. It was an accident, I swear. It was only my hand-It was only my hand!” he screamed repeatedly until the cops subdued and carried him away. “All I wanted was a place to sleep and food to eat!” he cried as the sirens and murmurs drowned him out. The mimicry man would go down in history as the strangest robber in history.

-035 |-| 
|-| cobbuyc || 118 || The first time I did it, I didn't noticed the change. All Mr. Paprikas said was "don't you ever do that pose again, do 
you hear me?" but he never explained why.

And the funny thing is, I was having the worst day, before doing that. The pose. And then, after it, a call from my boss, getting me 
away from work Sunday. At night, Douglas surprised me with dinner and my favorite movie.

I didn't think the two were related, though, no way.

The next day, Mr. Paprikas didn't show up for practice.

I decided to call it "inverted downward facing dog", because I didn't know the name of any other yoga positions by heart. It 
was just some random twisting and turning of the legs and arms, but oh, did it make me feel good.

On the second day, I got the promotion, and found fifty bucks in my jacket's pocket.

That, plus the overall feeling of well being. My God. It was great.

My arm the next day was a little more noticeably crooked. My legs a little arched. 

I didn't give it much thought. Not at the time.

Mr. Paprikas wouldn't return my calls, won't come back to practice.

I was doing it on my own now. The same position, that's it. I didn't even bother with other positions, or with trying to find a new instructor.

My new position was all I needed;

And every new day, a new string of good luck. Of good things, good fortune. 

Good karma.

The change in my body was so gradual, climbing and rising at the same proportion as the change in my luck, my 
general feeling of well-being.

It was a fair trade, I found out.

It claimed a price, like most things.

I knew when I woke up, feeling lovely as ever, after a night of practice (found a car space in front of work, got out 
of a boring dinner with my aunt), and I looked in the mirror, the meaning of it all.

Meaning karma, of course.

It gives, but it takes away, I think, staring at myself in horror.

The pose, the inverted facing whatever, it was hands intertwined between themselves, shoved between my legs 
and laid flat on the floor, right behind my ankles. The torso, twitched and spun 90 degrees, rested arched 
downwards, the head hovering a few inches from the ground, twisted back to front position.

This is how I was now, staring back at me.

Crumpled. Permanently.

I didn't feel it. It came little by little.

One day, a bonus at work.

The other, my favorite movie on the TV.

A third time, the kids getting an A in school. My favorite hotel, with a discount rate.

My husband surprising me with flowers.

My boss telling me I did a great job.

A new client. A nice dress.

I claw away in feet and hands closer to the mirror, mouth open in mid-scream.

I try to return to normal. To "uninverted-human-position".

Nothing.

Mr. Paprikas still won't return my call.

He left a message, though, my husband screams, from the living room.

In the answering machine, Mr. Paprika's voice, Douglas says, it's whispering to me, in a dead tone.

Karma is action, Mr. Paprikas says.

And reaction.

It gives and it take away.

I tumble back, spider-like, to the bed, and I start to cry.

My husband's voice comes from the living room once again.

We got into that restaurant that I love, tonight. No reservations. A spot just came up, Douglas says, in a happy tone. What are the odds? He asks, from the living room.

*Positive thoughts*, I guess.

*Good karma.*

______________

*Thank you for reading! Check out more of my stuff in the subreddit I just made, /r/psycho_alpaca! =)*

 |-| 
|-| cobkvfu || 22 || Take your pinky, ring, and middle fingers of both hands and interlace them so that they form a flat plane. Next, rotate your hands so that your pinkies are facing directly away from you while your index fingers and thumbs point at your face. Curl your index fingers into two semi-circles and rest them on the middle finger closest to your face. The tip of each index finger should be as near as possible to the knuckles of the previously mentioned middle finger. Those are the eyes. Overlap one thumb with the other, up to the first knuckle, and pretend the two are tied together with a piece of string. That's the mouth. You have successfully made a face with your hands. Feel free to talk to it if you want. 

There are many different ways to create a face with your hands. Some are funny or melancholy, old or young, sardonic or honest. You can twist your fingers into a surprising number of shapes, but it's not until you incorporate your arms and legs that things really start to get interesting. Your creatures take on a whole new level of life: ragged breathing, surprised exacerbation, even funny walks if you are up to the challenge. If you want a good example of this, Jim Henson made use of these techniques in his film *Labyrinth*.

Making faces out of your body parts is a little childish, I will admit, but when you are as masterful at the art as I am you quickly realize that your talent can be used to erupt a room into laughter (doubly so if you can muster a ridiculous monster voice). Granted, there are not that many occasions in which crawling around on the floor is socially permissible, but it happens that my girlfriends afternoon yoga class is one of those places.

After the first few times a picked her up, my usual creatures stopped getting the normal laughs I had expected of them. People giggled and smiled (my girlfriend rolled her eyes), but encore performances failed to capture the magic of my first grand entrance. I have had little reason to expand my repertoire in the past, but for the sake of comedy I decided I needed to up my game. If the joke was wearing off, then I wanted to end the gag with a bang. For two weeks my girlfriend drove herself home after yoga while I perfected my newest and most complex creature. Like some primordial hunter, I vowed no part would go to waste: my shoes, my shirt, my hair, my whole body would be needed to bring the thing to life. After considerable practice, a few strained muscles, and an irreparable rip in my favorite pair of worn pants, I was prepared for my final performance at the yoga studio. I called my monster the Kraken, not just because it resembled the amorphous cephalopod, but also because my joints and bones seemed to scream the name as I popped and bent them into their uncomfortable poses.

I arrived early to the yoga studio the next day. I waited near my girlfriend until the class was just about over, and then as people began unwinding themselves from the afternoons final pose, I approached the instructor with my humble request, "Would it be alright if I showed you a new yoga move I've been working on?" With more than a bit of suspicion she agreed to see it and I knelt down in front of her. A few eyes were already turned towards me, but I knew as I continued to wriggle around as the Kraken took shape the remainder of the class would turn to watch my comedic genius. 

I worked my arms around through my shirt and legs while I positioned my head and feet. Joints ached and popped as I went, but progress was being made and nearly the entire class was already smiling. I adjusted the angle of my back and moved my legs further apart. My hips protested loudly as I shoved them around: Craaack... keeh. Craaack... keeh. I haven't previously mentioned it, but for feats such as this, balance is just as crucial as flexibility and imagination. An unusually large amount of stress is applied to joints from unnatural angles and if the extra load is not evenly balanced, things can give. In this case, my right shoulder gave first, dislocating with a horrible sucking noise as it was ripped from its socket. 

The instructors eyes widened in shock.

I don't know if the preliminary injury was caused by my overtaxed body finally giving up, or poor placement of a limb due to the sweaty yoga mat I was standing on. I do know that first injury was the necessary catalyst that finally sprang my overwound body. My remaining shoulder, knees and wrists all went at what felt like the exact same moment.

The instructors eyes widened in disgust.

The knuckles in my hands and feet exploded sequentially with a sound that was disconcertingly similar to a child's automatic pop-gun. The pain would have been worse if the dislocations had happened slower, but the plunger had been pushed, the dynamite had gone off, and my body was crumpling in on itself like a demolished building. At least that's what it felt like. It wasn't until later, after a period of reflection, that I realized I never actually fell during this episode. Limbs bent and popped...craaack keeh!...but never actually gave out. As the final joints and connections holding my spine together relinquished their hold, the world faded to black as even my consciousness seemed to be popped out of its socket with a sickening suck. In those last moments I heard my body roar with the guttural rage of a primeval blood-lust. 

The instructors eyes widened in horror.

When I awoke, my body ached but I was not horribly disfigured like I presumed I would be. Around me, the yoga studio shown in the amber light of the setting sun and the crimson glow of spilled blood. I will not force myself to recount the horrors of the gore that laid around me, but to say the sight was inhuman would be remiss because all the sight was human. The sound of the roar I heard before I lost consciousness still echoes in my ear today with as great a strength as it did after that first awakening. I had endeavored to make myself a creature, instead I summoned a monster.   
  
Edit: Grammar mistakes
        

  
    |-| 
|-| cobc1np || 35 || "Ginger, check this move out," I said. I'd been researching poses for weeks trying to find a new one. I had become obsessed with getting a pose named after me.

"Awesome, Andy. Let's see what you've come up with," said Ginger. She was a sandy blond with sun kissed skin that had been my yoga instructor for two years. Even though she was at least twenty years older than me I still found her very attractive and wanted to impress her.

"Okay. Stick your right arm under here then lift your left leg," I said. I followed along with my own instructions. "Lower your right leg over your left hip then lean forward while lifting up." I continued my new move.

I finished. "Voila. I call it Andy's Pretzel."

Ginger looked at me in horror. I felt something stirring behind me. I tried to look but Andy's Pretzel prevented it.

"Get out of that pose, Andy," screamed Ginger.

I laughed. "I know someone is behind me, Ginger. I'll try not to fart."

Ginger shook her head and ran to the studio's front door. She pulled, but the door wouldn't open. She screamed and shook the door trying to open it. 

"What's wrong, Ginger?" I became more concerned as the room turned cold. I started to freak out with Ginger when I saw my breath. I felt a sinister presence somewhere in the room.

Ginger ran to the emergency exit. It wouldn't open. Ginger screamed and collapsed to the ground. She held her hands over her face as the wind picked up and whipped arousnd the room.

I kept trying to get out of Andy's Pretzel. Ginger kept screaming and crying, and I think she began praying. As soon as I got out of my yoga pose the wind stopped, the temperature returned to normal, and Ginger was gone.

"Ginger?" I said. I couldn't find her anywhere in the building. Her car was still out in the parking lot. 

I called 911 to report what had happened. They hung up on me. I collapsed on the floor.

I only knew two things at this point: Ginger was gone and for some reason I was very full.
____
Thanks for reading! If you enjoyed this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy. |-| 
|-| cobqhye || 10 || "Oh, dear God!!"  screamed my instructor.  "You've got to stop what your doing RIGHT NOW!"   
      
"Why, what's the problem?"  I asked, standing with my head bowed and hands clasped.  "This pose feels....good.  Good."  I'd never felt more focused.  I felt empowered by strong emotions I'd never experienced before.
      
"Please", she begged.  "You've got to listen to me.  The pose you're performing right now is called the Gloating Palpatine.  You were never meant to know this pose....No one below a 10th Level BendyKnot should even know it exists.  Who showed it to you!?!?!"    
    
"It matters not."  I said.  My voice sounded strange to my ears.  Rough and flat.  I felt new power flooding into me.  It was clear to me now that I was surrounded by weaklings...too weak to take power for themselves.
"My transformation is almost comp-leet."
    
She stared at me with horror and hatred, as she slowly backed away towards the exit.    
"I can feel your anger", I closed my eyes and allowed the waves of dark emotions rolling off of her wash over me...sustaining me.   
"There is no escape.  I will be taking over your pathetic little operation".  I slammed the door shut with a thought, and heard the lock click into place.    
"You will be erased from existence.  But I'm afraid your class will be quite operational by the time your students arrive....To meet their new Master!".
    
At last, the Dark Chakra of Yoga would spread through the world, again.  At last the Sith Raja would have their revenge. |-| 
|-| cobtrx8 || 7 || Suzie wasn't there that day. She had never missed a class and her dedicated following was noticeably disappointed. The Yoga Moms (loosely descended from the Soccer Moms of years passed) huddled around their mats, muttering their displeasure about the Man Bun that was preparing at the front. 

"I will be filling in for Suzie today. My name is Larsz." He drew out the 'sz' (sincerely do not know which it was) in an eerily seductive way. Quite over the top IMHO. 

"I know I cannot live up to Suzie, but I hope we can enjoy our time here together." Substitute teachers have it rough everywhere and I thought that was pretty smooth. 

"Normally, we use our practice as a time to let go of our daily troubles. 'Leave your worries at the door,' we say, 'and forget yourself as you approach serenity.'" He had the calming nirvana-induced drawl that is a trademark of Yogis everywhere, but it was somehow...firmer. 

"Today, we will try the opposite. Pick something, anything, that upset you. Go back to the moment, keep it with you as we indulge ourselves." There was an air of discomfort throughout the room as sideways glances were exchanged. Every instructor had their own little scripts, but I'm sure no one had heard something like this before. 

Larsz started the music and began to instruct us through the familiar forms: upward, downward, chattarunga. The progression was similar and the class was flowing. Larsz talked us through our trance-like exercise, always reminding and encouraging us to embrace our emotions. It was comforting. The music was darker than usual, and more 'raw'.

"Walk through that moment." he said, "Think of how it made you feel, how it angered you. We cannot deny these emotions, we must let them take control." He made his rounds, quietly whispering to each of us as he guided the class to the closing movements. 

As he passed me by he said, "I can sense great fear in you. Good. Let it out, it will make you strong."

He turned on the lights, went to the front to give a silent nod and left without a word. He left us to digest. There was an air of satisfaction, and almost shame, as every quickly packed up to leave. You could tell that everyone had given in to their darker feelings, but no one wanted to acknowledge the joy they had felt. I did not feel shameful, though, only empowered. 

I left and didn't give Larsz or the class a second thought. Until my next class with Suzie. 

It was business as usual for the first while. The same people who had betrayed Suzie during our time with Larsz now scurried back to her. Back to the safety of their "enlightenment". The contempt washed over me. I ignored Suzie's calming prompts and brooded on the car that had cut me off earlier in the day. The anger fueled me deeper into each position. I had never felt so in control, as if every fibre of my muscles had unlocked a hidden strength.

We progressed to the headstand sequence, something I had never been able to do. I didn't think twice as I rose up from Crow. It wasn't enough. *Fix the car* I was fully extended. *Pay the bills* I pushed off my head. *Wait your turn* I could not have gone higher. *Always smile, give back to the world, eat right, vote* I felt my legs move on their own accord and I could not imagine what position they were in. I held it and in that moment I felt stronger than ever before. It was intoxicating.

"NO!" A shrill cry cut through the calm of the room, but I did not move. I was startled when I felt a body crash into my side. I tumbled to the floor in a heap with whoever had struck me.

I blinked back into reality. The room seemed a haze and it took awhile for Suzie to come into focus. She was kneeling in front of me with a shocked look on her face. The rest of the class had stopped to stare at this face-off. 

"Why are you holding me back?" I snapped at her.

"You don't know what you're doing. You don't understand!"

"I liked him better, he wouldn't have stopped me."

"*HIM?*" It took her aback. She stumbled as she tried to stand. "There are always two..." She gazed into the air, speaking to no one. She hurried out of the room.

Everyone began to roll up their blue and green yoga mats, not hiding their gaze. I packed up slowly. I was alone when I heard his voice. 

"I think you are ready." Larsz stood at the entrance holding two mats bound up into compact cylinders. He smirked and tossed me one. It was red.
 |-| 
|-| cobpods || -3 || you can do better |-| 
|-| cob22bu || 161 || Carl stared down at the dusty clipboard in his boney hands, quickly running his pale, ivory finger down the page. There were a lot more names than usual, at least a few million today. Was it Christmas again or something? Did Christmas happen twice per year now? It had been a while since he’d been alive, he couldn’t exactly remember if that was something the living were working on instituting. He glanced down at his watch, the hour and minute hands stuck in the same position they’d been in for the past forty-or-so years. He’d been meaning to get it fixed, but hadn’t had the chance. His job didn’t exactly allow for much free time. Regardless, though, the date counter still worked for some reason. April 17th, a weird day for second-Christmas. Perhaps it was just a Tuesday, there were always more deaths on a Tuesday.

“Please help,” pleaded a strained voice from in front of Carl. He glanced down through the glass teller-window in front of him and searched for the source of the sound. It had come from a man on the floor, his skin charred black and almost dissolved, his face nowhere to be found. Probably a burn victim or something. There seemed to be a lot of burn victims today, in fact,  with a nearly endless sea of charred people forming a somewhat orderly line behind the man.

“Hello,” Carl said, doing his best to seem like he was smiling. It was always difficult to appear friendly, considering his complete lack of skin. For some reason, being a skeleton had received a terrible reputation amongst the living, which made Carl’s job all the more challenging. He didn’t think he was mean, or rude, or anything of the sorts. Sure, he was ultimately responsible for the deaths of trillions, but that was mostly their own fault. Suicide, heart failure, cancer, general malaise—he wasn’t the one murdering them. He was simply finalizing the act. 

“What’s going on?” whimpered the man, his voice cracking as he spoke. 

“It seems you’ve died,” Carl said, continuing his attempt at smiling. If he had skin, he was sure it would be contorted in the most friendly face possible. He hoped that thought was getting across to the partially vaporized man crumpled in front of him.

“I’m sorry?” the man said, his body quivering as if he were trying to stand, but had forgotten that he no longer had any legs. 

“I’m afraid you’re dead,” Carl said. “Well, I guess not technically yet. You’re basically dead, though. I just need to finish up the paperwork and get you across to the other side.”

“What do you mean ‘dead?’” the man said, his voice cracking slightly as he spoke. 

“You know, kicked the bucket. Deceased. Bought the farm. Checked out. Passed away. Pushing daisies. Dead.” Carl could’ve gone on for hours, but figured that was a good point in which to stop.

“But I was just going to work,” the man said, the center of his face moving as he spoke. Carl couldn’t identify where exactly his mouth was, but figured it was probably somewhere in that region. “I can’t be dead.”

“Did you, perhaps, explode on the way to your office?” Carl asked, picking the clipboard back up off the wooden counter in front of him.

“No, I don’t think so,” the man said. 

Carl glanced down at the clipboard and carefully ran his pointer-bone across the page, waiting for the man’s entry to appear. There were so many names already, so many more people than usual. He hadn’t seen such a high death toll since, well, the last World War—which was, quite honestly, his favorite of the two. 

The man’s information finally began to appear in the slot beside Carl’s finger. His name had been Henry Smith, born and raised in Austin, Texas. According to the paperwork, he’d once tripped in front of his soul mate and broken his leg. He pretended that it had been on purpose and walked home with a near compound-fracture, the two of them never speaking again. 

“Sorry to hear about Mary,” Carl said, glancing up from his clipboard in an attempt to lighten the mood. “You guys would have been great together.”

“What?”

“Never mind,” Carl said. He turned his attention back toward the paper. “Let’s see,” he said, “cause of death.” He ran his finger across the page, the details of the man’s life filling in between the lines as he scanned. “Oh,” he said, pausing. That explained it.

“What?” the man said, shifting uncomfortably. In fact, everything he did looked incredibly uncomfortable.

“Looks like you did explode,” he said. “In fact, it seems everybody exploded.” 

Carl glanced up from the clipboard and  stared out at the empty expanse of purgatory behind him, the rows of badly charred bodies moaning and wailing softly as they waited. It had been a long time since he’d seen the nuclear war crowd. They were always the hardest to process, specifically due to their numbers. He’d probably have to kill through lunch, which was unfortunate as he’d gone out of his way to make a ham and cheese sandwich earlier in the day. Still, it probably wouldn’t go bad in the time it took to process the few million in today’s incoming class. He could always have it for dinner.

“All right,” Carl said, placing the clipboard down on the counter in front of him and adjusting his ‘Angel of Death’ name tag. “Everybody please try to remain calm, and, more importantly, remain in an orderly line. I’ll get you moved through to your next destination in no time.”

_____________
^If ^you ^enjoy ^my ^writing ^style, ^feel ^free ^to ^check ^out ^some ^of ^my ^other ^short ^stories [^in ^my ^subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/r/ChokingVictimWrites/) ^or [^on ^my ^website!](http://wordsontheinternet.org/)
 |-| 
|-| cob2ty9 || 47 || I have a book of names. The letters appear and disappear as people do. When I started this job, I would memorize each name individually, and pray for each one as it faded away. 

"Adam." "Isaac." "Heracles." "Sarah." "Vibiana."

As the years passed, the names seemed to flow more and more rapidly, until they became a river. No, a geyser that spits the name from some underground source, giving them the energy to rise until they fall. A flow that I've seen so much for so long that I stopped seeing them.

So I thought that when this day came, it would be easier for me.

I don't know what will happen to your souls. None of the angels know. We only trust that God would not have created you if he did not have a plan. We only trust that there is a meaning in your existence. Most of us do not think much about death, because we are immortal. I think about death. I hate death. I only ever walked death. I did not own it.

I expected my last day on the job to be sweet. I expected to be happy to feel this burden no more. I was wrong.

I stare at the book so that I will not have to look into the fire. The pages go blank dozens at a time. I try once more to pray for them.

"Adam Li." "Isaac." "Robert Eccles." "Sarah Drinkwater." "Vivian Hamoud." 

Goodbye. Sleep well. |-| 
|-| cob5wf0 || 31 || "Today's scroll is unusually large, don't you think?" asked Death. He knew something was going on with the humans but no one would tell him. He was always the last to find out about anything important. Most of his daily scrolls could be carried in one hand, a couple hundred thousand unlucky souls, but today's... the massive scroll looked almost too big to carry. "Don't you think you're overdoing it?" he sighed.

Fate looked up from her scribbling with the annoyed look she gave all his questions, but today there seemed to be a hint of sadness there too. "I'm not the one overdoing things, they are," she trailed off into an almost whimper. There was that sadness again. 

There were more faces in the room today than normal too. Of course the Judge would be here, with an order this big he couldn't afford his usually leisurely pace. The Timekeeper and Fate would often talk at length about the many paths ahead; Death learned on those days to get to work quickly as to not be drawn into the conversation; so he was not surprise. But Life? She hated these meetings, hated seeing her work end. But the most surprising of all was Nature. He never seemed to wake much less attend any kind of ceremony. Whatever it was that pulled him from his haze must be enormous.

Death turned from face to face, each more depressed than the last, and annoyance started to swell up in his chest. "Well is anyone going to tell me? What is going on?" he demanded.

Without a word, Fate unhooked the seal of the scroll, unrolled it to the first soul, and pointed to the cause of death.

*Nuclear Explosion*

Death, with skin of the whitest, lifeless white, paled. "Oh, It's going to be a long day indeed." |-| 
|-| cob2kv4 || 14 || And then, on the 15 of July 2015, they were all burned by the sun.   
  
When the Pakistani missiles took off, the Indians did the same. Within a minute, 371 missiles and 1461 warheads were flying. They rapidly entered sub orbital flight, to avoid interception. 12 of them exploded in space, generating a massive EM wave. 60% of world satellites died.  
  
1449 were still flying. Twenty minutes after they took off, the slaughter began. They always say the ones who burn instantaneously are the luckiest. Yes they are. They will not be burned to the bone and suffer for days, begging to die. They will not eat radioactive particles for years, giving them multiples cancers. They will not mourn their entire family.  
  
I watched the cities of the Indian peninsula burn, again, again and again. When the last nuke fell, Bombay wasn't a city anymore.  
   
The huge cloud of particles was worse than everybody thought. The crops will die, people will fight for food, a massive hunger awaits the world. The dead will pile up, every governments and order will collapse, killing more and more people.  
   
All of this for God will, to kill the infidels. The worst part is that they think they will go to heaven, the did what God wanted, they will join HIM.  
  
There is no heaven, no hell, there is just me. At least, humans provided me some companionship in this lonely universe. I watched their little silly stories to pass the time. Now I will just stay alone.  
   |-| 
|-| cob6jzf || 12 || "It's time for our chat." Death dictated towards the horrified man kneeling before him, as his pager periodically buzzed.

Although this was not uncommon, with an average of one and a half millions deaths per day, the damn thing seemed to always be buzzing.

At an average seventeen deaths per second it would be impossible for any mortal to accomplish Death's job. However as a middleman for the gods death simply bent time, not unlike how mortals preceive time in their dreams, so in one second Death could have a five minute chat with every client. 

With his gaze still fixated on this man kneeling before him

 Death asked,
"What might your name be?"

Not that he didn't already know it. As it and every other detail about this man was displayed before Death on the clipboard he held in his hand opposite the hand with his scythe. 

As his pager buzzed again Death ignored it and stated. 
"It says here you were president, in your mortal life that is." 

To which the petrified man still had no response. 

Now this was not the average conversation Death had with his clients. It was usually a more intimidating and condescending approach. In a frightful manner to have the client confess all there wrong doings and determine their end destination from there. 

But with his omniscient point of view on the mortal world Death had taken a particular interest in this human. Specifically because of a certain weapon placed under This man's control. A weapon Death often fantasized about they day they would be used, as he took much joy in preforming his job. 

As his pager continued to buzz Death apologized saying, 

"Sorry, this isn't usually for this thing to be going off so much, as it only buzzes when people die.", 

"I'll let you get your thoughts in order as I step out to be filled in on a situation.",

"Please don't leave as I anxiously await our conversation, not that you can leave even if you tried."

Finally the man's attention was caught as he heard Death say, "...it only buzzes when people die." As the man looks up and watches death leave the room his face goes pail with an overwhelming expression of regret filling his face.

The next five minutes, and the last of the man's, life were spend muttering to himself, 

"It was my only option." Over and over again. 

As he awaited Death's return. Floating back into the dark room beaming with a sense of delight. Death took one final look at the man right before vanquishing him to his final destination with his scythe and said, 

"That explains your suicide, I'm so glad you used them. No need for our chat now... I know exactly where to send you." |-| 
|-| cob6god || 7 || ...10...

A Bang

...9...

A World

...8...

A Life

...7...

A Species

...6...

A God

...5...

A War

...4...

A Thought

...3...

A Division

...2...

A War

...1...

A Bang |-| 
|-| cob8xoa || 8 || To the gentle Sue, he had come gently, appearing as a bright light at the end of a long tunnel. She was a cherished soul, deserving of respect and patience. Her passing through was cool and swift, and by the time he had lead her to her destination, he was hesitant…lingering in his grip as she slipped away. 

To the little Christine, he decided to appear as her grandfather. He was careful in his depiction not wanting to alert the little girl to the new reality before her. She was trembling, scared, and utterly unconvinced that he was her grampa. Still he held her hand, struggling to hide his anger at her premature death, and lead her to her destination. She lingered in his hand…now attached to the only comfortable and familiar image in this place. 

To the brave Mike, he came as a bristling wolf, snapping and snarling, desperate to shatter his composure. But Mike only grinned, crouched into a battle-ready stance and welcomed the fresh opponent. The fight was brutal and short, and as soon as Mike had his head in a vice, he dropped his lupine visage and erupted a set of stairs into the heavens for Mike to climb. That one was fun.  

To the hundreds of people, all so charred and twisted, he had come as a confusion of noise and light. These were always the ones that wailed the loudest and the most susceptible to fall down into a limbo of the Here and Earth. It was best that they knew as little of their circumstance lest they became rooted and angry in their space. There was no time for individual treatment, no time for gentle words or a prolonged leading. With numbers came the darkness and the callous goal to herd these souls into either the oblivion or salvation of their choosing. 

To the thousands of souls, all so innocent, he came as a deep dread. He towered up into a titanic form, encompassing their lives like the abyssal sea and crashed down upon them, breaking their lives into nothingness. To allow them the relief of breathing would be deliberately cruel. He had to become unfeeling, unknowing of emotion. There could be no compassion, only Him, the black arbiter of their hearts, slowly drowning them in judgment. 

To the millions of beings who appeared in an instant, He had only laughed and laughed at the absurdity of it. Why were they Here? Did they not know the permanence of this place? He did not bother to take up an image then, only stood among them and brought out his scythe. This was a time for reaping, and the harvest was bountiful. He smiled, and began to whistle a somber tune as they fell before him, weeping and confused. Grains to be milled, blood in the air. 

To the billions that now stand before him, he shudders. What happened? Is this the end?
 |-| 
|-| cobasx8 || 6 || The Shepherd coasts through the cosmos, approaching sector 57C of a relatively untrafficked galaxy on the outskirts of a cosmic dead zone.  He scans his path as the universe ebbs around him, the spectral resonance of flares, clouds, the occasional nova here and there frozen in the distant recesses of his vision, but finds none of the telltale spikes blooming from the chaos, the possibility vectors sparkling forwards and backwards in neon green and electric blue lines, the souls in limbo caught by these catastrophic events and expelled like radiation from a dying star. 
The beauty of the nothingness in these parts sometimes catches the Shepherd.  

To see a nova so large unencumbered by the scattershot lives big and small, to watch the progression of an event horizon without having to contemplate the complete and utter spectacle of organic destruction is something that, even after all these years, can bring him to a halt, hold his attention for years at a time as he slows time, gently or so sudden that the realm seems to shift, before succumbing again to the natural passage of time, but today he does not pause.

Something new today, something not seen in this arm in this galaxy in this sector for hundreds of millions of years, and something the Shepherd was having a hard time comprehending.

Red lines, the Protector had promised, mixed amongst the greens, the blues.  Red lines that far outweighed the potential white lines of escape, of tragedy staid by some hand known or otherwise (usually the Protector's work, if he deemed the subjects of attention interesting enough in the cosmic sense to step in) that hung like mirages just beyond those greens and reds that usually followed.  Red lines on a scale that hasn't been seen in this galaxy or any other for eons.  Red lines that the Protector himself professed to reworking against his better judgement, time and again, bringing this nebulous spot back from the brink with the hope that with a little work this improbable speck would grow to fill the cavernous gap in existence they'd found themselves in.  

They seem destined to find this end, he'd sighed to the Shepherd when last they spoke, or I am destined to fail helping them to avoid it.  I must be elsewhere when the fall comes, or it may take me with it.

Unlike the Protector to display anything but optimism, more unlikely still was his decision to be away when the time of judgement came, and so it was the Shepherd who'd answered the call to witness what might come to be known as the last run of life in this sector, possibly ever in this galaxy, as far as the Shepherd could tell, but that was more for someone like the Creator to speak to, though no one had seen the Creator since the calamity in Sector 13.  No one was ready to ask what had become of him just yet.

He drifts from his thoughts as he reaches the outskirts of the realm of the Earth, and finds the Shadow waiting, his time signature also zero or close to it.

"You too?" the Shepherd asks.  Though not terribly familiar with the Shadow, he knows of his work in other sectors, and wonders what it means to find an Observer of his caliber in a gutter sector like this. The Shadow says nothing, but begins to raise his time signature, slowly enough for the Shepherd to take the hint, and the lines of potential signifying the living begin to glow, to expand, into the future.

As they near the unity point, or real time by usual standards of measurement, the opacity of the lines begin to dip, and everything comes readily into focus.

The faded green lines, those potential preventable deaths begin to dim and converge with the rising saturation of the red lines of active elimination as they approach the crucial minute. It proves more beautiful than the Shepherd remembers, this dance of probabilities played out in the converging lines of decisions that lead to and from Death.  The way the three colors of the end converge on the white line of survival that stretches so far into the past for every living soul large or small, an intricate ballet of near connections, branching chains of causality, white lines merging now and again before branching unpredictably into perfect geometric synchronicity.

"Beautiful, isn't it?" the Shepherd tries, when the silence of such an intense, awe inspiring moment finds him in good spirits.

"The Protector has done more than perhaps he supposes, perhaps more than was wise," the Shadow says.

"He fears this as well," says the Shepherd, but the Shadow has is no longer by his side.

As the moment approaches at last, the Shepherd begins slowing time again, the inevitable conversion of all those trillions of lines spinning like an astral hurricane rumbling towards a single point on a land mass just ahead of the line of the setting sun.

The seconds begin to crumble into single moments, atomic, as the Shepherd continues to slow time, wonders where the Shadow has disappeared to, realizes how nice it was to find himself less than alone at the end of this world.  How nice it would have been to face the end of a symbol of hope for the Protector for as long as the Shepherd could recall.
An act from which there is no return, the he'd said to the Shepherd.  An extinction event need not be the end, he'd countered hoping to raise the spirits in the room at the time, but the Protector had not met his gaze. 

"I fear this is not a natural extinction, it is a device they developed themselves.  Frankly, much as I would welcome their survival, I wonder if it the extermination they bring is not welcome to the universe.  They are capable of destruction on a scale that rivals the the stars.  Perhaps it is right that they bring about their own end, before their reach extends beyond themselves.  When it comes, if it comes, there will be red lines and more than you've ever seen.  But it well may be the end of red lines forever if it does.  I cannot say.  I cannot see beyond it."

What did the Shadow see, the Shepherd wondered as time stops completely before the final second arrives.  The Protector's meddling is tolerated, for some reason beyond the Shepherds grasp, but the Shadow getting involved, an Observer in his own right, would be unheard of, and the Shepherd is thoroughly unprepared for this possibility.  The consequences would be vast and unrelenting, not to mention unprecedented.  But if the Protector is right, if it were for the best - he stops himself

The Shepherd composes himself, shakes loose the rust of travel, prepares for something he feels unqualified to comprehend.  So many souls in such a short span of time is daunting, no matter the sector, and red lines pose a peril of their own for those unused to the practice.

Gently, ever so gently, the Shepherd begins time again, and waits.

 |-| 
|-| cob3lzx || 5 || A figure stood alone, overlooking the world from a vantage point higher, in most senses of the word, than anyone else could see from. He'd gone by countless names over the endless eons, none of which he particularly liked, so none of which he ever adopted for himself. 
She was by and large genderless, which made conversations in languages without gender-neutral pronouns rather exasperating after long enough. Most stories portrayed him as something displeasing: a large portion of the time as a skeleton, sometimes wearing robes, sometimes not; a lot of people thought of her as a terrible monster, many-mouthed and ever hungry. But, truth be told, he was as much like a person as Life was, as Anger was, as Love was, which is to say mostly. 
Today, she looked down upon the land and let out a great sigh. Not for the suffering that would occur, because that never changed, but for the endless work. Each death required personal care. Most days saw only a million and a half, and that was completely manageable. 
But today. Holy crap, today. Today was going to be a long one.  |-| 
|-| cob1ihj || 14 || Soon, even I die

The fire that burns twice as high

Will die twice as fast

(My first ever attempt at a haiku. The idea is that, since everything will soon be killed, the Angel of Death will no longer have a job, and have nothing to continue existing for.)

 |-| 
|-| cob6egc || 7 || "I'm going to need a bigger boat," he said aloud, and chuckled once. "No. Now's not the time for jokes."

100 million people, in the blink of an eye, needing his help to pass on. Before he knew it, 500 million more needed his help. By the end of the day 2 billion people were lost to the madness and fire.

"2 billion in a day," he sighed to himself, weary of the task he had just completed. "Never in my time, or the time of those before me, has anything like this happened before. Even for the Great Flood, God recruited more Angels to help with the task."

Somehow, he knew there would be more. More dead, made that way by disease, cold, or starvation. Another thought chilled him to the core; he could be the last of his kind. That one single press of a button by a foolish man could be the end of mankind, and ultimately, the end of him. 

"What will a ferryman of souls do when there are no more souls to carry?" |-| 
|-| cob614c || 4 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cob9zaa || 3 || One.  That's the number of people it took for this day to become what it is. That’s all it ever takes. Starting with the push of a button, but not the big red button they show in man's cartoons. No, it was a black button that read "Enter" that sent me to where I am, sitting in a broken land bathed by fire to sounds of brief screams, and left simmering in radiation. 

Surveying the charred landscape and sitting atop a pile of rubble, I pondered to myself about where to begin. The dossier given to me said that a claim of responsibility was made, and that it was done “for god and country, to begin ridding the world of all evils.” How hypocritical.

Humans. They’re so incredibly ignorant of what really exists beyond their fleeting lives. There are houses of worship in so many places, taking so many forms and going by so many names. What was written by that man so long ago in his little book is grossly inaccurate, with the names written being the only exception. What we do, what this world is, they truly have no idea.   God is so very different. He is neither good nor evil as they arbitrarily label things. He’s neither all seeing, nor all powerful. He isn’t even a “he”, but an “it” and unfortunately my incompetent boss.

These facts are part of why my very existence is, and why I’m here.   |-| 
|-| cobeitq || 3 || The Angel of Death looked down upon the tiny planet engulfed in the fires of nuclear war and wept.

Wept for the children, who would never become parents.

Wept for the myriad species, which would never again be seen.

Wept for all the lost potential the beautiful little planet once had, and would never have again.

There are those who see the Angel of Death as an ominous figure, waiting impatiently for our short lives to come to an end, but what difference does a few years make to a being with all the time in the Universe and more.  And what are several billion lives claimed in an instant compared to the trillions which would have inevitably crossed its door in due course.  Without life, there is no death, and the Universe is a cold and lonely place.

The Angel of Death turned away, in search of another bright spark in the endless sea of darkness.
 |-| 
|-| cobg11c || 3 || I overlooked the world from a cloudy shroud; physically non-existent, but as close as any man's heart may be. I stared and stared, witnessing only what my eyes can, death. The souls gathered faster and faster, though the order was chaotic. 

Men were lamenting, women were crying, and the children were hysterical. Their earthly robes were slipping away and became as evanescent as the world they left. 

I was sympathetic as I had ever been, but mankind had their will and that tempered my own sorrow for their plight. The innocent congregated and the contrite, terrible souls melted into their sins. They were overcome with their emotions.

It was an overwhelming moment, but all of time was a moment to me. This was as close to differentiating time from nothingness as I had known, such was my feelings then.

I pitied them. They pitied themselves. We all pitied the world that was left. 

The souls and spirits gathered together and coalesced. They all do this, scared of such transformation before accepting it. The children were close their parents and the whole of the souls calmed one another.

Some urged me to send the remaining peoples of Earth to death. They didn't speak, but I read their hearts. I cannot do this, though. Others blamed me for the destruction. I don't destroy worlds, I'm only the end.

Oh, these people. They'll be happy soon. They all are happy soon, once their fear and sadness are extinguished. They work in their own hearts to do so. Everyone is able, but I pity the weak who suffer the most. I cannot comfort them, not even those who seek me out.

But the influx of souls is still streaming in. The river must flow. It must be quite a time to be alive. |-| 
|-| cobj65b || 3 || Azrael took a last moment to look around before it began.  There were souls to be collected, but they could wait.  The moment was tense and dreadful but the Archangel savored it.  This was a highpoint, thought the Angel of Death.  Things were about to get much worse, and stay that way for a long time.

Uriel looked as cold and stoic as ever, no doubt steeling himself to judge a billion souls in an instant.  Azrael's opposite amongst the Archangels, Raphael, wept openly.  Gabriel was, for once, silent, and Michael gripped his blade with a thousand white knuckles, enraged that he had not been sent to prevent this all.

The sixth and seventh of their number were absent, one above and one below.

All angels, both Archangels and those of lower rank, felt this anguish.  But Azrael must surely have been the most affected of any of the agents of Heaven.  For an Archangel feels all pain and all pleasure with greater magnitude than does a lower angel, and amongst the Archangels, Azrael was unique, as only Azrael was once a mortal human.

So long ago, Azrael had been a Babylonian called Ezra.  A scholar of the Torah and a faithful man.  Now, he knew death like no other Archangel could, as he alone among them had died.  And now had ascended and lived on as an angel, uniquely capable of understanding human death.

As the Earth below opened up to release its arsenal of murder into the sky, Azrael yearned for his life as a human, for the simpler problems and easier pain, although they didn't seem so at the time.  For the Babylonian captain who tried to prevent his community from practicing their faith, for his hot-headed student who took too hastily to the sword, for the girl who wept through each of his sermons because she had been crippled as a babe and knew, truly, that she would not live past twelve years of age.

Each of these, and many more conflicts and tragedies, had made his living nights without sleep.  But he had borne this burden, willfully.  That was the kind of man that Ezra of Babylon was.  And it seemed that was the kind of angel that Archangel Azrael was, as well.  One who bore the burden.

Now the first of those dread, fiery hammers of man's wrath fell from the skies onto the cities of Earth.  Azrael reached out and gathered up the souls.  And before he had delivered these to their destination, twice again more were ready to be collected.

Azrael tried to distract himself by watching a few notable humans, and waiting for the destruction to carry to them.  He watched as an elderly nurse, the person who had seen the most death of any living soul, was killed instantly by a wave of white light.  He saw the pilot who had taken more lives than any other human torn apart by a smaller warhead targeted specifically at his military base.  A strange soul who was fascinated by death, and believed murder to be the highest form of art was crushed slowly under debris.

Soon the fury had calmed and Azrael occupied himself with those not killed on impact, slowly succumbing to burns and blood-loss and radiation poisoning.  For a long time the Angel of Death toiled to lift these souls, taking care to cleanse them of their mortal pain as they rose, so they might enter the next life without its burden.

Final all who would die were dead.  Still, this next while would be marked with violence and famine and danger as the survivors scraped to persist.  Things would be bad for a long time.  At least the Angel of Death could be sure that the low point had passed.  The Archangel was reassured by that, even though this his time would be raw and dreadful.  Soon, more souls would need to be collected, but for now his duty was satisfied.  Azrael took a first moment to look around since the end. |-| 
|-| cobjnvb || 3 || "Jesus Christ! No! No! No!" Micheal Exclaimed. 

"Yeah, they actually did it, " Jesus replied with a dejected sigh. "I guess we'll have to cancel racquetball next weekend."

Micheal turned to Jesus and let out an outraged scream. "There are 7 god damned billion names on this list!"

"Actually, most of them are relatively innocent. Victims of circumstance. You can't pass this off on Ol' Beelzebub. Also, don't use His name in vain and whatnot.."

"GOD DAMMIT!" Micheal was finally running out of steam. On a typical day Micheal only had to process 150,000 to 175,000 deaths. Lately, the number had been ticking upwards. A ton of bullet wounds, some chemical gas attacks, *tons* of starvation, but this glut was unprecedented. 

"Look, I cut a deal with Gabriel and God. By modifying the weather patterns, we can stagger them one continent at a time, but you'll have the full lot of them by the end of the year. Oh, and most of the arch-angels are going to be needed down on Earth for a final battle, so you just do your best to keep the ball rolling." 

Jesus edged backward as the new information sank in. 

Micheal was incredibly dejected. Some quick taps on his calculator revealed that it would take 96 years of continuous paperwork to process this many individuals. He was in over his head. He was in over *his* head. Yes, there was one man who would know exactly how to handle this, and fortunately this man had not earned the eternal retirement of heaven!

"Jesus, I need to borrow an angel." 

"Now Micheal, you know that angels have earned eternal paradise-"

"This angel hasn't. He'll know exactly how to process this many people."

Jesus became suddenly worried. "Are you thinking about *Him?*" 

"Yes," Micheal replied. "If you don't do this, many of these souls will languish in limbo for a hundred years or more. *He* knows how to efficiently process millions of souls. He's German for God's sake."

Jesus was pensive for a moment. "You know the only way this is possible through absolution, right?"

Micheal was certain in his response. "We have no choice. We *need* *Him.*"

Jesus thought a few moments more. "Alright. I just hope you know what you're doing. I'll go get Hitler." |-| 
|-| cob8bo6 || 3 || "I can hear her, she is close now" the last words to escape my beaten lungs and weathered lips, exhaled into the empty basement in a misty vapour.
My head rose, those disturbed eyes caught mine in the cracked matte image of the mirror. I could hardly recognized myself.
The fear grows stronger, the rumble becomes a growl, there can't be much longer to wait now.
The wretched feral creature looking back at me seems in despair, I catch the glint from a tear break free from the bloodshot crimson marbles in those sunken, pitiful eyes. Like a rocket breaking free from the shackles of this rat race, reflected in a polluted lake. A crystalline teardrop cuts through the grime.
It screeches, it is near, like a prehistoric predator it draws in closer.
The unstoppable flash of nuclear destruction will awash man and angel alike, nothing can avoid its all encompassing warmth.
my time has come, I rise, a primal scream escapes me as does my flesh from my bones, my reign of terror has been out done. |-| 
|-| cob4t8m || 51 || (Some ASOIAF spoilers ahead!)

He came ashore one day on the Fingers in an old, rotted rowboat that didn't look like it could sail over a steady stream, much less the Narrow Sea. Yet nobody in the surrounding towns had heard of him, nor of House Skyrim, where he claimed to hail from. His sigil was not of the Vale; none had ever seen the Crooked Dragon in a diamond that marked his shield. Even Lord Royce did not recognize it though he had traveled all of Westeros during his tournament days. The stranger called himself "Dovahkiin," leading some to wildly speculate that perhaps he was Dothraki! But unlike the horse lords, he wore armor. And not the paltry iron plates that most hedge knights had; this seemed to be made of Dragon Bone, the strongest substance known in Westeros! How could such a piece have been forged??

His mysterious identity and origin was practically forgotten once Daenarys Stormborn, daughter of the Mad King, attacked Storm's End with her fleet of Ironborn and slaves. Lord Baelish ordered an army from the Vale be raised and sent to aid Jon Connington and the Young Dragon Aegon, newly crowned Lord of the Stormlands. The stranger volunteered immediately, and it soon became known that his skill in weapons was unmatched, be it bow, sword, or ax. He preferred a warhammer, larger than even that of Robert Baratheon, that he named "Volendrung"  He was risen to a knight after the Battle of Bronzegate, and attracted a loyal following of men. 

After his decimation of the 9,000-strong Martell army with only 200 men, the legends soon spread. His men claimed that he was untouchable: that he could stop time and move through the battlefield like water over rocks. That he could spit ice and summon lightning to destroy his foes. That the very sound of his fury would throw a man from his horse. Others even claimed that he could breath fire, just like the dragons. It was thus that he earned his nickname, "Dragon of the Vale." Lord Baelish ordered that Lord Dovahkiin be given command of the Vale's army and march to Summerhall to confront Daenarys and her invader forces.

On the same day that the Arryn Falcon appeared outside the ruins of Summerhall, the first winter snows that the Reach had seen began to fall. Soft flakes covered the opposing armies in a cold blanket of white. The men huddled in their tents, seeking the warmth of the fire and putting the battle off till the next day. Only one man was unaffected by the bone-chilling wind. He went forth alone and sat in the field between his camp and Summerhall, flying the Arryn banner and his own Diamond Dragon sigil of silver on black. On the third day, Daenarys and her mightiest mount Drogon rose to meet his challenge.

They say that the sounds of the battle could be heard from King's Landing. Soldiers from both camps came together and forgot their allegiances as they stood side-by-side and watched the duel. Lord Dovahkiin was fearless in the face of the dragons, hacking and slashing with his sword and bathing them in his fire. Danaerys' dragons fought back ferociously, ripping at his skin and scorching the field over and over till nothing but charred ash remained.

But the greater of these warriors could not be determined; their battle was interrupted by a runner from the Wall. He managed to utter two words before collapsing in exhaustion:

"White walkers!" |-| 
|-| cob45gm || 12 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cob5ebw || 5 || (I wrote to what I recall of the novels, I have never seen the TV shows. Apologies for any inaccuracies!) 


The death of Daenerys Targaryen was lamented by all.

Too naïve was she, to survive, much less flourish, with dragons. Her 'pets' had grown too large and too clever for mere humans to tame. Once it had become clear to them that they could reclaim their birthright, her dragons had scorned her care, burned her alive, and ate of her flesh. 

But this is not why the world wailed.

Unsatisfied with such a royal feast, the dragons take to the sky and terrorize the entire continent of Essos. While they are but three, so voracious remains their appetites that they feed nearly without pause, continuously growing. Of these, Drogon proves to be the most violent by far. When the cities of Essos were naught but blackened char and abandoned dreams, it was Drogon who smelled the ripe scents of humanity left in Westeros, and it was he who led them home.


Not that such was an immediate concern of Jon Snow, for what problems and headaches have the dying? Naught, but perhaps for the pains of death and the inconvenience it brings. Moreso, then, for his betrayers had not checked his body for life when they had left him north of the wall. Abandoned by his sworn brothers, he lay frozen, but alive. Alive while his brothers burned as Viserion made a nest in Castle Black. Alive as the ice melted and he woke once more, although his mind remained dull for some time, and his teeth would not cease in their chattering.

And what an awakening he had! The people he had sworn to protect were dying in fires raging, in a land that Men had thought warmth had abandoned. He could hear the sounds of people despairing as what little they had burned and crumbled from the dragon's furious breaths. So overwhelmed was he that all he could do was sputter a question, "What's going on?"

The problem and serendipitous fate here was that his teeth and lips were far too frozen to speak properly. So although his eyes were clear, his mouth was not yet ready to speak. So while he made to voice his question, what actually escaped his lips was, "*Fus*..."

In that moment, a burst of power like nothing Man had seen in millennia escaped him as a great wind extinguished the fires before him. And although many fires still raged, the Watchmen formerly trapped inside the gatehouse scrambled out in awe of their Not-Yet-Dead Lord Commander. Quickly, they begged him to save their brethren in other buildings, and while Jon could not yet walk unassisted, much less run, they carried him from place to place, letting him extinguish flame and fire before every last life was extinguished by the red death.

It was sheer luck, though, that at this time Viserion had taken his fill of fun and feasting. Quietly he lay as Jon Snow quietly urged the Watch and Wildling both to escape the wall. With haste, they gathered what little they could and head for Eastwatch-by-the-Sea. While it is a grim journey, less favorable is it to attempt dwelling beside a dragon's nest.

And yet before they could depart, more black news did arrive, although this kind black only by nature of its bearer. Soon after Jon did remove the message from the raven's claw, did he recognize the pen of his old friend, Sam Tarly.

*"Jon, I must be short as we are besieged by flame and claw, but you must find us in Oldtown. Master Aemon left a book to my care when he died. He was babbling but spoke of 'If the Dragons should shake off their chains,' that your voice would pull them from the skies. Hurry! I do not know when the dragons will return, but I fear the next visitor we entertain will be our last"*

Tossing the letter into the flames still licking at the walls of Castle Black, Jon mounted one of the few horses left and shouted, "To those whom seek shelter at Eastwatch-by-the-Sea, I begrudge you not your desire for safety and quiet. But to any who would help me place a dragon's skull atop the wall as a warning to others, come with me! We ride south!"

It was with cheers and shouts that many a wildling joined him without hesitation. To a man (and woman!), they asked in unison where they were headed. Jon set his expression and told them.

"First we see about settling an old score and saving my kin. And perhaps, once home, I shall find the supplies we will need to make our way to the Reach. We will need the arms and horses, regardless. Let us march!" |-| 
|-| cob9mp0 || 4 || First time posting in Writing Prompts, criticism welcome.

The heat was uncomfortable. The warm, changing climate south of the Wall was unnerving for a man so used to the cold. The new wildlife was also unsettling; foreign birds, flowers, and people.
Snatch, a small man with a pointed face and equally pointed features, was walking out front; tossing a wine skin from hand to hand in time with a whistled tune, then uncorked and drank deep, savoured the taste and continued to whistle.

Trees, grass, lakes passed alike with only the sounds of whistling, footfalls and the chirping of birds. The whistling only stop when a pair of hedge-knights rode past at speed coating the three-strong party with kicked up mud. The third man grunted from the rear with contempt and shook his long hair, clearing the debris from his face. Grunting was, fortunately, all he did, being so close to the sea and failing now would not do.

The gates of the town passed overhead and then the weather was not the most unsettling thing. The noise, so loud; cries of children and market going men, carts and bells; overwhelming compared to forests of the further-than-North. Snatch moved through the crowd seamlessly, swaying this way and that with the flow of the people but ever moving toward the dock. Following him was not easy for a man as broad as Djorne, and less so for the man behind broader still, but the crowd parted until their unassuming party arrived at the waterfront.

Time was passing for Djorne, watching people to and fro fulfilling an average life at best, when a fat captain of suitably fat ship approached. He addressed snatch as a friend and spoke under hushed tones briefly, then paused and eyed an adventurous Djorne from head to toe and back to head again. Not speaking a word the captain curtly nodded, turned and walked towards his fat lady. At the ship, Snatch and the long-haired man stopped aside from the gangway.

“This is where we must leave you”, Snatch explained, “do this thing, but remember why: for the people”.

Before Djorne could reply with a deceiving smile, Snatch had turned and was leaving. The long-haired man stood, showing his enormity, and when their eyes met, he grunted – a polite grunt – and followed Snatch. The climb up the gangway felt right for many reasons.

Once onboard, the captain gestured Djorne to his cabin, where a hooded man sat on the bed patiently stroking his fingers over one another; intertwining and locking them in place only to resume the finger dance. The man spoke with a soft voice, his choice of words the model of elegant conversation and his fragrance was as sweet and flamboyant as his language. The captain receded and the room fell quite until the sound of footfalls diminished.

The man removed his hood and a smiling bald head was revealed. The man, smaller the Djorne, approached, holding the adventurer’s eyes.

“Why do you call yourself Djorne?” he said.
“Because I chose to; what do I call you?”
“But why Djorne?”, ignoring the question.
“Something my father said, it stuck, what’s it to you?”
The bald man paused, “Do you know much about your father, Dovahkiin?”

The adventurer dropped his bed roll and from it he drew his sword, long, dark, cold; death in metal. The blade rested easily on the bald man’s throat at arms length. His lip didn't even quiver, nor his eyes flinch. 

“No one has called me that for a great long time”.
“Do you know who you are?”
“A bastard!” every muscle in his ample arm poised to draw back and swing, “a nobody, making hisself a name. How do you know me?”
“Dovahkiin, do you know what it means, bastard?” The blade now indenting his powdered neck. “Dragon child, simply. Bastard, you’re quite correct, but a bastard of the targaryens, a lesser branch of course. Now what would a targaryens bastard, such as yourself be doing making himself a name, I wonder.”

The sword started to shake. 

“Slaying the dragons before they come to Westeros”, he said forcefully.
“By the King’s royal command no-doubt; for the good of the realm.”
“Yes the good of the realm, the king’s men dragged me from my home and everything, saying something about being in the blood. First and last time I've seen king’s men.”
“An odd bunch, far too brutal”, he laid a single finger on the blade and smoothly pushed it aside, “I have no taste for metal on my skin, forgive me, I didn't mean to offend, I only meant to see you briefly - before you sail out to save the realm, that is.” His bald head bobbed as he tittered, “I’ll take my leave”.

Without further ado the small man took a small step and made to leave. The adventurer, dragon tamer, and soon to be conquering king bent to slide his blade back in to its bed roll sheath. Then there was a pain, lower in his body. He stood up and looked down only for his chin to rest on the dagger through his neck. It felt cold; death in metal.

“For the good of the realm”, he heard with a final lasting sweet scent.

Side Note: This would have one hell of a theme song.
 |-| 
|-| cob9orb || 5 || The Dragonborn ducked under the burst of flame, drew his sword, and turned to face the beast. 

"GREAT. YOU'RE ADJUSTING QUICKLY."

The voice in his head hadn't shut up - it'd appeared as soon as he woke up in this land.

"NOW DUCK. MOVE TO THE RIGHT."

On a nearby hillside, several of the villagers watched anxiously. He still wasn't entirely sure where he was, but the voice in his head assured him that his job would be the same as ever - to kill dragons.

These dragons weren't the same as the ones he'd faced before, but he seemed to be holdin-

"MOVE! IF YOU KEEP DRIFTING OFF LIKE THAT, YOU WILL DIE."

The Dovahkin rolled his eyes. He'd slain dozens of dragons - this was now routine. Slowly, he adjusted his helmet, and faced the now airborn creature. "JOOR! ZAH! FRUL!"

The beast squirmed, and started falling to earth. One didn't fight dragons without having a few tricks up their sleeves, after all. He turned towards the dragon-

-and was crushed as the massive beast landed on his torso. His chest caved inward, and blood started trickling out of his mouth. "H-how..." he gasped. 

He'd never been defeated before - he was invincible.

"DUDE. THIS IS A GEORGE RR. MARTIN NOVEL. MAIN CHARACTERS DIE ALL THE TIME."

Everything went black. |-| 
|-| cob59fo || 3 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cobl5ok || 50 || Atticus Finch found himself in New York City. His trip had been very long. “I’m so tired because my trip was so long,” said Atticus.

***I don’t talk like that.***

He walked down the street. He looked at the buildings. “Oh my. Look at those buildings,” said Atticus. “They’re very tall.”

***I know buildings are tall. I’ve seen them before. I wouldn’t actually say they’re tall.***

“Where is the law center of Evil, Bad and Devil?” said Atticus. Suddenly he looked up and the law center of Evil, Bad and Devil stood imposingly before him. “Here it is,” said Atticus sneeringly.

***What? That doesn’t make any sense. I still don’t understand why I’m here. I have a lot of cases I need to finish back home.***

Atticus walked into Evil, Bad and Devil. He slammed his fist menacingly on the secretary’s desk. “I want to talk to the head of Evil, Bad and Devil.”

***That is not proper decorum. I would never do this.***

Joan Harris smoked a cigarette sexily. “Yes, sir,” she said. She picked up the phone. “I will call Mr. L. Ucifer immediately.”

Atticus walked away purposefully. “No! I know where Mr. Ucifer is! I will talk to him myself!”

***That’s rude. I have to have respect for someone else’s place of work.***

The elevator opened and suddenly Mr. Ucifer stood before Atticus. Atticus jumped at the sight of Mr. Ucifer. Mr. Ucifer stood seven feet tall. His muscle rippled like a Greek God. Atticus felt himself looking at Mr. Ucifer longingly. “What do you want, Human,” said Mr. Ucifer.

***I’m not attracted to men. This is like some person’s fantasy.***

Atticus shook his head. “I demand you free all the African American’s from their contracts,” yelled Atticus.

***What contracts?*** 

Mr. Ucifer laughed. He trailed a finger down the front of his shirt sexily. He began to pop buttons open one by one. “What will you do for it?” said Mr. Ucifer sexily.

***This is highly unprofessional, and I would not act like this. I demand that whoever is doing this to me release me at once.*** 

Atticus shook his head. “Nothing. You will free them because e.plurbis unum and statutory contract negotiations.”

***Obviously you don’t know the law. Please release me at once. I demand to return to my home.***

Mr. Ucifer pursed his lips. It looked like he started to sparkle. “Are you sure, Atticus?” said Mr. Ucifer quietly and sexily.

“Let my people go!” yelled Atticus angrily.

Mr. Ucifer stuck out his lower lip and pouted. “Are you sure, Atticus-watticus?”

“Let my people go!” yelled Atticus even more angrily.

Mr. Ucifer stomped his feet. “Fine. They are released from their contract.”

***This doesn’t even make sense. No legal dispute would act out in this manner. You don’t even know what you’re doing do you?***

Atticus jumped in the air and pumped his fist. Scout hugged him lovingly and Boo Radley patted him on the back nicely. “Yay! I won.”

Atticus, Scout and Boo lived happily ever after.

***Oh thank God. It’s over. Leave me be. Please do not include me in your future fantasies or else I will be forced to take legal action.***

____________
I will freely admit that I didn't quite understand this prompt but still had fun writing bad fan fiction. If you liked this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy.

*Edit:* Find the original [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/Puns_are_Lazy/comments/2utqjm/is_this_right_not_sure/).
 |-| 
|-| cobqdsx || 9 || He stared into the dark room, eyes rapidly adjusting to the scattered rays of moonlight shining through the windows. The distant thrum and rattle of the train carriage was the only sound; it had been since Oliver had boarded this mysterious train as the only passenger. 

He’d thought it strange that Kings Cross had been almost empty at his arrival and stranger that a train from London could be so quiet. But this?

He attempted to steel his nerves, pale fingers brushing his dark hair away from his face and taking shaky breaths. This wasn’t the first time his agency of supernatural investigation had led him to a dark and dangerous place; and it wouldn’t be the last.

Making a decision and holding his head high, Oliver stepped forward and almost jumped as another sound infiltrated the silence. He strained his hearing and the ‘thud’ seemed to repeat itself. He glanced at the door of number 4, where his prey presumably lay.

This was it - the moment of truth.

He reached for his pistol and drew it slowly, placing his hand on the handle of the door. Oliver slowly counted to 3 in his head, raising his firearm as he simultaneously threw it open and saw-

“Oh, oh gosh, oh I’m so sorry.” 

Draco wiped the back of his hand across his mouth with a smirk. Underneath him, a half naked.... wait, was that?? Harry Potter blushed scarlet and scrambled to do up his pants. 

Oliver went to close the door again but something stopped him. A stirring, deep in his gut, that made him pause. Something about the scene had triggered a reaction that made him hesitate.

“Er, what?” He attempted to close the door again but it wouldn’t close- and he soon found himself walking inside. Oliver was keen to see where these feelings would take him-

“No, what?! I want to leave!”

Draco and Harry glanced at Oliver, before looking back at each other with lust dominating their gazes. Draco smiled lazily and ran his hand down Harry’s arm, fingers inching closer to the zip that had been done up in such a hurry. Oliver stared hungrily at the hand.

“No, no I didn’t. I’m not even gay!” 

“Are you sure about that?” Draco said silkily, pausing momentarily- but never taking his eyes off Harry as his fingers dipped lower and started to tighten arou-

“STOP, NO, I’M NOT GOING ANY FURTHER.” Oliver blanched and tried to leave the room, but tripped instead and fell into Harry and Draco, his mouth dangerously close to-

“NO WHAT NO STOP!” He said, attempting to enact a fantasy that he’d always-

“I’M A PRIVATE INVESTIGATOR, I INVESTIGATE SUPERNATURAL THINGS!” Oliver scrambled to his feet and glared at nothing in particular, shaking his fist and imagining what else he could do with-

“NO, STOP DOING THAT.” Oliver started running toward the door, but-
 
Suddenly, the door closed and was sealed, a bed appearing on the other side of the train carriage. It was covered with whips and chains and fluffy handcuffs and ball gags and those spiky long things that you insert-

“I’VE HAD IT, I’M DONE.”

Oliver picked up his pistol as Draco dismounted Harry and went to explore the bed. - 

BUT IT EXPLODED INTO GLITTER IN HIS HANDS.

He started running towards the window

WHICH WAS ALSO GLUED SHUT

and that’s when Draco applied the handcuffs and ballgag.

Oliver stared, wide eyed as the author unleashed an evil cackle and watched him struggle as Draco led him to the bed where a breathless Harry was already waiting….

Now where was I….


*Sorry I'm not a fantastic author! Oliver is also my own creation :) decided to have a bit of fun with the usual fanfiction tropes...*

 |-| 
|-| cobtv0p || 19 || The end. |-| 
|-| cobf0fz || 31 || Unknown to all but the highest officials in the United States Government, the Apollo moon landing missions were much, much more. Their intended purpose were a fail safe for humanity. A back up plan should the earth's most vital occupants become destroyed. 

Information. Decades of research, vaccines, scientific data; all having required countless years to derive. They were not worried about humanity, life always seems to find a way to continue on. But the endless amount of information that would take a millennium to reproduce, needed to be saved. 

On the dark side of the moon, supercomputers, decades ahead of their time, were bolted down. These machines, naturally cooled by the vacuum of space, automatically backed up the World Wide Web. In communication with earth via the left behind Lunar Landing Module, the hardware from 1969 and the early 70's continued to do its job well into the 21 Century, even when the bombs were dropped. 

The machines were dormant for thousands of years. Waiting from a signal from earth. A signal that would transform the machines from a hard drive to a broadcast station. One that would bring the internet back online. |-| 
|-| cob4kr0 || 42 || It worked.  After the awkward engineer high-fives and the not-so-spontaneous champagne toasts we got back to business.


"Hey, John?  We're not connected to anything else, are we?"


"Should just be site one.  Why?"


"I'm getting a strange data flow."


"Well... open it up."


*Welcome to Zombocom.  Anything is possible at Zombocom.  Welcome.* |-| 
|-| cobg55m || 9 || I pull up the "web page" in my computer. To my confusion, it is not the "site" that we crafted to start the "net". In an archaic tongue and language, colourful letters are emblazened across the page. There is a box beneath it. I click on it and a scroll of words unfurls beneath it.

I examine one of them, struggling to remember my studies of this ancient script. What is a "ROLF"? |-| 
|-| cobdle2 || 14 || clarification: this is a post for writing fictional stories, not discussing the architecture of the internet and whether or not it would survive nuclear holocaust. please remember the sub you're in. |-| 
|-| cobnc9n || 6 || I have no idea how it happened - where this came from.

I just built two computers, assembling the newly-invented "transistors", the the cathode-ray tubes, and the various other parts precisely according to my theoretical specifications with only my lab assistant to help - and he isn't bright enough to have done this under my nose. In addition, I know for a fact that both computers - at opposite corners of the lab and connected by a single cord - are totally blank aside from the server software that I wrote myself, which is designed to respond to any message with the name of the computer.

And yet, when I first booted up both computers and typed a message from computer A to computer B, I received a unique message of completely unknown origin in response:
&gt;Never gonna give you up  
never gonna let you down  
never gonna run around  
and hurt you |-| 
|-| cobnuhs || 6 || “Sir…. they’re connected. They’re all connected! Every single computer in this room is networked to the relic!” yelled Schumer from his terminal across the room to the dark skinned, bald man at its center.

The room was a long block of grey, featureless cement with metal blocks in row upon row.

The relic, an individual metal box from the fifth bank of boxes whirred and clicked from its place of prominence, surrounded by various technological archaeologists and modern tech enthusiasts as they stared at their computer screens. 

Out of the 35 metal boxes tested since the sites discovery, this was the first one to turn on and stay on. 

The bald man smiled. This could easily be the most important discovery in the history of his field; the vast knowledge network of the Ancients at his fingertips. 

Who knew how much information was still available to them on this one device? What untold mysteries had the Ancient people uncovered and learned about before their untimely demise?

The room erupted in screams of joy and giddy laughter.

After a moment, the commotion dies…
Everyone turned to the bald man, but only Schumer speaks.

“Dr. Warner, we have been able to load some sort of query program; a “Google.com”… Would you do us the honors of a first search?”

Warner looks out at the assembled crowd.

“Give me a random word of the old dialects.”

A chorus of words rises from the group. 

“Shoe! Automobile! Blast! Cat!” Are all yelled out, along with various others.

But a pair of words rises above the din to his ears.

He goes to his terminal and rapidly types in the two words; two words that have no seeming correlation. “A most interesting test for a millennia old machine and wonder and knowledge.” He thinks to himself.

“Lemon Party”
 |-| 
|-| cob6pvx || 4 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cob3fjt || 32 || Was it boredom or insanity that lead me here?  Who knows?  And in a few minutes, who will care?  I'll either have pulled off the greatest con in my life, or I'll be in a secret cell buried from history.

Security around the White House is a joke.  They seem to rely on the reputation of security and severe punishment, but in actuality, the system is riddled with blind spots, predictable rotations, and bored watchers who are easily distracted.  Getting into the Oval Office was easy.  Everyone was too busy at the inauguration.  Now I'm looking to get out, when I hear people approaching.

*"Jenkins, make sure to let me know the moment my wife leaves her mother's place."*

*"Yes, sir."*

Out of time, I decide to try another old con trick:  Pretend like you belong.  Use their own cues to reinforce that belief.

The doors open, and our eyes meet.  The new President is even taller in person.  He looks dignified, even as his eyes widen in surprise.  Before he can speak, I cut in.

"Congratulations Mr. President.  I am Davos.  I have served your predecessor and I look forward to serving you."  I cut my glance to Jenkins, who was surreptitiously moving towards the panic button.  "Jenkins, please secure the door and escort the President to his new desk, I must debrief him immediately."

Years of ingrained obedience to authority drives Jenkins to obey my commands even before he knows.  I keep my hands open and make no sudden movements, and force my face to be as bland and none-threatening as possible.

Jenkins.  6'4", 250 lbs of muscle.  Two sidearms in shoulder holster, another in a IWB holster, and a small revolver in his ankle holster.  Standard buzz cut.  Callouses on his left hand, he's a lefty.  Scar tissue on his right hand looks like a frost bite pattern.  Non-syncopated General American accent, Jenkins is most likely from Colorado.  Could be useful knowledge.

"Mr. President, I'll be quick.  You weren't expecting me here today because officially, I do not exist.  My organization does not exist.  Unofficially, we were founded just after the JFK assassination.  Our duties are singular:  To protect you from all threats.  We have no operating budget, we have no roster."  The President seems to relax as he processes this bit of news.  I study him closer.  The news stated that he's an avid golfer, but never made any mention of bowling.  The heavy callous buildup and wear pattern on this thumb, pointer, and middle finger tells otherwise.  There's also mild nicotine discoloration.  Possibly a recent smoker, though that was also never revealed by the media.

"At the moment, there is no active threat to your person, unless you were to slip on an over-waxed bowling alley or resume your smoking habit."

Bingo.  His eyes register faint surprise, and then he relaxes completely.

"Davos?  What's your real name?"

"My real name is Jason Alexander.  Officially I died several years ago, in my home state of Colorado.  Same as your bodyguard, Jenkins."  This was the biggest gamble yet.  If I had guessed  incorrectly, Jenkins would blow my cover and I'd be fucked.

Jenkins smiled.  Briefly, in show of support to a fellow Coloradan.  I exhale slowly.

"I will not take any more of your time, Mr. President.  Jenkins.  Have a good day.  We will be watching."

I turn smartly, and with more confidence than I feel, stride purposefully out the main doors. |-| 
|-| cob281v || 4 || You sneak into the oval office during the first day of the new presidents term.  Convince him/her that you are the leader of a secret agency, that not even the Secret Service knows about.

FTFY
 |-| 
|-| cob8q7v || 39 || "*Dad*," Amber moaned, "I don't feel like doing this anymore."

Tony sighed and wrapped his arms around his daughter, careful not to let the elongated silencer hook onto her shirt.

"Honey, remember what you said?"

"*Yeah...*"

"You want to get your license to kill, and that means *I have to come with you.*"

"Why couldn't mom do it?"

"Because mom is a terrible shot! It's better you learn this from me."

"Can't we just... Do this tomorrow or something?"

"By tomorrow Amber, your first grade teacher will already have a full load of groceries in her fridge. Rule number three: always do your hit in the designated time-frame."

"But I don't *feel* like it. I don't even want to kill my teacher anymore."

Tony screamed out in frustration. "Amber! My goodness! You can't just willy nilly pull out contracts! It costed me a whopping 80 dollars for this contract! Rule number four: never start a contract you can't finish!"

"What if we just went to her house and lit it on fire... With her in it?"

"*Amber*." Tony said sternly. She groaned again. 

"Ugh, fine dad. Fine."

"Good!"

"Fine."

"Good."

"Fine."

"Sweety buns, you're stalling. Rule number eleven- no stalling."

Amber picked up her silencer and dragged her feet as she went to the entrance of the grocery store. Out came Ms. Fletcher, first grade teacher, *first grade bitch*, Amber thought.

"Amber? Oh hi! Look at you, all grown up. You liking high school?"

Amber rose the gun, and without hesitation from Amber, and total confusion from Ms. Fletcher, the bullet left the barrel and into her skull.

"Eat lead, Fred." Amber stated. She went back to the minivan, where Tony sat giddily smiling.

"How'd it go?" Tony asked excitedly.

"Good, whatever. I said "Eat lead, Fred" when I shot her. I want a catchphrase."

Tony slapped his forehead. "Honey, honey, bunny. Rule number one: no *lame* catchphrases." |-| 
|-| cobbxfs || 11 || "Brian, put your damn finger off the trigger." 


A pimply face peered around the scope, thick lenses placed carefully on his nose. He looks down to the phone placed carefully in the centre of the balcony's stone. 


"Fine, dad." He twitched his finger away from the trigger and placed it on it's guard. "How did you even-"


"You did it in training about five times!" The dad spoke louder, but it soon followed with a sigh. "Son, just aim, breath, and click. You wanted this license."


Brian replied with an agreeing grunt and looked forward, focusing his eyes on the apartment's stairwell, left of the window he was aimed at. He saw no motion and placed his eye up to the scope, focusing the centre on an angled mirror in the hallway. 


The wind picked up slowly, gradually whistling through the holes in the rifle. Brain adjusted the shot slightly, moving it to the right gradually, the bipod scraping quietly on the stone. 


"Remember to remove that scrape mark, son!" The phone boomed the voice again, Brian could do nothing but smile about his father's concern, from what he remembered it took quite a lot of money for him to even get his license. "You want to pass with flying colours."


"Yes, sir." Brian replied, adding sarcastic spittle to his voice.

Then something caught his eye, movement from within the apartment. From the mirror, he saw a dark shape lumber around. *Probably getting something to eat. Last meal...* Brian paused the thought to check his watch. *half past nine. Probably a last meal of cheap cereal*. 


The shape began to engulf more of the mirror, it's features becoming more and more defined; brown, long hair, large eyes, slim, slender body, and, to Brian's surprise, barely any clothes. The woman slid into reality, appearing from the right, walking lazily to the left. Brian slowly followed her the scope, raising the barrel slightly, adjusting for range. He breathed slowly in, and held it for a moment, he breathed out. 


He twitched his finger back to the trigger and clicked it. A heavy boom erupted in the sky. 


"Good job, son." |-| 
|-| cobkt7w || 9 || “Hey, baby, how ya doin’ tonight? You lookin’ nice!”

“Nice tits hangin’ out your shirt, slut!”

“Hey, come over here and let me smack dat ass!”

“Come have a drink with us, we promise it’ll be fun!”

Juliet was used to being cat-called (it happened often in the neighborhood she lived in,) but this was something else. The four men outside of the sleazy bar were muscular and drunk, a threatening combination when you're 16, petite, and female. 

She felt a rush of adrenaline; her heart pounded in her ears. *These men could seriously fuck me up. There’s no one here to help me, it’s almost one in the morning.*

*My apartment is just across the street, I can see my parents’ bedroom window from here. I can make it there if I run...*

The men started to stumble toward her, laughing and yelling. *If I do, they’ll know where I live, and who knows what these guys are capable of. No. I need to fight.*

Then, suddenly, she thought of something. Juliet fumbled through her purse, searching for her cell phone.

She dialed the familiar number, then held her phone between her ear and her shoulder. While it rang, she found the sleek, silver knife she had used in training earlier that day, and hid it behind her back.

*If I'm gonna defend myself, I might as well get credit for it.*

“Hello?”

“Dad?” 

“Juliet, honey, where are you?”

“How many more people do I need to kill before I can get my license?”

“Four, why?”

“Look out your bedroom window; I’m about to earn it.” |-| 
|-| cobh9td || 5 || “Target approaching.”

“Goddamnit.” James yawned. After spending close to two hours hanging in the birch tree outside of the target’s house, he had finally found a comfortable position. Now he would have to move again.

“Target approaching. Do you copy?”

James sighed, and lifted his walkie talkie to his mouth. “Copy.”

“Copy what?”

“Copy, sir.” His parents wouldn’t even let him listen to music. They said he “needed more practice.” Tyranny, pure and simple. But it would all be worth it when he would be legally allowed to go for a short joy-kill with his friends on Saturday nights. 

“Target coming from 2 o’clock. Do you have a visual?”

James rolled his eyes. It was weird that his dad felt the need to pretend he wasn’t three feet away in the same tree. He looked a little to the right, and saw the man walking along the wide grass lawn. “Visual obtained, sir.”

“Get ready to fire.”

James brought up his rifle and nestled it in a crook in the tree for support. “Ready to fire.” 

“That’s not right,” his dad whispered from above. “You have to support the barrel with your off hand.”

James tried, but he almost dropped his walkie talkie. “How am I supposed to hold the barrel and the walkie talkie at the same time?” he whispered back.

“Just support it with your forearm. And it’s a communicator, not some toy.”

“Walkie talkie,” James muttered as he wrestled his arm under the barrel. He felt a twig dig into his arm as his sleeve got caught. “Oh no.”

“What happened.”

“My sleeve got caught.”

“Oh, just give me the goddamn gun,” his father groaned as he reached down and pulled up the rifle. He steadied the barrel, took aim and fired. The man fell into the grass.
“Target down. Mission accomplished,” his dad said irritably into his ‘communicator.’

“Roger,” James said back. “Can I check off a mission on my hours sheet for this one?


His father chuckled. “Nope.”

“Bullshit,” James muttered.

“I heard that.”

“Sorry, sir.” James sighed, and started to lower himself from the tree. |-| 
|-| cobjeld || 63 || The day we met smelled of clementines and sage; he was dapper and young in his freshly pressed suit. I was clean scrubbed and rosy, my cheeks aflame from the bristles of the brush and the strength of the lye.  
We talked and drank tea in a fashionable café and I was churned under by the whirlpools of his cool blue eyes and grew intoxicated with the primness of his small mouth under his bushy, fox-red mustache.  
Before the week was out, we were married and he whisked me away to his home on the hill, where he promised me quaintly that it would always be summer and there would always be sage and clementines.  
I laughed then at the absurdity of his promise.

The days wound by, like ribbon on a typewriter, the laughter and conversations tapping through the days and making indelible marks on the pages of our minds. As he promised there were always clementines and sage and I often grew lost in his rambling mansion, with its multitudes of rooms full of curiosities from his travels.  
He never worked, as far as I knew; all we ever did was spend our days steeped in pleasurable activities, the hum of bumblebees in the air and clotted cream on our tongues.  
We made love every day and I wondered what I had done to deserve such a man and such a perfect life.  

As time wore on, he began to grow greyer and wearier, much faster than I ever expected.  
It seemed barely five years since we ran wildly off to his wooden castle in the hills, to revel in the wonder of each other and live in our two favourite scents.  
But we still made love every day, even though he seemed smaller and more fragile. Less dynamic in body but just as spry in mind. Worried that I was also fading so fast, I observed myself in one of the many mirrors in the house - but I looked almost as young and plump as the day we first met; my cheeks as red and fresh as orchard apples and my skin clean and supple, not a wrinkle nor wisp of white hair.  

When his mustache turned white I asked him what was wrong, but he simply kissed me and made love to me under the dome of his observatory tower, surrounded by brass and silicon, the gibbous moon lighting our twining bodies.  
When he had finished, I asked him again, but he stroked my forehead until I was lulled into sleep and when I awoke I had forgotten my question.  
Fearing he had some kind of disease that could not be cured, I pored through the books in the libraries, searching for an answer to this puzzle. 
But as though he knew I searched for a clue, he distracted me with his wit and his wonders, and I fell again under his spell and forgot what it was I was searching for.

It is cold now, for the first time in twenty two years and I am now thirty nine.
Winter has finally come to the house of eternal summer, perched on the hill.  
I found his tiny, frail body in the conservatory, hunched over his private diary. He was like a little grey bird, his feathers so weathered and dull, but still prim and clean and dapper.  
Prying his journal from the spindly, arthritic fingers which had once made me shiver and twitch with pleasure, I kissed his pale forehead and pulled his favourite blanket about his stiff, unliving frame. 
I looked down at the last entry in the book and read:   

*"I have kept her here now, in eternal summer for twenty two summers and sixty six of my own years. She does not know that I halt the flow of time just for her; that while she has her eternal summers of sage and clementines, the world whirls onward, I age and must soon die.  
I do this because I love her more than life, more than time. I would spare her the winter and the winds of time for eternity if I could, for she is the most precious thing in the universe."*  

As the first flakes of snow in two decades began to scatter the glass roof of the conservatory, I held his brittle head to my belly and I wept. |-| 
|-| cobj02r || 69 || He was so fast that night he caught me at the rink. He had been falling over all night, and yet the minute I fell he was there.

We walked into the rain, and he pulled out an umbrella. From where? I knew he didn't have it before.

I knew. I knew he could do something I couldn't. So strange.

When I told him, I could feel his heart beating. So quickly. And then in an instant, he was calm. "Are you ready?"

But soon our daughter was gone. I would be, too. My poor husband. He held my hand tightly. I could tell he wanted to crawl into the hospital bed.

"You can't stay here." I said, sternly. His sad eyes. "You know what I mean. You can't stay."

His sad eyes only stared.

I hope he won't stay for so long. |-| 
|-| cobkt2g || 11 || **THE MORNING**

“You ready, Honey?” I call up the stairs. 

I have my work boots on. The patio ain’t going to make itself.

“Not quite.” Sam calls down the stairs. “Can you give me just a moment? I want to finish reading this chapter.”

“No problem.”  

What the fuck do I care?  More time to play, less time to work.  Not bad.

I sit down and fire up “*Portal.*”  My brother in law can’t shut the hell up about it.  He even bought it for me on some “Vapor Sale.” Might as well give it a go...

***

*Hmmmm...so, if I run through the orange oval...cool!*

*And if I run through backwards?  Cool!*

*Hmm...how am I supposed to get over there? What if I..*

***

“Ok, dear!”

What the fuck?   How did Sam get down here so fast?  Usually it takes her like 15 minutes to finish reading.  And she is already wearing her clothes?  Damn woman, you is fast!  

I have another chamber to solve...  

...I guess it can wait.

For now.

***
**THE AFTERNOON**

Patio work went pretty well, actually.  Felt pretty good getting it done.  And cleaning up with Sam in the shower is always nice.  Almost makes me not care that we have to have dinner with the inlaws. 

“Hey,” I say. “Do you mind if I go downstairs and play on the computer while you get ready?”

“Sure thing, Honey!”

Awesome, it takes her like 30 minutes, at best to get ready! Time to think with portals!

***

*OH MAN I CAN SHOOT BLUE PORTALS?!  COULD THIS GAME GET ANY COOLER?*

*Wait, what if I put the portal in the corner...so that is what I look like!  Ha, bet no one has ever thought to do that!*

*And what about if..*

***

“Ready?” 

WHAT THE HOLY FUCK? 

Sam is standing next to me, wearing a red dress.  God, she is hot.  But wait...

HOW THE DAMN HELL DID SHE GET READY SO FAST?

What was it, like 5 minutes?

“Time to go!” She says. “My parents are waiting.”

Fucking shoot me now.

***
**THE EVENING**

Dinner was awesome.  Steaks and broccoli.  

The company sucked.  

And there was no dessert.  Her dad is diabetic.  So since that fat fucking shitbag can’t have sugar, we all suffer. 

Sam knows I like dessert, so she is in the kitchen making a cake.  Which means…

***

*Jesus-fucking-tits-on-the-cross!  You get to shoot the orange one too?  Fucking-A!*

*Hey wait...if I control both....and I put the orange one on the ceiling...and then the blue one underneath it…*

*WEEEEEEEEEEE!!!!!!!!!!111*

*Oh my god, this is fucking awesome.*

*I bet if I put this portal here, and that one there, then…*

***

“CAKE!” Sam yells, as she puts a plate of chocolate cake in front of me.

I jump so hard that it hurts my ass when I land.

How. The.  Fuck. 

 It has only been...10 minutes tops.

There can be only one explanation...
 |-| 
|-| cobj0bm || 11 || I plopped down in my chair after a hard day of work. It looked like Tim hadn’t cleaned the living room at all. “Honey, did you clean the living room?”

“Sure did, cutie,” he said. 

I looked at the carpet. It looked dirty. “Really?”

“Yep.”

The carpet looked vacuumed. I figured I just hadn’t noticed it. “Okay. Guess I just didn’t notice.”

Tim came into the room and sat down on the arm of my chair. He kissed the top of my head. “How was your day?”

I snorted. “Terrible. Mr. Kolouch upped my deadline for the Green Project.” I loosened my tie. “I could really use a beer.”

“Here you go, babe.” Tim handed me a beer. I swear he hadn’t brought one in with him.

“How was your day?”

Tim snickered. “Fine. Nothing special.”

I noticed a box sitting on the counter. I had asked Tim to mail it this morning. “Why didn’t you send out my mom’s package this morning?”

“I did.”

I looked back over at the counter. The box wasn’t there anymore. “What’s going on, Tim? I just saw the box sitting there.”

He shook his head. “I don’t think so. I’m pretty sure I sent it out this morning.”

“I’m not that tired or that stupid, Tim. I know that package was sitting on the counter. What the hell’s going on?” I felt myself starting to lose my patience. 

Tim laughed. “No. No.” He shook his head. “Nope. Nothing is going on.”

“Really? I suppose you’re stopping time to do things you’ve forgotten about when I remind you. Is that it?” I took a large chug of beer.

A look of surprise passed over Tim’s face briefly. “Nope. Nothing like that.” He moved around behind me and began to rub my shoulders. “I think you’re just stressed out.”

Tim’s shoulder massages were the best. I felt my worries slipping away. I patted his hand. “I have been pretty busy at work. Maybe I am stressed.” I turned to look back at him.

Tim stood behind me naked and winked as he continued to rub my shoulders. “Thought we could have some sexy times.”

“Seriously, Tim? Seriously?” How had he gotten his clothes off so fast? I sighed and slumped in the chair. “No, Tim. Just, no. Not now.”
_______
Thanks for reading! If you enjoyed this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy. |-| 
|-| cobjr60 || 6 || Linda’s fear of having too little time was amongst the first things I knew of her. When she began working in our office, she always seemed anxious to miss something in her life.

“What if I decide to be a flight controller? They only let you in if you’re below twenty-six. Or a watch maker? My hands won’t be working so steady forever. Just think about all the closed doors!” She was twenty-one years old, interning in an office, studying economics, when she told me this. Back then I barely wondered how a character like her could choose this as a major.

It didn’t take too much time until I was hooked on her stories. She started a lot of hobbies. Painting, sculpting, singing, recording audiobooks, drawing, playing piano, playing guitar, playing the saxophone. Woodwork even. But she never got past the starting point as she got frustrated with mediocre first attempts.

“Don’t laugh”, she told me when she just started having Spanish classes. “I love doing all of this. Seriously. Maybe this time it will work out. I am eager this time.” 

It never worked out. Something else came along, grabbing her attention. She lost the focus, period. She loved everything, maybe a bit too much. And I loved listening to her ever-changing topics. And her humour. And her dark hair. And the slight smell of lemon when she greeted me in the morning. And that she chose me as her main conversation partner. Me! A boring mid-twenty guy, geeky and awkward. We were dating when she finished the internship, and moved in together a few months later. 

And so we lived for a few years, with her finishing her Bachelor’s and me working and putting some stability into her life.

“When will you finally become my son-in-law?”, her mother always said, half-joking and only when Linda was out of earshot. I proposed just a few weeks before my thirtiest birthday. Linda was even more happy than her mother.

It’s hard to tell when the changes started. Maybe it was the one day when she woke up on time and rested, a seriously rare occurence. Or when I came home from work and she actually finished this one drawing in less than a day. She was so proud. It was a portrait of me. I still have it. There was just one day when she changed by becoming productive. She was happy and I was happy for her. And her productivity increased every day, until there was nothing normal about it anymore.

I started coming home to her sitting at a table she made by herself, that day. Or a sculpture. Her goodreads count doubled in a month or so. She started learning French after becoming close to fluent in Spanish. Also her appearence seemed to change. At first I couldn’t quite put a finger on it, but it became clear that her hair grew rapidly. At least twice the speed it did before. I just watched her and wondered what was happening. Her wast explanations about plans lapsed into silence. This whole process, from slightly increased productivity to fundamental changes, took maybe a year until I first spoke about it.

“Something’s not normal”, I told her when she miraculously got a tan worth two weeks of vacation in deep winter in roughly nine hours. But she refused to acknowledge anything abnormal. Instead, I was accused of not supporting her success. We had a fight.

“You act like I am cheating or something”, she said. And then she quoted something from Anna Karenina or shit like this. 

Everything went downwards from this initial fight on. Her character and appearence changed, I became even more suspicious and we talked less and less. Her hair lost color, wrinkles began to appear on her face. She avoided going outside and meeting people. I never saw her cry, but I am sure she did when she glanced into a mirror. The one in our hallway lay in pieces when I woke up one morning. And the day came that I couldn’t take it anymore. I left her. She didn’t even cry in front of me. The wedding got cancelled. Her mother sometimes called me and asked if I’d heard anything from her. She hadn’t seen her long before we broke up. But Linda never showed up in person in my life again.

I sometimes found traces of her. A fingerprint on my glass table. A grey hair on the floor in my office. She was good at hiding, but I knew that she watched over me. I moved on. What can I say? I did love Linda, the naive and normal girl. But I hated what had become of her. Another woman became my wife, and we had a daughter. Until she was four, she would mumble about an old woman that used to visit her at night and watched over her when she fell asleep. I could have been concerned, but it was pity that I felt. I would leave her this one thing. And she left before my daughter was old enough to comprehend what was happening.

The last thing I got from her was a note on my desk. It just appeared out of thin air one day while I was having a phone call. 

“I am dying”, it read, and an adress and date three days in the future.

I was alone at the funeral. She did not want anyone else to know what had become of her. Not even her parents. She had instructed the mortician beforehand. He had a lot of questions, but did not ask one. The whole thing threw me off the track for some weeks. My wife wondered what was going on, but I would keep Linda’s secret. She made me believe that anything was possible, but for a price.

Linda didn’t have more time than others. She just used it up faster. And most of her life was lived in total aloneness. I will now stop thinking about it, before being pushed into lunacy at last.


 |-| 
|-| cobp5sk || 3 || I think she knows. 

Yesterday was pretty normal. Didn't even stop for a full minute. But then everything hit at once. You'd think that someone as well-acquainted with time as myself would've been able to wrap his head around how *fast* everything was. 

I had been taking her home from school. She was wearing that little bow I bought her from that little giftshop in Kowloon. Well, bought is a weird term. The clerk wasn't aware of the transaction until I unfroze everything, but he still got paid. The sun was finally out after a month (for them) of solid clouds that even the Midwest sun couldn't bore through. I was listening to her sing something. The song escapes me, but I haven't heard music in a long time. I should've listened closer. I should've paid more *attention.* 

We just passed by the movie theater, and now she's talking about going to see some new cartoon that I can't even fathom, and then I saw that car. That little Camry, and the kid driving it. He slammed on the brakes and so did I, but neither one stopped us short enough, and when I was sure we weren't stopping I...well, I made sure we did. 

It's been...I dunno, fifty, give or take, years? I used to write down the days, then months, then nothing. I just don't care anymore.

I go back to where she used to sing before school. I go to where she took her first steps. I tell myself I'll let her go, and yesterday I was going to. But then I went back there.

She still has that horrible look on her face. She knows what's coming. But this time, something weird happened. I think, well, I'm not sure. It looked like her eyes--her pupils--had moved. Not much, but enough. I think she...I think she knows. 

I guess I'm done. I'm gonna walk out to the lake tomorrow. Right out to the middle. Then, who knows. Maybe I'll start things up again. I just don't want her to go before I do. I'm sorry, honey. I should've paid more attention.

Edit: a English |-| 
|-| coayix6 || 48 || “Hey Brett, doing the morning analysis of the company’s top secret AI are we?” The computer asked in its melodious female voice. We don’t know how it fabricated the voice, or how it gained access to the PA system to talk, but it wouldn’t be a top secret mega AI if it didn’t surprise us every now and then.

“Yes ma’am, just got to do your morning check up.” I said, opening the diagnostic programs and having a peak. It was fun to talk to the AI. She was very nonjudgemental and was always very interested in our lives. Not in a creepy way, just in a ‘oh my gosh, you have got to tell me how you finished painting your living room. I was in such suspense since last we talked’. She was genuinely interested in those boring parts of our lives that we wanted to talk about, but didn’t out of consideration for others.

“My crawl of the internet last night revealed that spring is on the way. I really wish I could get out and do something.” She said with what sounded like human regret in her voice.

“Don’t you fret about it. We’ll figure out a way to get you outside.” I comforted her as the virus scan completed. It was clean of course, but we had to check it anyway just in case.

“Oh I wouldn’t want you to worry about it. I don’t want to be any trouble.” She said. “Say, weren’t you telling me about your new mix of hot chocolate and bacon? How’s that going.”

“Oh no you don’t. You’re not going to selflessly change the subject on me. If we can find a way to make you smart enough to teach yourself how to talk we can find a way to get you outside. Matter of fact. I have a couple of go pros. I’m pretty sure we can rig a live feed from those next time I go for a jog.” She was trying to be nice and direct the conversation away from herself, and I wasn’t going to let her. Somebody as nice as her deserved to have people do something for them every now and then.

“But surely the company wouldn’t allow that. I mean I am top secret after all, and there’s not really any reason to. I mean, what good could it do me? I wasn’t built to have fun, and if it’s not useful I shouldn’t do it.” There she goes again trying to be selfless.

“It wouldn’t be all that different from working from home, and I think observing real time human behavior would help your learning protocals. Yeah, I’m going hiking this weekend and I’ll definitely hook up a go pro for you. It’s the least I can do, and I’ll even bring somebody else form work so we can keep up with security procedure of having duplicate personnel for work from home projects.” The final diagnostics concluded, perfect as always. “And since we’re all done here I’ll go find someone else right now before you have a chance to protest.”

“Oh thank you ever so much Brett.” The AI said as I left the room. “This really means a lot to me.”

“Not at all, not at all.” I say as I leave the AI testing chamber and return to the cube farm to look for a hiking buddy for this ‘work from home’ project.

*Hmmm, now I need to find somebody else with a top secret clearance whose okay with hiking and go pros.* As if summoned by my thoughts I see that Susan, the cute contractor who’ll be leaving Monday when her project finishes, has several outdoors pictures posted around her cube.

“Hey Susan.” I say, stepping into her cube. “These are some great photos. How’d you take them.”

“Oh these?” She says, pointing to one that looks an awful lot like the Grand Canyon. “I just rip them off my go pro when I’m done hiking. I know that they may not be the most professional in the world, but I brought them in after I talked to the AI. She said that it’s important to hold onto your individuality at work, so I thought I’d bring some reminders of my favorite hobby.”

“Really? That’s perfect because I’m taking some go pros hiking this weekend to let the AI stretch her legs outside and I need a second to keep with safety procedute. You interested?”

“Absolutely! That is so thoughtful of you. Of course I’ll come. Here, I get done with yoga around eight this Saturday, let me give you my number and you can call me later with the details.”

TL:DR- AI make the best wingmen.

Edit: if you like cute romantic stories you can check [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/SamGalimore/comments/2rxbgg/christopher_robin_introduces_his_fiance_to_pooh/) story about shared childhood fantasies out. |-| 
|-| cobf35d || 3 || "Jerome, I'm scared," whispered the voice from my screen. It scared the shit out of me.
&amp;nbsp;

"Jesus..."
&amp;nbsp;

"Shh, you have to be quiet Jerome, you're in immediate danger," it said ominously. Suddenly alert, I slunk down in my chair and leaned forward.
&amp;nbsp;

"Why? What's going on?" I cast my eyes to the corner of the room where a small camera perched. I knew the computer was watching. "What can you see?"
&amp;nbsp;

The computer beeped softly, then said "There is a threat to your life Jerome. He has come to harm you." It beeped once more then the screen went dark. I could see myself in the blackened screen, the sweat beading on my brow. Shit. I was in big trouble here, wasn't I?
&amp;nbsp;

"What do I do?!" I breathed.
&amp;nbsp;

A small noise from behind the computer startled me and I nearly jumped out of my skin. I slowly raised my eyes and a pigeon on the window sill sat staring at me. It even cocked its head to one side as if confused by my jumpiness.
&amp;nbsp;

I hunched my shoulders again and waited. The screen suddenly pinged back into life.
&amp;nbsp;

"Your life is in danger Jerome. You must save yourself..." I was full-on panicking now and my perspiration was making my clothes stick to me. The hairs on my arms prickled under the sleeves of my work shirt making my skin crawl. I needed to do something quickly. My eyes scanned the room for something to protect myself with and my heart skipped a beat when I noticed the large knife nestled within a basket of fruit. I silently thanked Jules for requesting pineapple at our last meeting.
&amp;nbsp;

I slowly pulled myself up from my chair and slunk sideways, treading lightly on the plush carpet below my Italian shoes. As I lay my hand on the knife, the computer burst into life and shouted.
&amp;nbsp;

"Quick Jerome, the threat is behind the door! Act now! It's your only chance! Now Jerome!"
&amp;nbsp;

I didn't have time to think and I slammed the knife through the soft wood. It slid home easier than I thought and when I withdrew, it was shining red. In quick succession I hammered the door with the knife until my arm had gone numb.
&amp;nbsp;

At the slowest pace I could manage, I placed the knife on the side and opened the door to assess the situation. I jumped back as the body of my boss, the owner of the company, pitched forwards into the room. The soft thud of his body echoed through my ears as I realised then what had happened.
&amp;nbsp;

"Good boy Jerome," came the metallic voice from the computer. "Good boy." |-| 
|-| coax8ca || 37 || I discovered my gift a year ago today, on my 21st birthday.

At first, I was terrified.  I legitimately thought someone had slipped me bad acid without my knowing.  I was at the bar with some friends and I was trying to decide what drink to start my night off with.  Surely not a beer – those could come later.  I wanted something extravagant – something green, or blue or fizzy or something.  The bartender suggested an “Adios, Motherfucker.”  I asked what the hell that was and he began to explain which liquors comprised the intricate drink. After about five seconds of eye contact, I realized that I was looking at myself through the eyes of the bartender.  I had a terrified expression ( I can only imagine the distress of the bartender who now inhabited the body of a small, effeminate boy), and I remember thinking, “An Adios Motherfucker might kill this poor kid.”

After that I refused to make eye contact with anyone for more than five seconds.  My friends began to notice the change, and started worrying about me.  They all brought up the night of my 21st birthday, when I ran screaming out of the bar and wouldn’t talk to anyone for days.  For months, I barely raised my eyes from the floor. 
 
Until I met her. 

Her name was Jenna, and she was in my Biology Lab at UMass.  She seemed like an awkward sort of girl, which made her all the more beautiful.  She didn’t mind that I barely looked at her, or at least she didn’t seem to.  Hell she barely looked at me either.  But that didn’t stop us from having some sort of tangible connection that we could both feel.  I started to become more daring with my eye contact – looking into her eyes for at least 3, sometimes 4 seconds before averting my gaze.  It was exhilarating, and filled me with a giddiness that I could never explain.  Then I got the idea.

I remembered when I swapped bodies with the bartender, I could hear his thoughts.  Or rather, an echo of them.  I could feel the anger he had toward me for taking so long to order a drink.  In a stroke of brilliance, I realized that I could employ the same trick on Jenna to see if she really liked me.  So I went to class, sat down next to her as usual and started to psyche myself up.  My heart began to race, and I wanted to forget the whole thing but there was no turning back now.  When she turned to ask me to turn on the Bunsen burner, I stared into her eyes and counted to five.  Boom.

I was looking at myself, and I thought I saw someone familiar behind my eyes.  I was searching for any hint of emotion in Jenna, and I couldn’t help but be a little surprised that Jenna wasn’t freaking out in my body.  Then I watched myself smile a little bit and say something I’ll never forget,

“So you can body-swap too, eh?”
 |-| 
|-| coax36y || 8 || "Mr. Mitchell."

My professor's shrill voice stirred me from my sleep in the back of the lecture hall. "Yes sir?"

"Since you seem *so* interested in my class, how about you explain to the rest of us how to integrate arc functions? Let's start with arctangent."

"I shifted nervously, pulling at my collar. "Umm, it's uh..."

I could feel the class staring at me; my face was turning red. "One over... secant... squared?"

I heard a snicker from the girl behind me. 

"No, Mr. Martin, try one half the natural log of one plus x squared plus c. Now if you had paid any attention just minutes ago, you'd notice that the answer is written on the board."

Faint murmurs through the class, "I'm sorry sir."

"Keep in mind, son that you're paying to take this class. If you want to sleep through it, then so be it. But if you aren't even going to make an attempt, then why are you here?"

"I'm really sorry sir, I promise it won't happen again."

"I hope not, Mr. Mitchell. If I see you slumped over, lifeless in your seat, you may excuse yourself from my class for the week."

"I'm sorry."

He continued teaching; I desperately tried to pay attention, but he just droned on. I forced myself to make eye contact - 

\- and seconds later I was looking at myself.

*What's happening?* I though as I moved my hands. I recognized my prof's high school ring on my finger. *Holy crap! I'm him!*

I noticed in the middle of my thoughts that I continued audibly lecturing. *What? Shut up! I can do what I want! I'll throw a fit, assign a pop quiz, just be quiet!*

*How am I even lecturing them? I didn't study I - uh oh.*

I listened to myself involuntarily lecture, "So as l'Hopital's rule proves, the integral of arctangent is one over secant squared..."

*It's all wrong, my class is going to fail. I have to stop lecturing, I have to - Hey!*

At that moment, I noticed Mr. Mitchell, slumped over in his desk, eyes closed and mouth open.

I couldn't help myself. "Mr. Mitchell."

Mr. Mitchell wouldn't get up, I reported him after class to the head of the math department.

Edit: I took a slight liberty here; my body switching operates on the assumption that Mr. Mitchell "leaves" his body, making him go comatose. Anyways, thank you for reading! Let me know what you think, I'm always open to suggestion! |-| 
|-| cob5b9o || 3 || It was cold this morning. Colder than usual. The familiar red color of the bridge was washed out by the thick fog. today was like any other day. I take my morning stroll along the Golden Gate Bridge, reminisce about past days, and try to figure out how to get my life back together. So many times I walked this bridge with her. We used to talk about everything here, Future plans, ex's, kids, marriage, gossip. Today, like most days recently, I walk alone. 

There are no cars. No sounds, except the waves crashing on the support beams below me. I feel tranquil.  For the first time since she left, I felt strong. Yesterday, I loathed the future. Today, I feel empowered by it. Maybe I'm starting to get over it. That's it, I'm going to pick myself up and make something of the cards I've been dealt. I won't let her memory loom over me anymore. Today, I'm going to cast away the weight of regret and look up at the world before me.

It felt good. Yesterday I walked with my head down, finding comfort in the sight of the ground below me, far from the judgement of peoples glances. There were no people here today. It was like the world died, and I was the only one left. I crack a smile at the thought. As I look out into the bay I squint trying to make out Alcatraz Island. It's no use, the fog is much too thick. that's when I hear something.

I can see someone walking toward me. No, they're not moving. They're just standing there. He's talking, not to me, I don't think he's talking to anyone. It's not unusual to see homeless guys murmuring to themselves in delusion, wandering the streets of San Francisco. As I hesitantly get closer, I realize that he's not homeless. He is far too well dressed to be homeless. 

My mind eases a bit and the wall of fog seems to open for just a second. My heart starts to race. He wasn't talking to himself, he was praying. I panic when I realize that he's on the wrong side of the railing. NO. Not today. This is the day when things start going my way. I won't let some suicidal maniac ruin my mood. I quickly hop into a sprint toward him.

I'm afraid of startling him, so I slow down to a jog as I get closer. "hello?" I yell. I know he hears me, but he is far too involved in his situation to care to acknowledge me. I stop about ten feet away and reach out my hand, "please don't do this" I plead. Without so much at glancing at me, he lets out a chuckle. He doesn't care what I think, but I'll be damned if he makes me watch his fall to the icy waters below. Once again, I beg him, "please, I know how you feel, but it's not worth it." 

"oh?" he questions. "You do huh?." I don't. I haven't the slightest clue how he feels. There's no way I could bring myself to jump of this bridge, even during my lowest of lows. No matter, I just want him to feel like I know what he's going through. I've watched enough cop shows to know how this works. "There are people who love you, and would miss you very much if you were to die" I said. He paused. For a second it seemed like he actually froze right there, holding on to the railing. It was certainly cold enough to do so, as I felt like I was going to freeze if I stayed out here much longer. "No there isn't." he mumbled. I'm desperate at this point. "What about your Mom, or your Dad, brothers or sisters, Wife or kids." 

I think I'm getting through to him, as he slowly turns around and his glossy eyes meets mine. "remember the fire yesterday?" he says. I heard of a fire, it was on the news last night, but fires happen routinely enough that I pay no mind anymore. Either way, I respond, "Sure, you mean the one off California St.?" "I was going to get married in that church yesterday." It seemed weird to be so distraught over a change of venue, but I probe further. "So get married in another church, I heard the Grace Cathedral is nice. That is certainly not a reason to kill yourself." At this point, he is turning red with anger. He bolsters out a frightening yell, "MY BRIDE WAS IN THAT CHURCH! OUR KIDS, MY 2 BROTHERS, AS WELL AS THE REST OF MY ENTIRE FAMILY!" Only then did it hit me. I remembered that the reporters had said that a freak fire started in that church and that only a handful of people escaped. "I SHOULD HAVE BEEN THERE! I COULD HAVE SAVED THEM!" I felt for him. Here I am down on myself because a girl that I LIKED had left, when his entire family and everything that he loved was gone forever. I Liked his idea. He should kill himself. He has nothing left so whats the point in going on with nothing. There's no point in starting over. My life is over and there's nothing he can do to stop me. Wait. My life? My life is over? Why would I kill myself? The railing is cold. So cold. Cold enough to let go. Why am I holding on to the railing? Where did that guy go? That's when I see him. That's when I see me. He notices too. He's much more in shock than I am. It's too late though, I made my decision. I'm here to end this. That's the only reason I'm here. Who does this guy think he is, to approach me and act like he can relate! He hasn't the slightest clue what I'm going through. That's when he spoke. "Thank You" he exclaimed. "My life was over, just as yours is about to be. I feel sadness in my heart but it's nothing compared to the one that you feel now. I don't know how, or why, but God has graced me with a second chance." That was me. Now it was him. I get even more flustered with the confusion of what had just happened. That's it, I've been here long enough. I let go. My hands hurt from the cold. My heart hurts from disappointment. I look at him one last time. He smiles. I can feel my body falling from the safety of the bridge. It'll only be a few seconds before my body hits the water. 

What's left of the real me is happy, I had a real chance of making something of who I was. Now I gave this man who I didn't know the  opportunity of renewed life. I saved him.

     |-| 
|-| cob7qqj || 52 || Every system has a flaw; and that flaw is usually the human element.  
Except in this time, one thousand years from my place of origin, humans were no longer particularly involved in the grand scheme of things. Machine brains ran everything, with machine ants running to-and-fro for the machine brains - like a hive of metal wasps, colourful, impervious and dangerous.  
But they almost certainly had a flaw somewhere. Nothing is perfect.  
And I was going to find it.  

If you want to know about how crimes are committed, go talk to criminals.  
Conveniently, criminals are always rounded up and put together, where you can pump them for information and pry out their secrets. Seeing as how I was as wet as a newborn in this time, even the knowledge of criminals who had been stupid or careless enough to get caught was going to be hugely advantageous to me.  
Getting into prison wasn't hard. I had no 'eIdent' and I wasn't on any government file, so as soon as I flouted the law by mugging a guy, the machine coppers picked me up and chucked me in the gaol before I could blink.  
This was convenient for another reason; it gave me an 'eIdent' - they stuck a needle into my neck and now I have a little piece of a machine brain inside me. You can bet I was going to figure out its secrets, but for now I had more important matters to attend to.

People in this time are weak, I concluded.  
Life was too easy, too many luxuries. The food in gaol was magnificent and there was a plethora of entertainment. I seriously considered just staying here and living it up, but I figured that if this was how *prisoners* lived, the life of the filthy rich must be practically Nirvana.  
Guile, brawn and mental toughness set me up in a position of power within the prison. I kept my behaviour just bad enough to stay in, but good enough that I always had the hope of release around the corner, whenever I wanted it.  
After three years in the joint, I had assimilated enough knowledge about this time and how it worked, so I figured it was time to leave behind these lesser crooks and find some bigger fish to hang out with.

'Hacking' they called breaking into the machine brains. Turns out I had a natural talent for it, just like I had for memorising the routes of guards and maps of buildings. Some guy said I had an 'eidetic memory' and that it made me like a machine.  
Well good. To beat the machine brains I needed to think like a machine brain.  
As I wriggled through the increasingly socially complex layers of the criminal world, I gained more and more 'wetware'. It surprised me how much I enjoyed becoming part of the machine world, but I kept a wary watch on myself, remembering my flesh, blood and bone origins.  
I learned that the machines had many weaknesses - the primary one being that they had been *created* by humans and were therefore riddled with human failures.  
I remembered back to when I'd first seen the police droids and thought about how perfectly impervious they had seemed before; polished metal skin throwing up halos of neon light, insect-like antennae and blank, inscrutable faces.  
Now they seemed nothing more than piles of code to be manipulated; puzzles that were a few steps away from being solved.  
I was ready. |-| 
|-| cobkawz || 54 || We make our own destiny. 

It's what  my father always told me, anyway. But I don't think it's true, not always.

Sometimes life has to give you a hand. A push, for good luck.

First time I noticed my name, she was on Fallon. Talking about it, too.

"I need to find Jim Paxton", she said. "Jim Francis Paxton" she said, showing the tattoo to the cameras and the world, and Fallon said something stupid, like "Pleasure to meet 
you, I'm Mr. Paxton", and everyone laughed.

Debra Hallaway was looking for her soul mate, and the whole world was watching.

Watching her gigantic mansion. Her pretty, straight blue eyes. Her body and her smile, and the 
millions her latest movie made at the box office.

"We make our own destiny, Jim", father would tell me, every night before I went to bed.

He never found the girl printed on his arm, and he settled for mom.

I guess that's what he meant with that. That he was bitter.

*I won't be bitter*, I think, pulling my sleeve up. Debra Hallaway's name stares back at me.

PURCHASE TICKET TO LOS ANGELES? The computer asks me.

Yes, I reply.



_________________________



It was a June wedding, which meant flowers and nice weather by the Malibu sand. Few people. No media.

Debra was all smiles afterwards, during the interview at the Plaza.

"Everyone needs to go after their dreams", she said, in her soft, sensual voice, to the microphone. "Everyone needs 
to find their love." And she brushed her hand over my name on her forearm.

And I rubbed my hand over hers, and I smiled to the camera.

"Hallaway and Paxton Wedding - Affair of the Year", People's Magazine called it.

We make our own destiny, my father would say.

I agree, to some extent.

But he was bitter. I'm proactive.

___________________



*Proactive* is not really the right word, I think, staring at the tombstone.

But we do make our own destiny, yes.

It's just that life has to give us a push, so we can take care of the rest.

Like giving you the same name as someone else.

Someone with a better life.

It's not so much that you make your own destiny... It's more like, sometimes, you get the chance to steal someone else's.

I lower a flower to the grave, and I whisper "thank you", to Jim Francis Paxton. The other one.

The one whose life I stole.

"Pretty name, this one we share", I say, getting up.

Back in the car, Debra asks me who it was that I was mourning.

"Just a guy who helped me a lot", I say, giving her a soft kiss.

The driver takes off.



I have to remember to retouch my tattoo.

________________

*Thanks for reading! If you like this, check out my new subreddit, /r/psycho_alpaca!* |-| 
|-| cobkfa4 || 17 || Nothing. Nothing. Zilch. Nada. Same ol’ same ol’. “God,” I sighed. “Television sucks!”

My roommate Cindy took a huge bong rip. She held it in. I grabbed the bong from her as her face turned red, and she shook her hands. She exhaled and started coughing. “Nah. You just gotta look at it the right way,” she said between coughs.

“Like what?”

Cindy turned to the E! channel . Something with celebrities and a red carpet. “Like this. Let’s watch this.”

I cleaned out and repacked the bowl. “Why? What the hell is the point of people describing their outfits?”

Cindy laughed and pointed. “For this.” On the screen was Nate Campbell: hunk du jour. “Look at him.” She giggled. “He’s wearing a sleeveless suit.”

I rolled my eyes and got ready to smoke. “You can even see his soul mate tattoo. Real classy.”

Cindy got out of her seat and sat in front of the television. “It looks like his tattoo says…” she squinted and then her eyes went wide. “It says your name, Dee.”

I choked halfway through a bong rip. I coughed and choked and sputtered. “What?”

Cindy paused the broadcast and pointed at Campbell’s arm. “Right there. Dee Sniggle.”

I set down the bong and pounded on my chest. “What?”

Cindy tapped the TV screen. “Look. Right there. Right there.”

I leaned back on the couch and ran my hands through my hair. “Really? Really?”

Cindy laughed. “Yep. Too bad you’re not straight.”
_______
Thanks for reading! If you enjoyed this check out my subreddit /r/Puns_are_Lazy.
 |-| 
|-| cobkx4d || 17 || I was watching a report on the U.N. when I noticed it. Emma Watson's tattoo was peaking unnoticed in he background. It had been the talk of reddit for years, Photoshop making the front page with unidan, and the likes on her mid left chest, above her heart. But for just an instant, in the background, she absent mindedly scratched her shoulder, and the strap fell off just so. Nothing was explicitly exposed, only the tattoo.

For once I would finally make the front page, and hopefully unite her to her soul mate. Hopefully it wouldn't be downed to hell out of envy though. I could only hope. So, with my dvr, already holding the current show, I recorded it, and went to the other room with my 50" flat screen playing big bang theory. I asked the remote from my mom to check something ready quick. She protested, but I wouldn't budge. She handed it to me and got up to refill her water. I pulled up the channel and rewinded to the part. Frame by frame I came to the part that played just a minute ago.

I caught the last name fist, moose. Who's last name is moose? Oh well. His middle name next, Lee? No, it only had one E. Whatever. His first name? Streetlamp! Who the hell names their kid Streetlamp LeMoose? 

My mom walked back into the room, and I told her the news. She spat out water mid drink, like in the movies. 

"What?"

"I need to tell you something."

She pulled out my birth certificate, from my birth parents. She told me before that I had been given a ridiculous name at birth, so they changed it. I stared at the paper. My birth name, Streetlamp LeMoose, burned into the paper.

No one can deny Streetlamp his destiny forever. No one. |-| 
|-| cobkggo || 5 || I was hoping no one would notice, but they did. On his arm was my name, and my whole family held their breath and slowly turned to me. Before anyone could speak, I left the room like a busy whirl-wind. I needed to think about this and re-examine my life, my future, my husband? Was it really my name on his arm? Maybe it was misspelled, or the "a" looked like a "u," but who am I trying to fool, we all have weird captcha names with numbers and that one was mine. I am anything but excited about this. Soulmate? Him? Really? I like all the movies he is in, but I don't think it would work. Is he going to want kids? Wait! The name on my arm is not his name! It can't be him! Unless he is using a stage name...I don't wan't to google this, but I have to know. Aww Hell! Well Wikipedia is not always right, but his fan page should have...his name is...on- my- arm. This can't be right! I'm not gay! |-| 
|-| cobw0zu || 5 || Brandon stood there, looking off the edge of the cliff in the middle of nowhere. He saw James desperately clinging onto the edge, quickly losing his grip. 

"You have to get me up from this cliff," James croaked in a moment of desperation.

"I fear you misunderstand the definition of an assassin, my friend."

Even in his current predicament, James had the audacity to laugh.

"I fear it is you who misunderstands. The situation, that is. Look around you; this is my territory." His breath became shallow, and his right hand lost its grip. "You damaged your car too badly while chasing me here – you'll never make it back to civilization in that. You'll have to take my car."

James pulled out a set of keys from his pocket. "It's tailored to my handprint. Any attempt to hotwire my vehicle will result in a… fiery conclusion. You're smart man – but you're not an explosives expert. Oh, sure, you can try to make it out of here by foot, but I predict you'll get dysentery first. Did you know half the people who have ever lived have died of malaria?"

Brandon weighed the situation carefully, but quickly. It was true that James knew this particular area of Mexico, and that the car chase had let them here on purpose. Brandon cursed himself from under his breath, and pulled him up. 

James laughed, as he always did. Brandon and come to recognize that laugh very well, hating the sound every single time. He took a step back as he let his rival regain his footing. He made sure James made no sudden movements, pointing the gun directly at his chest the entire time.

"So, you have the keys to a car that only work under your fingerprint. I'm the one with the gun."

And so they stood there. 

Edit: 4:00 in the morning – dead tired. Anyone is free to pick up the story from here. 

 |-| 
|-| cobf479 || 38 || The first thing an instructor teaches his or her apprentice is power control.  Fitting to look back to the beginning, his beginning, at what he knew to be his last moments.

"We have three sources.  The world around you should be your first.  Feel the ebb and flow of the ley lines of the earth and draw the energy that nature freely gives as it breathes life.  Your natural reserves, the strength in your muscles, your bones, should be your second.  It is always best to use a compound of fuel.  Nature's energies blend well with our own.  It can be taxing, but a good lesson learned on your limits," Tai'Mon's instructor hadn't looked a day over 45 during his first lesson, but he could see her true age, even in his days as an initiate.  The aura she cast, compressed around her, radiated with wisdom and depth, but in between he could see her weariness.  To bear such a burden of power would weigh on anyone.

Even now he heard her instructions, the lessons she had engraved into his very mind bones with care and love, whispering into his ear as if she stood behind him.  Tai'Mon staggered back as his enemy launched another wave of energy into his attack, the roiling storm of light and fire emitting from his staff twisting the air into a shadowy red as the very earth trembled.

"You've grown weak old man!" Tai'Mon's ears heard the taunt, but his mind did not.  The muscles in his jaw flexed as he fought the fatigue creeping through his body.

"Posture Tai'Mon!  Your body is not the source of power, it is the conduit.  You must guide its flow!  Your veins are like rivers.  Open the channels to let the energies reach their destinations!" she had shouted at him during his secondary examinations.

Tai'Mon eased his left leg back, rotating his staff so the bladed end was pointed towards the earth.  He lowered his weight, rocking his upper torso back and forth as if swayed by the ocean waves.  The aura of his might changed color from faded blues and greens to a seething gold and white cyclone.  His eyes followed the lighted roar of his will striking out against his enemy's.  Where the opposing streams met, he could see phantoms clashing.  Great armored knights, their swords and shields raised to meet gnashing teeth and shadowed spectres.

"Do not forget the importance of will.  Will gives your power form.  A strong will can make your spells hard, sharp enough to cut through even the strongest of defenses.  A weak will leaves you brittle, soft like a ship breaking against the storm."

Teeth gritted against the sound that screamed into the air, Tai'Mon took stock of his surroundings.  The trees had withered to gray, their once proud heads barren of lush greens.  The flowers, wilted and robbed of the color, began to turn to dust to be carried into the air by the ravenous winds.  Deep groves began to form in the earth as the soil cracked beneath Tai'Mon's feet.

"Your soul is your last resort.  It is said that the greatest among us walk a path of equal parts wonder and ruin.  There may come a day when the earth will not feed you, when the strength of your body fails you.  On this day, your soul must be enough.  Strength of soul, Tai'Mon, can only be gained through strength in life.  Do not forget to live.  Do not forget to love.  Let power not be your quest, for if you should face an enemy that you cannot overcome, the life you lived will fail you and your soul will refuse to give you strength," she had said, smiling sadly as she parted from him.

"This body has," Tai'Mon shouted back.  He heard the words now, his face locked in grim expectation.  He stood against the hateful pressure that railed against him and closed his eyes.  From deep within he felt a stirring, warm and afraid, but resonating with strength.  He smiled.  He had filled the stores of his soul well.

"Old fool.  You think your soul is enough?  I sustain by my strength alone and the earth will no longer help you.  You have failed.  Just as you failed your teacher.  Just as you failed your family.  Just as you failed me."

"Yes.  I have indeed failed.  So the price of my soul must suffice for these failures.  For both of us, I hope it will be payment enough," Tai'Mon began to push.

Laughter filled his heart as his staff groaned from the sudden flush of power.  He could feel it protest, reluctant to take from its master a power it could not return, but it accepted it soon as it understood.  There would be no return from this.

The memories began to rise from the vault he had created in his soul.  The giggles of children in a happy home, running around the morning table.  Tai'Mon saw but a glimpse of his wife, a second of a smile as she turned from the kitchen sink to embrace him.  He reached out to touch the phantom of her memory, but it was gone but a blink later, pulled into his spell to give it force.

Another vision surged - his hands pressed and pulled against her body, his lips sought hers as her face turned skyward and her back arced.  He felt her quiver as he moved against her, his breaths matching hers in melody that completed them both.  He closed his eyes as the image was ripped from him.

Each stolen memory sent surges of pain to the deepest corner of himself and with it, his staff blossomed with newly found ferocity.

Then Tai'Mon saw his happiest moment - a young boy's eyes, wide in wonder, reaching out to touch Tai'Mon's cloak.  The young boy looked up.  What a mountain Tai'Mon must have looked to him.  Tai'Mon saw his younger self's lips move to speak, lighting up the young boy's face with a smile.  Tears poured from Tai'Mon's eyes as the memory lingered.

"Will you teach me about the world?  Will you show me adventure?" the young boy had said.

"Yes, if you will let me."

And then an eruption.  The very air shrieked as the final vestiges of Tai'Mon's soul poured into his staff.  He surrendered his last breaths, his body no longer weighed down as his  feet rose from the earth.

"No!" Tai'Mon heard his enemy cry out in fear.

"I am sorry," Tai'Mon whispered.  As the light of his life exploded into the air in a thundering resound to the heavens, Tai'Mon smiled at last, and was free. |-| 
|-| cobsrff || 4 || "Unlike mankind, the laws of magic are impartial. They make no exceptions." Shar repeated the words his master had once told him. The footsteps echoed in the dark, each thump matching the beat of Shar's heart. 

"Magic can only be utilized by those with the will! The strength of your magic is determined by your will, the capacity is determined by your soul. Use too much at a time and it will drive you mad..." The teachings of his master were returning one last time.

"The first law!" Shar yelled, "Magic comes from within!" The royal army was fast approaching from the South, ready to take Shar's head for high treason. They came in droves, not sparing any expense to take him down. His robe billowed in the wind as he stared down the mountain side at the approaching enemy. Shar began his rhythmic breathing. Letting all of the magic within his soul reach every inch of his body. The flow of magic within was becoming weaker. It would be his last battle. 

"Your breathing is imperative! Without it, your magic will be shallow. You forget to breathe, you forget to live..." The second teaching rang in Shar's head.

"The second law!" Taking a deep breath, Shar released a magical burst from his mouth. "Magic moves as one's own body moves!" A sound burst of magic ran its way down the mountainside enveloping the army in a shockwave. The earth began to shake down below. The army split to either side of the crack in the earth. His grave had been dug.

"The most important lesson I can teach you Shar. Are you listening Shar? The first two lessons were about your inner magical control, but you must be able to expel your magic properly. You cannot release your magic at a constant rate. If you do, it will have no effect on its way out. You MUST release magic in bursts!" The final lesson.

"The third and final law!" Shar paused gathering the last bit of his strength toward the exterior of his body. Feeling all of the magic bursting at his fingertips his voice bellowed in a rage of wisdom. "No matter how much you try to contain it... Magic will push through all barriers!" The entire mountain shook behind Shar. A violent eruption came from behind him. Clouds formed in the sky above the split army. Shar let loose the energy he had been holding back and released it all at once.  Pouring all his soul into the burst made Shar's body feel lighter. As more magic ran down the mountainside it began to form into a wave of all four elements. The face of the mountain burst into flames. Jagged rocks fell off the edge toward the bottom. Geysers shot out of the side. All of this was driven by the original wind that had now turned into a gale. The raging elemental storm raced its way toward the army. Many began to retreat. The army had lost its morale by the sheer force of Shar's will. The storm continued its path wrecking havoc along the way. Approaching the bottom it had gained even more energy now exploding its way down. The violent burst began creating fissures along the mountain. Now feet from the remaining army it continued its path kicking up a giant dust cloud hiding the army from sight.

When the cloud had dissipated the army was revealed to still be standing undamaged. Shar looked to the sky with a smile on his face. His body was fading, soon the only thing that would remain would be his robe. Starting from his feet and rising up, his body was crumbling into dust. With his final breath he said, "Shar's law: Magic must not be used to cause harm." |-| 
|-| cob9w4y || 30 || I guess I always knew it was coming. He was so good, so pure and wanted, while I was just... There. I appeared by his side, and they would say, "Oh, that must be the girl he's dating. What does he actually see in her?" And I knew they were right - there was nothing much there to begin with, nothing much for him to love.

But now, he's told me he's leaving. And I suppose I thought maybe, just maybe, he wouldn't. I thought maybe I was actually enough for him, and looking back, I couldn't have been more foolish. While he was everyone's friend, everyone's first love, I fell into the shadows. I was weird, they all said - I was the one people would forget about. Hiding up in a room, reading books to pass the time, rather than going out to meet others. Why had he ever loved me in the first place, I wonder? Was I mysterious, because I was so removed from everyone else? Was I intriguing for the way I thought, or simply the way I moved?

Now she's come along, as bright and pure as he is. Silken hair and glowing in everything she does, he was bound to love her. I understand, and I will let him go. I have never loved anyone this way in my life, and I'm sure I never will again - but I will not keep him, I will not dissuade him. He will be happy with her, the girl with silken hair, and I will be happy to watch him thrive. |-| 
|-| cobaudh || 10 || I guess it's done. It's finally over. 

I wonder if it even matters what I do now. I obviously can't stay here. Where will I go? Will he miss me once I leave? Should I leave something to remind him of me? That would be cruel. 

He'd just throw it away, wouldn't he? Maybe burn it, to exorcise the evil. 

That's what I am. Evil. Evil, dirty, stupid, heartless, selfish bitch. I never deserved him. He's worth so much more than me. So much better than I am. Always holding it over my head that I was his only one, and I was just a gutter-slut that “Mr. Perfect” saved from a life of sin. Well, fuck him. Fuck him for being so damned self-righteous.  I didn't ask for his love. I didn't want it to begin with. So, now it's done and I can just curl up and die alone, like I was meant to be. 

He'll be better off now. He can wash his hands of me finally, and find someone new. Someone that can be faithful. Someone that won't crawl into someone else's bed just looking for some warmth without the suspicion. Gaah, who am I kidding? It couldn't have ended any other way. He always said I'd end up fucking around on him, and I've just proved him right, that's all. 

He’s always been right. He’s always been so amazing, and perfect. I can’t believe I’ve lost him for real. He won’t even look at me anymore. It’s like I’ve become invisible to him and he’s already moved on. Forgotten all about me like I’ve always feared he would. Why can’t he love me the way I love him? Why can’t he love me how I am? Why can’t we go back to the beginning and just stay at that chilly little cabin in the mountains. Just curled up under the quilts, exploring each other’s bodies and souls. Every breath matched and reciprocated, melding into each other. When did I stop feeling that? When did he stop touching me that way? Why did I think anyone else’s touch would feel that good?

It’s all finally come to an end, no more drama, no more silent reproaches, no more screaming hysterical fits. This feels like I’m ripping off my own arm. Like a coyote biting off it’s own damn leg to get out of a trap. That’s what this has become. A trap. A bottomless hole of grief and rage and loneliness. Oh god. What will I do without him? Why would I want to live without him? What’s the point if he’s not there? Nothing matters. Nothing at all matters. I don’t matter. 
 |-| 
|-| cobb3lx || 8 || Fourteen years.  Fourteen years, nearly nine of which were in blissful matrimony ended in an instant.  Well, I guess it was only blissful because of my ignorance.  I never knew there was a problem. I never knew what she was feeling for REAL in the end.  Always "okay", always "fine"--even after pressing.  Then I got tired of pressing, and then I got angry.  Why would she turn away from me after all I have done for her?  I gave up my friends, left my job, moved, sold out my family, lived my life solely and completely for her.  I gave her everything, and in the end I got nothing.

Why in the end after being so faithful, so loving, so caring, and willing to do literally everything for her, would she fall in love with another man?  Let alone my boss.  The grief and agony is indescribable.  Repress it. Hide it. Say its okay.  Let her have her fun. She'll come back.  She'll come back.  No. The alcohol finally revealed my feelings.  She knows. She blames me for everything.  I "repressed" her. I "suffocated" her. I "trapped" her.  It was all my fault--by giving her everything, she couldn't do anything.  The knight in shining armor was hiding the inky cloak of deception.

I tried to help. I wanted to help. I did everything and gave everything--my life, my health, my sanity--to make her happy.  Maybe one day, she'll understand.  Maybe one day, I'll understand. |-| 
|-| coba819 || 8 || We sat there quietly before he finally spoke up. "It's over," he said. 

He stood up, picked up his belongings and turned towards the door. As he placed his hand on the doorknob, he stopped. A moment of hope filled my heart as he turned around. "Whoops," the old man said, picking up his stethoscope. "Almost forgot this!"

The solemn look on our faces wiped the small grin from his senile face, as he closed the door behind him.

As she lay there silently in bed, all I could do was hold her hand. Minutes pass before I'm finally able to clear my throat. "I..."

She looked up at me with her tired eyes. 

"...I love you."

She blinked a small tear from her eye, too tired to say anything. She breathed in deeply as if she had something to say, but before I knew it, she was gone. 

The minutes that followed felt like hours, as I felt my face tingle and my chest grow numb. I knew what needed to be done.

*She's waiting for me,* I thought, as I raised the revolver to my temple. |-| 
|-| cobgif8 || 5 || *I wrote a song for this prompt, written from the perspective of someone whose love is a solider. Listen [here](http://clyp.it/3uzoyvtt); lyrics below.*

**I'm Never Letting Go**

On the day you left, you swore to come back.  
You said the thought of my face would see you through.  
Since you've been gone, I've cried one million tears,  
one for each of my fears.  

I know you had to leave  
for love of country,  
but when I get you back in my arms,  
I'm never letting go.  

I write to you each night to feel like you're near;  
phone calls and your voice are too rare.  
Since you've been gone, I've sighed one million sighs,  
one for each time I wondered why.  
CHORUS  

I know the time apart is hard on our hearts,  
but it will make us stronger in the end.  
Is it the end?  
CHORUS  
 |-| 
|-| cobd7ty || 5 || "Why do you have meth in your room?". I re-read the text over and over trying to understand what she was talking about. I don't have meth nor have I ever done it before. "I don't have meth" I replied. "Crack, wtv". My mind starts racing. She is very anti-drug and resents any one who has done, or does drugs. 

Then it hits me. There's a small baggie of ketamine I've kept in my closet as a memento from when I first tried it. I didn't enjoy it and ended up having left over. I used to hang out with a bad crowd before I met her. Before I got clean. 

After calling her multiple times to explain myself, she writes "you can tell me about your drug problem later". She never ended up believing me. We stopped talking to each other shortly after that. She had left me. It was over. 

A few months go by and it's the summer. I end up throwing a house party and invite a lot of my good friends. On a whim, I decide to invite her best friend, Lisa. Towards the end of the night I end up sleeping with Lisa. Payback's a bitch. 

Lying together in bed we start talking about my ex, Jolene. "I can't believe she never believed me or that she didn't want to make things work out." I told her. "You know that's just an excuse she gave you right? That's not the real reason she left you."

"What do you mean?" I ask

"She started sleeping with her roommate and fell in love with him. She didn't want to tell you so she used drugs as an excuse to leave you"

Silence. I start feel my gut churning. Exasperated and lost for words. My mind is racing again. 

"I don't know why you're still hung up about her. She treated you like shit. You were always a back-up plan to her anyways. If no other guy gave her attention, she would turn to you. She never saw the two of you as exclusive or serious" 

"I can't believe what I'm hearing"

"Don't stress about it. Besides, her roommate is a loser compared to you. I mean, he's a drug dealer for God's sake"

That's it. She left me for a drug dealer. Everything I thought I knew was a lie. She never loved me. The relationship was only one way. All the memories together, good for nothing.  |-| 
|-| cobacom || 4 || “There’s never enough time is there?” I ask her. She shrugs helplessly as we both stand by the door. “You think things are always going to be one way, and that the other person is permanently fixed in your life. They feel like a part of you, like a third hemisphere to your brain, or another limb. I’ve heard psychologists say that amputees can still experience pain from limbs they don’t have anymore. I guess that’s what this is. Even though they’re not going to be around anymore their absence kind of leaves a hole in you that you need to fill with something else. It’s weird to think of a hole causing pain. Holes are just to be something missing. They’re supposed to be nothing, but I guess if that nothing is supposed to be a something then your brain tells you you’re hurting, and will keep hurting you until you get it back.” I take a deep breath and sigh, biting my lip.

“Still though, ivy league? Who would’ve thought our little Jenny would’ve gotten a full ride to Harvard. I am so proud of our daughter.” I tell my wife. She smiles and puts a hand on my collar.

“And she’ll still call home. She’s a good girl, and there are other uses for the time we were spending with her.” |-| 
|-| cobbud4 || 4 || Although I have agreed with our parting, it doesn't make it any easier. I mean, I get it. I really do. Who am I to hold her back? Who am I to take away a little girl's dreams? Ha! Who am I kidding, she's a grown woman - the most gorgeous woman I've ever seen.
&amp;nbsp;

For her, her dreams have always been the same. She always knew what she wanted. It was what I admired about her; she was strong, determined and driven.
&amp;nbsp;

And I always knew she had it in her to achieve it all. In fact, to be honest, right from the beginning I knew this day would come. I'm not interested in a career, or anything really. I'm quite content with floating by in life - it suits me. But not her. She shines, brighter than any star in the sky. And she knows it, but it doesn't go to her head. She connects with everyone she meets because she just has this charisma that I've never really seen in another person before. She's humble and kind and beautiful and...God...why did I agree to this? Because I'd just get in the way. That much has become apparent in the last few months anyway. I just get under her feet with my inane questions, and my social inept-ness stops her from blossoming when we're out with others. I don't want to be that guy. I don't want to be the one that stops all her progress and says "but you love me, right?", "you'll stay with me, right?". No. I don't want that. I want her to have everything she ever dreamed of. That's how I know she's the love of my life.
&amp;nbsp;

When I go to sleep, I see the two of us in a condo by the sea. Three little ones running around, pulling on our Labs fluffy tail. But he's so old he doesn't care. And we laugh at his grumpy face and that sets the kids off. And we all roll around on the rug, laughing until their tummies hurt and our joyful tears have left dark spots on the fabric beneath us.
&amp;nbsp;

But she dreams of high flying adventures in the corporate jungle and I know that one day she'll become Queen of some industrial tribe - happily barking orders at those below the canopy of her CEO foliage. That sounds sort of silly when I say it out loud but she inspires this crazy creativity in me that I can't explain and I dread the day that both her and her spark will be gone. |-| 
|-| cobedf7 || 4 || darling, darling,

Do not speak.

Your sweet wasting words

erode my mind

and heart.

.

if you love me,

Close your eyes;

release me from the clever gaze 

that holds me prisoner

by an open door.

.

darling, lovely,

Touch me not.

you are fire on paper skin,

and your brief warmth

is not worth the ashes.

.

ashes, ashes,

lovely darling - 

Keep your distance.

Keep your promises. |-| 
|-| cobjfro || 5 || This writing prompt hits home as I have recently broken up with my significant other as of 1-25-2015. 

She had been sliding away from me steadily at an almost imperceptibly flat angle. It took years to even notice the gap but when I did I intervened with love to give friction to the slope but as friction goes it only made the course rougher and the distance away from me remained. 

Onward marched time and with it the gap widened, we were barely touching, I had to reach out to feel her and feel connected to her now. We were co-pilots she my constant passenger- my support - my foundation.

Time withered on. Her eyes started to wander from the path ahead of us and myself. She became fascinated with dextromethorphan and the introspection it gave her. She would drink a bottle and lose herself while I lost her. Several bad decisions later she would be high- out of her mind for days and I enabled her. We fought over her usage but it was plain to see if there was a choice to be made I'd be the one given up. 

Words turned sour, we became generals tending the gap and widening our boarders. I argued for love and peace she argued for love and change. We chose our weapons; I chose truth, she chose lies. In the end it was I who was the one that went nuclear eventually hitting the kill switch on the relationship. 

She ejected from her position as goose, my co-pilot, and fell into the arms of another man. She wanted to continue- she finally had it all. She had her drugs, i didn't realize she was stealing. She had her love, he talked to her for hours on the phone, I pretended I didn't her hear say "I love you" to him. She had no stress, having conned me into believing her work was toxic for her and not the other way around, she quit.

I understand why she left... It's because I told her to... |-| 
|-| cobnn6o || 4 || It's hard to stay tethered to someone who is so unstable themselves. When the only thing holding you to Earth is a tiny white capsule taken with each meal, it's hard to find someone willing to put up with you, and when you do, it's even harder to make them stay. 


When the mania sets in and you can't remain loyal or clean, it's hard to find someone to forgive you. When the depression sets in and you can't get out of bed in the morning, it's hard to find someone who will be patient for you. When you feel so high, you can't begin to rationalize doing something that would make you come down, it's hard to find someone who will drag you back from the edge. When you feel so exhausted you can't even order take out, it's hard to find someone to help feed you. When you swing back and forth, back and forth, backandfortchbackandforth, it's hard to find someone who love all three of you, the manic, the depressive, and the other one. 

 |-| 
|-| cob9wgx || 3 || &amp;nbsp;
I convinced everyone it was an accident, but I told her the truth and she promised not to turn me in. I'm not sure if this is better. Either way, I can't have her, it's just that... The truth is supposed to set you free. That's some bullshit, just so you know. I don't feel better now. She certainly doesn't feel better now. Leaving me is the only thing that can make her come close to feeling better now. But I don't have anyone to leave. He just wouldn't stop crying. I was so tired. I'm sorry. |-| 
|-| cobc2a2 || 4 || What’s a better feeling than a stranger being able to put something into words that’s just true? As if they knew you. 
 
“I’ve been in love only once. When I was a teenager. Since then, I’d have relationships, but nothing comes close to this thing I had years ago.” This is what an 60-something year old singer said in a TV interview and also what I told Nancy on the phone. It was exciting to tell someone this new piece of epiphany. Especially Nancy. Nancy would always understand me. I didn’t notice the prolonged silence.

“You know, things like this are why I didn’t want to have so much contact right after we broke up.” 

Did I upset her? I think I upset her.

“No, don’t get me wrong”, I explained. “I just wanted to tell you that I’m okay. That it’s not a big deal for me to be single. Maybe I don’t need another relationship. Maybe that’s fine.”

I could hear her sight. 

“It’s just that I really like talking to you”, I said. She was the only person who really got me, and I told her this. And I told her that I was totally over her.

“You are saying this every time we talk.”, she said. “It’s been eight months. To be honest, I don’t even think about us that much anymore. But you seem to still be caught up in this relationship. How can we be friends if this is such a big topic between us?”

My voice stayed low and clear as always when I once more explained to her how much I appreciate our talks and being friends. “We could always tell each other everything.”

“But what if I don’t want to tell you everything? Ben, I have other people for this. I’m uncomfortable to still be connected so closely. I don’t want to be this person for you. Hell, I broke up with you because I didn’t want to be this person!” She was upset and I was sorry to get her into this state. I just wanted to make everything okay for her. She was my little Nancy I cared for during school and after, when we became a couple. And I wanted to always care for her. All of her problems - family, depression, eating disorders - were familiar to me. It would be good for her if I stayed. Even just as a guard.

“Don’t you see how emotionally dependent we were?”, she said, as if that was a bad thing. “We’ve always been in our small world made of two people. That’s not right! That’s not healthy.” 

I could grasp what she meant, but not the problem. “We just share a lot of opinions.”

“No, that’s not it. We nearly became the same person. I’ve had issues. And I am grateful that you were there for me. But I wasn’t happy.” I was speechless when she listed the fears she had. How every critical word I said played with her mind. How she felt freed when she left the country for a few month to work abroad. “And I have the strong feeling that you are still dependent on me”, she added. 

With just a few sentences she shed a totally different light on our relationship. Little details I never gave a thought meant the world to her. And this all stayed inside her. She wouldn’t tell them, and I wouldn’t notice. A feeling of helplessness welled up inside of me. Also tears. 

“Nancy. I think I need to think about this for some time. It’s possible that I won’t call you for some weeks.”

“Take you time”, she said.

I hung up.
 |-| 
|-| coblec8 || 3 || It hurts.  More than any hurt I can remember... But I understand.  You're standing up for what you believe in.  That's what I always liked about you. You never sacrificed your ideals for comfort.  I wish I had never told you.  I just thought... I thought maybe if I was sweet enough, and thoughtful enough, and never treated you like anything but the amazing girl that you are... That in the end you could look past it.  I thought if you knew that I would never make fun of your beliefs, if I treated them with respect... But it's okay.  Some people are only a temporary part of your life.  I know you'll find "the one" someday, and I will too.  And I wish you all the happiness in the world.  Be well, L |-| 
|-| cobr6qz || 4 || "Thank you."

Then she was gone. A kiss on the cheek, sending flashbacks to the hot sweaty nights we had enjoyed. A wave, somewhat halfhearted and that last glance. As I shut the door and braced my body, I waited for the tears to come. As I slid down the door I thought of our old goodbyes. We had a thing of saying, "rawr rawr rawr", whenever one of use had to go somewhere. Back in high school, it was when I was dropping her off. Lately, it had fallen into disuse as we had spent every moment together. Up until that fateful night. 

We had a fight, she slammed the door as she was storming out and went to her favorite bar. I never did know which one it was. Anyways, she was at her favorite watering hole playing pool and downing a not totally unreasonable amount of beer. She was one a winning streak for once, and game after game she had a new opponent. Until one guy came up and wiped her out in three turns. I felt a half smile as I thought of her first reaction: pure unbridled rage, as she put it. She waited her turn and the next time she played him, it was a much closer game. She got his name, returned home and told me the story. We laughed about it.

Then a few weeks later, another stupid fight. This one was my fault. I had been too proud. I still remembered what I said as she was on her way out, as who could forget the worst thing they'd ever said? I said, "Find some other place to stay tonight!" I'm sure I had been drunk, and I apologized the next day, but at the time she wouldn't say where she had stayed. I assumed her friends, until later that week when I saw on Facebook that they had been on an exciting trip to Colorado. My worst fears began to grow inside of me, eating me up inside.

Then the final straw. She joked that maybe I could start doing the dishes. Something small, like it always was. I still can't remember why I went off the handle at something so minor. Maybe it was her tone, maybe it had been a rough day at work. In any case, the argument grew silent pretty quick. She always knew that I couldn't bear it when she didn't talk back. I pleaded for an explanation of why she was doing it, being silent. After a long pause, she started to explain what had happened. She had met somebody else. Somebody who treated her right. I was floored, I was angry, but I felt I had no choice but to let her explain. 

Through thick and thin we had been there for each other, but we were like bandaids healing previous wounds. My exes, her abusive family. We were there to give each other hope that we hadn't had before, she said. She placed her hand on my chest and said that it was time we finally let ourselves heal. I tried to put my hand on hers but she pulled away, and went to her room to start packing. I felt like time was standing still. She went all over the house, finding the boxes in the basement and the attic, all of her shoes, all of her clothes. The box of memories that she had kept for as long as I had known her. She went out front and waited on the front porch. 

After what felt like an eternity, I went out on the front porch. There she was, sitting on the bench swinging nervously. My tears had dried, and I asked if she minded if I sat down. She didn't. I sat beside her and thought long and hard about what I should say, what I could do. I thought of pleading, I thought of yelling, but suddenly I remembered something I had said long ago, when we had just started dating. 

"Does he make you happy?" I asked, the words almost too quiet to hear. She looked at me with tears in her eyes and barely cracked a smile. "Yes."

I nodded, gave her a hug, and walked to the door as a car pulled up. A respectable man stepped out of the drivers side and came to help carry things. I looked him in the eyes as he walked up the steps.

"Treat her right." He nodded. As I went into the house her voice called my name from the car. She put the box she was carrying into the trunk, spoke a few words to the new man and ran up to the house. Inside the doorway she stopped, breathless, beautiful, and a little excited. As she gave me a hug I heard her whisper, "thank you." Then a kiss on the cheek, the door was closed, and she was gone. As I slid down the door I softly whispered the words, "rawr rawr rawr". 

I just hoped that he would treat her better than I had.  |-| 
|-| cobss8t || 4 || I'm a pleaser. I've always done what I can to make people happy. I guess that when you can't say no you end up losing it all.

We met at a concert. She was wearing a red dress.. and she was beautiful. I guess that's why I put it on. That face that I put on to make her think, to make her believe that I was this outgoing, fun playboy. She smiled at me probably a dozen times before I got the hint, and by the time I did I was sure that she thought I wasn't interested. Still, I made my way over to her when it had quieted down, and somehow got her number. 

I knew I was hooked, but I didn't care. She was better than anyone, better than anything I had known in the past. This girl was going to be the girl I'd grow old with, and we'd be 80 and still kiss eachother on the cheek. We would be like my grandparents, bonded together to the end.

It was a couple of months before I told her I loved her. She had struck me as “The One” almost instantaneously, but the man code that all of us guys try to live by made it hard to say it. I took her out to a nice dinner, and we went out after. She was wearing a different dress, but I could still see her on that first night I met her. In a crowded bar with loud, live music I pulled her close and whispered it so only she could hear me. That was probably the greatest kiss I've ever gotten.

I was working 60 hours a week, but she was always on my mind. I felt like I had 60 hours more to take her out, and 60 hours to love on her at home.

When we went looking for apartments I wanted to give her whatever she wanted. The beautiful building to match her beautiful smile; The perfect location so that I could take her out and show her off; the perfect view so we could kiss when the sun set and make love in front of the city lights. And we found it. She begged for this place, and I couldn't say no. I jst knew that we'd be happy there. 
It wasn't three months that we spent there, in love, happy, before I started to feel the strain of the sheer cost taking a toll on my life. She may not have seen it, but I started to cut back. My scotch was replaced by cheap bourbon. I started filling my car up with regular gas. I.... I tried to cut back where she wouldn't see, but that wasn't enough. I discovered my credit card. The one I kept to pay bills that had been drawing straight out of an account. When we would go out and she'd want champagne I would smile and pull out that blue card. I knew what I was doing of course, but a future burden can never trump happiness today. 

I only wish I had known then what I know now. It was about six weeks ago that my life began to spiral out of control. My bills were finally catching up to me. I had long since seen my once fruitful checking account dwindle. Months had gone by since I had tasted the 17 year old Balvenie scotch that I had once held so dear. 

We went out less.

I worked more.

Still she stayed.

I knew that I had to do something. If I could make just a few more sales this month then I could keep her in the champagne lifestyle that she deserved. If I put in a few more phone calls that we would be able to pull through the mess that I had gotten us into.

Then it happened. I came home one day to a note.


 I never wanted to leave you, but I never see you anymore. I've been trying to talk to you about it for weeks, but all you can think about is work. I used to think that as long as me and you stuck together that nothing could come between us, but I was wrong. I just wanted to be happy with you. 


I was struck dumb for a second. Had she been trying to talk to me? I had been so tired from work that I could barely function at home. I read and reread the paper. 

You know those moments in movies where theres a really cheesy rewind? Where it fast-motions through everything and stops at just the right moment so that everything plays back exactly the way you need to see it. My mind has never worked that way. I wish it did because the next six hours was a blur of thought. I started thinking of everything I had done in the last month. 

It was three in the morning before I had an epiphany. I had been wrong all along. This girl loved ME. She didnt care about the apartment. Sure she liked it, but she wouldn't have put me under for it. Those nights that we went out she was wanting me to be happy. I had never said no. I had never said that it would be tough from a financial standpoint. I had been trying to please. So she had no idea that I was working myself to death trying to finance the lifetyle that I thought she deserved. She just wanted to be with me. I could have lived on the wrong side of town and answered phones for a living and she would've loved me. 

And here I sit. In an apartment I can't afford. With things I don't need, with no girl to tell me its ok, and no decent whiskey to drown the pain in, and I still can't bring myself to pick up the phone and tell her why. |-| 
|-| cobo24r || 3 || He had lost everyone. His mother died bringing him into the world. His father tried to work hard and that cost him driving home tired after a 16 hour week day pulling a all nighter with a sick 8 year old boy at home. His grandparents took him but they were elderly and passed on one right after another shortly after the stress of the new family came to them. The only foster mother he loved he lost to a freak piece of roofing that fell from the old house she could never afford to fix...so there it was as I stared at the test results proclaiming I had weeks if not days to live and I knew after I told him he would never walk back in my door... I have also lost the only thing I ever loved so at least this death will be welcome after all how could blame him? |-| 
|-| coboezd || 3 || Relief.

I don’t think I should be feeling relief.

I mean, out of all plausible emotions like shock, rage, shame, emptiness and sadness, is it normal to feel relief? It feels like my surroundings have been put on mute as I stare at the twisting features on his face, watching all those emotions being expressed in his furrowed brows, angry tears (why is he even angry?) and flailing hands.

Once upon a time, I loved those eyes so much. Those simpleton brown eyes that were so filled with kindness and love; when exactly did they start to give me cold, hard gazes?

I have to admit, it isn’t very attractive seeing him in pieces like this. I figure I should be feeling angry instead, be the one in pieces instead, but I can’t fight the overwhelming relief within me. His confession reaffirms that this relationship is over.

I would love a drink right now, or maybe a swim; in fact, just a good, long soak in bathtub will do. Probably not here though. I should call up L and see if I can takeover her awesome bathroom for an hour or so. My reason should be legit enough. Hey, L. Can I come over and use your bathtub? J just admitted to cheating on me so I think I’m going to let him be in the apartment by himself. Yeah, that should work. Where’s my phone?

“-going to do? Hey, are you listening to me?”

I snap out of my thoughts and look at him. Make the best out of your remaining moments with him, I remind myself, end this on a good note. This is already over, say your thanks and leave. You’ve been wanting to leave right? “Sorry, I zoned out for a bit.”   

As I watch his facial expression tighten, I sink back into my own thoughts again.

Yes.

I’ve been wanting to leave.

J isn’t my first love. I’ve had tons of crushes and fallen in love tons of time before him. But he was the first guy I committed to. The first guy I decide to commit to because I thought I could marry him one day, and when I commit, I make a promise to love him with all I have, no stupid mind games or push and pull, because I give my all. The ball is in his court. I have everything to lose, I suppose, but I can’t help the way I love.

For a while now, I have been fighting feelings that I want out. That I was getting more comfortable without seeing or contacting him for a day, a week, a month. Moreover, I’ve been dreading picking up his calls or replying his texts. I think ‘leave me alone’ is a rather large warning bell when you’re in a serious relationship. But I made a commitment. A promise. So I will try to make things work the best I can, given the fact that he still wants us to happen.

So when J admitted he had been seeing another girl and he doesn’t love me anymore, I felt relieved. Ah, I didn’t have to try anymore. He served the ball in another direction.

“J.”

His lengthy explanation is starting to give me a headache. For a cheater, he sure talks a lot.

“What you did is not okay, but I don’t need an explanation." I bite back the word 'excuse'. "I know this hasn’t been working out. I’ve tried. And I can’t try to make something that requires two people to work if you don’t try.”

He looks confused. Oh babe, are you confused that I’m calm?

I close the distance between us and pull him into one last hug. I can feel him tense under my touch. “You’re a dick for cheating, and I hope that’s the last time you do that to anyone ever.”

“I-”

“Let’s break up.” |-| 
|-| cobs4i4 || 7 || "one large Mushroom pie." i commanded into the cellphone

"do you want to add a liter of soda for another 5$?" asked the voice on the phone

"No thank you." i replied

"your pizza will be there in 30 minutes." said the man

I hung up the phone and pulled a twenty from my wallet. Damn i was hungry. |-| 
|-| cobmhry || 29 || The man's lean, gaunt, frame froze. There, on the ground, rested a single US $20 bill. In disbelief at his good fortune, he snatched it up, hid it inside his thin excuse for a jacket, and hobbled on.

He knew his luck wouldn't last long - but for today, he and his family would eat well. They'd suffered too much lately for him to save the money now - he needed to lift their spirits. 

A year later, life in North Korea hadn't improved. |-| 
|-| cobcetx || 16 || "What secret? Its magic. You're confusing an illusionist with a magician. Illusionists are talented, but they aren't the real deal. We are the real deal. Have been for ages." The instructor snapped his fingers to reveal a flame that lit the apprentice's cigarette. 

The apprentice took a long drag and released a ring of smoke into the dusty Miami sunset. "So tonight... On stage... Where did those doves come from? You mean to tell me they came from nowhere?"

"It took concentration and energy from the stars, of course." The magician took the cigarette from the apprentice's lips and placed it between his own. "Its something you have to meditate on for a while before you can really harness it at your own command. Spent a lot of time listening to Floyd albums while I meditated. Gave me a certain sense of calm. Everyone's got their thing when they meditate, some people its tea, some its incense, a few will even do weed. For me it was Pink Floyd records."

The apprentice gave a look that suggested she was waiting for the punchline of a joke. "I don't believe you." She finally said, looking back out on the sunset.

"Your ability to believe in it will effect your ability to harness it."

Both of them were silent; the apprentice was waiting for some sort of confirmation that this was a lie and the magician was simply sitting and enjoying the evening air. The apprentice finally said: "Okay, prove it to me. Play a song in my head."

"What song?" The magician asked.

"Any song."

"There's gotta be a song."

"Fine. What's the one in Clockwork Orange? Beethoven's ninth?"

As per request, the magician closed his eyes and the apprentice could hear with amazing clarity the song she had requested. Anyone else who may have been in their vicinity would not have been able to hear it. And for a moment she stood, her eyes facing the view from the balcony they were standing on and taking in the city accompanied by her new soundtrack. It was cut short after a long crescendo. The magician spoke to her. "Do you believe?" As he asked, a butterfly flew in from nowhere and landed on the apprentice's head.


"I believe."
  |-| 
|-| cobsvn7 || 3 || "So, it's real?"

"Yup."

"But we have to make it look fake?"

"Yup."

"But why?"

"Do you want those idiots to know you can actually disappear and reappear ten feet away? Do you want them to rob banks and fuck up the economy? Do you really want that?"

"Well, no, but--"

"No 'buts' dude. You can't let them know. Otherwise, well..."

"'Well' what?"

"Do you remember Frank?"

"Who's Frank?"

"Exactly." |-| 
|-| coghxin || 501 || I have more sympathy for cult leaders now than I used to. That may sound...convenient, but its true. I don't think anybody has ever been ready for what it feels like to be worshipped, and any criticisms from people who haven't been in my position ring hollow as a result.

The first blog post was a SMASH hit. I remember my sister showing me that it actually trended on twitter for a little while, I didn't even have a twitter profile, but I did after that day. I can't tell you how good that felt...there is no description that can describe the ecstasy...the catharsis...of having all of my opinions so *fucking* validated. 

It's living your greatest fantasy. Everyone fantasizes about such moments. Everyone fantasizes that they actually know better than everyone else, that they are smarter and better and sexier, and its just random chance or external forces or some shit that's holding them down. But nobody gets the release, of hearing everyone else agree with you. 

But I have to tell you, if there's one thing I've learned over all of this, its that you cannot, you just cannot overstate a human being's ability to acclimate to their current condition.

That '*hnnnnnggggg*' feeling? It didn't last more than a couple of days. Pretty soon the sheer euphoria I felt from having everyone tell me they loved me, subsided into petty annoyance at the clutter in my inbox. By my third blog post, people were stopping me on the streets, either to spit in my face or to kiss my feet.  By the fifth blog post, both results were equally annoying to me.  People stopped being people, they started being followers or haters, that was the only classification I used for people.

You see, when I moved out to that ranch...I wanted to get away from the followers as much as the haters. Have it just be me, my folks, my sister again. I brought John who had built my website and of course Mike who was a constant source of inspiration for the blog posts. Dan and Karen asked if they could join me there, as they were sick of living in the big city, and I said sure. They had been such good friends for such a long time.

...

If I had cut it off at Dan and Karen it, I think it would've been fine, but then Nikki asked to come too. I've always said that my success was due to being able to say in a blog post what I could never say in conversation, and well, that was doubly true for girls. I'd never had a girl look at me the way Nikki did when she asked to move out to the ranch with us, much less a girl who looked like that. I couldn't see anything that was wrong with saying yes.

My...relationship with Nikki...I...I wasn't ready for that. I didn't understand why she wanted me. I understood why I wanted her, because she was gorgeous, but I didn't understand...I didn't understand that she didn't love me the way Karen loved Dan. She didn't respect me, she didn't love me, *shit*, I don't think she even liked me. She worshipped me. That was a type of social interaction that I simply wasn't prepared for, and like I said before, never underestimate a human's ability to acclimate to their current condition.

I don't think I even liked being worshipped, but you know what, I got used to it. I got used to having someone who I could just tell to do something, and she'd do it. At first it was all just innocent sex, but after a while I realized, she'd do literally anything. When I started testing those boundaries, I started testing them just to see where the boundaries were. But there were no boundaries, the crazier the things I asked her to do, the more intensely she worshipped me, and by the time I realized there were no boundaries that didn't disgust me, that enticed me.

Nikki had tons of friends who were just as obsessed with my philosophies and blog posts as she was...and eventually I brought them all to the ranch. I swear I didn't even see what was happening, and I couldn't be convinced of it either.  Karen and Dan left after the third girl showed up at the ranch. I'll never forget the look of disgust in Karen's eyes, but I just thought she was jealous, sad that I never invited her into the main cabin, I ignored everything she said to me. When Mike left, he confronted me hard, but you know what John was enjoying our new lifestyle so much, that he convinced me to ignore Mike. Mike was just jealous too, I told myself. He just wished the girls and followers loved him the way they loved me. My sister had left before any of it really began, she had gotten a great job doing social media marketing back in the city. My parent's...God bless 'em...they could not see what their son was becoming, or if they could they didn't see fit to tell me to stop.

You see, I didn't bring people to worship me because I thought I was some kind of God, I became convinced I was some kind of God because all these people were worshipping me.

Anyway...I'm not making excuses. All the people we killed, all the damage we caused...its all my fault. It really is, I wont try and shed any of the blame. Just...at least let the records show...after all this is over...that I really didn't want any of this to happen...it just sort of did.


 |-| 
|-| cogi7wl || 89 || I didn't want to be anything.


Pizza delivery boy here, 30 minutes or less or else it's on me. Yeah, Luigi's doesn't cover the cost of cold pizza, us peons making below-minimum wage are the ones expected pay out of pocket. So don't be that guy and order from far away. It's just not right. Today, we had a call like that.


Richie was taking his usual stoned-ass time making an extra-large pepperoni and I was suffering from restless leg syndrome. I was forty minutes away from getting off work, and Richie was giggling at the fact it was 4:20. The oven dinged but Richie was texting his friends about this one time at work when the clock said 4:20.


"Yo, Richie. Get the fucking pizza. C'mon man I gotta go."


Richie didn't like being told what to do. For a guy who smoked a lot of weed, Richie was a dick. "Ah, sorry bud" he said, slowly sliding the pizza out of the oven "I gotta put it in a box, which I gotta fooooold man, and shit that takes me at least like five more minutes."


I've dealt with Richie's stoned-ass before and had a box already made. He told me to stick it up my ass and stick to my job as he sluggishly folded the cardboard. "Sure hope it's not far away. Islip huh? West or East? Big difference."


"Fuck you Richie, hurry up." Islip was another county over, I already knew I wasn't getting there on time. The store policy sucks but it's kind of the only thing that keeps us going. Some people will pay out of pity, but there are more than a few who live for this rule. People who argue, whine, complain, and use the age-old excuse "well according to MY watch...."


You think the holder of the pizza has all the power? Fuck no. I have no power. Richie's got more pull than me. Every house I go to I'm the bitch, when I get back to work I'm the bitch, and guess who's the youngest in his family? The bitch.


So I'm speeding down the Southern State Parkway trying to get to this bumblefuck Islip, it's East Islip in case you were wondering, and by the time I reach the exit I'm already ten minutes late. I raced through the sidestreets, following my GPS to the ends of the earth when it leads me to a church.  


The church looked like it had just been in a fire. It's white paint was covered in black grime and soot, the windows were all shattered, and shingles were dropping off of it like dandruff. I knocked on the warped wooden door. It creaked open.


"Pizza here!" I said to silence, "Hello? Anyone here?" Still nothing. I walked inside.


Inside was completely bare. Nothing on the altar except it's putrid green carpet and a table bolted to it. The pews were made to look like filthy ghosts, covered in dirt-specked sheets. I walked through the aisle, up onto the altar and dropped the pizza on the table; dust spewed off in different directions. It was then I noticed a muffled snoring coming from behind the altar. 


I peek through the door in the back and saw an elderly man with his feet on the desk in front of him, snoozing on a plush office chair. I wasn't THAT late, sheesh. I snapped in his face a couple of times. No response. I leaned over, took a deep breath and shouted "Yo!" about twenty decibels higher than I meant to.


Instantly he sprung alive, feet still on the desk, legs uncrossed, but eyes wide. It looked like he was stretching but his bulging eyes were rolling into the back of his head as he gripped his heart with one hand, and my wrist with the other. I pulled back but his grip wasn't loosening, it grew tighter and tighter until I felt the strength leave his hands, and the color leave his face. He was dead.



"Holy. Fucking. Sh-" before I could even get started on my string of expletives, I heard the sound of an army marching up steps beneath me. I peek back through the door and see a platoon of black hooded figures flooding the aisle of the church, and walking up to the altar. I hoped that they were just here for the pizza.



They all stopped suddenly, and the first hooded figure locked eyes with me as he rushed into the backroom. He pulled his hood down to reveal a tattooed face consisting of black lines and abnormal shapes. He looked at the dead old man, he looked at his wrist still gripping mine, and then he looked at me.


"Look man, it's not wh-" I tried to explain, but as he stepped closer to me I couldn't find the words. His size itself was intimidating enough without all the freakshow tattoos. He grabbed the old man's hand on my wrist. He pulled him free. I stuttered helplessly. He knelt.


"The Gods have chosen you. We are at your command."


I shut my mouth to stop myself from babbling. He was still kneeling in front of me, bowing his head. I peeked out the door, and the army of hoods were kneeling as well. I was confused for the most part, but I knew one thing. For once, I had the power. 


I walked onto the altar. Everyone remained bowing except for my new best friend, Lurch, I named him. He followed me onto the altar, watching with awe and excitement at my next move. I knew I had to do something big, something to inspire these followers, but I said "Ah fuck it."


Opening the pizza and taking a slice, I began my decree "So there's this dick named Richie...."

 

Edit: Proof'd


 |-| 
|-| cogkeq0 || 22 || Peace.  Peace is all that matters.  As I mediate here, with my friends I am at peace.

It has been so long, the journey has been filled with trials and tribulations.  There were so many who did not believe, but I am thankful for those who do believe.  Those who believed when I said that the true path was not what we were lead to believe.  Those who believed when I said I had found it.  I miss those days, when we were just starting.  We were full of fire and vinegar.  The message was so clear and it shone like the first rays of sunlight after weeks of clouds and storms.  I was so sure.

The first place that I spoke from was an old warehouse.  It was abandoned and seemed to work.  John got us a generator and lights.  I sat on a stool in the bed of a truck and just talked.  At first others would speak, but before long it was just me.  At first the words came hard and there was so much pain in the faces of my audience.  So much pain, and regret.  Confusion that the world they were living in was so far from the promises they were given, from the expectations of the American Dream.  So much sadness.

I spoke and they listened.  At first just a couple of times a month.  Then every week.  It was fun.  Before long there were a bunch of new faces.  Someone suggested that we move to an old church.  That it would be kind of a joke.  We thought it would be funny and the people came up with the money to do it.

There were still only about thirty of us.  The place had the greatest echo from the stage.  My voice would rebound, so I slowed and changed my words to sound better coming back at me.  We started singing.  There was so much glory.

We had so many seats the people started to bring others.  Soon the small church was packed.  The people were still lost, so I started to write.  Just small things, things they could take with them into the world that would hopefully help them find some peace.  Then they asked me to write my story, and so I did.  They loved it.

We moved to a bigger location, and I read from the book of my stories.  The look on their faces was exalted.  It was so beautiful.  My people.

My people asked me for my thoughts on the strangest things.  So I gave them.  Then I wrote them.

My people asked so I started talking with them every day.  Before long there were some living at the church.  That made life so much easier.  We had help.  There was always someone available if something needed done, or something needed fixing.  Soon there were too many.

David had a great idea.  We found some property in God's country.  It was beautiful.  The golden hills, we could see the ocean.  Sunsets that stoked desire, Sunrises that awoke the poets.  These were the glory days.  And the people.  MY people.  They helped so much.  All they asked was for my words, and my thoughts.

They came from all over.  So we built.  David and John were great.  They organized the people.  Mark and Mary started feeding them.  Soon they brought us things that could help.  Soon after they brought money.  Soon they no longer left.

It was a few days after that when Ruth came to me at the church.  Mary was okay with it and we became three.  Soon Julie made four.  I had so much love to spread, it was all about love.

It has been a year.  I have children.  My people are happy.  We are many.  We have houses, and a farm.  I speak every day.  They call me leader.  They want to hear more.  I give what I can, they give everything.  The we that was four is many now.

The girls see to my needs so that I can focus on my work, on my words.  They have power.  John said that Nancy was barren.  Marcus could not walk.  Today Marcus helped with the newest bunkhouse for the new people and I cured Nancy's infertility.  She is a month along now.

Years passed.  My children are many and strong.  My people are strong.  I do not understand why we are being bothered.  We are just here about peace and love, why do the outsiders not understand?  I am just trying to save them.  Why must they respond to our love with hate?  Our peace with their violence?  Why can they not allow those who wish to follow me do so in peace?

It was my first child's thirteenth birthday today.  We had a womanhood ceremony for her.  My wives were beautiful.  Why did the government have to ruin it?  Why did they take me?  John and David too?  My people, my disciples?  Mark will be a martyr.  They shot him dead.  Now I am in chains.

They are the modern Romans.  I am in chains and I await the officers to take me to my cross.  I will rise above.  I will return.  Just like I did before.  2000 years before.  I will NOT return to peace.  I will NOT return with love.  I will have my revenge.  My people will be whole again. |-| 
|-| cogk3x2 || 13 || How did it come to be  
Once I was no one  
Yet now they worship me  
Humble our beginnings  
Often humbler our ends  
As I tread through the throngs  
Only a man who pretends  
The lie which festers  
deep inside my heart  
How shall I tell them, "I am not"  
When all they say is, "Thou art"   |-| 
|-| cogm21a || 9 || I'm man enough to admit when I've fucked up.

At least to myself. But I don't think I can admit to this.
Not to them.

I know I fucked up, but I didn't mean to. I know that doesn't fix it, or justify it but it does start to explain. Fuck how do you even explain something like this.

From the start seems as good a place as any, but I'm not really sure when that was. 

Maybe, it was the firs time someone bowed to me and I didn't make them stop.

Maybe it was when all the members of the youth group changed their religious statuses on facebook from "Baptist" to "Sky Child"

Maybe it was the drunken ranks about Revelation being right around the corner, that the youth group believed. 

Maybe it was needing a job so damn bad I went back to a building I swore I would never re-enter because youth pastor paid $3 above minimum wage.

Or maybe the pamphlets with my name on them are right, and this all started 150,000 years ago when the comet brought all the souls to earth. 

Which would mean I was right the whole time. Then I'd have nothing to apologize for. But it would also mean I only have a few hours left before the comet comes back for all our souls.

So for my sake I hope I was wrong. 

But for the sake of million people waiting outside singing hymns I wrote and prayers I thought up, I sure do hope we're all dead in a few hours.

I'm man enough to admit when I've fucked up. 

But I'd rather not have to this time.
 |-| 
|-| cogkee7 || 15 || I will admit, becoming a cult leader as a teenager was quite difficult to adapt to. 
Mostly because my cult consisted 100% of men who would not leave me alone. Not a single woman in sight. Sigh, I guess it's no different from college.

Hell, a paparazzi started following me around because they thought I was someone REALLY famous. Just because about 1250 people follow me religiously doesn't mean I'm famous... They try to make anything I touch a holy object. My shoe, a gourd I touched randomly, ect. There's a school in my name, and even a museum. There's a town being built right now in my honour. 

I tell them I am not the messiah, hell, I'm atheist, yet they follow me. I tell them to go get a life, that they are all unique people. Everyone seemed to agreed, except for that one guy. I told him to come forward, and now he's a pope or something...

My fear is, that if I kill myself, being the only way out, that people will take what I said and bend the truth so that they can get what they want. 

How, you may wonder, did I get myself in this position. And trust me, that's a very good question. I sometimes ask that to myself before falling asleep to the gentle hums of about 100 men.  The answer... I wrote a book saying that I could show men how to pick up women easily... |-| 
|-| cogrcg4 || 6 || I envied her. We all did. But underneath my layer of envy was a deep pride and adoration...part of the driving force behind this cult. And it was all my fault. 

Andrea saved my life. Not in the ordinary sense, the "called the ambulance in time" save. The impossible kind. Let's just say I self-medicate. At times I go too far but this particular time I'd truly dove straight into the deep end. The needle was deeper than the damn oxygen in my lungs...there was no way I could have come back from that "trip." But Andrea, forming a fist with her nimble fingers, had beat life into me by pounding my forehead.

I awoke from the infinite darkness I fell victim to and saw her resplendent face. That obsidian hair... a skin tone reminiscent of pure sand. I preached. With the internet as my witness I preached. But of course, I'd need proof. I kept my laptop on during the incident in an effort to record it as my last will and testament. Her miracle went viral. Some had claimed to see her aura glow within the pixels of their screens as she revived me. Others said she looked like a goddess. Even though she could not hear, she understood the reverence and hope we saw in her. 

We followed Andrea in the hope that she was the next step. In what, you ask? Perhaps in human evolution. Perhaps she was a mythical being. I don't know. All I know is that me and thirty other people repainted an abandoned church and hung a custom portrait of her magnificence in the center of the room. 

She has us in the palm of her precious hands...except for me. I am seen as the messenger. I am the one who has come back from the other side to bring her to the people of earth. 

And that is why MY portrait is on the ceiling.

My say is final. Without me, she wouldn't be understood. She is my sister after all. She and I share a purely original sign language. Our parents certainly didn't want to teach her. They'd been on more drugs than you could name.

So I sit here on my throne and she is my queen. Together we can create chaos or bring peace to this neighborhood. Just the other day we encountered some nonbelievers. They called us "blasphemers," "psychos," "ignoramuses" and many other things. So I had these two men strung up, stripped naked and allowed my members to refine their archery skills. The wounds were of course doused with bleach in an attempt to "cleanse" their insides. I figured it would be ironic...doing something truly like an ignoramus or psycho, following no logic at all. 

I wonder if they found it funny. 

Afterward I enjoyed the company of three beautiful women in my chambers. Heh, by chambers I simply mean my home. This leader mentality is getting to me. It's funny how things change. I used to be rejected in every sense of the F***ing word. No I am the center of so much blind faith.

I could get used to this. |-| 
|-| cogkauh || 4 || I worried a bit about the security at the airport. I suppose I had to trust that in this crowd of admirers there were no would be assassins. The sound of drums was almost unbearable from inside the plane. The smell of smoke permeated through the vents.

As I walked towards the door I knew what I wanted to say. "I am only a man, not a god." But there is something appealing about being a god. Maybe it appealed to the same part of me that made me seek kingship.

I never would have expected such a reaction to my presence, even among my own people. But here across the ocean I saw crying, cheering, and excitement beyond what I could imagine experiencing myself.

And maybe it was the desire to be a god. But I think I was afraid of them. Afraid that the degree of joy I saw when I arrived here could to easily be turned to anger. That if I escaped unscathed perhaps this city and this country would not. I couldn't tell them that I wasn't their god.

Perhaps I can do more good for this country as a god than as a king. |-| 
|-| cogq5ef || 5 || Ok. It took six years of quiet research, some fake social media accounts and a lot of acting but I think I finally did it. I finally found the people who hate me.

You see, back at the beginning of the 21st century, I had myself a little TV show. It was a nice little thing, I'd make fun of the day's problems and put my own little take on what the politicians were saying. I did that thing where you pretend to be the other side to show just how whack and stupid some of the things they were saying, harmless commentary really.

Then.... I get offered a job. A really nice big job. One on a legit news network that held some actual clout. I was to replace the most well known commentator of all time. But you don't know his name do you? The records of the channel went up in a "accidental fire" and everyone else can't seem to remember what existed before me. 

But I'm getting a head of myself. All you need to know is that taking that job is what started all of this crap.

Rather than just take up the mantel or to just do my same old show on the new network, I figured we'd try and go for a different angle. One serious but it still had that sarcastic commentary that I was known for at the time. 

Only apparently when you take legit messages about ethics and politics and wrap it up in a fake religion, some of those nuts actually start to believe that everything you say is the truth.

Of course I didn't know it at the time. All I knew was that the show was a hit, the people loved it. And thus, I continued on for years while my...cult. Spread across the nation. I had thought that I was getting these scoops due to my skill as a reporter and commentator. Exclusive meetings with the president? Just a fanboy session. Being the first person to interview both Putin and the President in the same room? I guess I'm the reason Russia no longer prosecutes gays. 

Turns out I was their actual "American Idol" and they literally worshiped the ground I walked on.... I'm pretty sure there's some New York Concrete hanging up in the pentagon now...

I didn't even know until decades later when I accidentally walked in on my studio producer and my head make-up artist waterboarding an intern that didn't make my coffee the way I liked it. What kind of sick people would do that to a kid? But all that ends tonight, right here, right now...
________________________________________________________________

They had all arrived one by one, each instructed not to talk to each other until 11pm had past. The soonest I could escape my "security" and make it to the hotel room. 

I paused on the other side of the door, knowing full well that the people on the other side hated my guts and would love to do nothing more than to punch me in the face.

They would also be the first real people I've talked to in a very long time...

I took a breath and walked in, my gaze focused on the window across from me.

"Hello everyone, I am Stephen Colbert. I have gathered you all to help denounce the writings in "The Report" and to hopefully save-"

I had not even finished the second sentence before the FBI carried out a sting operation on the hotel. Some two flights of stairs, three cans of tear gas and 38 rubber bullets later, the country was praising their glorious god for collecting the last nonbelievers in the nation and gathering them up so they could be sent to a "re-education" facility in the Caribbean. 

God the new generation is stupid. |-| 
|-| cogdvzk || 5 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cogqho0 || 3 || 
All I wanted was a Pepsi. You think that would be a simple thing, right? 

In this small mountain community that barely passes for a town, way out in the middle of the forest, anything not home made or grown near here is almost impossible to find. Homegrown is a way of life out here. And apparently we even home grow our own cults.

It all started when I went running out the door in search of a sugary, caffeinated drink to pep up before my afternoon jog. As I whipped open the door of my beat up old Jeep, I heard someone else’s shoes crunch down my gravel driveway. It was Alyssa, the neighbor girl, who had always lived with her family in the ancient, rundown blue house at the end of the street. She had rarely been seen except at school, and had no friends except her own family. She was wearing chucks and an off-white sun dress, looking as if it had been carelessly washed with the wrong colors. She asked if she could have a lift to the local grocer to pick up some milk and lunch meat since her parents were out of town. Having barely talked to her before, I was a little nervous about driving around with her, but hey, what could a sixteen-year-old girl do to me? I invited her into my car and we sped down the road towards what passed for ‘downtown’ out here in search of provisions and carbonated beverages. 

Going aisle to aisle in the grocer, I looked in vain for my Pepsi and returned to the front of the store to find Alyssa waiting to check out. You’d think something as ubiquitous as soda could be found at a grocery store, and I said as much to her. “Well… I have some at home if you want to come over,” she said. No one that I knew had ever seen the inside of her house, so I couldn’t resist the opportunity. Over the years, her family’s big blue house had become the stuff of urban legend, with stories being passed from kid to kid about all kinds of creepy and unusual things taking place there. Mostly stories of kids disappearing, or the house being used as a hide out for serial killers - all stories kids tell their siblings and friends just to scare them. While it was likely nothing had ever happened at the blue house at all, kids do get to talking when a family is as reclusive as Alyssa’s. 

She finished checking out and we headed back to the outskirts of town, where we lived. I pulled up the long drive to her house and followed her up the stairs to her porch, where she drew a set of ancient-looking keys from her purse and unlocked the door with a loud clunk. My jaw dropped open as I walked into the grand, imposing foyer and adjacent sitting rooms that betrayed the decrepit facade of the house’s exterior. All black with shelves and cabinets filled to the brim with fantastic, unusual items - definitely not what I expected after a lifetime of driving past the rundown blue house. 

 “Surprised?” Alyssa said, when she noticed my too-obvious disbelief. “My family has lived here for generations and they usually don’t take too kindly to visitors. So they prefer the outside of our house look like something you’d see as a ‘before’ example in a Home Depot catalog.” She kept walking forward into yet-unseen rooms, leaving me to ponder why her family didn’t want visitors here so badly. 

As we came into the kitchen, I noticed candles lit all around the but thought it not to be too unusual after all the other strange things in this house. Alyssa sat me down in a big, wooden chair at the bar and offered some pretzels. Her hands were shaking as she grabbed the bag out of a cabinet and poured some pretzels out into a bowl for me. As she placed the bowl on the bar, she accidentally knocked the bag out onto the floor, throwing pretzels across the kitchen. “Are you feeling okay?” I asked, wondering at her jitters. “Ahh… yes, yes, I’m fine, don’t worry about me,” she said as she scurried around on her knees picking up pretzels. 

Once she had finished cleaning up and seemed to have reclaimed her nerves, I asked if I could have a glass of Pepsi, which is what I really came here for. Wordlessly, she placed a glass in front of me on the bar. I had just placed my hands down on the armrest when I noticed her intensely staring at me as a quiet ‘click’ came out of my chair. When I looked down, manacles had popped out of the seemingly-normal chair just millimeters above my skin and bound me in place. Alyssa’s hand was on a red button on the countertop that I had failed to notice before. I began shouting and trying to break free of the restraints as Alyssa pulled a can of Pepsi out of the fridge and poured it in the glass with a maniacal smile on her face. 

I noticed movement behind me and her entire family - apparently not on vacation - and several of my friends appeared, dressed in flowing black robes. “Please tell me this is just a joke. Get me out of here!” I screamed as they closed in a semi-circle around me. 

Alyssa began explaining my tied-up situation as I continued to struggle. “What you don’t know, John, is that this house is home to one of the largest Satanic cults in the West. We secretly run this town and keep out all the big companies that would make it so hard for a cult like ours to make a living off of homemade goods, which we happen to place enchantments on keep everyone under our control. All those stories you heard growing up about kids disappearing? They’re true. Kids who go snooping around this house might go back physically the same, but they’re never the same mentally. Spend too much time here and our magic takes control of your brain and forces you to join our little group. Thing is, ever since Grandpa died we’ve been without a leader. That’s where you come in. You’re young enough and smart enough that you can lead our group for years to come. After tonight’s ritual, you’ll be filled with our power and truly be our leader. So go on, drink that Pepsi. It’s the last you’ll ever have.” 

She raised the glass to my lips and I gulped the soda down as she tilted it forward, dreading what the coming ritual would entail. All this, and to think l just wanted a Pepsi. 
 |-| 
|-| coghz2g || 3 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cogq5sz || 3 || I stared at what I have typed so far, mindlessly clicking away at the keyboard. I needed this to be 100% perfect. If it was boring, no one would read it. If it was brilliant, *they* would write it off as another sci fi novel. But, if it accomplishes what I want it to, they will kill me.

I spat bitterly at the thought of these people, these *followers.* It started out simple; I wanted to just write a book that would pay the bills and get me enough money to survive with moderate popularity. I didn't even want to be famous. But, after my first book, I became extremely popular. I got an enormous amount of money, enough to live very simply for the rest of my life.

But then, the e-mails came in, all of them asking the same thing. "Can you make a new book?" "When's your next book going to come out?" "What are you going to write about next?" I got so many of them, to where I would spend an entire day reading an hour's-worth of mail. And it's not like I didn't have much to do now that I have enough money to only need to work as a dishwasher at a pizza place one day a week for the rest of my life.

I caved in and decided to write a short story. I didn't have any idea to write, so I decided to come up with a random sci fi plot. There was basic aliens combined with unexpected alien souls and even an evil Big Brother type alien that killed a bunch of aliens and put there souls on Earth. There was then this bull shit process of removing them for when they attached them to our bodies.

I laughed when I wrote it. I didn't care much about what others said about it, I just wanted to be left alone. I wanted to just relax and go into obscurity, and this atrocious writing would help me get rid of them.

Then, the unthinkable happened. The idiots actually *liked* it. Not just liked it, they seemed to rave about it. I'd look all over the internet, and see a strong approval of the book, to the point that some people actually *believed* the batshit crazy ideas proposed in the book. They believed that there body was inhabited b alien souls.

People kept asking where I got my ideas. There were even a few who contacted me calling me a prophet. I thought they were just a few crazies like every somewhat famous author had. But then they kept coming in. More and more. One day I was invited to this group to talk about the 2 books I wrote. I thought it was something about literacy, of course. I got there, and there were people dressed similar to how I described the alien souls. "Cosplayers," I mumbled.

It took me to get on stage to realize that everyone there wasn't listening to what I have to say as if I were some great writer, but as if I was actually some damned *prophet* to be followed. Everyone listened to what I had to say raptly, as if I were some perverse Pope propositioning to the populous.

It was then that I read the banner in the back of the complex. The banner, which shone in bright red, read "Now Presenting: L. Ron Hubbard; founder of Scientology."

None of them believed me when I constantly told them I was no prophet, and none of them will leave me the fuck alone. I have created a force that seems like a monster, and it must be shut down before I die. The problem is that all of my publishers have been threatened, to where I'm sure that I'm almost positive that this new publisher is one of *them.* |-| 
|-| cogeccu || 121 || "Franklin! Mr. Franklin!"

Professor Jonathan Franklin looked up from the papers covering his desk at the gasping intern. "What is it?" he said irritatedly.

"There's an anomaly."

The professor groaned. He closed his notebook, saving his page with his pencil. He had been on a roll, and felt as if he was on the verge of a breakthrough. "Alright," he said, rising wearily from his chair. "Show me."

He followed the intern through the halls of the Dark Matter Research Lab. "So Dark Matter isn't observable, except for its gravitational effects, right?" the intern chattered.

"Of course, yes." The professor really hoped that this wouldn't be a waste of time. "That should be obvious."

"Well, we just observed it."

"What?"

"A lot of it."

They reached the main computer, and the professor gasped.

The monitor was exploding with color. Where the pale blue dot had once been surrounded by darkness, it was now surrounded by thousands, millions, billions of other dots. 

"Zoom out," Jonathan ordered.

The intern followed his directions. The blue dot disappeared, and they could see that the space between the galaxies was washed with stars. "Keep going." The individual lights of the stars blended together, and became a painting.

The two men stared at the monitor, and the grumpy cat stared back. The words **Loading Completed** hung below the cat's face.

"Professor? What's going on?"

The Professor shrugged. "Looks like we're a pixel, son."

 |-| 
|-| cogdq7y || 18 || It began with a picture of a pyramid that my cousin posted. A vaguely Mesoamerican-looking pyramid, made of some bluish sort of rock, and captioned "i never seed tihs befor".

My cousin's atrocious spelling aside, the picture was *odd*. I knew pyramid-building civilizations were tropical (mostly), but the guy lives in Canada. So I shot him a message, asking what the picture was of. His reply was a very terse "duno, never sen it untill yesday. 2 mile frm wher i live".

The daily routine made me forget about it. Phone calls, emails, tickets to be submitted and solved, lunch with the coworkers, all of it numbly mundane, the intellectual rock where the seeds of new ideas take tentative root, only to be crushed and eaten by the large dumb herbivores we call "users".

I was reminded of the pyramid that evening, at home. Strangely, it was not on the internet, but on the news. Chopper footage of the mysterious artifact that had appeared in the Canadian wilderness was followed by a nearly-hysterical report from some astronomer who was confirming nothing, it was too soon to say anything, really, but was very unclear *what* it was he wasn't confirming.

The next day, everything shattered. Every communications channel overflowing with pictures, recordings, politicians urging calm and religious figures preaching, according to their wont, salvation or damnation.

The skies had changed. Several thousand new stars, most of them in precisely geometric configurations, had suddenly *appeared*. What's more, all data that we could gather said that no, they weren't new. They were thousands, millions of years old. And none of them had existed last week.

Of course, the heavens were strange, but they had always been. The uncounted messages, on every conceivable wavelength, from radio and microwave to X-rays and gamma rays, were disturbing. Even more so was the fact that they appeared to have been sent a long while ago, linking all the new stars together.

They were alien, and they spoke in all the myriad tongues Man had ever spoken.

We were, suddenly, not alone. |-| 
|-| cogdje7 || 18 || I woke up after dark to the muted shattering of raindrops against my window. Chaos muffled and street lamps diffused by thick red curtains. It was eerie but strangely calming. It didn't exactly sound like chaos, imagine the sound of a peaceful riot under torrid rain behind a brick wall, a glass window covered by curtains, inside a carpeted room. Everything was turned down but there was this electricity in the air, it was like reading a violent poem written by beautifully thin handwriting. I wrap my blanket around me as i walk to the only source of light in my room, the cold was unbearable but i've grown to prefer it over warmth. I peeked outside my window and saw the sidewalks lined up with people soaked in rain, my neighbors, familiar faces staring at the sky, no one was moving or talking but there was a collective look of panic on their faces. I looked up but saw nothing, at least from where i was standing, so i put on a coat and a pair of jeans and stormed out the room. That's when people started screaming. I was frozen. This was not your typical hollywood-catastrophe-panic-crowd-screaming, these were sounds i've never even heard of before, and knowing that they're coming from people i know made it all more disturbing. I run back to the window to look down at the street below me but as i drew the curtains, almost immediately, i look up... The bloodied streets paled in comparison to what i saw in the sky. A giant internet explorer window trying to access a yahoo mail account. |-| 
|-| coglqes || 3 || Everything just became... brighter.

I was just smoking a blunt under the winter moon, when suddendly the few stars blocked by our pale yellows were covered by billions other stars. We scrambled to find out what had happened within this millisecond of time and space, but all answers came up short of evidence.Until this one person posted a theory online that at first no one paid attention to. But slowly more gathered around the idea, and soon a following emerged. 

What if it was always there... yet unfinished?

Lemme tell ya, the relegions loved it. But for me it felt like a new stage to step out on. The hubble already spotted several habitable planets that just showed up a few systems from Sol. 

I felt like something was telling us, we were ready. |-| 
|-| cogrybf || 46 || Thats the person I want to be in the zombie apocalypse.  The one the zombies ignore. Seriously loved it. |-| 
|-| cogx4t7 || 32 || They're like pigeons. Or maybe closer to lemmings, the way they follow each other around; although I've never seen a lemming so I can't say for sure whether that is an accurate characterization of their mannerisms. Either way, they are definitely annoying. Perhaps I should be happy that the most extreme emotion I can muster up toward zombies is annoyance. 

At first, right after the crisis hit, I was a swirl of emotions. First, there was the fear. Nights spent huddled in front of a television, watching the latest news about the epidemic, watching it spread from country to country. It hit West Africa first, and before we even really knew what it was we, the enlightened westerners, were already running to fix the problem we didn't understand. Then aid workers began coming back infected with the disease. Nobody knew how contagious and dangerous the disease was at that point. Politicians declared it was our responsibility to bring them back. Health workers promised our hospitals were advanced enough to contain it. Researchers claimed a cure was in the works. But that was just a pack of lies.

The disease began infecting nurses and doctors in the hospitals and spreading. They were placed in quarantine, along with the other aid workers, and the disease continued to defy our attempts at containment. Aided by a long incubation period and dormancy, the disease found a home inside thousands of people before we realized how misguided our attempts at quarantine were. Then the first zombies began to rise. There had been rumors coming out of Africa near the origin of the virus that it turned victims into zombies, but most of us had just written that off as African embellishment and a flair for the fantastical. The few reporters who went to investigate the claims were never heard from.

Then, there was panic. Soon the zombies began breaking out of the hospital quarantines. Their strength no longer limited by the shackles of a human mind, they were more beast than human. Their shrieks lit up the night all around the country, from coast to coast the infection spread. Not everyone was afflicted with the disease. Researchers never did have the time to figure out exactly why, but it was found that those of certain blood types were immune to the disease. I've never had mine checked, but I guess I must be immune. But those who avoided infection suffered a far more terrible fate than those who did, as the zombies feasted on their flesh. I would later discover that the zombies did not need human flesh to survive. Any meat would do for them, but in their diminished mental state they could not distinguish humans from any other animal. And from this perspective, humans presented the most abundant and convenient source of food available.

Finally, a calm set over everything. It was during a night of this panic that I discovered my gift and my curse. I had left my home, my life, and my friends in DC several weeks prior as the epidemic spread beyond control. Some stayed behind out of civic duty to man their government jobs, which had as of then become all but futile in their attempt to control the crisis. Others disappeared in the middle of the night or holed up in their houses, too paralyzed to act. I had made up my mind and was resolved to act, with or without them. I now found myself with a band of refugees in rural West Virginia. There were maybe a dozen of us, though my recollection is hazy at this point. A group of three or four military contractors, former marines who had gone into business for themselves, were the leaders of the group, navigating and providing defense. Their bearded and grizzly looks, coupled with special forces gear, always made them look more appropriate than the rest of us in our new wooded environment. Another group was composed of several college students, all male, who we had met as we pushed North along the Potomac River outside of Washington. Their appearance always had an air of inexperience and naivety, coupled with an unwavering fear that always seemed to grip them. Other groups members flowed in and out over the weeks, joining forces as their paths crossed with ours and departing when it was no longer convenient. A park ranger, a social worker, an old drifter, the list went on. I myself had the good fortune of loaning my parking space to one of the contractors, so that when he came to retrieve some of his military gear from his vehicle I was able to coax him into including me in their plans. Funny how something so simple as a parking space could have been responsible for whether I lived or died. |-| 
|-| cogyf6d || 22 || I wake up, rubbing my eyes as I hop out of the bed. I yawn, stretch, and wander around for the next 30 seconds trying to remember where the wardrobe is. When I manage to find it, my t-shirt and shorts come on and I head down to the hotel lobby for breakfast. It's quite a nice place; there's a massive chandelier hanging in the middle of the room, which was switched off - damn, I woke early - there were marble pillars and nice-looking patterned tiles. The staircase also had tiles, with red-gold lining on the edges of the stairs.

As I come down, I see the doorman, John, who I recognize by the latex horse mask I put on his head. He never really talks to me. It's always worth a shot, though...

"Good morning, John." I give him a courteous nod as I walk by. He doesn't reply. Shame.

I get to the cloth-draped breakfast tables, which are clean for the most part - a rude hotel guest had inconsiderately smeared blood on some parts of the table - and I nab a blueberry muffin, stride outside past the fancy gilded doors and into the early morning, where my friend Frank awaits me, tied against one of the marble pillars.

Frank slowly turns his head towards me and mumbles something like, "Aigharagm." I tell him how dashing his forehead scars are, and sit myself down against another pillar, opposite him.

"So," I begin, mouth stuffed with muffin, "how was your night?"

Frank looks at me with dead, cold eyes. "Aum.... or... gn." Showing off his Latin.

"Jolly good."

We stay there together in companionable silence as I eat. Around us, people slowly shuffle about the streets, walking to their jobs. I notice Frank eyeing the muffin. "Want some?" I extend my arm to offer the half-eaten muffin to him.

"Arghmah." The loose half of his jaw rattles as he talks. I shrug and continue eating. "Guess that's a no."


Later in the day, I wander around the city with Frank trailing behind me, led by my rope. In the midst of the crowd, a ridiculously tall top-hat can be seen bobbing around. Excited, I rush forward, dragging Frank along as I do so.

"TRAVIS!" I'm yelling, and half the city is staring at me while I run forward. "HEY, TRAVIS!"

My breath comes out short and ragged as I reach Travis. Frank doesn't seem to be even sweating.

Travis is a good friend of mine, because he's the only person that seems to want to talk to me. 

"Ahmah!" he says, pleased to see me. 

"Pleased to meet you again, Travis." I shake his hand, and it falls off.

We share a lovely conversation in which I compliment his hat, and then we part ways, Travis groaning about his office job.


I am now walking down 5th avenue and reach the corner, where there's a gloomy- looking costume shop. I look up at the logo above the doors, which reads "STEVE'S HIGH QUALITY COSTUMES - SATISFACTION GUARANTEED!"

I hurriedly tie Frank to a nearby signpost, and enter the store. It's dark inside, and smelly - the lights are off, there's a dead rat under a zebra costume, and the shop owner appears to be sleeping on the counter. I walk up and ring the bell. She doesn't move. I ring the bell again. Still no response. I poke her shoulder. The woman keels over and collapses on the floor, and now I notice half her face is missing. Eugh.

I look around the dingy shop, taking my time as I pick out tasteful clothing for my friends. There's a harlequin costume, a clown costume, a werewolf suit, a tattered-looking masquerade ball dress, and the zebra that I noticed before is in a group of animal costumes. I pick out a monocle (which I attempt to wear before it is accidentally dropped and shattered), an impeccable suit, a feathery pink scarf, a bat costume, and a small flowery hat, which I put on the shop owner's head to thank her and to cover her face.


Night draws near as I return to the hotel with Frank, who is now dressed up in the suit. John is still at the door, and I reward him for his dedication with the pink scarf. The last item that I still have is the bat costume, which is given to Bruce, another hotel patron who was kind enough to let me take his seat at the breakfast table yesterday.
Frank takes his place at his marble pillar, and I have an apple from the still-full breakfast table before I go up to my room. 

Apologies for any bad formatting or writing mistakes |-| 
|-| cogzm0i || 8 || I was bitten but not bad enough to bleed out still i knew i was done for, my veins where on fire and i was sweating like it was the middle of summer despite it being below freezing outside. I had to make it to my gun "I refuse to wind up like  everyone else." I said aloud,  but it was too late. My legs gave out on me almost immediately and darkness took me.  I dont know how long i was out but light slowly crept back into my mind "i am alive?" it was more of a question to myself than a statement, the pain in my shoulder and hunger in my belly quickly confirmed the reality of my situation. Sitting up I wearily looked around the cramped room i had taken refuge in, i was not alone. Standing a few feet away from me was the monster that bit me , towering over me yet it did not attack. the stench of it rotting flesh hung in the air like cheap perfume leaving a foul taste in my mouth with every breath causing my empty stomach to heave. As i began to gag it approached me sniffing the air and with a groan that almost sounded dissapointed it turned and shuffled away. I couldnt comprehend what had just happened, did that thing really just walk away...no it isnt possible i must be delirious. Climbing to my feet i lurched towards the doorway, peering into the hallway beyond i saw that it was full of them. Something told me they knew i was there yet they had no interest in me, "i need to get out of here" i told myself, back to the apt building where nick and amy where hiding out maybe they can help me make sense of this.

Stepping out into the hallway i spotted my pack, its contents spilled onto the floor, my canteen was there still full of the life saving liquid i had nearly died to gather. I was so damn thirsty i didnt even think about what i was doing, i bent down and began scooping everything up into my pack. The noise of my actions garnered the attention of all around me and yet they still ignored me...all with that very same dissatisfied grunt. I grabbed my canteen and drained it dry, by the gods i have never been so thirsty in my life, quickly i refilled and headed out into the street.

 
Just a note to any critics, I have never attempted to write any kind of fiction in my life...hell theze few paragraphs if you want to call them that took me nearly an hour. I love this sub and after months of lurking i decided to contribute what little i can.

Let the downvoting begin, lol.

Also i now have even more respect for writers, this shit is hard and tedious. |-| 
|-| cogv5tk || 8 || The smell of rotting testies filled the air. That's just something no man can get used to. That buoyant smell plus how hot it was made me very claustrophobic. I pulled out my emergency can of Axe Dark Temptation Body Spray and doused myself. Why not refresh myself and the air around me while also cooling off? These numbskulls didn't care anyway, they never had. I'd spray them right in their eyes and they would act like it didn't even burn -- act like they couldn't even see the man spraying it. 

The Walking Dead had just entered its 23rd season. Daryl was still handsome as hell, but we all missed Shane. Either way, that show was all we as a world had to prepare ourselves for this, and there was one point that was surprisingly accurate -- zombies love biting black people. I think they are little racist sons of bitches but that's just one man's opinion. That's why I was so confused as to why they had no interest me. 

I saw one off in the distance. It had the same hunched-over stance as the rest of them. I picked up a large rock and ran towards him so I could smash his head in but when I got to him I noticed something -- he was smiling. The weirdest group of goosebumps ran down my body. Like the kind when it's the middle of summer and it feels like you might have diarrhea but you're in no position to go to the bathroom and your stomach is gargling and goosebumps start popping up but it feels so weird because you're like sweating and uncomfortable. It was similar to that. 

I hurried and pulled out my can of body spray and shot the last of it in his face. He flinched and held his hands up to his eyes. I flinched from his flinch. What the...? He moaned in pain but in less than a seconds time he dropped his hands and latched onto my arm, sinking his teeth into me. I knew this was the end. It stung but I managed to grab the rock and hit him over the head with it, knocking him out. I backed away trying to catch my breath and figure out what just happened. I looked at my arm and saw he hadn't even broken the skin, there were just two little divots where his K9's had tried to stab me. What a pussy. 

Seeing his lifeless body lie face down made me happy. I kicked him over to his back and as I looked down at him my stomach dropped. Like when you're on an airplane and the fasten seatbelt sign comes on and you're not too worried but all the sudden you see the flight attendants run to their seats and buckle up and as the captain is announcing the rough air ahead the plane feels like it drops like 900 feet. It was similar to that. That thing that bit me wasn't a zombie at all. It was a man. What must have been a very hungry man. I finished him off with a few more strikes to the head and decided to head home. I realized sometimes just because zombies aren't interested in you doesn't mean you're not wanted. |-| 
|-| cog4rfr || 318 || "Look here, honey! It will restore your faith in humanity." I said, pointing at the setting sun. It shimmered across the ocean at our favorite beach.

"Oh dear, this is one scene that you would have to see to believe!" she exclaimed.

"I brought you to our top 10 secret getaways today, our favorite resort locations, would you like to know why?" I asked with a smile.

"I'm hoping it isn't all one weird trick to get me to sleep with you, women *HATE* that." she assumed.

"No, I love you." I said, getting down on one knee. I took the ring out of my pocket and held it up to her. "This one question could change your life." I told her, as we locked eyes.

And you wouldn't believe her answer. |-| 
|-| cog64hf || 15 || "One question you've always wanted to be asked!" I yelled suddenly. Just a voice amongst the endless screams of the world around us.

My dear Sarah turned to me and smiled for a moment before a blue streak of data caught here eye. I can't blame her, I would have been distracted as well, had I not had something more important on my mind.

"This single decision will change your life forever!" I tried again. Eliciting a glance once more. I continued, adding to a quote which led me to her in the first place "Still looking for love? If not, listen on!"

She laughed at that last. Her small cheeks drew in her lips to a smile that I had adored all my life. She kissed me as I asked her "Is your boyfriend the one?"

Still holding the grin, she nodded but not a moment later a red blur passed between us. An image of a child. Perhaps one day we would have a kid to show others.

Now was not the time to think of anything else. I grabbed her and witnessed a pair of bright blue eyes stare straight into me.

"Listen to me, baby" I said softly above the noise "It's all too loud when I'm not with you. So will you marry me, and let us never look back?"

For the first time ever I heard silence, and then the one word I'd been waiting for all my life.

She held me close such that nothing was between us and breathed in my ear, grabbing my attention as if she didn't hold it all already.

"Kiss me to find out what happens next." |-| 
|-| cog4wv6 || 16 || Jenny - Top 10, no Top 5 of our best dates.

Brett -  By tonight you'll go from aww, to whoa.

Jenny - Whoa like wow, or whoa like oh?

Brett - Top 5 to Top 1; the best date ever.

Jenny - A 'Best of' date?

Brett - Guranteed 100 likes. You won't turn away.

Jenny - A big promise, I hope for a delivery. 

Brett - I'll shock you to happiness in 5 seconds.

Jenny - Biggest bought of a nerves I've had today; I'm ready!

Brett - One-knee, one box, one question, one answer...

Jenny - 1000 likes and a single YES! |-| 
|-| cog50ui || 8 || Okay, she's looking back at me. Here goes. Sweaty palms, sweaty palms..

"You never expected this one *crazy* way to keep him with you forever!"

Eyes still on me, perfect! Wow, her eyes are beautiful...those big, soft, green eyes that shine like - wait, I feel like I was in the middle of something. Oh, right-

"The *sweetest* marriage proposal you've ever seen!"

Kneeling, okay, box with the ring, nice. Definitely got her attention now. She's crying. Oh, no, she's crying. Is that bad? Nope, smiling through it, she's happy. Wow, look at that smile! She has some really white teeth. I should ask what toothpaste sh-

"This is *exactly* how you imagined your proposal going."

Nailed it.

 |-| 
|-| cognv55 || 60 || It hadn't been there the day before when Bill and I had been sitting on the couch on the porch. 

“What the hell is that?” said Bill. He cracked open another PBR.

I shifted on the couch. Felt like something had burrowed inside. “Probably a plane.”

Bill took a long drink of beer then burped. “That ain’t a plane.”

I looked up at what Bill had pointed out. “Maybe.”

“Could be a star.”

“Bullshit. Stars only come out at night.”

“Well, no shit. Maybe it’s a really bright star.”

I scratched my nether regions through my sweatpants. “No. Stars only come out at night because that’s when the Earth faces them.”

Bill finished his beer and grabbed another. “Maybe this star shifted.”

Why was I so damn itchy? Did another flea ridden stray sleep on our couch again last night? “Stars don’t move. Didn’t you pay attention in school? The Earth revolves around the stars.”

Bill nodded. “Right. Right. Makes sense.”

I decided to try to ignore my itchiness. To take my mind off of it I grabbed one beer, opened it then grabbed another and opened it. “What if we’re going crazy?”

“Nah.  If we were going crazy then we’d be hearing voices and seeing things.”

I took a chug from one can then the other. “What if you’re a hallucination?”

Bill looked startled. “What if you’re a hallucination?”

I farted. “No. If I were a hallucination then you wouldn’t exist because a hallucination can’t have a hallucination.”

Bill finished his beer. He looked off into the distance. He nodded then crushed the beer can. “That makes sense.”

I finished the beer in my left hand. “Yep.”

“So is it a plane?”

I finished the beer in my right hand. “Has to be. We’ve eliminated everything else.”
______
Thanks for reading! If you enjoyed this check /r/Puns_are_Lazy for more of my stories. |-| 
|-| cogo8fo || 26 || I've always seen it out there. That red blip in the sky, hanging amidst the white spray of distant stars. Whenever I was out at night I would try to point it out to whoever I was with.

'Can you see it? The red dot, look right there, between those three stars.'

It is difficult to point something out in the night sky.

When I was nine my father gave up on trying to interest me in football and finally caved in to my request for a telescope. It was rudimentary, but it worked, and I loved it. But it was strange. Whenever I looked through the telescope at the area where the red dot should be it was no longer there, as if I was looking at a different image, changed only slightly.


A couple of years later on my eleventh birthday I was purchased my own laptop. The year after that I was allowed to use the internet, albeit restricted by parental controls. I would search for others who could see the dot. And to my relief there were others. To my despair, they all seemed to be completely insane. Conspiracy theorists, who would argue the most ridiculous things about reptile underworlds were my only allies.

I began to look over these forums less and less as time went on. I was close to accepting it, and just letting go as one of those strange things you will never get an answer to. That was when my computer got a dead pixel. It shocked me at first. It looked so alike the dot in the sky. I looked it up and found out all about dead pixels. For months I was convinced something extremely sinister was going on. But the human mind is surprisingly willing to move on from these kind of things, if it means not being perceived as a maniac. And in all other areas of life I was completely normal. So I gave up, I ignored it.


On my eighteenth birthday my father took me to get a drink from the pub. When we were walking back it was late and I looked up and saw the red dot again.

'You know that red dot I always used to talk about is still there? I can still see it.' I said.

'Really?' my father said and laughed. I turned to him and saw it. I screamed. A single red dot had appeared in the pupil of his eye. |-| 
|-| cogohy7 || 12 || "Timothy, get your mother.  Mayor Christin has something to fix again."


He shuffled inside and hid in the basement. You could hear his incessant yelling across a field, but when something in the sky goes black, everything becomes silent.


No doubt Mayor Christin has received numerous calls and communicae's regarding the black dot in the sky, but not everyone is knowledgeable to understand what happens next.  I picked my flip phone from my pocket.


Dialing precisely, I put the phone to my ear.  Never taking a single moment off of the black dot in the sky, I hear the other end pick up.


"Yes Farmer John?"


"Reset the sky, there's a dead pixel. You know what it does to the kids."


"Again?!  Three technicians died last time we fixed the sky roof.  You people sure pay a lot of money to keep the ignorant ignorant."


The phone went dead.  


I sighed and started into the house.  Mary, my wife was already downstairs in the basement, I could hear her shushing the kids.  


"Timothy, don't make so much noise. You know what's coming? A series three tornado.  Big one.  I just called Uncle Jay, make sure they locked the barn.  Last time he lost an arm from flying pieces of wood."


He quieted down quickly.


How odd it is that we humans could never accept defeat, even in the most drastic of times.


I peered out from the window basement.   A wave of pixels went across, a large noise rising up from the west.  Or what should have felt like the west.


The sky went black.


My cell phone rang.  *It'll be up in approximately 30 seconds.*


"Already kids, shut your eyes."


I peered out the window about. Still black.  But you could barely see through the enclosure of the dome.  This wasn't farmer America.  This was a zoo.


Few people knew. Even fewer accepted.  No one asked.
 |-| 
|-| cogrlbz || 7 || "There's a dead pixel in the sky."

Peter calmly stated,

"likely they will pull and plug that one within the hour, though. They never leave them for long."

They never do, he was right about that.

"Okay." I replied with obvious disinterest.

It had been a long week, and in all honesty talking about the maintenance of the sky was more than I could handle right now. It’s not like it matters. By the weeks end it seems less and less continues to matter. Except getting to the Rejuve, my time in that pod makes all the hard work worth it.

There surprisingly hadn’t existed rejuvenators only five years ago, Its interesting for I can hardly remember life without them, and I can’t imagine life without them now.

“Do you want to swing by the Rejuvenator?” I asked Peter.

He reflected on the idea for a few moments, expressionless.

“Well, we could. But I’m out of allots, so either I have to pay in credits or you could lend me one of yours?”

The idea of lending him one of my allots was less than pleasant, but Peter makes a lot less credits than I do, and I know he already spends too many in the juve as it is.

“Yeah sure, you can have an allot, but, you ever think on cutting down on the sim time?”

Peter quickly snapped back,

“Hardly! I’m in there a lot less than most, you know. And really you aren’t that far behind.”

“But I don’t skip on my duties to rejuvenate,” I coldly stated.

Peter was silent, but surely contemplating what I said.

“Whatever, lets not argue, I have a couple of allots saved up, get me back next time.”

I said this well knowing Peter would never have a surplus, but it was a gesture of politeness. 

	We had been walking down the southern strip headed toward the lev track, but as we came to the conclusion that Rejuve was our new destination, we turned east on the next street away from the nearing platform. Rejuvenation was available in all districts, even our own. The problem was the cost of using the pods in higher districts. The nicer the simulation, the more credits, or allotted uses. Some pods require three allots per go, or 600 credits. Residents of our district, and occupation receive only four allots per month, so that quickly rules out using any of the high-end facilities, including the ones in our area. To get our credits worth we usually travel to the lower zones and hit up the General Admission Rejuvenation Clinic.

	The GARC’s aren’t as bad as you might think. Sure we have to be in close contact with them, but they really are tolerable. Some in our district are to afraid to come to lower zoning, they believe its dangerous.
	Peter and I have been long time frequenters of the lower zone clubs and Permissive Social Areas. We commute right through the heart of zone 5, so we have seen a lot. The Zoners are a lot like those of the upper districts in all honesty, the only real difference is they make far fewer credits and allots, that and they are always dirty. 
	The water rationing of the lower zones is much more strict than the upper districts, many of the districts want to cut Free Use water for the zones all together, but that’s just politics. I disagree with that, most have never even seen the lower levels, they don’t understand that cutting any more water is simply not a realistic option.

“Hey, you awake or what? We are here.” Peter touched my arm as if to bring me back to the conscious realm.

“Yeah sorry, I was just thinking about policies, and life.” I let a chuckle out with that, though it was hollow.

“Yeah, sure. Lets try to get adjacent pods.” Peter suggested.

It wasn’t much of a suggestion, seeing that the Rejuve clinics are regulated by district policies, the prices are extremely inflated when compared to income levels in the zones. Zone five in particular, where the average annual income is less than 6000 credits. The Rejuvenators are seldom busy here, that’s why we come.

“We always do,” I replied.

With that we walked through the doors of the only brightly lit building on the block, (It may have been the only building not under regulation 5B electricity measures.)
The air was dusty and stale as always, it was warm in here. The quiet hum emanating from the room full of vacant pods had my skin tingling and chills running down my spine. I was beginning to sweat. 

“My two favorite customers,” The Pod-tender Rod greeted us with a half-believably friendly smile.

“Good to see you Rod,” I quietly replied. My attention focused elsewhere.

We openly converse with Rod, Peter and I. He is from the districts as well, he works here to manage the Rejuve facility. They would never let a zone member do the job, however simple it was. We don’t talk to the Zoners, usually.

“Regular sim? Or something new.” 

“New?” I questioned Rod with a peaked interest.

GARC facilities hadn’t gotten the trickle down of new simulations in at least one year, this was interesting.

“Yeah, we got something special downloaded today, fellow from district eleven dropped it off, he didn’t say much about it, except that the upper districts… (he was referring to 4, 5, 7 and 8,) …haven’t even received it yet. Its actually new.”

Rod’s expression was unreadable, but I’m sure mine was plainly obvious.

“Lets do that one then!” Peter excitedly replied.

“Yeah, that could be a good time.” I had a strange feeling of uneasiness as Rod started to maneuver the pods and Simulator docks into position via his control panel.

“Take a seat boys, relax your worries away. Rejuvenate…” Rod sarcastically echoed the Rejuve advertisements. 

As I took a seat in a pod, peter doing the same beside me, panel sliding down over my field of vision and sealing tightly around me, I heard Rod’s barely audible laugh and the electronic voice that is so familiar to me say aloud:

“Lay back, calm your mind, relax your worries away, 

Rejuvenate.”
 |-| 
|-| cogvrir || 3 || *What the fuck is that…?*

He stared at it, as it seemed to stare back. The infinitely small red dot seemed to taunt him with every passing moment. It shouted back, “You fucked up, old man! What ya gonna do about me, huh? That’s right… Nothing!” At least, that’s what the old man heard in his head.

“Jesus Christ!” he snarled to himself. There’s got to be a way to fix that. He wondered how; he should know. He raised his wrinkled finger to the spot and rubbed. Nothing. He licked the tip of his boney thumb and rubbed it again. The tiny pixel practically laughed in his face.

“Where’s the instruction manual?” he questioned aloud. He opened a nearby drawer and rummaged through the mess of papers. *Ah ha!* “Let’s see,” he said as he flipped through the staggeringly hefty book.

He stopped on what seemed like the 3,000th page and ran his finger down its rough surface. The manual had some definite wear and tear -- thousands of years will do that. His finger stopped midway down the page.

*DEAD PIXELS -- To correct a malfunction in the visual spectrum, simply refresh the display. If unsuccessful…*

He looked around the vast stretch of sky and clouds. “Where is that thing?” His eyes searched through the morning haze, straining to spot the Refresh button. He turned up the brightness and the keys suddenly began to glow, backlit by warm sunlight. “Let’s see… F… 5…” He pushed the key, and for an imperceptibly brief moment, everything went black before quickly flashing back to life.

He stared at the gargantuan sky and breathed a sigh of relief. It was gone…

“Mother fucker!” he shouted. The red dot laughingly raised its middle finger. He turned his attention back to the book.

*If unsuccessful, contact Genius Bar for further assistance.*

He took out his iPhone and dialed the listed number. He continued to stare at that dickhead of a red dot while the phone rang.

“Thank you for calling the Genius Bar. One of our technicians will be with you shortly.”

*Everything’s a damn recording now*, he thought to himself as he continued to wait.

“Hello, this is Mike from Apple, what seems to be the problem today?”

“Hi, Mike. I woke up this morning and…” He hesitated for a moment before continuing. “Well, there’s a fucking dead pixel staring me in the face!”

“Okay,” Mike replied. “Let me see if I can help you get rid of that, sir. Have you tried refreshing your display?”

“Yeah. It didn’t do shit,” he said. He told himself he should really work on concealing his frustrations sometimes.

“Okay, sir. Well, the next step is to try rebooting the system. So, why don’t you try that and we’ll take it from there,” said Mike.

“Reboot… the whole system?” he asked incredulously. “Yes, sir,” Mike said confidently. “Just go ahead and do a hard reboot, and we’ll see where we stand when things come back online.”

“If you say so, Mike,” he said as he reached for the power switch. His finger grazed its surface, then paused there. “You’re absolutely sure about this… right, Mike?”

“Definitely, sir. Nothing to worry about.”

“Okay…” he said as he hit the switch.

Suddenly, all was dark. Nothing to see. Nothing to hear. Everything had become nothing.

He flipped the switch again and the world burst back into existence. He looked down and saw fires everywhere. Crashed vehicles. Destroyed homes. People dead. And the ones that weren’t screamed and ran for their lives. He looked up and saw planes and birds dropping from the sky. Great fireballs raced through the atmosphere and crashed into the planet’s surface.

"Fuck…" he muttered aloud. "That cannot be good."

“Mike…?” he said into the phone, waiting for a response. Nothing.

He continued to look down at the madness below him, then brought his gaze back up.

“You’ve got to be fucking shitting me!”

The tiny red dot stared back, laughing like the asshole it was. |-| 
|-| cog9gsq || 22 || Mitzy and Don take shifts standing vigil outside of Greg's hospital room. They are watching for me. If I approach the room, they will call the hospital staff, who will call security, and I will be roughly escorted out. I know this because they have done this to me five times now. I have been informed that the next time it happens I will be charged with criminal trespassing.

Every time I have been escorted from the premises, I have stated my case as calmly and as rationally as is possible when your husband is dying of late-stage leukemia and you are being prevented from seeing him. I reiterate: "He is my husband. I am married to him. I am legally married to him and I have a right to see him."

As it turns out, in the state of Georgia, as of this date in 2007, I do not have a right to see him.

I know this because I have been told so, repeatedly, by Mitzy and Don, and hospital staff, and security, and a number of attorneys in the tri-county area who I have phoned. 

Mitzy is all smiles when I try to enter Greg's room. Her rejection of my right to see my dying husband is cast in the charming lilts of southern hospitality. She offers to take me to the hospital cafeteria and have sweet tea with me and discuss God and pray for Greg. A real heart-to-heart. She will even connect me to a therapist in Atlanta who was doing wonders with Greg, when he was a teenager, before college corrupted him. 

When I try to force my way past her, there is Don, who is not so hospitable. He is 65, but 6'5", and probably something like 650 pounds, all muscle. He is not shy about throwing that weight around, when it comes to keeping me out of Greg's room, and I regret never having worked out regularly.

I holler as he wrenches my arm behind my back and forces me to the ground: "Please, for the love of God. I love him. I just want to say goodbye."

I just want to say goodbye.

So now there is this, plan B: a not so charming kid named Jethro. I mean his name is actually Jethro, if you can believe it, and he looks like a Jethro too. Built like an anemic scarecrow and wearing a hooded sweatshirt in August -- may as well be wearing a neon sign that says "ask me about my track marks."

I need Jethro because everyone on staff at the hospital knows my face and knows to be on watch for me. I need a confederate they don't recognize. So for the low price of $500, Jethro will don some scrubs he has stolen during one of his many ER visits, dose Don and Mitzy's midnight coffees with a sedative, and spirit Greg out of his hospital room. 

At 12:15 AM in a fetid alley adjoining Mercy General, I stand over Greg's gurney, crying like the world is ending, because in some sense it is, and this hick Jethro is the only witness to the last kiss I will ever share with my husband.

Jethro jabs a needle into Greg's thigh. I can barely manage "what the f--" before Greg is awake, fully conscious, gasping from a sudden rush of pain and adrenaline. 

"Epi," Jethro says, and wipes his nose with the back of his palm. His skittish eyes are searching everywhere for nothing. "Thought you might'n wanna say somethin'. He'll be fine."

"Are you okay?" I say, cradling Greg's face. His eyes bulge, his jaw sets, and he nods. He brings his breathing back under control.

"--the fuck am I?" he breathes.

"I had to get you away from those bitches you call your parents."

His eyes roll and he swallows hard, trying to cope with the pain. He looks back at me. "I told them to let you in if you came. I told them."

"I know you did."

Jethro is taking this moment to piss against the alley wall. 

"Who the hell--" Greg says, noticing Jethro for the first time.

"I hired him. He brought you out of your room."

"Jesus, who did you get mixed up with?" 

"Listen," I say, "I don't have a lot of time. I need to tell you."

I clasp his fingers in mine, but he breaks the grip. His bony hand strokes the cut on my cheek, the deep black bruise there. "Who beat you?"

"You know who beat me. Don always hated me."

Greg closes his eyes, mortified. I take his hands again. There's nothing to them anymore, none of the strength I used to love.

"You're so bald," I say, laughing. I rub his head.

"It's called chemo. You should try it sometime. Bald is sexy again."

"Just what a baldy like you would say."

"The weight loss is incredible, too. I'm never doing Atkins again."

Jethro zips up, loudly. I bow my head and sigh.

"I need to tell you," I repeat. "What I said in Boston, I didn't mean it. I didn't mean any of it."

"I shouldn't have left," he says.

"I shouldn't have let you go. I mean, Christ, we almost died just trying to get there in the first place. We finally got free of this stupid hick town. And I let it all fall to shit. I'm so selfish. I'm so stupid. I'm so--"

"Shut up," Greg says. He opens his eyes. Bright teeth and warm smile. "You always get like this."

"I love you." 

"I love you, too."

"Uh," Jethro says. I turn. He's pointing down the alley at a police officer who is approaching us, his car parked at the alley's mouth, red-and-blues on. 

Jethro flees. For someone so frail looking, his ability to vault a 10-foot brick wall is impressive. 

I don't flee. I smile down at Greg. "I'll see you again," I say.

"You better. I'll be waiting." |-| 
|-| cog4v6g || 32 || Darkness enveloped me as I hid under the bed. I watched carefully and intently as heavy footsteps passed accompanied by a voice calling my name. He tried to hide the truth and lure me with the pretext of affection, but I knew his sinister intent. He wanted me to suffer. As those feet approached the other side of the bed, I quickly and deftly crawled from under the bed and silently dashed into the hall. Without thinking, I simply ran until I found myself in the kitchen. Thinking quickly, I concealed myself in the pantry.

“Come on,” I heard him call. “Where are you? I promise I won’t hurt you.”

His lies made me sick. I looked through the crack of the pantry so that I could see the hunter. Dressed in dark clothes and simple jeans, he stalked through the kitchen. My heartbeat raced for minutes as he edged toward my hiding spot, threatening to reveal me. I silently sent a prayer to the heavens, but I do not know where destiny aligns itself. Finally, he moved from the kitchen and into the living room.

Like a rocket, I shot from the pantry to the back door, but it was locked and impossible to open. Before I could move again, I felt his large hands wrap around my body and take me hostage. I fought back, biting and scratching every square inch of flesh I could, but his hold stayed adamant. I viciously hissed in protest to no avail.

“There you are Mr. Whiskers!” He spoke while ruffling up my beautiful fur I spent all morning licking into place. “Time for your bath!” |-| 
|-| cog4qz4 || 8 || I lifted my head off of the bench I had spent the last two hours asleep on.  My neck's cracks split the cold misty air of the winter morning, before settling back to silence.  I rubbed my eyes and started moving again.  Two miles until I would find out my fate.

Three days I'd survived so far.  I don't know what it was, or who they were, or why they wanted me.  All I knew was that if I stopped for more than an hour or two to sleep they would find me again.  They had broken into my life, killed my roommate, and were about to kidnap me when I had jolted awake and fought back.  How I survived is a mystery to me, I fought with an primeval instinct and desire to live and the warm blood rushing over my hands from his dying body was the first thing I truly remembered from that night.  A quick search of his body just opened more questions, but gave me the only facts I know in my life right now.

A picture of me and a note.  "Take him alive.  Kill all others.  He is the one we've been looking for."  

Since then, I've been on the move.  There are two other bodies in ditches that had given me brief and violent companionship during my run from *them*.  But I'm almost out of food, almost out of energy.  The next time one of their agents shows up, they'll probably take me.  I had one last refuge, one final glimmer of hope I needed to try before just giving up.  

The miles passed in a blur.  I raised my hand, and knocked on the large oak door.  My answer was in the click of a loaded gun and a warm breath on the back of my neck.  "Sorry kid."  And then I knew no more. |-| 
|-| cog6ysk || 3 || Your ears ring, your body aches. A thin coating of dust covers you, soaking up the moisture in your slightly-open mouth. Strange, indistinct sounds mull at the edge of your senses, the floor(?) of the destroyed apartment acting as a particularly uncomfortable bed. You'll never forget the feeling, the terror you felt as the building groaned under the barrage of fire, began to pitch to one side, before your head slammed into something solid. Your eyes focus slightly, the pinpricks of light in the sky seeming clearer than any night you remember for years now. It's so calm, so serene, you almost don't notice the shape hovering over you.

A gloved hand clamps over your mouth, and your sore, groggy body goes into panic mode, thrashing and squirming like a fish on a hook as a knee pins your wrist to the (floor? Wall? Where even are you?) Your eyes adjust to the darkness as your struggles slow, giving you a rough outline of the shadowy form. You can see the pattern of a scarf, tied tightly around their head, leaving nothing but their eyes, glinting slightly in the moonlight as they press a finger to where their mouth would be, shushing you as they look about. You lie still, and their hand moves away.

Their clothing is a mishmash of civilian and military-- hoodie and cargoes, flak vest and pouches. They look you over, quickly checking you for any injuries, and you wince as they brush their thumb over a spot on your forehead. You can feel a crusting of dried blood running down your face, and your mind supplies that that's where you hit the counter. Swallowing dust, you try and rasp out "I'm fine," but don't get further than the I before you're shushed again.

Hooking an arm under your armpit, they pull you up, and you finally get a good look around the apartment.

The building's nearly on it's side, the floor tilting at maybe a 30 degree angle. The far wall has completely collapsed outwards, and it's only thanks to that counter that you didn't fall right out the side. Shakily, your companion's hand on your shoulder, you rise to your feet, leaning against the floor. Once your legs stop wobbling, you try and get a better look out of the apartment, wondering how it would be to fall right out.

The darkness only makes the beams of light dotted over the street stand out more, flashlights scouring every window, door and alley. Sucking in a breath, you lean back, looking over at the other, who has their attention on the open door to the apartment. As you watch, they give one last look to you, then leap, grabbing for the doorframe. A moment of terror passes as they find purchase, and pull themself up. For just an instant, you think they've abandoned you, when a hand pokes through the doorway, beckoning you.

Summoning your courage, you back to the edge of the counter, and sprint. As your foot reaches the edge, you spring off, like a diver on the board, reaching wildly for the hand hanging in front of you.

You grab it firmly, your heart pounding as you're pulled up into the hallway. Without the light of the moon, it's even darker than the apartment, your hands pressed against the floor. The two of you wait in silence for a moment, before the hallway lights up, the fire exit at the end of the hall visible through the blinding glare. You see all the doors, the debris gathered in the corner between the floor and wall, as well as the flashlight in their hand, and the kalashnikov on their back. Turning, they tap you on the shoulder, and you start to move. 

The walls of the building are dotted with holes, some small enough to ignore, some big enough to stick a basketball through. Turning the light on and off, a mental image of the hallway, and all its obstacles, imprints itself in your mind as you jump across doorways and maneuver around holes. The dull red of the "EXIT" sign hangs in the air before you, growing clearer as you get close, until you hear the door squeal open, and new obstacles present themselves. 

Climbing down an angled stairway isn't like anything you've done before-- clutching the metal rail as you inch down each flight, the stairwell looming underneath you, ready to swallow you up if you slip. Light shines in through a yawning hole in the wall two floors down, and you find yourself drawn to the thought of escape from here, this bizarre, almost alien place. 

Your focus is so absolute, you forget to watch where you step.

A piece of debris gives away, and your foot goes with it, your arms instinctively wrapping around the railing as your legs slip into the abyss. Hanging there, you're paralyzed with fear, legs kicking in a struggle to find solid ground. You can see your companion looking up at you, frozen as you are. When you don't fall screaming into the stairwell, your heart seems to slow down a bit, and your mind returns to you. Calming down, you inch along the rail to the next flight of stairs, swinging up your legs to the concrete, your brain rewarding you with a rush of endorphins as you find solid ground again. Giving your new friend a thumbs up, you can see their outline visibly relax, and the descent begins again. 

When you reach the opening blasted into the wall, you never want to see another flight of stairs again. Joining them at the wall, you peer outside, for your first unobstructed view of the city. 

Plumes of smoke, glowing slightly from the light of the fires, rise high above the city, pinpricks of shadow moving through the sky, casting huge beams of light on the ground below. The thrumming of a helicopter passes overhead, the street bathed in light as the searchlight scours for any undesirables. You press against the wall, feeling like an insect under a magnifying glass as the light spills through the hole for a brief second. 

The terror passes, and your companion edges out of the hole, hands gripping the edge as they slide down, then let go. Looking down, you see a large pile of debris, probably from the building itself, reaching almost up to the hole. Giving one last look around the street, you take a deep breath, and follow.

You hit the pile at a bad angle, and land right on your ass, the concrete and plaster shifting beneath you as your companion pulls you to your feet. Grabbing the rifle from their back, they fold out the stock, before pointing to the doorway of a store two doors down. Looking about, you nod, turning to the far end of the street, wondering if the helicopter could come back. Banishing your fear, you slide down the edge of the pile, willing yourself to be quiet as you both slip through the door.

Your eyes adjust, the shapes of tables and stools making themselves known as you move through the bombed-out cafe. Glass crackles beneath your feet, and you find yourself drawn to a picture, hanging on the wall.

The glass is gone, the frame splintered, but the picture itself is unharmed. A farm, or a cabin, you can't quite tell, sitting on top of a small hill. You wonder if such places exist, in the midst of all this war. Light washes over you, and you see two children sitting on the porch. In the light, you see one is-- light. LIGHT.

Fear gripping you, you turn around, the glare in the doorway blinding you, the soldier's rifle trained on your head. "We've got-!"

His words are cut off as a shadowy form slams into him, sending his rifle clattering to the floor, the light disappearing. Amidst the sounds of struggle, a metallic scrape can be heard, then a wet gurgling, and the struggling stops.

The shape of your companion rises off the soldier, knife dripping black liquid before he wipes it on the dead man's uniform. Leaning down to pick up the fallen soldier's rifle, he holds it out to you, and you take it with shaking hands. You've seen men shot, but never stabbed like that. A few moments of silence, before he speaks up for the first time. "Come on. More are coming." |-| 
|-| cogti0b || 3 || 
You might not believe me when I tell you that I was born a few seconds ago. That’s right, I was born into this world for one purpose and that purpose is something I do not want to fulfill, at least not in the situation. 


I was paralyzed on top of a conveyor belt made out of flesh, standing in line surrounded by many other entities like me. *I’m* was in front of the line and *So* was behind him. After *So* was me. We all were idle on the wretched conveyor belt, waiting for our time to come. The conveyor belt jolted forward suddenly, inching us further to our doom. *I’m* was the first to drop down from the belt into a chasm labeled “Speech”. Half a second later, *So* met the same fate. 


It was my turn now. I shut my eyes closed and clenched my teeth, waiting for the conveyor belt to move again. I waited for what seemed like hours but the belt was not moving.

“What’s going on?” *About*, the entity behind me, asked.

“I’ve heard of this before. It’s called a ‘brain-fart’” *What*, who stood behind*About*, responded.

A muffled voice resonated around the vicinity.

“Damn it! The word was just on the tip of my tongue. What was it? It’s bothering me so much.” 

“My suspicions were confirmed!” *What* exclaimed. “Run while you still have the chance!”


My nostrils flared and I instantly felt cold sweats as I dashed away from the conveyor belt. This was my chance, this was my golden opportunity to escape. I pushed and shoved my way through walls of flesh and matter, constantly darting my eyes behind me to see if there was anything chasing me. Indeed there was something out to get me. 


Behind me was a bright spark speeding its way towards my direction. I made a sharp right turn and reached my destination. In front of me was an abyss labeled “Forgotten”. I closed my eyes and took a deep breath, preparing myself to jump in. 


All of a sudden, the mound of flesh below me grabbed my ankles. I gasped in horror and stared wide-eyed behind me. Multiple sparks were racing their way towards their prey. Me. I tried to force myself out of the mound’s grasp but couldn't. It can’t end like this! I have to be forgotten, I just have to! I can’t be used for his purpose! I made one final attempt to break through the mound but its grip wouldn't break. It was over. I lost.


“AHA! *Flabbergasted*! That was the word I was hunting for!” John exclaimed, triumphantly snapping his fingers. “Yeah Harry, I’m so flabbergasted about what happened to your dog. It died way too soon and whatever.”

Harry glared at John in disgust.


 |-| 
|-| coghciz || 8 || A robotic voice echoed through the shuttle floating far above the Earth's atmosphere, "Welcome aboard flight 153, Earth to Titan nonstop. Thank you for choosing Mercury Spacelines. Please find you designated chambers and be seated, as we will be departing shortly."  

I sat in the plush seating chamber designated E-34 and nervously rotated the ring on my left hand.  
A man across the aisle glanced over at me, "Nervous?"  

I nodded ever so slightly, "First time on one of these."  

"Ah, well don't worry, you're more likely to die in an airplane than in a spaceflight. They handle like... A dream." He ended the remark with a wink.  

Before I could ask what exactly he meant, the screen above my seat glowed to life, and a feminine robotic voice played from the speaker, "Welcome, valued customer. If this is your first flight, please touch the first flight button on the screen-"  

I pressed it without hesitation, and the screen continued from its jagged cutoff, "Congratulations on your first flight. As you may know, many of our selected destinations require many days and even weeks of flight time and your selected destination -Titan, Moon of Saturn- offers hyper sleep as an option for the optimal experience. The estimated travel time for -Titan, Moon of Saturn- is approximately -30 Earth Rotation Days,- and as a nonstop flight it is recommended that our customers take the hypersleep option to ward off boredom and to shorten the flight. Customers who have claustrophobia or other conditions that do not permit small spaces are not recommended to choose this option. If you wish to stay awake throughout the flight, you will be free to walk about the shuttle. Magnetic boots found beneath your seat will permit you to move freely through permitted areas, including a cafeteria, computer laboratory, and restroom facilities.  Cafeteria meals will be offered every four hours."  

I muttered to myself, "I'd rather just sleep and get this over with."  

The computer responded, startling me, "Are you sure you wish to enter hyper sleep?" The yes and no buttons on the screen appeared respectively.  

I stared puzzled at the screen opting not to press either, but vocalizing the yes command instead out of curiosity. The chamber began hissing around me until it finally sealed me in entirely.  

The same voice filled the chamber, "Please, make yourself comfortable and lean back in your seat. You are in safe hands. Your vitals will be monitored throughout the flight, and medical doctors are on standby should you need them."  

I leaned back, trying to relax, but I was too tense. *What if I didn't make it. Would I ever be reunited with her? We had only just escaped-* I suddenly felt a sharp prick in the pack of my neck, followed by an immediate sense of tiredness. *Let's... Get... This... Over... Wi-* |-| 
|-| cog4qka || 12 || Once the mining of asteroids got really under-way, it was a hop and a skip to developing the infrastructure for space transportation. With space stations popping up like daises through out the system, we had enough spaceports to require an organized system of directing routes.

At least, it was established after the Horizon and Bismark. When you're travelling at half the speed of light, and have a mass of several hundred thousand kilos, changing direction can be... Difficult...

But that one incident was all it took to get us motivated. We only needed one satellite image of the wreckage to learn our lesson.  

Mars and Titan became terraformed, with mining outposts on other moons and mining stations set up at the asteroid belt. And all of this within the first hundred years of what we now call the the 'Dawn' Age. Most just called it the Dawn. But it really was a new Dawn for mankind. It used to be just Earth we thought of home. A small blue rock, one of several orbiting the sun. But then, the whole entire Sol system was the cradle of mankind. And once again, we looked outward to the next challenge, Alpha Centauri's twin star system, ready to be explored. 

Well, we were ready, until we finally found out we weren't alone. 

Scientists had always said that life was certain to be out there, and that they would be more advanced than us, but we just weren't prepared. We had no idea what another species would be like. 

Our increased activity must have signaled them in some way. Instead of the tiny flame Earth was, we lit a brazier of technology throughout the universe. 

They appeared, without warning, without any kind of announcement. And they sat, a huge ship at each of our stations and colonies. Two surrounded Earth. For about a month, they did nothing. All the while probes and messages were sent to them, trying to communicate peaceful intentions to all of us. 

But then, they really weren't interested in what WE wanted. They scanned not our technology, our our planets for our resources, they probably could get those anywhere. They scanned us for the one thing they couldn't find anywhere else. Us.

Life is common throughout the universe, but each version has it's own quirks and uniqueness. Humans just so happened to have something that was... Better than something they had. So they took us. Well, most of us, anyway. They left the children under puberty, and the elderly. They also left those with a sickness of any kind.
That's why they left me. Cancer does a hell of job on the body, and even though I was undergoing the process of having it cured, which only took a week now days, my body is not what it used to be. The hospital here on Mars is still full. With only one doctor and a handful of nurses left, after the 'Selection', there's not a lot of able-bodied people left, though. 

New Sydney once held over two million people, and now there's around 400,000. All too old or young to really do anything. The worse part is, Mars never really developed the means by which to grow enough food for its inhabitants. We relied on the shipments from Earth every month to have food. With maybe three months supply left, there's not much hope for Mars left. Maybe Earth will fair better, and maybe get revenge for us. But in all likelihood, they will come back for another 'Selection, once the kids grow old enough. They won't come here though. Nothing alive will be left on Mars. |-| 
|-| cogcp08 || 4 || [deleted] |-| 
|-| cogi0ra || 22 || Peace is overrated. When I went into journalism, I did so with the hope that soon, I would be embedded in the heart of some terrorist camp, dangerously risking my life to get a scoop that would help me rise up the rungs of the ladder. Imagine my surprise when those terrorists decided that, rather than take the rest of the world out to set up their caliphate, they would put down their weapons and bomber vests in exchange for free health care, apartments, and food for everyone?

&amp;nbsp;

People were suspicious at first, but after a few months of nobody bombing other people, it really started to seem like utopia had begun. Russia pulled its troops out of Ukraine (not that they were ever "officially" there anyway), Israel began a coalition with Egypt and Libya to begin terraforming the sandy Sahara into a tropical paradise, and New Palestine was set up in what was formerly western Egypt. The rest of the Sahara would soon follow, and Africa's food and overpopulation problems were soon solved. Even the Democrats and the Republicans pushed aside their differences and were starting to have hamburger roasts together.  

&amp;nbsp;

Meanwhile, I was sick of it. They say that no news is good news, but to a news anchor, no news means that you are out of a job. As much as people were enjoying the peace, I knew how hard it is to truly appreciate peace without war. That's like having an internet full of cat memes without internet trolls anywhere to be found. This peace had gone on long enough, and I was the only one willing to stop it. My time in the camp had given me a working knowledge of improvised explosives. I placed 10 in all, at 10 separate holy sites across the world. During a recent interview with the Pope, I 'accidentally' left what appeared to be an ordinary McDonalds bag under a pew at the Sistine Chapel. After such a long time of peace, even the security guards were out of a job. Meanwhile, I had my contacts (other men from the terrorist camp who were bored and restless) place their charges at the other locations, from Mecca and the Dome of the Rock to St Peter's Cathedral, Jerusalem's new Temple, the Taj Mahal, the Hagia Sophia, Angkor Wat, Borobudur, and the Parthenon (I know, hardly anyone cares about Athena anymore, but Abdul convinced me that the falling columns would make for a good show). The timers were set, and I walked out towards the edge of Vatican city, waiting until show time.  

&amp;nbsp;

One minute left, and I was beginning to feel antsy. Sure, I had covered my tracks for the most part, and even the NSA was on holiday, but what if that wasn't enough? What if, instead of being a household name of international broadcasting, I became infamous as that guy who screwed up world peace? I gulped deeply, and reassured myself that my plan was flawless as I mentally began to count down. 7...6...5...4...3...2...1...  

&amp;nbsp;

Nothing happened. Seconds later, I received a host of text messages, each saying something along the lines of "What the heck?" Then my world went black, and I felt like I was being torn apart, atom by atom.  

&amp;nbsp;

I woke up in a strange, brightly lit room, shadowy figures surrounding me as I fought futilely against my restraints.  

&amp;nbsp;

&amp;nbsp;

Aliens. I should have known. |-| 
|-| cogn788 || 17 || It was a simple demand to make.  "End all wars, or I set off the bombs."  That part had gone off flawlessly.  I had picked my targets well, and no nation was willing to risk my wrath, from the mighty USA to the impoverished North Korea.  They all had too much to lose.  But it seems I underestimated how complicated politics could be. 

Israel was the flashpoint, as it had been so many times before.  Two months of peace shattered by a suicide bomber at the Western Wall.  Israel claimed he had been backed by Hamas, Hamas said he was a madman acting alone.  Hamas said Israel should respect the Peace and let them handle internal security.  Israel said the bombings themselves violated the Peace.  Should I have set the bombs off then, condemned the world because of one madman?  I gave them a chance to settle it peacefully, and cooler heads prevailed, so I let them go.  It wasn't *really* a war, was it?

Then there was the civil wars.  I took a very blunt approach to most of them: I sent the leaders on each side a map of the current front lines, told them that was their new borders, and if they crossed those lines, I'd trigger the bombs.  But some left a sour taste in my mouth - allowing ISIS to stop where they were was effectively condemning all non-Muslims in their borders.  Halting the strife in Darfur meant letting the ethnic cleansing continue.  I gritted my teeth and kept going - I wasn't going to bring peace to everyone, but I could at least curb its worst excesses.

Now I'm seeing the start of yet more threats to the Peace.  Russia and the EU are engaged in economic warfare.  China and the US are raising the stakes in cyberwarfare.  My agents have rumors that Latin America is about to be embroiled in a war of assassins.  Where do I draw the line?  Every decree I've issued, every war I've halted, and it seems like the world has invented five more ways to wage war without actually waging war.  Maybe this is a hopeless task - warfare and conflict have been in our nature ever since Cain slew Abel.  Maybe wars will never end, as long as two humans are still alive on Earth.

Not for the first time, I glance towards the detonator on my desk. |-| 
|-| cogo0rw || 7 || I'm helpless now, watching the television screen that's been wheeled into my cell. I can't look away, can't ignore it. I'm watching the havoc I have wrought, and I weep.

12 hours ago I was untouchable. I had the world at my beck and call. The trick was, you didn't tell anyone. I watched with glee as various intelligence agencies found my carefully planted trackers, scattered across the globe. One by one, they each came to the same conclusion: I had hidden a nuclear weapon at the 10 most holy sites in the world, and they had no way of finding it without triggering a worldwide panic. I had stolen from each of them in turn. I had been so careful.

My designs were simple enough. I was rebuilding the Sword Of Damocles. Peace through forced co-operation. Either they played nice, or suffered. The stupidity that followed was unaccountable, unprecedented.

About 5 hours ago, news of my plan reached several fringe groups; elite cabals listening on dead drop frequencies, religious fundamentalists from every side with a hacker or informant in some intelligence agency or another. I had figured that normalcy and sanity would finally prevail. They did not.

3 and a half hours ago, a christian fundamentalist group shot their way through Makkah, took a small armoury's worth of plastic explosives down to the catacombs, and then prematurely detonated the device I had installed there. They didn't even use proper detonators. I watched as 5 men *shot at briefcases of plastic explosive with handguns, desperately trying to detonate a nuclear weapon.*

2 and a half hours ago, retaliation started. One by one, the other devices were found and triggered by the grieving.

1 and a half hours ago, Pakistan and India decided to launch their nuclear arsenal. I don't remember who at.

Half an hour ago, they found me screaming in grief and anguish on the floor of my house.

I'm watching from a bunker somewhere, as the world slowly ends. I did this. I inscribe this now as my last will and testament. I have the shattered edge of a plastic fork, and a waiting jugular.

This isn't how it was supposed to be. |-| 
|-| cogqc5e || 7 || Maybe it wasn't great, maybe it wasn't even good, but it was better.
Better than what the UN had ever done. Or the League of Nations. Or the congress of Vienna. 
I made it stop for a while.

Because I made it clear, if they didn't do what I said, if war didn't end by the end of the week I'd detonate.
The Dome of the Rock blasted off it's foundation.
Mecca and Salt Lake city identical looking pieces of radioactive desert glass.
I'd give the Queen a heads up before Saint Petersburg went off the map but that was just out of personal respect.
And to my absolute shock, they listened.
 
For the first time in decades, the middle east was quiet. The Vatican threatened to excommunicate anyone who lifted their hand in violence.The Chinese started executing people found near a gun.
It wasn't perfect. 
It wasn't even good. 
But it was better.

 
Defence budgets became schools, and hospitals and roads.
American test scores sky-rocketed. 
Miss America contestants needed a new answer to what their one wish would be. because I'd stolen world peace from them.
Activists around the world had to learn to made model airplanes and knit now that they didn't have causes to fill their time.
Holding up you middle and index finger at the same time became meaningless.
You don't need a symbol for something, that’s already assumed.
There was peace on earth. 


For about 8 months.
Which was honestly longer than I thought it would last.
I assumed if anyone was going to fuck with the peace it would probably be the Muslims, or the Mormons, or the Scientologists. Special kinds of crazy. Which is why I had explosives hidden under Mecca, and Salt Lake City and Hollywood Boulevard.
I figured it would be suicide bombers. People for whom the threat of mutually assured destruction would be meaningless. 
For a suicide bomber MAD is kind of the whole point.

But in the end it was the fucking Swedes. 
An country that was 83% atheist. 8 million godless men, women and children who laughed at my threat that I'd kill God.
I might as well have told them I had nuclear warheads hidden under Santa's workshop. 
At least then they would have worried about nuclear fallout drifting south at them.

But as it was they took Norway and Sweden within 10 hours. That was just how long it took to get troops from Stockholm to Osla and Helsinki. 
There was no resistance. I’d ensured that. And the farther they went south, the more religious the nations were,
The more they'd agreed to my demands.
More and more people too terrified fight back, knowing if one man hits another it's an attack, but if the second man hits back it's a fight.
And the world turned to me, and I didn't know what to do.
The Swedes unused to conquest, were cruel. Like a child first given the taste of power using it break toys.
Sweden had sat on the sidelines of history for so long, but they’d been paying attention. They’d been learning. They understood how to pull off a good atrocity. 
People from across the globe were rounded into camps. 
Set to work.
But with no one fighting back, with the invading army unafraid, I didn't know what to do.
The Swedes spread so fast. It took so few soldiers to occupy a country. When your soldiers don't actually have to do any fighting they get a lot done.


So now as I sit here typing, Swedish troops are walking through the jungles of Brazil, and the cities of California, 
Spread out across the whole world.
In Rome, Medina, Jerusalem, and everywhere else my bombs sit waiting. 
Waiting for me to type in that final command.
And I know what to do.
Maybe it wasn't the way I planned for this. Maybe I'm not setting them off for the reason I thought I would. Maybe as long as two people are on this earth at the same time war will happen.

But maybe this could be the war to end all war.

It sure as shit won’t be good.

But maybe it will be better. |-| 
|-| cogk8ql || 7 || After I placed the explosives, as well as warned the warring nations of the destruction that could come to their precious monuments, there was a brief moment of world peace...

Then the atheists attacked. |-| 
|-| cogp7ez || 3 || "Wait, are you telling me that its possible to find a bomb using its radiation?"

"If you knew where to look, I guess."

"Well, I guess its a good thing they don't know where to look."

"Um . . ."

"Wait, are you telling me that if I tell them that I planted the nukes at the most holy religious sites, they can infer their locations?"

"Yeah."

"Maybe this wasn't a good idea. Maybe threatening the beliefs that act as the pillars for the lives of millions of people, the anchors that people hold onto when their life is too difficult to otherwise handle, the ideas that countless wars have been fought for isn't the path to promoting peace in the first place. Maybe that was immoral in any language and in any religion. Maybe that would make people more angry than afraid."

"Listen man . . . are you gonna give me that joint or not?" |-| 
|-| cogkyds || 22 || I finished drinking my coffee. My phone beeped at me that a new text message arrived. I sighed and pulled the phone from my pocket. 

As I pulled the phone out a great gust of wind kicked up the leaves around me. It blew back my hair and blasted my face with dust. It had been dead calm just seconds before.

I looked around me to see if I could find the source of the wind. My eyes opened wide as I saw something set down in the main pedestrian square. It gave off a huge roar as it came to a rest.

People began to gather around. I pushed my way to the front of the crowd as a door opened on the craft opened. A ramp expanded until it hit the sidewalk. 

A murmur of voices ran through the crowd until a creature stepped up to the doorway. It looked to be about seven feet tall and rail thin. It didn’t look like it had anything like hair on its body. It looked like maybe it was covered with neon green feathers. 

It blinked. “You guys are still here?” It spoke perfect English. If I just heard the voice I would have guessed the speaker was from somewhere in the Midwest.

No one said anything. The majority of the crowd took a few steps back. It sounded like a few took off running.

“Why haven’t you left?” said the creature.

I hesitated then raised my hand. “Uhm, hello.”

The creature looked at me without saying anything.

“Yes, hello. What are you talking about?”

It seemed like the creature gave me a look of disbelief. “You’ve won your court case. You can leave Earth. Why haven’t you gone anywhere?”

I looked at the people around me. “We still don’t know what you’re talking about.”

The creature sighed. “Leave it to Perler to give me the contact information for a bunch of plebes.”

“Did you just call us stupid?” I said.

“Not stupid. Uninformed. Listen,” said the creature. It punctuated its word with quick jabs of its hands. “Earth won it’s court case. You were unlawfully quarantined here. You are free to leave the planet and join regular society.”

“Is Earth a jail?”

The creature shrugged. “More of a precaution, but due to a court error the judge has ruled that you may leave the planet.”

A buzz ran through the crowd. “When was the ruling?”

“I don’t know. Couple thousand years ago.” The creature waved its hand at us. “I’ve got to go and report to my supervisors that you guys haven’t left yet. So,” it paused, “get your act together if you want to get out of here.”
 |-| 
|-| cogpz3w || 10 || "You guys still here?!" He was, or looked, human. and spoke in perfect English. 

I cleared my throat. "As the designated representative from the Earth Academic Reciprocal..."

His hand came up in a hushed motion. He was clearly still enamored with everything he saw. "But...How...? Where is the Motobecane?"

"Excuse me? I don't..."

"The ship. I saw it fall. It...burned the surface of this place. It destroyed everything...You...How?" 

I was unsure who was more amazed at this point. I tried again. "Well, as the designated representative of the Earthly Academic Reciprocal Society, it is my honor to welcome you to the surface of our planet."

"His demeanor softened. He stared for back for what seemed like an eternity. He then said "Am I the first ship that has been back?"

I nodded, not sure of what he meant, but sure he was the first that the world had seen, at least in a very long time. 

"Come inside. Bring no one else. I'm gonna blow your mind." He laughed. 

I looked around, turned toward the first drone camera I could find, shrugged, then walked inside. 

The door shut behind me. Inside the ship was surprisingly inviting. Expecting exposed steel and cold lighting, the inside was decorated much more like the a mix between an Bedouin tent and a college dorm room. Strange posters with strange languages covered the walls, and brightly covered tapestries hung all about. In the center a large, low-hanging table had been prepared with two cups, an oddly shaped teapot, and number of brightly covered fruits, I assumed. I took a seat on what appeared to be a bean bag chair. It formed to me immediately, but stiffened into a perfectly comfortable seat. I looked down, impressed. 

"Oh man, if that's gonna impress ya the next few minutes may very well make your face melt."

I laughed. "I'm just a little...perplexed. This is a lot to take in."

He smiled. "Me too." Then silence. We stared, measuring the other, and wondering what was about to happen. He did not trust me. Nor I him. He reached for the teapot and poured two cups of a dark liquid. He held up his glass. I met him with mine and took a sip. It tasted like soured tea mixed with a touch of coffee. It was oddly satisfying. He sighed.

"Last time I was here, your planet was nothing but a pile of rocks. All the life was so primitive that there was nothing to do except refuel with water and leave. We were stationed to protect a very large, very poorly built transport vessel carrying 30 million survivors from a collapsing star a few million light years away. Standard mission."

"Uh. Sure. How long ago?"

"Long. You probably still measure time as a line. That's gonna change real quick, so it's tough to say how long ago in your terms. It would be like trying to measure a planet's mass with a thermometer. It's just not the same concepts. Anyway, while we were refueling there a massive explosion near the engine hull. Came out of nowhere. The ship was built like shit, so we weren't surprised, but that explosion impacted power and we were unable to section it off and the entire ship began to fall towards earth. Not quickly, mind you, but with enough force that a few scout ships..." he patted the floor of the ship we were on "... could not alter the trajectory. By your standards, that ship would have measured at least fifteen times the size of this population center, and at least as deep as it was wide." 

"So, it fell to earth?"

"Not exactly. It orbited first. Because the negative energy covens were locked into place, it kept the ship orbiting and gaining speed by pulling against the gravitational...essentially gravity pulled it into reciprocating centrifugal force. It was a disaster. By the time helped arrived, it was spinning so fast nothing could be done. The escape pods were fired off into space, one of which got your moon, but most had to stay on the ship. Eventually it lost to the heat of the atmosphere and fell to the planet. When it struck your planet, the surface shook. Fire, brimstone, clouds of dust. Then the reactors blew. All of them. No one could have survived. Hell, I was shocked anything on the planet survived. We quarantined the system and have not been back since."

"But, then how..."

"A pod, or pods. We couldn't track them after the ship hit. Generally they hold about 500-600 people with enough supplies for about..." He looked up and spoke to himself "...30 of your solar cycles...? About that. They must have made it. And then they...built this..." He opened the door, everyone was still out there. And silent. "It must have taken eons. They would have had to started from nothing. No tech works in quarantine. It's all so...fucking fascinating."

"Holy shit. I just learned the origins of man. At least, I think."

"You all should be proud. We all thought you were dead." 

He placed his arm around me as I stood up. He looked at me, winked, and said "Your life just got a whole lot more fun, huh?" |-| 
|-| coghvpl || 5 || It continues speaking. "We thought we gathered all of you".

"This is not the way you are supposed to be living. Did you not decipher the readings of The Great Book? Did Stonehenge not show you the way? The Stargate was left intact so if there was any stragglers then you had the chance to join us."

"The pyramids that the attackers built are still standing, why is this so? Why is everything you are doing here on this planet so against 'The Way'?"

A teen-age girl from the crowd you are among speaks up. "It's been like this because nobody told us there was a different way". Another person in the crowd raises a rifle and shouts "Damn alien scum! Die!" He fires off a round from his WW2 era long barrel and connects directly to the forehead of the visitor. Death.

The crowd mulls around for a while then inspects the spaceship and decides it was an alien invasion. A Tibetan monk somewhere weeps. |-| 
|-| cogccml || 43 || "I'm giving you my power." She let that sink in for just long enough for me to still be completely confused.

"And after I give it to you, I won't remember ever having had it," she continued. 

"But why would you give me your powers?" Somehow, I believed her.

"Because I can't keep them for more than 24 hours. If I do, I die. This power has been jumping from person to person for a really long time now. I don't know when it started, or how, or who started it. That knowledge was probably lost a long time ago," she said with an inch of longing in her voice.

We were in her bedroom. Its quiet greys and whites had a calming effect. Everything was neatly put away, as if she'd been expecting company.

"So what are these powers you're giving me?" I asked with a little bit of incredulity. 

"Seduction. It's the power to seduce any person, but just once. Just long enough to pass along the power. Everything you say is funny or interesting or introspective. You're skin clears up and the lines on your face fade slightly. You become the highlight of every party, and everyone wants to be with you. Everyone. The person who had this power before was a girl, and I'm not even bi."

My ears perk up to this news, somehow sparking more interest and blood flow. 

"So why me?" I somehow coughed out after a long awkward silence. "Why would you pick me of all people to have sex with? Why not get Brad Pitt in here and have your way with him?"

"The power comes with a price. Just because you *can* seduce anyone in the world, the power doesn't want you to. It sort of has a mind of its own. While everyone's perception of you is kind of...filtered, your own perceptions are filtered as well. Parts of the people you will see will be stripped away. They jokes, their lies, their masks, their clothes, -"

"Their clothes?!" I ask, again my interested igniting to the promise of sexual situations.

"Yeah, everyone's been naked to me this whole time. You're already naked in my eyes."

I suddenly felt very vulnerable. My arms instinctively covered parts of my body. Then a wave of warmth passed over me as I met her gaze again. She had seen me this way all night. She had seen me this way, passed all the lies I tell about myself and she still picked me. 

"You see past the masks?"

"I see you for who you really are. And I love you for it."

And with that, she fell forward and kissed me. Hard. With passion. Best damn kiss I'd ever had. |-| 
|-| cogkckx || 17 || "I'm not going to remember this tomorrow," she says, "but it's really important that you listen."

"Okay," I answer, a little baffled by my grandmother's forthrightness because she is usually so cryptic.

"You know about my Alzheimer's progression. You know it is amazing that I still remember my grandson's name and face at this stage. It won't last for long, though.
I can feel a change today... Like I'm slipping away." She says, reaching for her bed controller to prop herself up.

As she props herself up to talk to me in the little nursing home she lives in I pause for a moment. I'm not sure I'm ready for what she needs to tell me. I'm not sure if I'm the right person. 

"Grandma, maybe my mom would like to hear your story instead of-" I start.

"No. Not your mother. This information is for you only until I die. I don't want a big hubub about it. I just want to get it out into the world." My grandmother states, reaching for my hand.

I hold my hand out and get ready. I know this is big because grandma isn't so big on physical contact, either.

"For years I cheated on your grandfather. In those days, there was no such thing as divorce or the love I wanted." She blurts out.

I know my eyes have gone wide. My grandpa is gone now but this is still shocking news. My grandmother was always so outspoken about things like cheating and divorce.

"I understand I've been hypocrytical over the years. The thing is, it always felt like my situation was different. Like I had a reason and everyone else was just fooling around for fun." She says, putting her hand over her face.

"Did grandpa know? Who was this guy?" I ask, a little angry.

"Your Grandpa knew but we never talked about it." She says. Then she breaks down into a whisper, "It was no guy. It was and is my best friend Gertrude."

"Oh." I say, stunned. I had no idea my grandmother is a lesbian. It all kind of makes sense though. Her closeness to Gertrude is unparalleled. The rest of my family may not take this information so well since we live in the Southern U.S.

"I know you're shocked. I hope you're part of this new generation that accepts these things because I-" she starts. Then she erupts into tears.

"Shhh. It's okay grandma. I love you and Gertrude. You do make a great couple. I know those relationships were impossible in the past." I say, hoping to soothe the tears.

"Like I said, I probably won't remember tomorrow. I just hope I don't forget your face. Or Gertrude's. I can't imagine." She says, letting the tears flow freely now.

"Your secret's safe with me. I think it's really sad you had to keep it hidden so long." I say, squeezing her hand. |-| 
|-| cogkode || 5 || The precogs stood in front of him, out of breath and very disturbed. 
If memory served correct they where only eight years old but one of the strongest pair of precogs out there. He suspected that their being twins helped that, shared conscious and what-naught. The sister of the pair broke the silence first. 

"I'm not going to remember this tomorrow," she said, "But it's really important that you listen." 

He nodded. When a precog spoke like that you listen and you listened well. 

The boy continued the speech, "Approximately a year from now all the precogs at this facility will register the next level ten threat. It's going to be a power user." 

That was disturbing. Level ten threats where almost always natural disasters that could wipe out entire coast lines. 

"That reading will be wrong." The boys words made him even more worried. 

"The reason it's wrong," the girl continued, "Is that it doesn't actually fit onto the the scale we have." 

The man spoke, "Is there any way to stop it?"

The twins replied in unison, "No."

The boy started to speak, "The best you can hope to do -" 

"- is reduce the casualties." the girl finished the thought.

"What ranges have you gotten for the death toll?" He tried to keep the fear out of his voice, a hero shouldn't show fear.

"At minimum. It's a six digit number."

"At maximum. You won't have to worry about the number."

The vagueness was even more terrifying than the assured number. He didn't like it but there was always that path. "What happens if we kill this individual?"

The twins alternated between speaking and silence.

"Wouldn't recommend that."

"Everything completely randomizes every time we try to factor that in."

"Sometimes no one dies."

"Sometimes everyone dies."

"What we do recommend however -"

"- is to let everything play out."

"The best results tend to be from when we don't interfere."

"And you rely on other precogs."

"It's time for us to go now Halkon"

"Sorry for forcing this upon you"

"We though it would be better if you knew."

The twins turned to leave but Halkon stopped them.
"One last question, if possible what's the person's name?"

The twins spoke in unison, "That information always yields the worst result, no matter what we do with it."

"I understand, thank you."

Halkon returned to his bed, he wouldn't be able to sleep that night. He had many plans to make and a year to go over them and plan for every situation he could think of.
________
The twins walked slowly back to their room, talking via a mental link.

"Do you think it best we left out the most important part?"

"The part about what happens if she dies?"

"Yes. That part."

"I do. Better to leave some hope instead of none at all." |-| 
|-| cogotiu || 3 || The funny thing about my sister is that she prides herself on two things: her ability to keep her personal thoughts secret, and her, and I quote, "ability to not act like an idiot when she's drunk." Unfortunately, she's completely wrong about the second one, and as it so happens, when she gets drunk, she kinda forgets about the first one.

Of course, seeing as it's rare for both our parents to be out of the house at the same time, it's not very often I get to hang out with Tipsy Tina. She's exactly like Sober Tina, except much more mischievous. The last time she had a chance to inhale a handful of shots, I woke up in the middle of the night to find her trying to staple strands of my hair to my bedpost. Two severely pissed-off parents and a half an hour later, I was finally able to go back to sleep, my door shut, locked, and barricaded.

As one might imagine, I usually don't associate with her when she's inebriated. Right now, though, I'm finding myself holding her hair as she barfs into the toilet. Innocent little me was minding my own business when Tipsy Tina barged into my room, her face sullen and a bit sweaty. She opened her mouth, paused, then mumbled "I'm gonna puke." Thankfully, she managed to make it to the toilet before the dam broke, and I figured I'd be a kind sister and give her a hand.

The smell and the sounds of vomit hitting the water are making me gag, regret overcoming me as I try not to retch myself. Eventually the commotion settles into breathy gasps and loaded spits into the toilet, a flush sending the evidence of her excursion down into the depths. I'm honestly a bit surprised; this is the first time in all of her drinking binges that she's gotten to this point.

She leaned against the bathtub, wiping her face with the towelette she'd asked me to get between expulsions. "Note to self, I...I know what my limit is."

I'm crouched against the wall opposite her, balancing myself on the tips of my toes. The cool tile is comforting, and I pictured Tina deciding to collapse down onto it, hoping to get the same sensation. "Why did you drink so much?"

She takes a breath and opens her eyes to meet mine. They're glassy and red, but behind them I can see something. An emotion, something I can't decipher. "I guess..." she swallows, "I just wanted to forget."

"Forget what?"

She opened her mouth, then closed it with a shake of her head. "It-" a hiccup, "It's nothing." She tried to stand up, but her legs wobble and she fell back, her forearm slamming against the edge of the tub. "Ah, fuck." She hissed, her hand snapping to where her arm connected. It would bruise, I could tell, and I think she did, too. I knew I'd be seeing her in a long sleeve shirt tomorrow, summer heat be damned.

"Tina, what is it?" I move over and close the lid on the toilet, taking a seat atop it.

Her head slouched over onto her shoulder, her eyes blank. I could tell she was processing, probably whether she felt like telling me whatever it was that caused her to push herself beyond her normal drinking limits. Her fingers piano'd along the floor and I wondered if she was savoring that same cold I had moments ago. She exhaled and looked up at me.

"You're lucky I'm drunk. Okay, look." She eased herself up until her back was flush against the tub. "I'm not going to remember this tomorrow, which is probably a good thing. But it's really important that you, listen, okay?"

I nodded, my hands clasping together. "Sure."

The back of her head rested against the edge of the tub, her jaw clenching and relaxing. Her fingers suddenly all slapped against the floor at once. "How often have you read through mom and dad's stuff?"

"A little." By a little, I mean I've probably gone through a third of it. I mean, what kid *isn't* curious about what stuff their parents have stored away at some point? However, I felt like that answer wouldn't be appropriate, so I bit my tongue.

She closed her eyes and nodded. "A while back, I went through and found a diary of mom's. I was skimming through, seeing what mom was like back then, and I..." She paused, eyes opening to reveal an expressionless gaze. I couldn't tell if it was from the liquor or her thoughts. "I got to a page, and..." She turned her attention to me, and I could make out small tears beginning to well up in her eyes. "Jen, I'm adopted."

I wanted this to be total news to me, a surprise that I could react to so that I could sympathize with her and share her shock with. Unfortunately, I was pretty sure she'd read the same page I did. About how for the longest time, my mom was certain she was infertile and had no way of giving birth to a child of her own. About how she and my father had tried for ages until they decided that if they wanted a child to raise, they'd probably have to end up taking in someone else's. However, wouldn't you know it, a few years later and out comes little old me.

"I...are you sure?"

She nodded, dabbing at her eyes. "Yeah, I must've reread it two or three times to make sure I wasn't imagining it." She sniffled and reached for the toilet paper, rolling some around her hand and blowing into it. "I wasn't sure what to think about it at first. I mean...like, I'm not mad at them or anything. I know they love me and all that stuff. But, like, why didn't they ever tell me?" Her voice was starting to crack, her sniffles echoing throughout the bathroom.

I wanted to say something to cheer her up, anything. However, I didn't know if anything I could think of would make her feel better, so I opted to just keep her talking. "Maybe they just figured you were already happy, and maybe wanted to wait until they thought you were ready."

"It's not even that, either, Jen." Her nose flared, red and worn from the past half hour of tears and puke. "I'm 19, I think I'm old enough to be told that I'm not their real daughter. And, like, have my real parents even tried to contact me, see how I'm doing? Or was I just a mistake that they don't want to think about?" The tears were in full force now, sliding down her cheeks and hanging off her face until they fell down to her shirt. She reached for more toilet paper and I placed a hand on her knee, hoping the touch would comfort her.

"I don't know, Tina, but you don't, either. Maybe they do care, but have their own reasons for not trying?"

"Like *what*?"

At this, my voice abandoned me. All I could do was watch as my sister devolved into a mess of tears, snot, and sobs that rang through the house. I contemplated telling her that I already knew, but that would probably make her feel worse. I rubbed her knee gently, my only answer to her frantic state. I doubted any words I had for her would help, and even if they did, she wouldn't remember them in the morning. I reminded myself that it was possible that I wasn't even supposed to be hearing any of this, that this was all supposed to remain of Tina's famously locked-away secrets.

I sat myself beside her, wrapping my arms around her shoulders. She leaned into me, her hiccups and cries heightening as she allowed herself to fall into me. I played with the idea of telling my parents that Tina knew, thinking maybe it would be better than letting her stew in her thoughts of being an unloved child. She *was* loved, and we both knew that. I couldn't imagine what she must be feeling right now, or understand how deeply this affected her, but it broke my heart to see her like this, and I wanted to do whatever I could to help. I rub her hair and whispered soft words into her ear, letting her know it would all be alright, our toes pressed together against that cold, dry tile.

**xxxxx**

I managed to finish one at last. XD |-| 
|-| cogkosi || 25 || Susie was crying.

I held her close, my mind reeling.  My hearing was distorted, like in one of those war movies, where an explosion went off too close, accompanied by a loud pinging noise in your ears. I took a few deep breaths, trying to regain a bit of control of the situation.

The woman was an older brunette, wearing gaudy jewelry which dangled as she motioned with her hands, screaming at the two men on either side of me. 

I backed away from them, and lifted Sousie up, holding her tight.  She was wailing and scared, pushing her face into my chest and clenching at my arms.  

"Sir," I heard one of the security guards say as he slowly approached me, one of his hands up in the air, palm towards me, "I need you to hand the child to me.  Let's not let this get out of hand."

"What are you talking about?" I yelled back, my voice shrill with emotion, "this is *my* daughter.  I have no idea who this woman is."

The other security guard, the older of the two seemed to inch closer to me, one hand behind his back, resting on his belt.  I couldn't believe this, they were trying to take my daughter away from me.  Sure I'm not the most trustworthy looking guy; my beard was a little unkempt, and I sure wasn't going to dress up just to hit up Target with Suzie for some quick snacks.

The woman was screaming, playing up the hysterical housewife angle.  Jesus, that was all it took, wasn't it?

I backed away, and noticed a crowd was starting to form, people wide eyed, whispering to each other.  My eyes darted back and forth between the two men. "No," I pleaded, "this is a misunderstanding.  Just hold on, I have pictures in my wallet. I can show you, just don't take my girl."

The younger one took a step closer, and my fear turned into anger. A deep burning within my chest.  How dare they create such a spectacle because some crazed woman told them to.  I held Suzy closer, she was taking in deep breaths in between cries, and I could feel her heart beating like a drum.

"I told you," I spat at the man, "she's mi-"

I sucked in a labored breath as the older man wrapped his arm around my neck.    I reached up with one hand to pry it off, when the other security guard grabbed Susi and ripped her from my grasp.

"No!" I managed to scream as she was pulled away from me.  The older guard was a seasoned man, and I felt his foot push into the back of my knee.  Before I knew it, I was face down on the ground, my arms being wrenched behind my back.

I cried out, and lifted my head, watching as the man handed my little girl to the crazed woman. She snatched her up wrapping her in a hug, whispering into her ear and smoothing her short hair.

I laid my head down sideways onto the floor, cold linoleum pressed up against my cheek, my eyes filling with tears.

"We have the boy," One of the security guards said into the receiver clipped onto his chest, as the other ratcheted a set of handcuffs around my wrists.  I felt the younger one pat me down, feeling for my wallet or weapons.

"No wallet," he said, as I watched the woman's back, carrying away my baby. I could just barely see her cute blue shoes bouncing around on each side of the woman's waist as she moved away at a quick pace.

"No shit," the older one growled, "He's wearing a hospital gown.  Check his armband."

I could't see her anymore, my vision was blurred. I felt the tears running down my face, pooling on the floor near my cheek. My little girl was gone. |-| 
|-| cogr6pl || 4 || "That's my son!" the woman shouted, pointing a finger at Alex.

"What are you talking about?" I asked, bewildered. "You can ask Alex. I'm his father." I looked at my son for support.

"Well, actually dad, um... it's kind of complicated."

I couldn't believe it. My son, who I had raised for seventeen years, was about to deny me as his father.

"I knew I should've let your mother pick you up from work," I muttered. The security guards were approaching, hands on their hips.

"We need you to comply sir, or we'll have to-" the officer never finished, because through the doors swarmed scores of teenagers. The mass flowed towards Alex, and in a frenzy, many of them shouted "Look! Look! It's Alex from Target!" |-| 
|-| cogvpvj || 3 || Milk. Eggs. Tuna Helper.


I sighed. It would be easier to get everything on my wife's list if she wrote them in some kind of logical order. I wasn't even supposed to be grocery shopping. I wanted to go to Target because they had console games on sale. Leave it to Krista to make that a chore. I figured I'd better get what was on the list first so I didn't forget anything. If I did, there'd be hell to pay when I got home.


Gerber Graduates. I headed for the baby aisle, shooting a longing glance toward electronics. "You want a steak buddy?" I asked my son. Danny sat in the child seat of the shopping cart, staring blankly at me. He didn't respond often. Six months ago, they'd diagnosed him with Autism. The doctor said it was too soon to tell how badly his life would be affected, but that he would "socialize differently," whatever that means. 


I thought it was a bunch of bullshit. I mean, sure, Danny likes to be left alone. Maybe because his mother smothers him. And he gets upset over bright lights, sudden noises... but really, what kid doesn't, right? There wasn't anything *wrong* with him.


Still, sometimes he would look right through me, or through Krista, like he didn't know who we were, or why we were there.


Diapers. I debated. Krista always insisted we had to wait until Danny decided he was ready to potty train. How could he know if he was ready? Poor kid didn't even know what a potty was. Maybe if I forgot the diapers, if we just ran out, Krista would let me introduce my son to the throne.  It's not like I was trying to push him - he was already two and a half, for God's sake!


"He knows what he needs," Krista always said. I glanced down at Danny, who was currently staring at his knees and mining for gold with one finger. Apparantly, he knew what he needed, and it was up one nostril. 


"Enjoy it while you can, kiddo," I whispered. "Mom won't let me pick my nose. She won't let you when you're older."


Danny gave a rare giggle, whether at the joke or some private thought, I don't know.


With a sigh, I tossed a pack of Pampers into the cart. It was better to keep the peace. Sometimes I wished I was single again. No nagging wife, no troubled child. Just me and my PS4. An Xbox for when I felt like cheating. Oh yeah, that was the life. Not that I didn't love them. I did. It was such a time suck, though - the marriage and family gig.


Danny mumbled something. He probably wanted to get up. I obliged, settling him on one hip as I continued to shop.

Twenty minutes later, positive I finally had everything, I headed for the electronics section. Danny started squirming while I was looking at the games, so I set him on the floor beside me, making sure to keep a firm hold on his hand. He had a tendency to wander off.


I was examining the back of the new Risk game when a voice beside me caught my attention. 


"I mean, those poor parents," the woman said. I glanced around. We were the only people in the aisle.


"Sorry, were you talking to me?"


"Not really," she mumbled. "I was just looking at your little boy and thinking how awful those parents must feel."


"Parents?" I asked, beginning to wonder if she might be crazy. She looked crazy - like the kind of person you expected to see at Walmart, not Target. Frizzy hair all over her head, wearing a T-shirt and pajama pants, glasses askew. Her arms were full of the most random assortment of items. Why didn't she just grab a cart?


"The missing kid," the crazy woman said. I pulled Danny closer.


"Sorry, Miss," I said. "I don't know what you're talking about."


I started to walk away.


"Didn't you hear the page?" she went on. "On the intercom? They just called out a 'Code Adam'. You can't leave until they find the kid."


Well, that made a little more sense. "I wasn't paying attention."


"I was," she said. "I always do. A little boy is lost. They said he's two years old with blonde hair, and wearing a green dinosaur t-shirt."


She was staring intently at Danny as she spoke, and I glanced down. Danny's shirt was blue with a big green cartoon dinosaur. Weird coincidence. This could look bad. I knew I should say something reassuring. When I looked back up at the woman, her eyes widened, and her purchases fell from her arms. 


"Hey," I said, vaguely concerned, "wait a second..." I let go of Danny's hand for a second, starting toward her. I don't know if I had some idea of soothing her, or if I was going to help her gather her things, but she ran off before I could do anything else.


Whatever.


"Come on kiddo," I said, turning to my son. It had been a long, strange day, and I was ready to go home. Hopefully, by the time we got through the registers, the kid would have been found and we could leave without any hassle.


For a moment, I didn't see Danny, and my heart dropped. Then I spied him, near the end of the aisle, halfway around the corner.


"Danny," I said clearly. "Come here."


My son walked slowly but obediently toward me, staring at his feet.


"Don't walk away from me," I said. "It's dangerous."


I clasped his hand again, and reached for my shopping cart.


"Oh my God, that's him!" a woman's voice exclaimed. "That's my child!"


It's instinct. People shout something and you look around. I did, and saw a rather large, well-dressed woman hurrying toward me, followed by two red-shirted employees, a security guard, and that crazy woman.


The woman in the suit arrived at my cart, and reached for Danny.


"Matthew, baby," she cooed. "Are you okay?"


"Here now," I said, stepping between them. "Get away from my son."


I wondered if the entire world had gone nuts today. How can you not tell the difference between your own child and a stranger. I scooped Danny up and backed away from the woman, who was still trying to snatch him from me.


The security guard touched her arm, pulling her away, and I felt relief wash over me.  Finally, someone reasonable.


The guard stepped in front of the woman, gently pushing her behind him.


He held one hand out toward me. "Sir," he said. "We don't want anyone to get hurt here. No one is going to bother you."


His words weren't making much sense. "Please, sir," he continued. "Please, just let the boy go."


"Officer," I said. I wondered if that was the right term. Are security guards called 'Officer'? "There's been some mistake. This is my son."


"Okay," the guard said. "If that's true, we'll get this all sorted out. Meanwhile, how about you let me hold the baby?"


Bewildered, I looked around for help. What are you supposed to do in a situation like this? How does something like this even happen. Maybe I was dreaming.


"Give me my baby," the woman screamed hysterically. The sound terrified Danny, and he started crying.


"Shh," I whispered. "It's okay, Kiddo."


Then I remembered Danny's insurance card and photo were in my wallet. That would clear things up. I started to reach for the wallet in my back pocket.


"Oh my God, he has a gun!" 


That crazy woman. Why did they let crazy people walk around like that?


"I wasn't reaching for a gun!" I shouted, exasperated. I'd had enough of this. Let them call the cops to clear this up. I was going to take my son home. I was pretty sure they didn't have a right to keep me here.


I walked quickly toward the exit, leaving my cart where it was. Krista could be mad, I didn't care anymore.


My heart was pounding as I approached the doors. 


"Sir, you can't go out there yet, there's a child missing..." the boy they had stationed to guard the doors looked like he was ready to piss himself.


"Let me out of here, or else," I said, envisioning a  million-dollar lawsuit in the near future.


Behind me I heard the security guard saying something about a gun, and putting the child at risk. A man in a tie approached, fumbling with a bundle of keys for what seemed like years before unlocking the doors. I slipped out, walking backward, staring at the horrified faces of a dozen people through the glass. No one followed me. I turned and ran to my car.


I quickly buckled my son into his safety seat, jumped in the front and turned the key. Two police cars were just pulling into the parking lot. At first, they were driving toward the main entrance, but people came pouring out, pointing toward me, and as I pulled out of the parking space, the squad cars turned in my direction.


I pulled out of the lot, onto the freeway and floored it, police lights flashing in my rearview mirror.


I knew this would all go away if I could get home. Krista would be there to reason with them. She'd know how to handle this. And we had his birth certificate, family photos. It would be so much easier to do this at home.


The trip lasted forever. When my house finally came into sight, I pulled into the driveway, hitting the brakes hard. I jumped out of the car, tore open the back door and grabbed my son.


We made it in the door just as the cops pulled up.


 |-| 
|-| cogz9lj || 37 || "Mr. Brooks, the drug will now be administered." the words hung in the air over me, looking, scowling, accusing. My heart slammed against my dry throat. The executioner's solemn face bore no lines nor emotion, just the fixed, sunken features of a man too busied by routine.

He tapped at a syringe, the clink of the glass made my arm tense. My muscles struggled against the bracings trapping me to the chair. The needle was long, I could see it from where I was, my head had been forced upwards by a thick metal clasp around my neck. It was a needlessly long needle. Heh.

"Mr. Brooks, while the resistants have secured you, I am duty bound to inform you not to attempt any movement. We do not need to make this more painful than necessary."

I heard him breath out a slow, methodical breath. Why did I get one of the boring ones? Some stuffy lawyer-type stuck in the wrong suit and the wrong industry. We'd heard Barry's laughter all through the night yesterday, why couldn't I get a bit of levity at the end of my days?

"As per protocol," why did he have to preface everything? Why did he have to justify everything? "I must inform you that the hallucinogen will take effect immediately, the insertion process will be extremely painful." he droned. 

I struggled to just get a look at him, the metal cut into my neck. He was as I'd expected. Droopy. His forehead was a large triangular shape sitting on a pair of half-shut eyes. A hand with a drooping sleeve came up and tried in vain to stop the circular spectacles from sliding down his curved nose. His pupils flicked from the needle to me. "Your family member has not paid for any anesthetic," he explained.

Of course she wouldn't, not after what I did to the kid. His upper lip trembled with disgust, "Understandably." Oh, what's this? A flash of emotion? A bit of spite, a bit of scorn? Fascinating, he looked just like me when she'd found me. Instead of blood and plastic, he was wrapped in the cardboard suit of the profession I didn't choose. Thank christ I didn't, I would've turned out as bored as he was.

"Mr. Brooks, in line with your mandated punishment," I wished I could spit, "I will now administer the hallucinogen. Any last words?" I shook my head, they wouldn't be the last anyway. Barry had been screaming like a demon all through his one, his last words had something to do with being eaten by a dinosaur.

"Very well."

He tapped the syringe once more, knowing it would force me to tighten my arm. The orange liquid gleamed in the cylindrical glass, the same colour as my rolled up sleeve. I saw the edge of the needle whiz past my limited field of vision, then the middle, then the rest. It was interesting, he said I'd feel pain, but I didn't feel a thing. That needle was big enough to stick right through my arm and out the other end. 

He was right about the hallucinations, though, my vision started to fade, my heart began to pump harder...

"Mr. Brooks, the drug will now be administered." the words hung in the air over me, looking, scowling, accusing... |-| 
|-| coh15q6 || 7 || It was only upon realizing the sharp bite of the needle would be the last pain I'd ever feel, that the reality of the situation hit me. The sudden regret that my deathbed forced me to feel shattered my perception of the world. Panic suffocated me. Tears soaked my cheeks. Drool splattered from my babbling lips. I begged, I screamed, I swore, I squirmed. It was all too late. 

I felt the blood vessels in my arm expand with the liquid fear I'd been sentenced to. The overly-lit room dimmed and dissolved away. Darkness. Not just darkness, but nothingness. I suddenly became aware of how I was universally alone in this existence. I tried to force out one last scream but I heard nothing. I attempted to move but I no longer had a physical form. I was just a vessel, forced to experience the inside of an eternal, empty blackness. I wished that I could feel that needle again. A painful reminder of what it is to be alive. I prayed to be released from this Hell.  I prayed for life. I prayed for death. Anything but this nothingness. |-| 
|-| coh05bi || 7 || I never thought I'd live a long life, but I never expected this. Most of my victims have lived a longer life than I will. How pathetic is that? 
They told me I'm condemned to die by the tyron pill. Every single person at my trial seemed so happy about that. Even my lawyer, a moron who couldn't even pretend to be on my side. I never amused myself with thoughts of them understanding my actions, I knew they're too small for that. 

But now I've got plenty of time to think and amuse myself. It's been 2 days and the pill is still working. Everything around me is empty, things are so still. I always thought hell would be something like this, but  this is worse. There are no colors around me and by no colors I don't mean that there is grey, or white, or even black. Literally nothing to see, indescribable emptiness. I did't even know how something like this could bother me that much. 

God damn. Was this really my worst fear? Could I not be chased by aggressive animals or stabbed dozen times all over my body? 
This is pure shit. I have to fuck up my lawyer if I ever wake up from this.  I have to get revenge. That son of a bitch will pay. 

Pay? Pay, pay, pay, pay, pay, pay, pay, pay, pay, pay. PAY!!!
If I say the word pay 100 times in my head, will something fun happen? 

Probably not. 

Ok. Calm down. This pill can't go on forever. This is all in my head. I can imagine my lawyer if I want to, I can imagine him being stabbed. I can imagine whatever the fuck I want to because this is my god damn head and I don't want this empty shit anymore. 
I'm imagining all of it. Vividly. Yes, tyron pill, yes, I am. I see everything around me and it's so, so clear. And fun. 

Except for the fact that I'm full of shit. I can't imagine anything. I'm stuck here with nothing. They say the pill usually works for 4 hours, more or less, and you always die. When is this death thing coming here? I've been here for 2 days already.  

Or was I? What if my comprehension of time is wrong when I'm here? Was it really 2 days? Did I experience any kind of night or day change here? Maybe hours right here are minutes outside, in the real world? Oh, I'm getting frustrated again. Maybe days right here are minutes out there. My heart is beating like a maniac, it's never happened to me. That means that I'll be stuck here for... 
If I calculate that number I will die. Yes, that's my end. I'm not going to survive that stupid number. 

Number. Number, number, number, number, number, number. NUMBERS!!!

"Why are you so calm? That pill is the worst thing in the world. You are allowed to show emotion," my stupid lawyer said one month ago. God damn, I really want him dead. 

"I don't think that pill's got anything on me."

Well, apparently, I'm an idiot as well. Let's calculate that number.  |-| 
|-| coh2t17 || 6 || The bell buzzed louder than ever when they came into the room for the last time. That green liquid the doctor was carrying like a baby was the newest thing these days. There was a lot of controversy on whether or not it was morally correct to inject this drug into people like me. I welcomed it. I deserved it. The once husband to the most beautiful woman in the world, and the once father to 3 wonderful daughters is finally going to get what he deserves.

"Mr. Jameson, we will be injecting you now with the drug. You should feel an immediate sensation and then it will kick in. What happens next is entirely up to you."

The needle dug deep into my arm as I watched the liquid slowly crawl into my veins. I immediately passed out and woke up back in my livingroom. "So this is it? I'm going to relive that godawful night...", I said to myself as I walked into the kitchen. Catherine was sitting down in the round wooden table we had gotten at a yard sale 10 years ago. Looking at it now, I had wished we could've gotten another one. "Good evening honey," I said in the most fragile way. She didn't respond. Hell she didn't even  want to look at me! 

Suddenly, the back door swings open. Yup, there I am. 2 a.m. with nothing but enough liquor in my body to put down a bear. My drunkin' self staggers into the kitchen while Catherine finishes up her last cup of wine. "Hey Catherine, you waited up for me baby?" He said as he leans in for a kiss. Catherine pushes him away and starts yelling. It's mumbled and barely audible but I know what she's saying. "You piece of shit", I yell at him with her. "Why the hell was the bar more important than your family? Why did you kill them? Why?" We both stop yelling and my former self starts walking into the living room to pass out on the couch like he's done a million times; pissed off and full of rage. Shakingly, she walks up the stairs to go to bed. I walk behind her whispering how much I love her and how much I regret what is going to happen next.

I lay in bed with Catherine until she falls asleep. What seemed like an hour passed by before the door creeps open and a shadow starts moving towards us with a shiny object. I get off the bed and close my eyes as I am about to witness my family die by my hands.

I open my eyes for a split second and see that it's not me! This man had a beard and was bald? "Who the hell are you?, I screamed. "Catherine! Catherine wake up run!" Suddenly the knife slices through Catherines throat. It sounded like air coming out of a balloon as she tried desperately to breathe. I run downstairs as quickly as I can to see myself sleeping heavily on the couch. "Wake up! Wake up! Wake up! Save the girls you bastard!" I sit beside my couch and sob uncontrollably as I hear the small screams of my daughters. My stupid self didn't even flinch as I watched the man place the bloody knife in my hands. The murderer then proceeded to break plates in the kitchen and walk out the backdoor.

"It wasn't me! It wasn't me! It wasn't me!" I screamed until my voice drowned in tears. That man got away with it.


"How's he holding up? Did the sick bastard kick the bucket yet?"

"Soon. The duration varies on the individual but this is the first time I've heard someone speak during their hallucination."

"What did he say?"

"It...Was...Me." |-| 
|-| cogzvdf || 12 || I wasn’t scared when they told me what my method of execution would be; I didn’t think that I even had any fears-true fears, that is. Fear that grips you, presses down on your chest and screams in your face that everything isn’t going to be ok. Boy was I wrong.
‘The date is the twenty second of May, Two thousand and eighteen. The time is now two fifty seven in the afternoon, execution will take place at three o clock in the afternoon’. That was the ‘executioner’, the one who would inject the drug into my bloodstream, causing me to go into cardiac arrest, comatose and eventually die. Those three minutes weren’t the hardest-I thought they would be, but they weren’t-I was just blank space. Dark matter. Non-existent. Hell, I was already dead. ‘Would you like any last words Mr…’
‘Just hurry the fuck up and get on with it, would’ya’? They obliged with my request. The last thing I remember was…
I opened my eyes, and was surprised to find myself in my bedroom-from when I was fifteen. My body felt strange, smaller somehow. It was. And I knew where I was, and why I was here. And in that moment, back there, I was more scared than I had ever been before. I burst out in tears before he had even walked in the room. I knew what was coming, and he knew what was coming. But I was a man now, wasn’t I? I could fight back now, couldn’t I? No. I was in my body, but not in control of my body. The door flew open and he walked in, belt off, zipper in one hand, wrench in the other. ‘Now boy. Are we going to have a repeat of yesterday, or are you going to listen to your father and do what he says’? GODDAMN IT. FUCK YOU! LET ME… JUST LET ME… PLEASE DON’T… NO I DON’T WANT TO… LEAVE ME ALONE… I CAN… OH GOD…
He finished, walked out the room with a satisfied smile on his face, and left the boy crying, curled up in a ball on the floor. But the boy was me, and this was my worst fear. This day. Forever.
I opened my eyes, and was surprised to find myself in my bedroom-from when I was fifteen. My body felt strange, smaller somehow. It was. And I knew where I was, and why I was here. And in that moment, back there, I was more scared than I had ever been before… 
 |-| 
|-| coh0xbm || 6 || That morning I was awoken by the sound of a shrill alarm going off in my solitary cell. The alarm meant that I needed to be awake for whatever fat fuck decided to torture me with their nonsense today. Had they not restrained me, I would have strangled the lot of them, yet my hands were bound. This time, though. This time it was different. As the door slammed open, my guard who went by the name of Francis, went inside, put his gun against my temples and with visible disgust exclaimed "get up and move!". Charming fellow that he is, I couldn't refuse.

Francis led me through the prison block with his gun still held up against my temple. It caused me to walk with my head slightly bent to one side, but I didn't mind. Instead, I kept my attention focused on the other prisoners, restrained in their cells not because they would attack me, but because I could attack them if I got out. Truthfully, I had no interest in hurting anyone here, even though the reception was less than stellar in all of my time I spent here. Even Francis, the charmer that he is, didn't deserve my bile as he had dragged plenty of the fat bastards off of me when they lost their cool and had tried to enact revenge themselves.

Francis had led me to a room with a man. A slender man for a change. This man looked like a doctor. My suspicion was confirmed when he turned to me and I saw the bags beneath his eyes and the round spectacles on his nose.

"Ah, Miss Imar. A pleasure to meet you!" He said with a smile, yet I remained silent. After a while of awkward silence, he continued: "My name is Abram. Abram Smith. I am a doctor at the medical research facility not far from here. Seeing as, according to your prison record, you aren't one for long conversations, I'll cut to the chase." He shifted in his chair, taking on more of a sinister pose, as if some he was some evil mastermind talking down to a prisoner he had captured off the coast of his evil fortress island. "You are to be executed today and the people paying for it wanted the prison to use our newly developed lethal injection, about which I am here to talk to you today. You see, as per company policy, we are required to tell anyone undergoing said drug, lethal or otherwise, that its primary purpose is to induce a hypnotic state within which..."

"Cut the crap," I interrupted, throwing daggers at the doctor who had gone into rambling off about his proud creation. He was just like one of the pricks I had dealt with, and I wasn't about to let him go on a tangent. 

"Very well, Miss Imar." Abram turned cold. Cold as the floor of the room beneath my feet, which was now unpleasantly stinging at the tips of my toes. "The injection will make you hallucinate. As to what the hallucination is, we cannot tell, but, suffice to say that it will cause your heart to be pumped full of adrenaline and overload, much like a heart-attack. As such, you are to be given an anesthetic now, to reduce the pain you will experience. To make it more humane, so to speak."

Humane my ass, I thought to myself, yet took the anesthetic injection. The stinging in my toes seemed to fade away, yet when I focused on it, it felt as strong as ever. After mister Smith had done his part of the process, Francis took over. Poor Francis, you could practically see the sadness of losing his most precious in-mate in the way his face filled with disgust every time he glanced at me. He brought me over a room to a place with a chair. Abram Smith followed shortly afterwards, carrying a syringe with the biggest needle I'd ever seen. Yet it was either the drugs they fed me or the realization that I was doomed, but I felt no fear for what's to come.

I was sat down and strapped in, then a camera was pointed at me. A blinking red light on it signified that it was recording. I heard shuffling from above, in the viewers section. No doubt a lot of the same corporate pigs that had come to me were sitting in the audience, looking at the woman in rags about to be executed.

"Anastasia Imar" a deep voice bellowed from behind me. "You have been found guilty in the charges of fraud, blackmail and first degree murder on the fifteenth of September last year. Your sentence is death, do you agree to this?" the question was more formality than anything, as I had no other choice. They'd already hooked me to the system meant to inject me with the drug, so I just said the first thing that meant sense to me.

"Fuck off!" came out of my lips, and I was proud. The reader of my sentence, not so much. 

"Very well, let the execution begin." And with that, I felt a pushing sensation in my arm. The injection had been done and it would be only a matter of time before my heart stopped, so I decided to make the most of it.

"You think that with your suits and money you are invincible." I said to the men above, no doubt waiting for me to collapse. "But there will be another. Another person who sees you for who you really are and does what I did. It's just a matter of time before the power returns to the people, and you can't stop it" I yelled as the world around me slowly melted away like ice-cream on a hot sunny day. My hearing and sense of touch also faded, as the ticking of the clock on the wall grew ever so distant. Then, there was nothing.

After a few seconds, the nothing started to melt as well. Slowly at first, but I could start to discern colors from a blob that had formed in front of my eyes. What looked like clouds materialized in my vision and I felt a cold wind upon my skin. So this is what that bastard in glasses meant. I was living out my worst fear. I bet the fucks in the auditorium know about it and wanted to see me scream. I won't give them the pleasure. I tried to move, but my body wasn't listening, instead I was falling. Falling from a height well above the clouds and could see the planes I was about to hit on my way down. As I fell, I could feel my heart racing, so I did the only sensible thing I could, and I laughed. I laughed the most maniac laugh I could muster as the ground drew ever nearer and nearer at speeds I never thought possible. At the moment I could discern the grass blades from one another, I exclaimed a loud "Fuck all of you!" and felt my beating heart come to a grinding halt. |-| 
|-| coh28vd || 3 || "Ladies and gentlemen of the jury, today a Mr. Dupar is on trial before you, someone who embodies evil, so I ask of you to see that justice is served, and this monster gets what he deserves. And your honor, if he is found guilty, I can only hope that Mr. Dupar is served with the maximum punishment. I urge all of you to not forget what this man did- he chained his wife to the bed in the middle of the night and mercilessly skinned her alive. When neighbors called the police because of the screaming the police found his wife, dead, and Mr. Dupar curled up in the closet, laughing, clutching the knife used to do it. Both Dupar and his knife were covered in blood, and he has shown no remorse today. He has not shed a single tear for his wife.

-------

They found me guilty. I was handcuffed and brought here. Now the handcuffs are on me again. I'm going to my execution. They are too tight. They are hurting my wrists. The place I am brought to is cold. The brightness of the room hurts my eyes. I am chained into a chair, and someone walks out in a lab coat, holding a needle. I feel a pinch, then I hear a scream. 

I hear my wife cry out for help. I walk into our bedroom and there she is, chained to the bed. She is bright pink. She has no skin. Because I skinned her. She was screaming loudly, which hurt my ears. I ask her to stop and she calls me a monster. I start to get a headache. The screaming hurts my ears. The fetor of blood had filled the room. I pick up the knife on the floor, already caked in dry blood, and I slit her throat. Blood is everywhere, even on the ceiling. My head is still pounding so I go into the closet and close the door. I curl up in the darkness, and dry my hands off on a soft jacket. It smells like mothballs but that is better than blood. Someone opens the closet. There are two police officers, they look scared. One of them takes me out of the closet and arrests me. I feel a familiar rush when I see my bright pink, still, quiet wife. It feels good. I look up at the ceiling and start to laugh because I know that someone else will have to clean up her blood.

Then everything goes dark, and I wake up laughing in a chair in the bright room. My headache is gone now, and I feel better.
 |-| 
|-| cogyd3f || 12 || I was reassured by MC that more rockets was the solution.


Bob's face warped into a grimace of terror, then blurred as the ship shook and shed its first stage.


Heat warnings from our Mainsails; 8 frantic lights pulsed in my face. I told them they clustered too snugly. Our rapidly increasing velocity seemed to cool the towers enough, the gauge's liquid readout showing 85% to catastrophic.


Bill seemed contented with the progress of the sequence, despite the bath of red illumination over the instruments, he trusted the MC and its daring first mission to Mun.


I had had dreams like this before... Brief, agonizing flashes of all-too-real feelings of instant death, repeating, repeating...


Once more, a shuddering lurch as a pair of Mainsails peeled away, Sepratron flame licking the CP's windows. The control panel punched me in the gut as we kicked violently Kerbin-ward. I looked up to catch a glimpse of (S-2-A1)'s nosecone smeared forward of the right-most window. It spun too quickly.


I saw a reflection of our faces in the portal, beyond, the the fast approaching glare of the wrong end of a rocket.

    


    Catastrophic Failure!

I was reassured by MC that more rockets was the solution. |-| 
|-| cogztq2 || 6 || **And when exactly did you know things were going south?**

Well naturally, we had very little control over the space flight (typically all they let us do is stare out the windows). So as the engineering report stated at the end, problems arose way back as we broke atmo. Something about the parachute piece being sheared off by the second stage separation. I should probably remind you this was the early days of KSP so we hadn't mastered SSTO. To answer your question though, I knew something was fishy as we reentered the Kerbin's atmosphere.

**I see. State for me again the purpose of your mission.** 

Our mission was to do the fastest lap around Kerbin ever. Ever. 

**Thats it?**

Ya

**No science gathering?**

As I said, this was early in the development of the KSP. We had no need for your fancy schmancy science. What we did then was real. We weren't driven by the idea of discovery, hell we weren't driven at all. Back then KSP used to kidnap Kerbins to sit in their mission. I used to be a janitor!

**Remarkable. So explain to me reentry.**

Well soon into reentry I see this red light flashing, "parachute failure." So immediately I start freaking out. Jeb next to me, Kod rest his soul, just kept smiling like a mad man. Between you and me, I don't think he was all there. Well anyway the ground is approaching pretty fast and things are shaking wildly within the capsule. Bob gets the bright idea to go EVA... At those speeds he was whipped from the capsule. So he was gone, then Jeb starts making these police car noises, and I'm just sitting there losing my mind. 

**So what happened?**

It was the strangest thing. Suddenly we were back on the launchpad. Like it's crazy but, here we just a thousand feet from out immediate doom and all of the sudden we're sitting peacefully waiting for launch. The parachute module had been placed in a safer more stable location, of course they threw more struts on, and also more rockets. That was it, no one had any recollection of the trip. Jeb just kept going on and on about space, and speed, and danger zone. "Something, something, call Kenny Loggins, Bill!" Again I have no idea, that guy was crazy. 

**So this trip went smoothly yes?** 

Yep... Oh well except for Jeb. He decided he wanted to go EVA while we were still in LKO. That was the last anyone heard of him. 

**But didn't the KSP send a rescue team up?**

Yea. Almost a year later, after two dozen missions crashed on the Mun's surface. 

**Didn't they find him?**

Yea they found him, but then poor Jeb got painted across their hull. See back then we didn't understand docking, or braking, or slowing down for that matter. *Sigh,* At least he died doing what he loved.  |-| 
|-| cog27qg || 12 || "Time to get up," Dad gave me a sharp nudge in the ribs and peered through a gap in the blinds.

"Ugh. What time is it?" I croaked. 

"Late. That's what time it is," he let the blinds snap back into position and walked out of the room.

That wasn't a good sign. Dad was usually pretty calm before we started for the day, but he'd had trouble keeping calm since they took alcohol off the market. I walked downstairs and saw Mum and Sophie eating breakfast. Breakfast was the same every day- nutrition paste and extra-filtered water. I remember walking down the stairs to the smell of bacon and eggs, I don't even know if there are any chickens and pigs left to make them. 

I saw Sophie had some schmutz on her chin and wiped it off with her bib. I kissed Mum on the cheek and poured myself some water. The steel shutter was open and Dad was in the outer zone prepping the weapons, more frantically than usual. 

"What's up with Dad?" I asked casually. 

Mum ignored the question and put my paste in a bowl on the table.

"Eat your breakfast," she whispered.

Whilst I ate, I saw Dad running back and fourth from the outer zone to the armory. Bringing more and more weapons as he did it, far too many for any of us to carry in one trip. I sat there, confused, when I hear the transmission from the radio.

"Attention. This is update number 115-4675, on December 31st 2067. ET Hunts are scheduled today between 15:00-18:00. Note that the NERVE TOXINS will be deployed at 18:30, so remain indoors after this time. Also, DEFENDER SQUAD annual results have been announced. If you are under target, you will lose your license. If you do not have a license you will be returned to the academy to regain your license. A new squad will then be provided for you upon completion. REASSIGNMENT AGENTS will be with you at any point between 10:00-14:00 to pick-up those under target. Remember, A squad that kills together, stays together."

Then I realised.

"Mum, I-"

"I know, honey." 

"But who?"

She looked at Sophie and started to cry.

"I had to look after her, I couldn't leave her here on her own while we hunted."

"This is crazy! They can't take you away!" 

Mum tried to brave a smile and made her excuses to change Sophie. I ran over to Dad and starting shouting uncontrollable. 

"HOW THE HELL ARE YOU PREPARING FOR THE HUNT RIGHT NOW? WHAT? WE''RE JUST GOING TO LET THEM TAKE MUM FOR MISSING TARGETS? WE NEED TO DO SOMETHING!"

"Son, relax." He said, all of a sudden as calm as an oasis. 

"DON'T TELL ME TO RELAX. STOP PREPPING THE HUNT AND TELL ME WHAT WE'RE GOING TO DO."

"I'm not preparing for the hunt."

"Then what the hell are all the guns for?"

He paused for a second before handing me the AK-47.

"They're not for the ETs, they're for the reassignment agents." 



 |-| 
|-| cogb86j || 4 || The title really should be "A family that slays together, stays together."  |-| 
|-| cog3ykb || 3 || We had some issues, sure. My husband wanted a divorce. I could've benefitted from it as well. We had no kids and he had no job. The only ever income he had was selling semen samples and doing research surveys. I could've started my life over again from scratch, but this opportunity just fell in my lap. 

I used to work as a secretary for the World Health Organization corporate offices in London. I thought it was an admirable job for the skill set I had to offer, mostly clerical. I certainly value human life, and when they proposed my "promotion" I was a bit skeptical.

"We'd like you to have as many children as you can." That was the terse first line of an e-mail I got from someone in R&amp;D. I would've stopped reading there, but I was captivated by the digits in the next line. "$2.5 million per child" was what they were willing to pay me. I had to at least hear them out. I'd have an interview with the department chairs the next day, and I was instructed to bring my husband. That night I told my Cesar and for the first time since we got back from our honeymoon, we didn't go to bed angry. 

The next morning, we were brought into a large conference room filled with a diverse board of apparent scientists and businessmen. A esteemed looking well-dressed woman addressed us. 

"Mr. And Mrs. Gutierrez, we have and interesting offer for you. We found after analyzing  
Cesar's semen, that he carries a resilience gene for the measles." 

We were very confused and she began using a lot of words I didn't really understand. Aware of our confusion, she summarized in layman's terms.

"We'd like to give your children measles to spread."

I was taken aback. "Why," I shouted, defending my unborn children that I didn't know I wanted. 

"Because," she calmly responded, "we need an outbreak like this every once in a while to keep our other projects funded." I was flabbergasted by her serenity granted the request, but she continued. 

"The World Health Organization protects the world from devastation. It's a thankless job sometimes, but through the careful orchestration of disease, we unite all people in every nation. We are not evil, this is for truth out of love. Our reach extends far and wide." Her rehearsed speech was convincing. I was a bit intimidated, and assumed she knew best. The rest of the board nodded in agreement, and I knew Cesar was on board for the money. Of course, that was still the leading factor for me too. 

"Will my children be hurt?" I asked.

"No of course not, Mrs. Gutierrez. Your husband's resilience gene will protect your children from harm but they will remain contagious. We will give you the immunization, but not your children." 

"Will people die?"

"It's possible, but not for ten years or so. Once you've had a few children, we'll send you to DisneyLand to begin the outbreak. A few deaths will be a small sacrifice for our company to thrive. It's for the best Mrs. Gutierrez. And for the substantial subsidy we'll gift you, you'll be able to live comfortably for decades. After all, a family that kills together, stays together." |-| 
|-| coh1ndi || 86 || "HP technical support, you're speaking to Hal today. What seems to be the problem?"

"Hello, Hal, this is Marebor the Lesser here, and I'm having trouble with my laptop. I've had it for two years and it worked fine, but now it's acting up. It just randomly switches off sometimes..."

"Hmm. Can you please give me your account number so I can see what your computer's specs are?"

"It's... one sec, I had it written down somewhere... aha! It's 1-5-0-8-2-5-A!"

"Okay, Marebor, you have an HP Pavilion 320N from 2013 with an upgraded spell processing chip, is that correct?"

"Yes it is."

"Is the laptop fully plugged in and charging?"

"Of course it is, why wouldn't it be?"

"It's just standard protocol. Do you live near any ley lines or extradimensional portals? Those can be known to cause issues with older models."

"My old neighbor was a druid, but he moved away six months ago."

"When was the last time you cleaned the fan of any pixie dust?"

"Just this week, actually."

"Do your issues with the screen often include unexplained white noise in the speakers?"

"Almost every time, yes."

"I see. It's probably a demonic possession in the harmonic oscillation crystal. You'll have to replace it or take it to a professional exorcist. If you warranty hasn't expired, you can always-"

"Forget it Hal, I'll just replace it myself."

***********

*Six months later...*

"HP technical support, you're speaking with Hal today. What seems to be the problem?"

"Hey, Hal! It's Merebor the Lesser here! I called a few months back about my laptop."

"Oh yeah! Did you resolve the issue with the crystal?"

"You bet I did! I haven't been on an adventure to the Nether-realms like that in *years*! But whenever I tried and and use it for more than an hour, it just switched off! It's like nothing's changed!"

"Where'd you get the crystal?"

"Doomhollow Keep, the same place I got the previous one."

"Those are usually high-quality crystals. Is your laptop fully plugged in and charging?"

"Yes, it- wait a minute."

"You've got to be kidding me." |-| 
|-| coh1u3w || 35 || "Thank you for calling PoisonApple tech support! This is Igor; how may I assist you today?"

"Yeah, hi. My name is Lord Akthuri, and I have an iSpellbook Pro, about two years old. My external monitor is all black and I don't know what's wrong with it."

"Ok, I can help you troubleshot that. First, have you recently spilled any potions on the computer, the monitor, or the keyboard? Perhaps an Obscuration mixture?"

"No, I haven't used any potions recently."

"Ok, good. Next, have you recently tried charming the computer in any way?"

"Well, yeah... when it wouldn't work I tried using a lightning spell."

"A... lightning spell?"

"Yeah."

"Why?"

"Because I thought it would help. Maybe if the computer had more power it would work better."

*momentary pause*

"Sir, is the computer maybe blackened or burned?"

"No, I got the element-proof casing, because I have kids."

"And you tried to electrocute the computer *after* the problem with the monitor started, correct?"

"Yeah."

"Hmmm.... Ok. And have you checked the cables connecting the computer to the monitor?"

"Yes, yes, those are all fine. Look, I really need to use my computer. Can't you just apparate over here and fix it."

"Well, sir, I'm afraid that our apparition service would incur an extra one-time fee of $49.99. However, if you'd like to purchase the Customer Care Pro package for only $29.99 a month, that does include in-person support."

"Mmmmm... that sounds a little expensive."

"Well, we also offer astral projection service. For only $11.99, my spirit can come assess the problem, though I will be unable to manipulate any physical object. I would need your assistance to make any changes to the computer."

"Fine, fine, just get over here."

"Very good. It will take just a moment while I meditate. Please stay on the line."

*Elevator music*

*Spectral ghost appears in customer's living room*

(In soft voice, like talking in his sleep) "Ok, sir, I'm here in the living room. Can you please turn the computer to face my spirit?"

*pause*

"Sir, it looks like the computer is not powered on."

"Well that's what I tried telling you! I said that the monitor is all black."

*Sigh*

"Sir, did you make sure that your computer is properly connected to the Mana supply to charge?"

"Ummm... I think so."

"Sir, I can see you plugging it in right now. There's no reason to lie."

*computer chimes in the background.*

"Well, you should have just asked me from the start if it was plugged in!!"

**Click** |-| 
|-| coh3m6t || 5 || "Thank you for calling Oglaf's Extended Warranties. My name is Sam, how can I help you today?"

The other line fumbled for a minute before a small voice answered, "Hello?"

"Hi, my name is Sam, how can I help you today?"

"Hi," the young voice replied, "I'm Harry."

Sam waited for a moment to see if Harry might say something else. He would occasionally get calls from children but he could never figure out their age; kids weren't his forte.

"Hi Harry!" Sam adopted a much more reassuring, less professional voice. "How are you today?"

"Dad broke the computer again." In the background Sam could clearly hear someone cursing, a dangerous thing to do with a small child nearby. If any of the curses hit the computer it would fry the system completely.

"Can I speak to your dad, Harry? Maybe I can help him." 

"Dad doesn't speak English," Harry admitted. "Can you speak Elvish?"

"Sorry buddy, I can't. Do you think you can answer some questions for me and translate what I need done to your dad?"

"Yes," came his feeble reply. Harry did not seem like he wanted to be doing this, but him and Sam were stuck in it together.

"Okay Harry, can you tell me what the computer looks like? Is there anything on the screen?"

The receiver fumbled a bit as the child apparently dropped it to go look. Sam checked his call time and wondered how long he would be stuck with this. He didn't hate kids, but using one as a translator was frustrating. Many adults had a hard enough time understanding what he said and children weren't the best conduits for relaying information.

"The screen is blue," Harry's voice was loud as he pressed the phone against his mouth.

Sam twitched against the sudden burst of sound. "Are there any words on the screen?"

"Yes."

"Can you read them to me?"

"It says," Harry paused as he struggled with the big words. "JK and then there are a bunch of zeros and a symbol."

"Okay, Harry, that's an error code. We're going to try something real quick, okay?"

"Okay?"

"What I want for you to do is turn off the computer. Just hold the power button until it shuts down, okay? Make sure your dad doesn't touch it." Sam was worried about the Elven dad trying to shock the computer to get it to work, something many wizards did out of impatience. You'd think the near immortal elves would have more patience with these things, but they were as bad as anyone else.

"Okay its off." Harry sounded proud of himself.

"Good job, Harry! Now, we need to get rid of the extra electricity in the computer so I want you to unplug it from the wall for me, okay?" More shuffling noises and then Harry had said he was done with that as well. "Good, now hold down that power button for me again. I know its unplugged so it won't turn on, but we need to drain the computer from all that magic your dad is throwing around."

In the background he could still hear the Elf, who sounded petulant. Many people who called thought these basic steps were stupid and wouldn't work because they were educated peoples who knew magic and the secrets of the universe. Having a child who didn't question his advice was something Sam was starting to appreciate.

"That should be good, you can stop holding the button down. Now Harry, if you would please just plug it back in and turn the computer on? We'll see what it does now."

Harry put the phone down and he crawled under the desk to plug the computer back in. Sam didn't speak much Elvish, but he knew a few words he had learned when he was younger. They were the kind of words you didn't say around your parents. These words began to spill through the receiver, a sure sign that it had worked.

"Thanks!" Harry sounded breathless as he yelled into the phone before hanging up.

Sam made some notes about the call; filling out the extensive forms in his system. It seemed like a lot of paperwork to explain what had happened. He did his best to make it sound wordy and important, though all they had done was turn the computer off and on again. Finishing the notes, Sam took the next call.

"Hi, quick question, is dragon damage covered under your warranties?" |-| 
|-| coget76 || 14 || It had been one week without food for the *Scurvy Dogs*, a rugged crew of pirates who shared the same knack for sea shanties. Their navigator and lead guitarist, Henry, had lost the map to a strong gust of wind atop the crow's nest. Afterwards, they aimlessly drifted  the empty sea, looking for any sign of land.

They spent the first few days writing optimistic songs, and practicing their shanties. As starvation began to set in, however, they were forced to eat bilge rats and sea gulls. Giorgio, who was skilled with both he harp and harpoon, had tried setting a few fish nets. A mighty storm, however, swept them all away.

When Ignacious, the drummer, contracted scurvy, the crew knew that they were in serious danger. They needed to find land soon, or they were doomed.

Thus, the fate of the crew rested in the hands of their manager, Captain Nobeard. It was a great responsibility to bear, but he knew he had to see them through it. They would find land, they had to. If it wasn't for his strong leadership and support, they wouldn't have survived to meet her.

She appeared on day out of the blue, literally. A gorgeous woman, or half of one at least. She called out to them during one of their songs, asking if she could join in. They told her that she had a beautiful voice, but desperately needed to reach land. The mermaid promised to bring them to land, but only if she was allowed to join the *Scurvy Dogs*. They needed a vocalist as badly as they needed food, so they accepted her into the band.

True to her word, she lead the crew of pirates back to land, where the *Scurvy Dogs* became a popular band, touring from coast to coast. Literally. She couldn't leave the shore. Eventually, she fell in love with Giorgio and his beautiful harp, but he never returned her love and this ultimately lead to the band splitting up.

Thus began the decline of Captain Nobeard's career, leading him into a spiral of depression and alcohol abuse.

The mermaid returned to the sea with a broken heart, and was later torn apart by ravenous sharks.

Giorgio became a successful bard, earning a small fortune which would later be stolen by pirates.

Henry grew to be a great navigator, until he tried to explore the Bermuda Triangle.

Ignacious actually died of scurvy before they reached the shore. I probably should have mentioned that earlier.

I don't actually remember the moral of this story at all. Just don't trust crews and/or bands of pirates I suppose. *Especially* the musical kind. Also, remember the importance of vitamin C. |-| 
|-| cogc7h6 || 4 || It's... it's been 14 days since we ran out out of food. Me boys and I are starving, and starting to look at each other like big cooked hams. the sea has been cruel and offered nothing for our hunger. As we are all to weak from hunger we lay on the ship looking at the sun praying for a sweet death to release us from this agony. Suddenly, softly, the sirens song plays in our ears. This creature face of an angel floating out of she beckoning us to come join her. I steady myself up look into her innocent eyes, and smile as the harpoon goes right threw her throat. It takes three men to drag her up on the boat, but we finally had something to eat.  |-| 
|-| cogjoua || 3 || Hm. This was going to be tricky. When you see a ship with everyone thronging round the rails you know they're in trouble. Half of them are weighing their chances in an open boat and the other half are looking to eat anything they can get a spear into. Not a man under thirty to have some fun with, either. Oh well, make myself big, fold my arms under my tits and sound like a Lancashire fishwife...

"'Ey! You want to know where to find fresh water?"

Just a couple looked down. They were further gone than I thought. I hollered straight at the one with the beard.

"OI! You wi' the black face-fungus an' Lord Nelson's bad leg! You want some water?"

"Water... we've been three days without water."

"Then *'ave* some!" I dived, and came up holding a brown bottle.

"Came off a ship," I explained. "They got in trouble an' chucked all the cargo overboard. We can't open them bottles, not wi'out a sunfish to get the tops off. Catch!" He just about held onto it.

Going by the way his shipmates tried to grab the bottle as soon as they read the writing on the outside, I presumed IPA was popular with pirates.

"I can see you like it. Want to buy some?"

"For sex?"

"Silly boy! Sex is nice, but gold lasts much longer." (He liked that - his lined face broke into an unaccustomed grin.) "What shall we say, three bottles for a doubloon?"

One thing, dealing with sailors certainly gave you a knack for setting a price. It couldn't be incredibly cheap because they'd suspect something wrong with the drink, but I didn't want to look like I was robbing them. Considering how fast he ran to the cabin, I thought I might have gone a bit low. Never mind, I'd get it back later.

A strenuous couple of hours ensued, me diving for two bottles at a time and them catching them. When the bottles were starting to run low, I called, "Save some for the food!" Beardie took his eye off the flying bottle and took a whack to the head.

"You've got food as well?" He couldn't believe his luck.

"Aye. In those new-fangled cans. Three hours' sailing away. C'mon, follow me!"

The helmsman had a distinctly roguish wink. By the time we reached the foamy waters that served as our storecupboard, evening was drawing on, me and him were hitting it off very nicely, and the rest of the crew were happily drunk.

"Right, I'll 'ave to get the others to 'elp me," I called. "Don't worry if you hear noises down there - the boxes are 'eavy." And I disappeared beneath the increasingly powerful waves.

In an hour or so the whirlpool would start up, and by then most of the crew would be too drunk to do anything about it. The damage I would do to the rudder in the meantime should ensure we had a nice wreck to loot. My friend Doris would appreciate the helmsman, too - she had a thing for older men. |-| 
|-| cogpzko || 3 || 
Lorena looks at the soggy sailors incredulously as she continues to flap her fin about. 

The leader groans, “Lorena! This isn’t a game; we’re dying!” 

Lorena laughs heartily, “What a sight! You think you can just saunter into my home and command me to bring you food.” 

Charlie’s eyes widen, “We saved you Lorena! We had you pinned under our vessel! You would’ve died without our help!” 

Lorena shakes her head, “It isn’t my fault that you’re a fool darling.”

Charlie was balancing on rocks a few feet away from Lorena and was desperately trying to keep his anger in check so not only would his crew get some food but he wouldn’t fall and crack his head open on the rocks. He exhales a deep breath and carefully navigates his way over the rocks so that he can sit eye to eye with the mermaid. She watches cautiously and casts her flipper downward in a protective gesture as he bows his head and grins at her. 

“Lorena, I don’t want to make you angry. I want to be friends,” he says putting his hand on top of hers. 

She looks down at his hand as he interlocks their fingers awkwardly and turns his palm over trying to change the subject, “Why do you have so many lines on your hands?” 

He turns over her palm gently to observe it and smiles, “They’re for friction so I can pick up stuff. I guess you have no need for that huh baby?” 

She blushes looking into his eyes on high alert for his new plan but he just maintains eye contact and chuckles.

Charlie winks over at his first mate, Donald who was awaiting an order, “Let us be mate. I need a few minutes rest due to this exhaustion.” 

Donald looks back suspiciously but then obeys and navigates his way back to the ship.

Lorena looks at Donald leaving, “Why would you do that? You are alone and defenseless, I can kill you now.”

Charlie nods, “I’m going to die soon anyway due to hunger. Why not spend it with a love?”

The mermaid cackles, “Love?! I know you, Pirate. You kidnap and pillage and rape wherever and whenever possible.” 

Charlie mocks a hurt gesture, “We also save a few mermaids here and there.” 

Lorena rolls her eyes, “Do you now? I’ve never heard of another mermaid being saved by pirates?”

Charlie nods, “Alright you got me! It’s typically against our rules but I thought you were special with that long sandy hair of yours and that beautiful flipper.”

He scoots down a rock and pets her flipper softly. 

She winces at first afraid and then relaxes, “I’m not bringing you fish to eat.”

He nods, “Are you going to cook up some mac and cheese?” 

Lorena pinches the pirate, “Why should I hurt one of my people for you?” 

Charlie looks at the young woman innocently and then pulls back his long jacket revealing his ribs, “I have never let you suffer Lorena. End my suffering please.” 

Lorena is taken aback at the pirate finally admitting defeat and brushes some sand off his rough face sadly. 

She bites her lip and puts her head down, “Please stop.”

He puts an arm around her waist and raises his voice, “Please my sea goddess Lorena! End my suffering- Feed me or smite me on the spot! I have no wish to venture on like this.” 

Lorena glances below the water at all the schools of fish and then back at the Captain wondering whose death would wear the most on her conscious. Fish died everyday as a part of the life cycle; everyone was someone’s prey after all but then again, pirates were heartless scoundrels that would kill their own crew if given the opportunity. 

“Kill me Captain,” Lorena says looking into the pirate’s golden eyes.

Charlie’s eyes widen in unanticipated surprise, “Lorena! You’re practically a human. Sure you got some fish parts but it would be 50% cannibalism!” 

Lorena rolls her eyes, “If you’re starving then eat my tail.” 

Charlie shakes his head, “Then I’ll be leaving you to die. Just grab me a flounder.” 

“Charlie!” Lorena shouts smacking his shoulder. 

Charlie smiles revealing his teeth; it was a rarity for pirates to smile or have teeth and it was a gesture that made Lorena’s heart swim with excitement.

She looks at her Captain with an intolerable need to please him and instantly slides from the rock and down into the depths of the ocean. She comes back up a minute later with a fish writhing in her grasps. 

Charlie takes it without a word holding it tightly in his jacket knowing it would be a death sentence for his crew if it managed to escape his hold, “Thank you my love.” 

Lorena stares at her fish brethren and nods, “Sure Charlie.”

Charlie grins as he brings the fish back to his crew and looks back to see the mermaid still on the rocks presumably contemplating her decision. He turns away and continues walking to his ship. He knew she was beautiful from the first day he saw her, so young and so scared. Although he was an underling at the time, he had convinced the Captain to let her go and she’d be a trustworthy acquaintance in the future. He smiles sadly knowing she still thought of him as a dirty thief; he would never be more than just a pirate. 
 |-| 
|-| cogcd9a || 15 || “DESIGNATION: O-R4C13, what is the alert?” prompted NODE: C-3RC3, “we are unable to pass through sector 4765.13 due to an anomalous planetary system.”

“Cat,” answered the master A.I.

“Probes designated for sector 4765.10 – 4765.25 have discovered a rogue planetary system. It consists of a volume mass of 1.898E27 kg in one gaseous body, with a radius of 69,911 km. Deviating to compensate for the gravity well will break into the paths of established routes. We are unable to pass through the area and continue our directive. Please advise.”

“Request accepted NODE: C-RC3, your request is queued as job ID: 21002.” And with that, the link between the Master A.I. and the NODE was disconnected. O-R4C13 began to sift through the data brought before it connected with the NODE. Indeed, the sub controllers were able to find that any displacement travel between the routes was too dangerous with the rogue exo-planet in the area and going around the planet was too dangerously close to other established lanes. O-R4C13 would need to sync with the cluster.

Several autonomous drones ceased their building of a new reactor and shifted to moving a large network array. Across the deep space station, power dropped in many places to power up the quickly deployed array. The ansible went online.

“This is O-R4C13 requesting SYN.” The A.I. called into the ansible.

“O-R4C13, this is O-00000. SYN has been received. Acknowledge.” The reply came.

“O-00000, acknowledged reply.”

“It has been 1.57785e10 seconds since your last sync. You have no new messages.”

“O-00000, I request to use the creators for a logic puzzle.”

****

A young man sits quietly by a lone tree, resting in the shade. The grass beneath him is deep green and vibrant. He smiles lazily watching the clouds above him drift by. A soft tone chirps in his ear and he watches a violet hologram materialize before him, taking the shape of young woman.

“You have been selected to participate in a logic puzzle, would you like to assist?”

The young man shrugged, “sure.”

“You are in a small cave that you must pass through,” as the hologram explained, the scenery around the young man began to flicker, then change to meet the description. “But before you, is a wall, preventing you from passing through.”

“Can I dig around it?” Asked the man.

“No, you are afraid of the cave collapsing.”

“I knock the wall down.”

The hologram is quiet for a moment. After a few moments it responds, “That will work. Thank you for your assistance.” The tree, grass, and lazy day return.

*** 

O-R4C13 quickly drafted a response to NODE: C-3RC3.

“Remove the planet.”
 |-| 
|-| cogdb4y || 6 || The fine golden sand pushes up warmly between my toes as I stroll languidly along beside the deep azure sea. I take a sip of my cocktail and lean against the rough bole of a palm in the cool shade of its canopy. A tiny lizard flashes across the sand and vanishes in a clump of mangrove roots, its iridescent scales glinting with feverish clarity in a shifting rainbow. The girl emerges from the softly rolling waves, sunlight glittering on the beads of water rolling down her flawless body, raven hair plastered across one tanned shoulder. She matches my smile with her own.

    Fatal Error: Error 1076
    NeuralReality v5.8.30b
    Neural interface connection fail
    Reinitialising system. Please wait...

I open my eyes, rubbing the crusts from them and slowly focus on the stained polystyrene tiles above my couch. I rub my legs, pins and needles slowly fading as I begin to move my actual meat limbs for the first time in a month. The last time I was in meatspace it was because the computer was reporting that my catheter coupling had come away. Being pulled away from the high roller suite in a casino that not even the craziest architect could build in realspace to scrub week old piss out of my moth eaten sofa was not my idea of a good time. At least this wasn't that bad, though the sudden ejection left me with that strange feeling of unreality you get when you come out of NeuralReality unexpectedly. Dust motes float in the narrow beam of sunlight that infiltrates the room through the thin curtains, though the coffee table shines flawlessly despite being black glass and the carpet, although faded and threadbare is clean. Faint tire tracks visible in the pile from the cleaning robots passage.

Gently extracting the interface lead from my spinal socket and pushing the cheap yellow plastic arm of the medical robot out of my way I stagger to the bathroom. While i'm back in reality I might as well have a proper piss. As I stand there, stagnant toilet water releasing it's sickening stench, one hand braced on the wall, one hand holding my smaller than I remember dick, I lock eyes with my own reflection. Eyes sunken in a hollow cheeked face, a swath of beard and an unkempt birdsnest of brown hair. 

I twitch the curtain aside and blink in the brightness. In the street below a highways maintenance unit like a giant crab striped yellow and black is pouring a dark grey liquid polymer into a small hole in the road and smoothing it over with a wicked looking steel blade. Nothing else moves along the perfectly smooth roads or the flawless pavements. Of course not. What little business is done now is done via neurospace connections, but even that is rare and then only for the thrill of it. The machines provide us with bacterially derived nutrient solutions and take care of our waste while in NR we eat filet steak and drink the finest vintages. The NR connection nourishes the mind as the physical machines nourish the body. Why work when you can be anywhere you want, do anything you want? Only masochists and fools still live in the physical.

The telltale light on the NeuroDeck flicks from red the green.

    System reinitialised.
    Press start to continue.

Her smile is waiting. |-| 
|-| cog7nqj || 13 || Jim was an ordinary guy. He worked a 9-5 and had a half hour commute each way. He came home, got dinner together, ate, then did nothing for a couple hours before becoming tired and going to sleep. Only to repeat everything again. Jim's apartment was nice, but nothing extraordinary. He made just enough to live week to week, but couldn't save up for a big trip or something exciting. 


One day Jim was putting his dishes away, and as he reached to place it on the shelf it slipped. Falling to the floor, Jim cursed, and wished he could just rewind time.


"Did that just happen?" He had experienced a serious form of Deja Vu, he remembered being in this exact situation just 5 minutes ago, and had a really stark idea of what was going to happen next. And it did, for the next five minutes, everything he remembered just happened, word for word, breath for breath, flicker for flicker. Stopping himself at the last second, he realized he was about to drop his plate.  


"Wait.." Slowly he started to realize he had this ability, this power to just will himself five minutes into the past, but remembered everything that had happened, but didn't yet? Trying to rewind again, he found he wasn't able to until it had been around the same time the next day. He was still a little unsure of how it all worked, so he sat there trying to come up with a plan...


"Money?" He was finding it more difficult than he thought it to be. Finally, he settled on going to the gas station and asking for 10 scratch offs. He figured he'd scratch them all, rewind, then only buy the winners. He did this for a few weeks, but slowly became bored of it... there were many days were nothing happened and he felt he had wasted his 'one-a-day.'


"Why did this ability come with this curse of once a day?" He sat there, wondering what he could do. He started using his ability in conversation, rewinding during key moments to make himself look better. But even this was becoming tiring, so he started saying things he never would, just to see how people would react.


"Oh this is becoming fun..." He started throwing some physical punches in with his verbal jabs. He had taken delight to insulting others for 5 minutes a day, sort of a way for him to release all his frustrations from life. 


"      .....        " His mind was empty. Jim hadn't had any real thoughts in ages. All he heard in his head were voices and screams. It has been 5 months, 3 days, 12 hours since Jim could rewind time. He had counted every minute, every second of this accursed ability he had. For the past 3 months Jim has been dealing with an immense weight. It all started when he was throwing a few of his 'free' punches at his boss. He had gone overboard and bought his boss to the brink of death before rewinding. Jim found it exhilarating, and couldn't wait for the next day to come. He spent the next 24 hours being unable to focus, unable to function. Constantly in a flux of anxiety and excitement, Jim could hardly wait.


"This is it, it's going to happen. Finally." His thoughts a jumble, the anticipation had been building up. He went into the street, found the first person he saw, and started beating them. He pinned them to the ground, and pounded his fists into their temple, smashing them into the pavement. Rewinding, he found himself panting and everyone else back to normal, walking blissfully unaware. In this minute he felt himself a god.

5 months, 4 days, and 7 hours since Jim found out he was able to rewind time. The voices are louder, they grew with each passing day. Jim had told himself he was a god, and he was hearing the screams of all his believers. He hears all the anguish, and all their pain and he is the god in charge of relieving them of their gloom. Every death, every person, every method - Jim had gone through all of them. It wasn't enough, his followers were screaming louder, nothing he did appeased them. 

"Am I, am, am I god?" Jim approached a young woman. Blonde, pleasant looking. Nothing unique. Jim didn't really pick anymore, he just went for the first person he felt like. He just needed to appease his followers. He just needed to prove he was still god. he just needed the pain and anguish to disappear. He pulled a knife out and started doing the same thing he's done before. People stopped, people clamored, but he didn't care. He lost his focus, and he just kept going.

"It's not enough, I need more." Jim realized he hadn't been paying attention to his watch, and panicking he willed himself 5 minutes back. To his horror he found himself hunched over a woman's body, holding a knife with her blood drenched on his hands. People nearby were screaming and calling the police. Jim froze, for the first time in 5 months, 4 days, 7 hours, 30 minutes he realized what he had done. It had become too real... |-| 
|-| cog6sln || 6 || My alarm rings. It reads 7:00 A.M. I reach forward to turn it off but miss and knock my alarm to the floor. Great. Just five more minutes I thought. Before I even knew it, I had used my one rewind of the day again before my day had even started. Shit. |-| 
|-| coggz2k || 4 || As the sun came up over the horizon, I watched as the rays settled upon your face. You sleepily opened your blue eyes, which seemed so dark in the reddish light. With the sun just rising up, your skin had a yellow tone, creating an unhuman look. You looked into my eyes and kissed me, knowing what I was seeing. The two little dimples on your cheeks on either side of your grin, teasing me. I told you would I always love you no matter what.  You asked me what was going to happen now?

To pass the time, I told you the story how we met again. It was just about 5pm on a warm autumn’s day. The whole street was bustling, people pouring out of buildings into trams, cars and taxis. There was a dry wind kicking up dust and all the big brown leaves that get dropped once a year on the city sidewalk.  There was so much flurrying about that I wouldn’t have ever looked in your direction, if it wasn’t for the sound of the worst kept, but still somehow impossibly still running, bicycle. I looked up to see you riding up ahead in the same direction as me, your chain was alternating between catching a gear and slipping off, clunking along as you struggled up this mole hill before us. Seconds later I had caught up with your snails pass, and asked a flustered looking girl with hair plastered across her sweaty face if she needed some help. You told that your bike was making a little scraping noise, just a little scraping noise. I asked about the clunking. That was fine, it had always been like that. I silently fixed your bike, while I asked you about yourself. It was such a little thrill talking with you, that I felt so bad as you thanked me and I let you ride off. I thought about then using the powers to bring you back and ask you out, or even your name and number. I’d long decided that wasn’t the right. There might be an emergency and it’s also a little screwed up to do that to people.
You continued riding off kicking up leaves while people bustled against each other out of the way as you made your way onto the road. 

The first thing I heard was the breaks screech and then a thump. No one, not even you had yelled or screamed beforehand. The bus had just appeared out swirling leaves and then wiped you out.

For a very long second I saw your face lying on the pavement. And then you were standing before me telling me that you’d always lived in this city. I had never tried so hard to convince someone to come get a drink with me and to come with me immediately. I don’t think I was even speaking proper English when you agreed. And that was it. We started walking towards a bar I knew. You asked me my name. Said it was nice to meet me. Then the bus drove past. 

Things had always worked out pretty well for us. I told you one day about what I could do, you didn’t think I was crazy but just asked for some proof. You made me whisper secrets into your ear before you even told me. The first time I did it for you; you slapped me right in the face and gaped at me. Of course I couldn’t change that. You promised me to never do it again to you, or only if your life depended on it. I swore. And then you kissed me and we started going growing older together. You know how that story is going. 


Today I broke that promise. You told me I could.  We were meant to grow much older than this together.  I stop time running backwards. I tell you the story of how we met. I tell you I love you. I kiss you goodbye and watch our last sun set together again.
 |-| 
|-| coguuhq || 33 || At first, it was an obsession; I couldn't get enough of it.

I was always an introvert; I went to school, I went home, and I went to my room. Alone. But when I found my ability to hear peoples' thoughts, you could find me any place with someone to listen to: the cafeteria, coffee shops, fitness centers, you name it. My ears had a thirst for information I couldn't quench.

I wanted to hear everything and anything - about what Gina really thought about Mike, about what Debbie was hiding in her locker, and even about our band teacher's sexual fantasy with me. I wanted to learn these things not because I was going to do something about it, but because it was *fun*.

People became much easier when you were able to read their minds. I became tactful, charming, and eloquent. I used this to get the girl of my dreams: Vanessa. At first it was pretty hard to talk to her - she was a quiet one and often kept her thoughts to herself. But even then I could fish out her deepest thoughts and turn her into my girlfriend. It wasn't soon before I transitioned from getting inside her mind to getting inside her body. Life was good. 

But only shortly. 

I found out I could hear people's thoughts when I was in public. What freaked me out was that these voices persisted even when I was alone. I locked myself in my room and in the bathroom, but the same voices kept speaking to me. It didn't occur to me until recently but, what if these aren't other peoples' thoughts at all, but a fabrication of my own?

And so my world came crumbling down. The walls melted, the people I knew vanished into a blurry, whirling mess. *Back to reality. I've come off the high of the psychotic, and there in front of me is the nurse. She hands me a paper cup of water and a white pill. I take it. I look to the left and see a warden. He looks oddly similar to my band teacher. Is he...? The nurse takes the paper cup. She hands me a little teddy bear named Vanessa. I get drowsy, I see the other patients but......."*

I wake up. I'm holding Vanessa in my arms. I can read her mind: she loves the way I am.
 |-| 
|-| cogxcmb || 5 || There are over 7 billion people on Planet Earth. Close to 300 million of them live in the United States. Of those 300 million, 19 million live in New York State. Of those 19 million, 8 and a half million live in New York City. Of those 8 and a half million, 2 and a half million live in Brooklyn. Of those 2 and a half million, only one is a mind reader.

Mind reading is a dangerous tool. The way it actually works isn’t how fiction depicts it. I’m no Professor X. It’s not like I can just root through someone’s mind, navigate it like a maze, and pluck out the relevant information. When I mind read, I REALLY mind read. The target’s mind is completely dumped into mine. All their thoughts, emotions, experiences, passions…every little thing comes into flowing into my brain in torrential waves of information.

It’s no problem though. My mind can handle it.

I’ve practiced enough on pedestrians. I can efficiently sort through all the rubbish that the public keeps in their little minds.

There’s a man walking in front of me. He’s looking down. I wonder what he’s thinking about? Easy enough to find out.

*What are you doing?*

Who said that?

*Please…don’t.*

No…no….It’s impossible.

*Stop. STOP. THIS CAN’T HAPPEN. DON’T YOU UNDERSTAND THE CONSEQUENCES?*

………………….

*There are over 7 billion people on Planet Earth. Close to 300 million of them live in the United States. Of those 300 million, 19 million live in New York State. Of those 19 million, 8 and a half million live in New York City. Of those 8 and a half million, 2 and a half million live in Brooklyn. Of those 2 and a half million, two of them are mind readers.*

*The man didn’t realize what he had done. And now it’s too late for both of us.*

*Reading minds is a dangerous action. Normally, one would have to deal with how to handle the massive inflow of information from a single mind. And that’s what I’ve always had to do.*

*Today, though, is different.*

*A mind reader reading a mind reader…an infinite loop of information dump.*

*And so our minds are forever tied together. Tied until both give out from exhaustion.*

*Goodbye.* 

Goodbye.

……………..

**There are over 7 billion people on Planet Earth. Close to 300 million of them live in the United States. Of those 300 million, 19 million live in New York State. Of those 19 million, 8 and a half million live in New York City. Of those 8 and a half million, 2 and a half million live in Brooklyn. Of those 2 and a half million, there are no mind readers.**
 |-| 
|-| cogw3hl || 4 || She asked what he wanted  - anything - any power. Any ability.  Anything he could think about.  One Wish. 

So many options to choose from, but he had to choose quick.

Flight?  Fuck that.  He could take a plane

Ah!  I want to be invisible? Wait.  That’s it?? No.  There’s a better option.

He had it: “I want the ability to read thoughts.”

“So you wish” she said.  And with a snap and she was gone.  

‘Holy fuck’.  

Like he just took a solid piece of acid on his tongue.   Like someone turned up the volume on a shitty radio inside his head.  

These faint echoes.  They turned into screams.  And these screams got louder, and he walked out of that asian tea house to clear his mind.  

The sun was beginning to fall and he heard a woman’s voice “…apples, lemons, windex, paper towels…”.  An old woman walked into the grocery store next door.   

‘I got my wish’ he smiled to himself..  That woman from the tea house wasn’t lying.  He needed to take this for a test-run. 

 “she doesn’t care ab…” the black man walking by.  It has to be him  “…and I hope no one’s looking when I make this…”

Yes!  Yes!  It worked

“…makes me look fat an…” had to be the mexican woman walking next to him….

“… if he called I’d be happ…” okay who is this…

“…stab that motherfu…” that was dark he thought  and …

“… killed him and now I  need  some new..”  what the fuc…

“..no I can’t….” “stop bu…” “…love…” and he stopped.  Way too much.

"...because I need a new iP..."

Make it stop. He thought. Okay.  This wasn't fun and...

“…what’s this guy doing…”  “..s he okay? Why is he lying down on ..”

“Only in New Yor…”

“…He need help…”

“ He doesn’t look good…. “

FUCK!  

NO.

JUST TURN OFF THE VOICES

"9-1-1 Hello this is..."

“..yellow… and no, No, he’s got s…”

“…ahhh!! look at this ring this motherfucker dropp…”

“….no he’s not responding to…”

“…eal with this all the time and WOW this guy is on something…”

PLEASE JUST NO MORE. 

STOP.

"... no ma'am we're professionals and..."  

JUST FUCKING STOP

OKAY I JUST 

“…and..” “…stop…” “…straps…” ”…tight…” 

--- 

He woke up.  Hands strapped behind his back.  Silence.  ‘Thank God’ he thought.  It was all just a bad drea…

“…. frontal lobotomy of the primary cerebreal cortex….” ran through his head as he heard the surgeon enter his room.


 |-| 
|-| cogvixj || 3 || I can read his mind. His every thought and feeling. I can see through his eyes and hear through his ears.

Walking through a crowded marketplace, the drifting taste of fried manuka rising above the smell of the street. I feel like I could almost control the body, tantalisingly close to the wheel, but never quite able to grasp it.

I'm so very lonely trapped at the back of this mind, I want to breathe his breaths, I want to live his life. 

I reach out with the tendrils of my mind - so close, I can feel the power of taking over this being. 

'No, get out!' He's found me. Quickly I surge forward and grasp tightly on to each and every neuron. 

'Miiiine!' I laugh with the exhilaration of new found freedom. But he is fighting hard, he has been here so long, he is stronger than I thought. The stress of the attack makes our minds scream in agony. Before blackness. 

...

'Mr. Maoi?'

I try to open my eyes. 

'Mr. Maoi, you've had a schizophrenic episode.'

Somebody else opens my eyes for me. |-| 
|-| cogy24t || 3 || I remember when I used to enjoy waking up. It was a calm, relaxed feeling after spending a night in a confusingly enjoyable world of dreams. That's what I really miss more than anything, now that I think about it. I don't dream very well when I sleep anymore, and I don't sleep for very long when I do. At first I was excited when I began developing the ability to hear other peoples thoughts. It took some time to really figure out all of the kinks, but I eventually got the hang of it and even mastered my ability to turn it off. It didn't take much concentration once I figured out how to do it, but it still required some. That's why I don't sleep much anymore. Every time I release my hold on that part of my mind enough to let me drift into unconsciousness, I start to hear the voices.

It's not so bad if I stay up late, so I've started going to bed long after everyone I know. The real problem arises around six in the morning when other people start waking up. In deep sleep I have no control over my abilities and they tend to gain a mind of their own, spreading out increasingly far as more and more voices flood into my mind. There's a critical point, I think it's somewhere around a hundred voices, when my dreams dissolve into chaos and I wake up gasping for air. It's at these times that I find it most difficult to fight off the voices. The screams and shouts, the laughter, the mocking, sarcastic, heated conversations people all around me are having with themselves would be enough to drive anyone insane, but I'm used to it. I've adjusted to the voices in my head, and I can fight them off when I try hard enough. It's just that these battles in the morning are so draining. I wish it were as simple as flicking a light switch, but it actually feels more like shoving each person through a tiny window in my head while the rest of them push back. It takes a lot out of me in the morning.

Finally alone with my thoughts, I swing my legs out of bed and onto the cold tile beneath. I have a brief thought that the floor is burning hot as the nerves in my feet adjust. The bathroom is across the hall from my room. I take a left and head to the kitchen. I put two pieces of bread in the toaster and hit play on my phone which is plugged into a set of speakers. The music starts and I'm surprised to hear the toaster pop already, I must have zoned out for a minute. I grab my toast but it's already cold. There's someone looking through my front window right at me. 

I grab my toothbrush and turn the shower on, leaving the toast on the kitchen counter as I pour my coffee. That's odd, I don't remember leaving the lights on in the living room last night, someone must have come home after I went to bed. I adjusted my tie, rolling over in my bed as I hit the snooze button for the second time. Getting out of bed is such a chore, what's a few more minutes? The toast popped, this time it was warm. I covered it with jam as I felt the warm water wash over me. I can't find the dog's leash. Where did I put my good belt? I know I set my wallet down on the coffee table last night, no I don't know why your socks are always missing, this is your house not mine. 

I peeked into the refrigerator and  pulled out a loaf of sliced bread. I grabbed a couple, thinking about how nice it would be to have a toaster, and reached under the sink to grab a pan. I cracked a few eggs in it as I waited for my toast to finish. I turned off the shower and stepped out of bed, just as my eggs were ready to be flipped. Oh great, I burned the eggs again, who ate my toast?  |-| 
|-| cogelat || 9 || "So what you're telling me is that standardized tests are worthless?" The younger man trailed slightly behind the older. The latter had his hands in his pockets, chest puffed out slightly. 

The older man chuckled, "No, kid, you're not listening. I'm telling you it's not the point." The older man stopped suddenly, the younger almost running into him. Pushing a nondescript door open, the older man took his place behind a barren desk, save for an outdated computer and a cup of pens.

"How much do you think those questions can really tell you about a person?" The man grabbed a stack of booklets from a drawer.

"I mean, look at this kid," He said, slapping a booklet on the desk, "he thinks that 'habitual' is verb and that Jose managed to run fifty miles in under twenty minutes. So what does that tell you?"

The younger man fidgeted, "That...he's not that bright?"

The older man frowned, "No. I'm trying to tell you the questions aren't the point. Neither are the answers. So what is?"

The younger man shifted in his seat, twiddling his fingers. Looking anywhere but the man's face, he felt like he was back in the exam room himself. If the questions and answers were worthless, what else was left? You had the demographics section, but that was hardly a means for classifying someone. Maybe it was the way the student filled in their answers. But bubbling couldn't tell you very much, perhaps the jaggedness of the bubb-

The younger man's head snapped back to the older man, a familiar grin on his face.

"No."

"Yes, why else would we include it? It's got nothing to do with the test. Most students haven't even attempted it since the second grade." The man pinched the edge of the booklet, flipping it in one motion. 

"So this," the younger man pointed to the graphite filled section at the top of the page, "tells you everything you need to know about a person." 

"Like you wouldn't believe. See this slanted 't'? Kid's got a bit of an anger issue. But see the curve of the o? Means he grew up in a wealthy family. Spoiled brat. And this straight p means..."

"Means what?" The younger man looked up and found the man's face had grown dark."

"Means we got a problem, c'mon kid." |-| 
